19
rape and murder
Moninder Singh Pandher
the killing of a teen
his spokesman
government.
fight against the system of apartheid, or legal racial separation, that was present in South Africa until 1994.
a series of killings and threats by Muslim extremists ordering them to convert to Islam or face death.
1,424
1,424 families,
Muslim
the federal government
engineering, physics, chemistry and other sciences.
U.S. President-elect Barack Obama
nuclear program.
his campaign message of change
Barack Obama
U.S.
Ali Larijani said Saturday that Obama
Iran's parliament speaker
mayor of the town of Constanta,
he wore a Nazi uniform during a fashion show
a Nazi uniform
the Nazi swastika symbol on the uniform before
"Entourage."
a used car salesman
"Bravery,"
"Fashion is being hit particularly hard
doll clothes
Nilsson.
at the Savannah College of Art and Design.
urged the body to recognize Palestine as a non-member state, calling for a more definitive timetable for Israeli-Palestinian peace talks. But he also warned that a U.S. veto of the bid for full membership in the Security Council could be dangerous and might spark violence.
urged the body to recognize Palestine as a non-member state, calling for a more definitive timetable for Israeli-Palestinian peace talks. But he also warned that a U.S. veto of the bid for full membership in the Security Council could be dangerous and might spark violence.
a U.S. veto of the bid for full membership in the Security Council
first-degree murder
"the armed and forcible confinement"
Monday
encourage your students to learn about and appreciate the history, culture and achievements of African-Americans.
recognize the accomplishments of African-Americans,
confronting various world crises, such as climate change and food shortages,
crises, such as climate change and food shortages,
called for world unity in confronting various world crises, such as climate change and food shortages,
be part of the swap deal
Stuttgart
the season.
Zlatan Ibrahimovic and Samuel Eto'o
midfielder Alexander Hleb
be part of the swap deal that saw Zlatan Ibrahimovic and Samuel Eto'o switch clubs earlier this week.
care for their children if
reported for duty
Individual Ready Reserve program.
"I love my niece very much and while she has made some decisions that have not been in her best interest, she has my full support,"
murder
Behavioral Science Unit are assisting Cleveland police, Cleveland
"Amber"
12:30 a.m. October 9
to be between 14 and 17.
"Amber"
unprecedented effort to reach out
a massive stimulus bill
Obama
sign the bill
on a party-line vote showed he has failed to deliver the "change" he promised.
Sen. Lindsey Graham,
that there is a biological foundation to gender identity,
a gender transition and then want to reverse it,
0.25 to 0.5 percent
biological foundation to
Tomas Medina Caracas
A key rebel commander and fugitive from a U.S. drug trafficking indictment
a FARC camp in the jungle in the south of the country.
Colombian military
Rapid Response Force,
Alleged cocaine trafficker and FARC rebel
"The death of 'El Negro Acacio' was confirmed by various sources, including members of FARC itself."
charged with conspiracy to import cocaine into the United States and manufacturing and distributing cocaine within Colombia to fund the FARC's 42-year insurgency against the government.
Alleged cocaine trafficker and FARC rebel
A key rebel commander and fugitive from a U.S. drug trafficking indictment
United States
in November 2002
November 2002
BOGOTA, Colombia
cocaine trafficker
Tomas Medina Caracas,
Caracas managed the rebel group's sales of cocaine
Tomas Medina Caracas,
drug trafficking indictment
"Two
snowmobilers
in southern British Columbia,
a day after avalanches
southern British Columbia,
1996
The Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam (LTTE)
military garrison there, according
Sri Lankan soldiers
Elephant Pass,
Sri Lankan soldiers
Malcolm McLaren
Burk,
capital murder
was found shot on North College Street, a few miles north of campus, on Tuesday night. She died later at a hospital.
died
on fire
insurgents
Farmers
countered that they need to reinvest the profits and that the higher taxes make it difficult for them to make a living.
export
August 28.
president Luca di Montezemolo
Argentina
small farming town 105 kilometers (65 miles) southwest
French Cesar Awards.
"La Vie En Rose"
"La Vie En Rose"
"Persepolis"
make 50 films a year,
Stevens' Listeria
Police cracked down on drug dealers,
Thirty people
campaign March 20
stabbed
assault
the person alleged to have stabbed Malloy,
second-degree assault
Bhutto was hit on the right side of her skull with shrapnel.
bullet wounds
Former Pakistani Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto
CNN.
"big wound" on the side of her head
flying shrapnel
his office was
Phoenix, Arizona,
paying your mortgage and putting food on the table,"
Lehman Brothers.
have had a ripple effect on other businesses in their community
mistreatment
presidential election,
most powerful clerics to approve a special committee to investigate alleged mistreatment of detainees arrested in the aftermath
alleged mistreatment of detainees arrested in the aftermath of the disputed presidential elections.
alleged mistreatment of detainees arrested in the aftermath of the disputed presidential elections.
Iranian presidential
Mom.
her one-woman road show, "All the Lives of Me,"
hug a lot of people."
"The Brady Bunch" mom,
Florence Henderson,
"The Brady Bunch"
10:30 a.m.
agency personnel
"following the unconfirmed sighting of" such a man.
an armed man had entered an office building,
told reporters that no gunman or weapon was ever found. He added that the building, where the gunman was once thought to have entered, has been secured after authorities went through
called off their response late Friday afternoon
Rivers:
Joan Rivers: Oh, [it] shouldn't have happened. We were more acquaintances than friends. But we spent one amazing day on a boat with my whole
Oh, [it] shouldn't have happened. We were more acquaintances than friends. But we spent one amazing day on a boat with my whole family and she and Liam and the boys.
Totally happy, totally devoted to each other.
2005
"the Formula One campaign is [no longer] a key promoter
it is to pull out of Formula One at the end of the
2005
has announced it is to pull out of Formula One
at the end of the 2009 season.
restructure the group's motorsport activities
Gladys Knight
TV executive Suzanne de Passe,
Elizabeth Taylor
Clifton Davis
Wizard of Oz (Victor
Willy Wonka and the Chocolate Factory
February.
1 p.m. Monday.
least 5.0
marry, or not marry, a person of another race resides with the individual and cannot be infringed by the State."
"American
are of different races.
Louisiana
Tuesday
Diana and Dodi step into an elevator at the Ritz Hotel.
buying an engagement ring.
August 31, 1997
The jury
six-month process.
security camera at the Ritz Hotel in Paris
pregnancy.
just hours before
he was buying an engagement ring.
Bodyguard Trevor Rees-Jones was the sole survivor.
establish cause of death
unseen footage
Diana, Princess of Wales, taken just hours before
Lord Justice Scott Baker
tt may never be known for certain whether Princess Diana was pregnant when she died in the Paris car crash.
Ralph Nicoletti, 18, Michael Contreras, 18, and Brian Carranza, 21,
Ralph Nicoletti,
Nicoletti and Contreras
Ralph Nicoletti,
800 or so
superdelegates are free to vote however they want.
however they want.
of superdelegates
our process
800 or so
public could react strongly against that,"
are allocated with the understanding they'll vote the way their state went in
800 or so
a piece of debris
debris won't threaten the international space station,
The dimensions of the satellite
astronauts Mike Fincke and Sandy Magnus, and cosmonaut Yury Lonchakov
astronauts Mike Fincke and Sandy Magnus, and cosmonaut Yury Lonchakov
maneuver the international space station
a Soviet-era satellite
computer simulation.
the Fuji track
the 1982 arcade game
2009
Suzuka
computer simulation.
2009
Computer-aided design (CAD)
crashed
James Lyon, assistant controller of the RAF's aeronautical rescue coordination center at RAF Kinloss, Scotland.
Royal Air Force officer
and they're not willing to take a risk. Have fun with it. It's only decorating.
look at the way the space is being used,
host
"We will take military action wherever we get information about the presence of militants,"
military offensive against Islamic militants in South Waziristan had ended, then saying there is no timeframe for its completion.
an intense operation to rout militants from their haven along the country's border with Afghanistan.
there is no timeframe for its completion.
conducting an intense operation to rout militants from their haven along the country's border with Afghanistan.
waterboarding, sleep deprivation and other coercive practices
President George W. Bush
former President George W. Bush
Rice was among top Bush advisers
less than 150 feet from shore,
near the northern shore of Puerto Rico,
man's body
the roughness of the area.
launched two more search missions Tuesday morning for four men and one woman still missing.
come up on stage
When I was little my dad had this box car and one day he put a George Carlin tape in it and it got stuck. So for a year until the car died we listened to this George Carlin tape over and over and over again.
stage
When I was little my dad had this box car and one day he put a George Carlin tape in it and it got stuck. So for a year until the car died we listened to this George Carlin tape over and over and over again.
tales of meeting Carlin, and the impact he had on their lives.
There's a vibrant art scene, where each month the gallery district is alive with opening receptions and throngs of people interested in getting out and seeing the scene. There's also the internationally renowned Art Basel art fair that comes to town every year putting Miami on the cultural map.
Miami
city's nightlife and restaurants,
Miami
recognized the photos
videotaped rape of a toddler
Chester Arthur Stiles
Henderson, Nevada,
Monday night
37,
32,000-tonne Malaspina Castle
seized by Somali pirates
The 32,000-tonne Malaspina Castle
me cry with joy."
explosion
Elissa Montanti,
his leg and his childhood.
"I feel an ache when I think of her. Every time I remember her, I cry,"
a prosthetic leg
died on the scene. I still remember her screams."
Stack, wife of Andrew Joseph "Joe" Stack III, of negligence, alleging she knew or should have known that her husband was a threat to others and, thus, could have prevented the attack,
alleging she knew or should have known that her husband was a threat to others and, thus, could have prevented the attack,
plane crash.
"hundreds of hardened al Qaeda and Taliban in dug-in positions,"
region of Tora Bora,
The troops are targeting "hundreds of hardened al Qaeda and Taliban in dug-in positions,"
Air and ground strikes
no substantiated reports
remote mountain Tora Bora region on the border of Afghanistan and Pakistan.
Joker in "The Dark Knight."
actor
the little film
$10 billion
Afghanistan
al Qaeda and Taliban militants
hit and set on fire,
Israeli military action in Gaza is comparable to that of German soldiers during
Staszow.
Gerald Kaufman,
step up attacks against innocent civilians."
Paso, Texas.
$50,000
says, he earned $50,000 making about 20
he spends every day training at a boxing gym
into El Paso.
spends every day training at a boxing gym
"It is our policy not to comment on rumor or speculation,"
R&D
"raise productivity."
Michael Lampe, a Wyeth representative.
Pfizer
drugmaker
about 800
Pfizer
a deal to buy rival drugmaker Wyeth
anti-tip safety brackets
100
will notify nearly 4 million customers who may have bought stoves between July 2000 and September 2007 that they either can get anti-tip safety brackets installed for free or receive gift cards or reimbursements of up
to retain the high confidence we have in General Dave Petraeus and his team out there.
a magazine article's assertion that he had been forced to resign over his opposition to a possible war with Iran.
to retain the high confidence we have in General Dave Petraeus and his team out there.
clashing with President Bush.
Adm. William Fallon
William Fallon
he had been forced to resign over his opposition to a possible war with Iran.
both of the conflicts.
eternal conflicts of the Middle East and Kashmir,
the Middle East and Kashmir,
Afghan people.
Sony Ericsson WTA Tour "will review appropriate future actions with regard to the future of the Dubai tournament."
ban Saturday, just before her scheduled flight to Dubai.
demonstrations against Israel
Shahar Peer
WTA
The National Indian Foundation,
on its Web site.
A car bomb
U.S. Embassy
north of Beirut,
Beirut,
Twenty-one others
struck a U.S. Embassy vehicle
three
three
highway north of Beirut,
U.S. Embassy vehicle
driver of the embassy vehicle
Lebanese nationals,
Lebanese
dragging you out of the bedroom and onto the dance floor.
flat, but a hit with teens
Disney's popular television series
Miley Cyrus,
Tennessee
such courage and dignity,"
4
anal cancer
"very, very serious."
Stage 4
Thornton's electric hillbilly band
"mashed potatoes with no gravy"
reportedly greeted with loud applause
Stamford, Connecticut,
Billy Bob Thornton's
because my clients tell me," she said.
the government cabinets of half the countries in the world."
St. Petersburg.
drunk passenger
drunk passenger
drunk passenger
from Turkey to Russia
to openly sign a card demanding a union and then, if a majority sign, the company involved
allow a company's employees to openly sign a card demanding a union
Werder Bremen
to win titles
Carlos Alberto
Fluminense,
Borussia Dortmund
Carlos Alberto declared that he would not play for Corinthians again
Werder Bremen
Fluminense.
Portuguese title as well as the Champions League.
Bundesliga club Werder Bremen
FC Porto
Carlos Alberto,
the Portuguese title as well as the Champions League.
7.8 million euros
Motorcycle accidents
second training course
In June, a week before the qualifying round of the
Eric Shanteau,
Olympic swimmer
"The financial troubles of his companies,
economic crisis had "broken" Merckle.
cement-maker HeidelbergCement and generic drug-maker Ratiopharm.
L'AQUILA, Italy
G-8 summit.
Leaders of both industrialized powers and emerging economies
Thursday's meeting with emerging economies including China also secured a commitment from the developing countries to work for limiting global warming to the 2 degree Celsius threshold,
Leaders of both industrialized powers and emerging economies
global warming
Durban, South Africa,
Durban, South Africa,
most vulnerable countries to climate change,
Representatives from 20 countries
20 countries
"updated intelligence assessment"
to overhaul the setup for a missile defense
"updated intelligence assessment" about Iran's ability to hit Europe with missiles.
Western concerns about Iran's nuclear ambitions
criminal gangs behind much of the drug trade in West Africa
Toxins from dumped electronics
the developed nations
cancers.
U.S.
taking responsibility
found that in Europe only 25 percent of the e-waste was recycled safely. In the U.S. it is only 20 percent and in developing countries it is less than one percent.
25 percent
2004
The 2009 World Yo-Yo Contest
Portland
hundreds of adults
18
12 federal
followed the arrest Saturday of Arnoldo Rueda Medina,
Michoacan state,
the number of federal police officers patrolling the state of Michoacan,
Timothy Geithner's job is secure despite critics calling for his
send more troops to Afghanistan.
was to send more troops to Afghanistan.
taking office was to send more troops to Afghanistan.
Dick Cheney
"I fundamentally disagree with Dick
Dick Cheney.
the United States
Afghan
do the heavy lifting in Afghanistan, and if Obama is serious about securing the country and rolling back the Taliban, he really doesn't have much choice but
"nasty, brutish and short."
Americans,
Ku Klux
the Ku Klux Klan,
Ku Klux Klan
Christopher Shelton Timmons,
grenade, a pistol, ammunition, loaded magazines
deadly weapon, having an unregistered firearm and having unregistered ammunition,
officer
grenade, a pistol, ammunition, loaded magazines
ask for directions two blocks from the Capitol building.
he believed Murray should be eligible for early release if he is given prison time.
he believed Murray should be eligible for early release if he is given prison time.
a second contempt citation for derogatory comments he allegedly made about a rival witness.
"multiple instances" where Dr. White was "trying to sabotage the trial."
Olafur Ragnar Grimsson
Iceland
combating climate change.
she is the biggest and best loser that we have
join Bayern Munich at the end of the season
Olic
Lewis
Seattle man has been charged with insurance fraud for allegedly sinking his
Lewis
insurance fraud
Puget Sound Bay
a hole
people were killed
He wounded three people before turning the gun on himself,
Germany,
a shooting at a courthouse
turning the gun on himself,
William Jackson
was a slave in the home of Confederate president Jefferson Davis
in the home of Confederate president Jefferson Davis
Ken Dagler,
a Tracy, California, high school gym
Melissa Huckaby,
Red Mass,
lecture and give information
legal profession,
1952
oranges
family has been growing citrus in Vero Beach, Florida,
winter weather
The winter weather blasting much of the country has made it to Florida, and the cold front now moving through is expected to last longer than usual.
destroyed.
fate of
the Tigers
exceeded 100,000 individuals.
Paris, France.
in military prison
planting weapons to make the men appear as if they were Taliban fighters
self-defense.
Army Staff Sgt. Calvin Gibbs
in nine Broadway and nine Off-Broadway productions,
cable TV series "Mad Men," has acted in nine Broadway and nine Off-Broadway productions, such as "Sunset Boulevard," "Beauty and the Beast," "Jeffrey" and "Starlight Express."
"We have to work toward acceptance on all levels,"
Vella Gulf
The
western Gulf of Aden
would-be hijackers.
Polaris.
his 2005 autobiography, "The Bad Life."
deplored the arrest last week of filmmaker
paying to have sex with "boys" in Thailand.
Frederic Mitterrand
Sarkozy
said he never had sex with "young boys"
they contain carcinogens and other toxic chemicals dangerous to humans.
contain carcinogens and other toxic chemicals dangerous to humans.
found they contain carcinogens and other toxic
E-cigarettes
a vapor
Padma Lakshmi
Lakshmi,
Lakshmi,
Padma
Padma Lakshmi is pregnant with
Obama
the other side of the aisle and bringing us together,"
2002,
12 counts of burglary.
home invasion and murders.
Connecticut
Nigeria
attacks have cost the oil industry millions.
usually over 30, in mid-to-late career and can afford higher-end hotels but
"Americans have privacy issues.
the communal atmosphere
The term "flashpacker" likely originated in Australia, and combines the term "flash" -- meaning "stylish" -- with "backpacker,"
"There's a sense of community, and there's a social aspect to it that's pretty significant,"
They are usually over 30, in mid-to-late career and can afford higher-end hotels but
taken into custody
Henderson, Nevada,
my share of nightmares,"
23 felony counts, including a charge of lewdness with a minor, sexual assault and the use of a child in the production of pornography,
"I've had my share of nightmares,"
"I've had my share of nightmares,"
lewdness with a minor, sexual assault and the use of a child in the production of pornography,
"I've had my share of nightmares,"
videotaped rape of a 2-year-old girl.
after a Henderson, Nevada, police officer pulled over the white Buick Century he
Jeff Banks
"mortified"
court appearance in Las Vegas, Nevada, on Wednesday morning on charges stemming from the videotaped rape of a 2-year-old girl.
"He said he'd been in the Navy and, you know, I was looking for a strong guy to represent to my sons what
Celta Vigo
English Premier League
World Cup draw, live on Friday 4th December.
with rubbing alcohol and set him on fire.
one of the youths had stolen his father's bicycle.
Monday,
a year.
could have their service cut
Internet service providers could be allowed to cut service for as long as a year.
French Internet users
a special government anti-piracy agency
a special government anti-piracy
fragmented access and distribution.
MyHappyPlanet,
to make seamless that virtual space between desktop and handset.
fragmented access and distribution.
compatibility with Skype, Google Talk, AOL Instant Messenger, Windows Live Messenger, Yahoo! Live Messenger, Jabber, MySpace and Facebook.
instant messaging, photo sharing and VoIP for cheaper telephony,
industry is to make seamless that virtual space between desktop and handset.
VoIP
Sharon Tate,
terminally ill
denied a compassionate release from prison.
diagnosed with brain cancer
assault with a dangerous weapon,
U.S. Border Patrol agents convicted in 2006 of shooting and wounding an unarmed illegal immigrant
U.S. Border Patrol
sentences they received are too harsh
U.S. Border Patrol agents
shooting and wounding an unarmed illegal immigrant
Pakistan?
is further destabilizing an incredibly unstable situation.
weak
Pakistan could form a broad-based government of national unity and appeal for more international support in terms of encouraging financial aid and having trade restrictions lifted so they can improve the economy.
Punjab terrorist groups
attacks and advances
There is a weak government
option of re-signing Brazilian midfielder Fabio Rochemback.
Brazilian Rivaldo
midfielders Fabio Rochemback and Gaizka
Middlesbrough have decided against taking up the option of re-signing Brazilian midfielder Fabio Rochemback.
Consumer Credit Counseling
video
video store.
She had 17 credit cards and admits that living beyond her means
totalled nearly $80,000.
dramatic
"Crouching Tiger Hidden Dragon,"
acting
she sustained an injury while training at the Royal Academy of Dance in London.
Mir Hossein Moussavi
Mir Hossein Moussavi
400
elite light infantry fighting force
Four active-duty U.S. soldiers
Dahlonega, Georgia,
planning to rob drug traffickers.
U.S. District Court.
1970s.
Agent Brett Turner
an unmanned drone
militants
Pakistan
12th missile attack
pickup truck carrying suspected militants near the town of Wana in South Waziristan
children
sense of timing
surgeon general of the United States
30 inches
Interstate 5 between Seattle and Oregon
5 between Seattle and Oregon
47 residents
between Seattle and Portland until Saturday,
Green faces life in prison without the possibility of parole, or
of raping and killing a 14-year-old Iraqi girl.
Kentucky.
the jury
distribution of weapons to people who then killed Tutsis.
governor
Renzaho
genocide, crimes against humanity and war crimes.
the International Criminal Tribunal for Rwanda (ICTR).
below what is now rolling Irish countryside,
as much as $300 million on the market,
more than 1 million ounces of gold may lie below what is now rolling Irish countryside,
$300 million
may be the largest gold deposit ever found in the British Isles,
Barack Obama's inauguration is a huge milestone in the fight for equal rights
a Democratic candidate,
This is a day of jubilation and celebration.
equal rights
as a Democratic candidate, a U.S. senator from Illinois, and a progressive.
"the black candidate."
regained control
are using ships they have already hijacked and larger ships
are using ships they have already hijacked and larger ships from which they are launching skiffs,
Capt. Richard Phillips of the Maersk Alabama
1963 heist
on compassionate grounds.
a London prison
"If your whole candidacy is about words, then they should be your own words,"
Clinton
Barack Obama
Hillary Clinton
Obama
downplayed the
had "lifted rhetoric" from
support a unified Palestinian government
al Qaeda-like jihadist
begun to cite the example of Salah al-Din al-Ayubi,
recent shift of opinion toward the peace process
Jund Ansar Allah,
Palestinians should be willing to live peacefully with a Jewish state in their midst.
the religiously based radical movement has subtly changed its uncompromising posture on Israel.
Bran Castle, Romania
Anne Rice's
top destinations
3-year-old
a suspect in the videotaped rape of a 3-year-old girl four years ago.
rape of a 3-year-old girl.
videotaped rape of a 3-year-old girl
3-year-old
Tina Allen
Tina Allen
card this year
Service filing deadline
pay with
Internal Revenue
credit card
granted him a fourth, then a fifth bottle,
interfering with a flight crew
cemetery
Eden Memorial Park, in Mission Hills, California,
Eden Memorial Park,
that Eden Memorial Park and its management for the better part of 15 years were engaging in improper burial practices,
as many as 500 graves may have been torn up without the families' permission.
U.S. President George W. Bush
14.15 percent gain.
two of
Heavily armed Nigerian rebels
obligations in Nigeria
early Monday.
Royal Dutch Shell
Royal Dutch Shell
"[Shell] is working hard
it may not be able to meet its oil supply
Eighteen
Eighteen
Quad City International Airport,
An accident involving de-icing solution being sprayed on an
accident involving de-icing solution
anyone with a U.S. or British passport
Andi Varagona
At least six foreigners
for anyone with a U.S. or British passport and taking about 15 of them hostage.
Oberoi hotel
woman from Nashville, Tennessee,
sacked five times in
flunked
a perfect 19-0 season and Super Bowl glory.
flunked their chance of a perfect 19-0 season and Super Bowl glory.
remains unknown,
25
Marc Gonsalves, Thomas Howes and Keith Stansell
French-Colombian politician Ingrid Betancourt,
Brooke Army Medical Center
crashed into a home in Clarence Center, New York,
Steve Chealander
during the landing approach,
fallen as deep as the basement,
freezing temperatures and piles of wreckage,
undergoing a double mastectomy and reconstructive surgery,
double mastectomy
"E! News"
he is not gay.
contemplated
Colorado-based New Life Church
relationship with a male
says he contemplated suicide
Haggard
Colorado-based New Life Church
Evangelical
"physical contact" with a second man whose allegations of an inappropriate relationship
the letter
different ways of communicating,"
Khamenei has yet to reply to the letter
the specifics of our different ways of communicating,"
disputed election,
of "The Real Housewives of Atlanta" reunion special,
"amazing" when they first met.
Sheen
two daughters
Missouri hunting lodge.
Getting a reservation requires a little detective
underground supper clubs.
San Francisco,
senior loan officer
Troutdale, Oregon,
increased demand.
put more than 7,000 to work, mostly in local government jobs.
a new FedEx shipping center
five
average surface temperature
goes through phases of warming and cooling and the human contribution
Dennis Schmitt
one degree Fahrenheit (0.6 degrees Celsius)
one
Dennis Schmitt
global warming.
natural variability,
humans are at least a
latest shift
trend widely called global warming.
global warming.
global warming.
planet goes through phases of
Dennis Schmitt
one degree Fahrenheit
average surface temperature
arctic ice melt
global
an increase in the concentrations of greenhouse gases,
decrease in toy and monetary
Toys for Tots,
toy donations down,
Marines
a possible sentence of life in prison without parole or become eligible for parole in 20, 25 or 30 years.
my life."
of life in prison without parole or become eligible for parole in 20, 25 or 30 years.
Bobby Cutts, Jr.,
spare my life."
six men and six women
Bobby Cutts Jr.
Cutts' punishment is being decided by the same jury of six men and six women who found him guilty.
former police officer convicted of murdering his
"Doubt,"
happens when a strict nun who heads a Catholic school in the Bronx suspects a charismatic priest of having an inappropriate relationship with a
a strict nun who heads a Catholic school
a Tony Award- and Pulitzer Prize-winning play by the same name
warming water currents
Cameraman Neil Bennett
Greenland
a major outlet for the ice sheet which
Greenland's coast.
proprietary technology and employee real estate agents
proprietary technology and employee real estate agents to provide home buyers and sellers with value-added online service.
high-energy biscuits
is still out in much of the country but it is being restored.
U.N. World
15,000
is expected to rise,
400,000
southern Bangladesh.
laid waste to the all-important rice crop and caused a huge loss of livestock.
had reached 1,723, and the figure is expected to rise.
Sidr,
15,000
World Vision
western coast of Bangladesh near the border
power outages, massive traffic jams and spotty phone service,
Due to her advanced age, "it's practically impossible" that she would be tried or face jail time,
92-year-old
A 92-year-old woman
Nearly 1,000 customers
it is now
1,000
it is now
a small plane crashed
Robin Dehaven
the plane crash.
his truck
in kind
that the U.S. will infringe on Pakistan's sovereignty and continue operations on
reports that Pakistani troops had prompted the attack
Gen. James Mattis ordered the investigating officer, Brig. Gen. Stephen Clark,
helicopter and small plane
over the Hudson River,
the flight data recorders,
15,000 feet (4,500 meters) deep,
51
plans to find a way to scoop up the plastic waste and devise a way to turn it into a future fuel source.
find a way to scoop up the plastic waste and devise a way to turn it into a future fuel source.
salty soup of seawater, microscopic pieces of
to find a way to scoop up the plastic waste and devise a way to turn it into a future fuel source.
seawater, microscopic pieces of plastic and marine debris. Those are the ingredients
gather more data
wood rats, birds, bobcats
Florida Keys,
the men who now control the estate of being "intent on keeping her in the dark" about deals they've made or are negotiating.
their business agreements
Michael Jackson's children.
medical examiner
locations of icing conditions,"
I-287,
Robert Gretz,
A Spanish court
Chattanooga, Tennessee.
freshman year of high school
freshman year of high school
the kitchen at Memorial Hospital in Chattanooga, Tennessee.
36-year-old
kitchen at Memorial Hospital
Donohoo's
Chattanooga, Tennessee.
at least five
my parents, my mom and dad,"
Muslim radicals
parents,
"I miss my parents, my mom and dad,"
at least five years in detention.
Afghanistan
more Taliban attacks and roadside bombings,
Afghanistan
he was struck by a mine
died when he was struck by a mine
Officials said Kevin Brown, a Jamaican national, was acting strangely and caught the attention of an air safety officer at the Florida airport.
trying to board an Air Jamaica flight at Orlando International Airport
carrying a weapon or explosives onto a plane,
weapon
into custody
Somalia's transitional government
warship
warship
torn muscle
the injury would keep him on the sidelines for about six weeks.
Barcelona
torn muscle
Ronaldinho
about six weeks.
will miss most of the rest of the season
United States
Hawaii.
the United States
North Korea intends to launch a long-range missile in the near future,
"wipe out" the United States if provoked.
and drove a short distance before crashing into a tree.
drove a short distance before crashing into a tree.
murder in perpetration of attempted aggravated robbery.
September 30
University of Memphis
murder
drove a short distance before crashing into a tree.
drove a short distance
a chemical process that transformed these steroids into the female sex hormone, progesterone.
bipolar disorder.
Dr. Cade
1983
Saddam Hussein's eldest daughter,
Raghad Hussein
Raghad Hussein
Raghad Hussein,
Sunday
killing of a Taliban leader.
seven
believed to
Nine of the 11 Pakistani nationals
suspected of planning an al Qaeda-linked attack.
U.K.'s border agency,
Police and the border agency
"We are seeking to remove these individuals on grounds of national security. The government's highest priority is to protect public safety,"
clubs and bars in Hong Kong and Shenzhen,
public toilets and playgrounds.
an animal tranquilizer,
Christian Zheng Sheng School,
A portable game room to go,
capacity-boosting rechargeable battery comes in especially handy by offering double the juice.
your gaming experience:
a built-in 15.5-inch LED HD screen, stereo speakers and dual 3.5mm headphone jacks
U.S. 7th Fleet
representatives of all branches of government,
that Zelaya was not overthrown but instead was replaced through constitutional means.
with representatives of all branches of government, presidential candidates, the military, clergy, businessmen and representatives of various sectors of Honduran society.
delegation
nearly two months of political turmoil that Honduras has faced following the June 28 coup
many visas for Hondurans would be suspended.
a proposed agreement
resolve nearly two months of political turmoil that Honduras has faced
Japan
high levels of mercury in fish can cause health problems in pregnant women and young children.
our culture to eat dolphins."
dolphins
monitor and videotape the whalers. And Rudd says Australia could even file charges against Japan in an international court
secretary of state
"Dan Wheldon
his equals,
a cocky, fastidious 23-year-old
He placed the hat on the car's nose, got out, walked around to my side of the car and grabbed me.
"Dan Wheldon
victories over world
sexual orientation or gender identity.
ensure equal rights.
"The passage of this legislation will give the Justice Department and our state and local law enforcement partners the tools we need to deter and prosecute these acts of violence,"
hate-crimes law could be used to criminalize conservative speech relating to subjects such as abortion or homosexuality.
violent acts based on bias,
hate crimes
recording
company boss
L.K. Chaudhary,
his comments
company boss
137
L.K. Chaudhary,
the president
Medal of Honor
Staff Sgt. Jared Monti
Staff Sgt. Jared Monti
in an effort to save another soldier in Afghanistan,
the progress in addressing American children's mental health needs,
be able to enact, to build, a supportive health care framework and a mental health framework
frozen world located in the Gaslight Theater.
Opry Mills,
July
Nearly two out of three Americans
later in their first year in office,"
100-day
Nearly two out of three Americans
64
unauthorized prescription
investigation of fraudulent prescription-drug pads ordered from a vendor in San Diego."
prescription drugs
illegal substances, medication or heart failure,"
Oxycontin
Americans
Military
Angelina Jolie
a moral duty to do
Numbers tell the story
Natalie Cole
February 2008
hepatitis C
Natalie Cole
searching for a kidney
drugs, illnesses
actual or perceived race, color, religion, national origin, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, disability or sexual orientation. While
greater access to local communities for federal training programs and mediation services that can prevent hate crimes before they boil over into violence. Our
hate
Friday morning,
talks with management over pay, job cuts, and disciplinary issues broke down.
extra buses and free shuttle
pay, job cuts, and disciplinary issues
buses, scrambled for taxis, cycled or simply
pay, job cuts, and disciplinary issues
Tuesday at 7 p.m.
yoga, life skills, first aid, spoken English and psychometric tests,
New Delhi
100,000
October 3-14 in 2010.
"Recent commitments by the Egyptian government to address the security situation in the Sinai are important, and the
its ambassador would be withdrawn until Israel conducted an investigation into
the NATO command called a "successful operation against high-priority Taliban targets."
Two Taliban leaders,
British troops
"successful operation against high-priority Taliban targets."
NATO's
NATO's International Security Assistance Force.
killed several insurgents
Mullah Bismullah Akhund
offensive language to describe people in his military unit.
British newspaper News of the World
"Paki."
videos of him making offensive comments while on military duty in 2006.
making offensive comments while on military duty in 2006.
Savage and her neighbors
rape
flee the filthy trailer,
Chief Bruce Carlisle
had no clue that Thurmond, 36, had a wife, let alone four kids;
Paul and Rachel Chandler,
"Please help us, these people are not treating us well,"
ransom of $7 million,
"Please help us, these people are not treating us well,"
on supporting full marriage equality,"
acknowledged "we have more work to do,"
the administration's progress,
Harold Ramis
Jack Black
Ramis
sandal epic
sings
neuroblastoma,
4-year-old friend, Taylor Love,
"Love Notes."
messages on "Love Notes," little cards designed to encourage Taylor Love through the tough time.
an elderly woman thought to be Hitler's mother, as well as studies of objects, landscapes, models, and even a Roman senator.
between £4,000 and £6,000 (about $6,100 and $9,100) each,
between £4,000 and £6,000 (about $6,100 and $9,100) each,
between £4,000 and £6,000 (about $6,100 and $9,100) each,
the English Premier League season, as well as
Barcelona
meniscus
Turkish Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan
not from Lebanon,
the network in the
suspects planned to create cells to monitor and attack UNIFIL troops,
does not identify the
Anastasia Pavlyuchenkova.
Indian Wells Masters event
Rwandan and Congolese troops
was arrested by Rwandan authorities.
Hutu tribal fighters and several Rwandan and Congolese troops
rebel leader Laurent Nkunda, of the rival Tutsi ethnic group, was arrested by Rwandan authorities.
a travel ban
Russia and China
Zimbabwe's longtime president, Robert Mugabe, and 11 senior members of his government.
the measure would have instituted a travel ban on Mugabe and others in his government, frozen many of their assets and imposed an international arms embargo on the
Russia and China
Wilmington
about 5,000
DHL would close its hub there. About 3,000 of the 8,000 people who faced layoffs lived in or around
Feed the Children.
the first human cases of Avian Influenza
SARS and Avian Influenza,
Chinese ambassador
the proposed weapons sale to Taiwan.
the Taiwan Relations Act,
Apache attack helicopters are part of the $6.4 billion weapons
Patriot III anti-missile system, Apache attack helicopters, Harpoon missiles and Javelin anti-tank missiles.
$6.4 billion in arms
selling weapons to Taiwan,
proposed weapons sale
a casino in Switzerland and made
in black clothes and black ski masks,
hospital
in the hospital
giving birth
A solar eclipse, he says,
dragon Rahu
remain at the club
Milan
AC Milan
will remain at the club until June 30, 2009,"
Benjamin Netanyahu
a two-state solution.
accept a peace agreement
Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu
Home Secretary Jacqui Smith to ban any group that she believes is involved in
because of its support for "terrorism" in Iraq and the Palestinian territories.
Hezbollah,
involvement in terrorism in Iraq and the Palestinian territories.
Terrorism
Searchers
three Britons, a Frenchman and a Swede
Mantaolan, on the island of Rinca off the Komodo National Park,
Sweden.
boost for the rights
Pratibha Patil, 72, is India's first elected female president.
Pratibha Patil,
India
bitter
India has elected its first female president,
a bitter campaign marked by scandal.
its first
Ronald Reagan
The chairman of the board of trustees
approximately 20,000
Ronald Reagan Presidential Library
Ronald Reagan Presidential
Weinstein
80,000
frees up a place for another non-European Union
Ronaldinho
frees up a place
alleged the Kiwis lost on purpose
two-time
deliberately losing a match against Thailand
high inflation on food and fuel
winds
continual armed conflicts
Holly Hunter
"The Closer."
June 8.
F/A-18.
to ground the 636
Some 636 F/A-18 A through D model Hornets
stress cracks
The Norwegian
seeds
the vault
around the world
130 meters (427 feet) inside a frozen mountain.
The Norwegian government
10,000 years."
Norwegian government
130 meters (427 feet) inside a frozen mountain.
planned the crash of teammate
to deliberately crash his car in last year's Singapore Grand Prix.
Renault Formula One team
[have commenced] in France concerning the making of false allegations,"
Flavio Briatore
girl's mother, Kimberly Dawn Trenor, described to police how her daughter died and was put in a plastic storage box
2-year-old Riley Ann Sawyers
beaten with belts, picked up by her hair, thrown
Zeigler
Trenor and Zeigler
Royce Zeigler,
police artist's sketch
Ten
not directly threaten anyone in the videos, there were no grounds for further action,
Finland.
emphasize certain ideas
the hashtag
"little old lady"
"BRB," "tweet," and, sadly, "OMG!!!!!"
you can look right at it and not recognize it,"
there has been no known damage
electricity grid
infrastructure
a breach,
other infrastructure that could potentially disrupt service or damage equipment, two former federal
reconvene Monday.
Tem Darrell Steinberg,
Many acknowledge and sometime embrace the season's customs, such as gift-giving and sending out greeting cards, while at the same time they are
Christmas
"December Dilemma"
"December Dilemma"
help with the aftermath.
food
Yangon
emergency in five regions: the city of Yangon, Irrawaddy, Pegu and the states of Karen and Mon.
The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies
roofs, uprooted trees and downed power lines.
help with the aftermath.
Carly Fiorina.
Barbara Boxer,
presents himself as a committed fiscal conservative.
Some girl
Ludwig van Beethoven
Bob Dylan
Jim Keller (of Tommy Tutone) and Alex Call
Ludwig van Beethoven
Bob Dylan
"Für Elise"
Therese Malfatti,
"for Therese," as in Therese Malfatti,
"for Therese," as in Therese Malfatti,
the songwriters
the songwriters
the songwriters
Therese Malfatti,
Americans and British all put together
more than $150 million during the past year.
piracy
professional landscaper
they set aside their own jobs to garden as a team at one of their homes, rotating every week so that each woman's property gets the full benefit of their collective burst of labor and artistic vision.
set aside their own jobs to garden as a team at one of their homes,
collective burst of labor and artistic vision.
Brazil.
the bodies of the flight captain and a steward from the Air France
flight captain
Flight 447,
some dental work done,
Rapper Lil Wayne
Dokdo in Korea and Takeshima in Japan,
Dokdo in Korea and Takeshima in Japan,
Dokdo
they would visit Ulleung Island
fourth
layoffs across Japan.
The global economic crisis
12.7 percent
U.S. District Court
that Nozette, of Chevy Chase, Maryland, tried to deliver classified information to someone he thought was
appeared in U.S. District Court
Nozette, of Chevy Chase, Maryland, tried to deliver classified information to someone he thought was an Israeli intelligence official but who was actually an FBI undercover agent.
Tuscan Sun
California
Singapore Sun Festival
opens October 18.
Cortona, Italy.
Tuscan Sun Festival
attract different people
that forbids Sunday trading in all but the largest cities.
allowing many more shops across the country to open on Sundays.
allowing many more shops across the country to open on Sundays.
scheduled to last three days, with a vote expected late on Thursday.
Washington
"Israel has the right to defend itself."
the issue of preventing Iranian nuclear weapons capability,"
"Israel has the right to defend itself."
that Israel had taken the military option off the table.
the military option
a five-way tie
Valero Texas Open.
San Antonio,
posted six birdies
American Ted Purdy improved by three strokes with a 67 while his compatriots John Mallinger, with a 64, and Scott Sterling, who posted a 63, made it a five-way tie overnight for second place.
Goydos
An upgraded QuickTime system will let users more easily view, record, trim and share video,
Mac OS X Snow Leopard
faster applications,
operating system
faster applications,
midfielder
David Beckham
March 9.
at AC Milan
investigation had found cases of plagiarism and falsification in previous papers by Churchill
"deliberate and repeated research misconduct."
plagiarism and falsification
the September 11, 2001, attacks were a justified reaction to U.S. policies in the Middle East,
compared some victims of the al Qaeda attack on the World Trade Center to Nazis
U.S. policies in the Middle East,
were a justified reaction to U.S. policies in the Middle East,
essay,
Ward Churchill
found cases of plagiarism and falsification in previous papers
dozens
as 77
they remain dangerous.
behind bars
Alabama
our sincerity
he takes full responsibility for safety issues in the company's
specific drinks,
Boston, Massachusetts
Eight
13
best picture, best director
earned 10 nominations, including best picture, best director (Danny Boyle) and best adapted screenplay.
12 a.m. on Friday.
iPhone 4S
Apple's newest creation
faster dual-core processor
Friday.
two main political parties said they would not cooperate with the military-backed caretaker government on organizing the elections.
round-ups began May 28,
People arrested by Bangladesh police in their latest round-up arrive at a jail in Dhaka.
negative.
a huge pig farm in the neighborhood
a huge pig farm in the neighborhood
discrimination against gays
worsening the harsh treatment of gays
it risks
by January 1 2012.
phone makers
universal
"committed to Gulf security for decades and it should come as no surprise to anyone that we'll do
"committed to Gulf security for decades and it should come as no surprise to anyone that we'll do
we must to ensure the strait remains open."
targeting and potentially killing top al Qaeda leaders,
Blackwater USA
Tennessee.
Arkansas,
Tennessee,
headed straight toward
Tuesday night's storm blew his house away above him
put on sweat pants, grabbed a flashlight, drank a shot of whiskey,
A tornado
tornado outbreak
Arkansas,
home-made device used to spread fire
ex-in-laws'
another relative's home in the nearby Sylmar area
home-made device
Bruce Jeffrey Pardo
Santa,
another relative's home in the nearby Sylmar area
girl,
he investigated alleged tampering with his computer.
"I think he couldn't handle the refusal -- me not having sex with him."
Persian culture and our customs,"
Fairfax, Virginia.
overhaul the nation's health care system.
Arizona
the nation's health care system.
Republican
too big, too expensive
Baytown and Beaumont, Texas; Baton Rouge, Louisiana; and Torrance, California.
Environmental Protection Agency officials
its refineries now meet the required EPA standards on sulfur emissions.
Baytown and Beaumont, Texas; Baton Rouge, Louisiana; and Torrance, California.
Environmental Protection Agency officials determined the company had not sufficiently reduced sulfur emissions in its refineries in Baytown and Beaumont, Texas; Baton Rouge, Louisiana; and Torrance, California.
sulfur
Exxon Mobil
Baytown
Cain unexpectedly put his hand on her leg beneath her skirt "toward my genitals." She also said he pushed her head toward his crotch.
"All allegations of harassment against Mr.
"I want you, Mr. Cain, to come clean. Just admit
Saturday
the center said the storm could re-emerge in the Gulf of Mexico and regain intensity Sunday.
40 mph
15
install exiled opposition leader Severo Moto who is currently in Spain awaiting trial on charges of arms trafficking, and to gain access to the former Spanish colony's oil wealth.
plotting a coup in
Mark Thatcher
250 people have died over a 48-hour period.
Hemingway Marina.
early August
whether or not to continue to the swim."
Thomson, about 150 miles west of Chicago,
U.S. Rep. Mark Kirk,
150 miles
about 150 miles west
twice
Ronaldo
lowland gorillas
hunting and diseases like Ebola
100,000 of the gorillas left worldwide.
Ebola hemorrhagic fever,
swamp in equatorial Africa,
if a man with HIV or AIDS rapes a virgin he will be cured of his disease.
Girl Child Network (GCN),
four times that
public money
President Obama
President Obama
fix the credit crisis, the auto industry and trade policy.
George C. Pardee and Helen N. Pardee Professor of Economics and Political Science
London.
Haymarket,
Four suicide bombers detonate themselves
in Haymarket, central London.
July 7, 2005:
bombings and attempted bomb attacks
in Haymarket, central London.
a bomb consisting of 200 liters of fuel, gas cylinders and nails
A chronology of bombings and attempted bomb attacks in the mainland UK since
two
Al Qaeda
four men
The IRA
IRA
mainland UK
killing 52
bomb consisting of 200 liters of fuel, gas cylinders
1970s:
Champions League
Scott Brown
with a six-match European
Scott Brown
Champions League match
his horror tackle on Celtic's Scott Brown
Immigration Minister Eric Besson
The ban
France
citizenship
Sam Mendes
Virgin Galactic
Stephen Bosworth
Washington,
Stephen Bosworth
"quite positive."
administration's controversial system of military trials for some Guantanamo Bay detainees.
The ACLU
administration's controversial system of military trials for some Guantanamo Bay detainees.
on his third day in office,
greater latitude in selecting
$80 billion
elderly Americans,
at least a 50 percent
elderly Americans,
Medicare beneficiaries
Obama
Volunteers take turns three days a week driving a tanker truck or Orme's diesel-belching 1961 fire truck to a hydrant near Bridgeport, Alabama, 2½ miles down the road.
"With this new water coming in, then we'll have
Bridgeport,
drought
Water
hydrant in Alabama
A pipeline from Bridgeport
in the Southeastern United States
6 p.m.,
folks in Orme, Tennessee.
dried up early, on August 1, and hasn't revived,
Bridgeport, Alabama,
the town's tank.
drought
the town
human
mathematical equations
Google
Facebook and Google
Colin Farrell,
Based on a video game, "Max Payne"
"Pride and Glory"
"Pride and Glory"
provide irrefutable evidence that abuse was widespread and systemic.
abuse photos
sought release of these photos
personnel abusing prisoners at overseas locations.
Michael Camacho,
DiNardo's family
shot in the line of duty last week died of his injuries
police officer
Marc DiNardo,
Napa Valley in Michigan's Leelanau and Old Mission peninsulas.
St. Augustine, Florida.
400 years
cheetahs, zebra
conflict zones to assess their conditions and treatment.
late November
at least eight people
"This is the first time since the beginning of the current conflict that the ICRC has visited people detained by the armed opposition,"
in late November
went hiking Friday with a group of homeless teenagers
Prince William,
with a group of homeless teenagers
group of homeless teenagers
the U.S. Supreme Court
guns on a first-hand basis,
handgun ownership,
CNN photojournalists
guns on a first-hand basis,
Gunmen shot and killed 17 patients and wounded two others
Wednesday,
130 killings per 100,000 people.
An unprecedented wave of violence
said authorities believe a rival drug gang attacked the men at the El Aviane rehab facility.
last remaining places for European football's showpiece tournament
Poland and Ukraine,
Ware said the evidence indicated Wuterich "failed to exercise due care in his own actions in supervising his Marines."
unidentified man,
The investigating officer
against a Marine accused of murder
$3,000 per job
contends selenium in two of its multivitamins may reduce men's risk of prostate cancer.
selenium
Portland
Portland
Christopher Noxon,
more than 150
climate change bill
climate change bill
SSM Cardinal Glennon Children's Medical Center in St. Louis.
a progressive neurological disease
a children's hospital in St. Louis, Missouri.
the neck.
right side of the neck.
Our Troops
hit by a sniper fire while serving in Iraq.
reveal his new shirt number.
Friday
celebrity, fashion icon, multimillion-dollar heartthrob.
his new shirt number.
on Friday
A victory in Roland Garros
Federer
men's final of the French Open on Sunday.
Rafael Nadal
flagrant violations of international law"
carry out "genocide" against the Palestinian people.
Hugo Chavez
"They are cowards," he said. "It's as though a boxing professional were to come here and challenge you to box. Well, how courageous! How courageous is the Israeli army!"
Venezuela
the flagrant violations of international law" by Israel
"condemns strongly the flagrant violations of international law"
genocide
Lauren Burk,
on fire in a campus parking lot.
Courtney Larrell Lockhart, 23, of Smiths, Alabama,
at a hospital.
"People ask, 'How do actresses do it?' Um, they pay us to do this in order to look good on film,"
130
About 425,000 more
Nutrition Association
federal subsidies fall far short of
importance of those achievements
Democrats won two seats but needed three to take control.
stems from the bitter battle last winter that saw pro-union protesters camping out in the state Capitol and Democratic senators fleeing the state in an unsuccessful attempt to halt legislation by Wisconsin Gov. Scott Walker that some felt was anti-union.
six
nation's veterans
pledged to make it a "personal priority" to resolve the statehood issue before the end of her first term.
Venice and Port Fourchon,
The president's
being attempted to cap the well and the economic and environmental impact of the spill,
oil spill
sinking of an offshore drill rig
San Diego's
Los Angeles,
San
September
"This is a good man who has always been on the right side of history. For him to have used some inartful language in trying to praise me and for people to try and make hay out of that makes absolutely no sense,"
any and all Americans, especially African-Americans,
mother, Jacqueline
Lavelle Vance,
convicted
San Bernardino, Caifornia,
Sheriff's deputies in San Bernardino
during a home invasion in San Bernardino,
Sunday
have not contacted authorities or the parents.
Episcopal
Leaders of the Common Cause Partnership, a network of more than 100,000 Anglican Christians in North America, are
New Hampshire
Episcopal Church consecrated
North American Anglican church.
more than 100,000
about 100,000 members
when the Episcopal Church consecrated an openly gay man, Rev. Gene Robinson, as bishop of New Hampshire.
which erupted Thursday
87
BAGHDAD, Iraq
Hannelore Marianne Krause,
that Germany withdraw its troops from Afghanistan to ensure their safety.
her son,
Sinan,"
U.S.
girl's family
they were dismayed by the punishment and would have preferred to see the death penalty handed down in the case.
Haitham Sabah al-Badri,
rounds struck a gas station in a mainly Shiite neighborhood in eastern
al Qaeda emir of greater Samarra,
Two mortar rounds struck a gas station in a mainly Shiite neighborhood in eastern
Iraqi
a new venue
a fans' collective
($15 million) loan
Stamford Bridge,
Bush administration
Bush
"Anyone who is against the terrorists is with us."
Bush administration officials
fascism, Nazism
Bush
President Obama,
Michelle Obama,
excellence and unity.
Tony Blair
the Games
a new digital topographic map of Earth
digital topographic
1.3 million images
new digital topographic map
"No shots were fired at the PT-FI bus convoy as earlier reported,"
two
PT Freeport
U.S.
when a 12-bus convoy carrying employees of PT Freeport was attacked by unidentified gunmen in the country's eastern-most province.
province of Papua
F-15E
ground support
Each F-15E
All U.S. Air Force 224 E-model aircraft
E-model aircraft,
in Iraq and Afghanistan.
U.S.-led wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.
ground support
after the crash of an older model F-15C
of hydraulic system lines,
Strike Eagle jets
U.S. Air Force 224 E-model
models of its F-15
models of its F-15 fleet
big tract of land in Texas,
A turbine will generate somewhere around 20,000 [dollars] a year in royalty income.
20,000 [dollars] a year in royalty income.
Texas,
4,000-megawatt wind farm
While the wars will not last forever, many are still in the fight and could use more than a few words of thanks when they come home.
thanking our children, our friends from high school and
Ghazi bin Muhammad,
Friday,
three
did not break the law. And I never, ever thought I was breaking the law,"
six felony counts.
14 times
people
a parent with
Bangladesh
Bangladesh
Sunday,
International aid organizations promised initial packages
10,000.
relief supplies
some aid
3,114
others are unable to return to their homes
Elisabeth Mann
Efraim Zuroff,
the U.S. space program.
The firestorm of controversy has already begun
The Obama plan is truly breathtaking,
LIBYA
its border crossing terminals,
cease-fire agreement
cease-fire agreement
Israeli officials, however, stopped short of confirming that a cease-fire agreement has been reached.
emergency funds to assist workers and communities affected.
9,500
Ohio
to prevent layoffs.
U.S. ground and air delivery operations based out of Wilmington, Ohio,
making the cuts to improve profitability
9,500
Lisbon
member countries
About 375 million
27
of 736 members from 27 member countries to the European Parliament
The election of 736 members from 27 member countries to the European Parliament
About 375 million
About 375 million EU citizens aged 18 or over are
'Mummy'
Diana, Princess of Wales,
Princess of Wales,
emptiness
British Defence Secretary Bob Ainsworth
nine
British Defence Secretary Bob Ainsworth
southern part of the country.
20 people died
the 20 people died in battle and people detained were not mistreated.
for the next decade or even longer,
USA
"pre-meditated murder"
Blackwater
Blackwater
in compensation
$8 million in compensation
"Not even a
$8 million in compensation for each of the 17 Iraqis who died,
rocker Ryan
is known for producing rock music with a country influence.
producing rock music
"So Real,"
Oakland Raiders linebacker
overturned Saturday in the Gulf
at 2 a.m. Monday,
the families
found alive
cancer.
mammograms alone don't guarantee a clean bill of health.
"The best time of your cycle to do a mammogram is going to be when your period is over, maybe the week after your period is done when the breasts are not going to be tender."
a powerfully unhappy Connecticut couple,
73
newer cholesterol-lowering drugs
via drugs, exercise and/or diet
30 percent,
low-density lipoprotein, or bad cholesterol,
Safaricom Ltd.,
about $35,
The solar
about $35,
Kenya.
Guru
myself and Curtis
recorded a song, shot a music video and got a Michael Jackson tattoo etched on his upper arm.
Michael Jackson
need a Michael Jackson tribute song made
second runner missing since Monday
Natera-Armenta and Diaz
5:30 a.m.
Runner Maria "Gina" Natera-Armenta,
Orange County Sheriff's officials,
two were missing.
Cleveland National Forest near San Diego.
spotted Natera-Armenta waving from the ravine,
Give your children an allowance
can be effective, but that they work in only a surprisingly narrow band of circumstances.
$25 billion
New CD
$25 billion bill
grateful that they
U2 frontman Bono
ONE campaign in fighting disease, poverty, and hunger.
Doha at the Museum of Islamic Art
the annual Hajj pilgrimage followed by the celebrations of Eid Al-Adha.
Doha, Qatar.
planet is extremely hot,
find planets the size of Earth and to determine how common these planets are.
is like 4,000 degrees Fahrenheit. That is so hot. And it's 4,000 degrees Fahrenheit just on one side only. The other side would be closer to 1,000 degrees Fahrenheit,
"The new discovery was that planet is extremely hot, very, very hot.
this planet is like 4,000 degrees Fahrenheit.
Kepler
to find planets the size of Earth
Standing Together Against Rape in Anchorage, a nonprofit group that offers support to sexual assault victims among other services.
the highest per capita number of rape cases in the United States,
sexual abuse of a minor,
sexual abuse of a minor,
sexual abuse victims
to secure loans from the German government,
to have the deal finished by the end of this month,
GM Europe
about $100 billion annually
Fiat/Opel
$100 billion annually
$100 billion
at 8:15 p.m. Saturday on the seventh floor of a Texas Department of Criminal Justice medical facility in Galveston, Texas,
seventh floor of a Texas Department of Criminal Justice medical facility in Galveston, Texas,
The department of criminal justice
8:15 p.m. Saturday on the seventh floor of a Texas Department of Criminal Justice medical facility in Galveston, Texas,
an investigation is under way
Minneapolis, Minnesota; Seattle, Washington
protests.
widening disparities between rich and poor and corporate greed, among other grievances.
last week
mops, brooms, pots and pans.
to sit on this much stuff and supplies we normally don't even keep.
commentary are solely those of John Rice.
for new leaders in the nonprofit world.
tremendous
last month.
plans to send 2 million vaccines to Paraguay
last month.
seven people
iconic 7-UP
want to sign up for Gizmo5 before the acquisition is formally announced, since Google
an operation to clear an identified Taliban bomb making facility in Uruzgan province,
Tarin Kowt in Uruzgan province,
One
Australian commando,
Australian commando,
Four
Tarin Kowt
One Australian soldier, three civilians
soldier was hit by small arms fire,"
their canopies apparently became entangled.
became entangled.
eight
FAA
when their canopies apparently became entangled.
four batches of Lipton Milk Tea sold in Hong Kong
Lipton Milk Tea
melamine.
from London to cities such as Portsmouth and Southampton.
from London to
U.S.
buses
an independent homeland
many as 250,000
as 250,000
Sri Lanka,
The fighting has forced the closure of Pudukkudiyiruppu hospital in the Vanni region, the last functioning
an independent homeland
Syrian
bloody conflict between security forces and anti-government demonstrators.
flee
Latakia,
Latakia,
Omar
the most-wanted man in the world
in 2000
"I don't think my father
Omar bin Laden
'Try to find another
heavy snow,
mudslides.
threat of mudslides.
She pleaded not guilty
"Defendant had not slept during the preceding 24 hours,"
assaulting a
all
not guilty
assaulting a
Lisa Nowak,
made under duress.
defense attorneys
country's current economic problems.
27 percent
the growing federal budget deficit:
the country's current economic problems.
27 percent
the GOP.
38 percent of the public
a controversial measure to allow people
have required each of the 48
advocates of gun rights,
The Senate
Nueces County, Texas,
"Further, it tells us nothing about the eating and exercise habits of the individuals involved. The restaurant industry continues to offer a growing number of healthier offerings, move away from the use of trans fats and provide more nutrition information.
person's risk of stroke is associated with the number of fast-food restaurants near their
1986
brother of
her brother's death.
killed three people and wounded 23,
office housing judicial police in the city of Thenia,
city of Thenia,
Tuesday
Al Qaeda
destroyed about 20 houses,
January
An al Qaeda affiliate
near an office housing judicial police in the city of Thenia, about 50 km (31 miles) east of the capital of Algiers,
killed three people and wounded 23,
Al Qaeda
destroyed about 20 houses,
in the city of Thenia, about 50 km (31 miles) east of the capital of Algiers,
student performance,
to closing the achievement gap.
Barrack Obama's
his NATO allies in Strasbourg,
Baltasar Garzon
in Europe, Africa and the Americas have found
Baltasar Garzon
hasn't really wanted to talk about them.
several men who say they were tortured at the U.S. prison in Guantanamo Bay, Cuba.
questions that people around the world
Strollers, playpens, toys and diapers
secret contents of the average American trunk and cargo hold.
portable gym locker.
some interesting results.
cargo holds were clean and uncluttered.
average American trunk
A machete, an axe and a hammer,
run 150 miles,
a 68-year-old grandmother
fend for themselves by carrying in their backpacks all the food they will need for the week.
five consecutive
September 30,
second season of the Starz drama "Crash,"
second season of the Starz drama "Crash,"
"It was my favorite thing,"
Spider-Man
"I want to see him again."
SpongeBob, Lassie
my wedding
"Maybe that's why I'm being helped now,"
his favorite superhero.
happiest day of my life,"
this is the happiest
corner at Universal
Meeting him
Spider-Man
bin Laden as the speaker
Osama bin Laden
As-Sahab Media
"Prolong the wars as much as you like.
Army Col. Henry Moak
Pound cake
pound cake,"
"I would eat it any chance I could get, but not all of the meals came with pound cake,"
Henry Moak
earthquake
USGS
Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger.
More than 30
11:42 a.m.,
Chevrolet, Buick, Oldsmobile
certain mid- and full-size passenger sedans under GM's Chevrolet, Buick, Oldsmobile and Pontiac brands.
recall
certain GM vehicles in which oil apparently can leak and ignite.
involves a potential for oil to leak on the exhaust manifold during hard braking.
"most likely" a great white shark,
great white
one large shark sighting was confirmed
At least one
four
Friday
three executive members of her National League for Democracy and a party spokesman
Suu Kyi
meet with three executive members
pursuing a dialogue with the ruling junta,
pro-democracy demonstrations.
Nobel Peace Prize winner
if it were necessary to root out terrorists,
statement drew boos.
Sen. Chris Dodd
CHICAGO, Illinois
said that if it were necessary to root out terrorists, he would send U.S. forces into Pakistan without the country's approval.
"Islamic economists
Islamic banks
if the principles of Islamic finance were followed
profit-oriented conventional banking.
if the principles of Islamic finance were followed
Thomas L. Friedman:
U.S. president,
"Incredible opportunities masquerading as insoluble problems."
"I have a lot of high hopes for him. I think we are very lucky to have someone with his raw material as the next president. I think
"Incredible opportunities masquerading as insoluble problems."
all banks
Monday nights at 10 p.m.
Zane Lamprey
completely fine.
a TV program about drinking, "Three Sheets."
2,000 people
19-year quest for justice.
the FBI's Child Abduction Rapid Deployment (CARD) team
8,
London.
J.Crew,
Both
Michelle Obama
Sarah
capped 16
200 former fighters
in important part of the Nepal's ongoing peace process.
Nepal's
200
of the Nepal's ongoing peace process.
no connection
the fifth
"We will wait till January for our offensive since we are
Chechnya.
Boris Yeltsin
Boris Yeltsin
withdrawal of thousands of
Barack Obama
Barack Obama
wowed the crowd
Democratic National Convention at the Fleet Center
the Fleet Center.
pressure I'm experiencing is nothing compared to folks I'm meeting getting laid off.
three
Caylee Anthony
month before the meter
tips, called
side of the road,
11, 12 and 13,
Remains described as being those of a small child
meter reader
aims to prevent depletion of forests by managing them and making sure their use does not interfere with natural benefits or the local environment.
Asia and Africa
to invest in green jobs
Asia and Africa
14 of the suspects used credit cards issued by
Dubai authorities.
a Hamas
he believes Israel was behind the killing
Mossad,
Lonely Planet
books
did not reveal any inaccuracies.
Brazil, Colombia,
Lonely Planet
says he plagiarized or made up portions of the popular travel guidebooks
publishes more than 500 titles and employs 300 authors, according to its Web site.
an intern in the Colombian Consulate."
Recent figures suggest that the top end of the super-yacht market is holding firm
market is bracing itself for a storm
more than £350 million
"Chartering
super-yacht market,
Superyacht UK
Christopher Michael Dean,
He appealed, saying the sentencing enhancement required proof that he intended to discharge the firearm, and his actions were accidental.
a mandatory 10-year prison term for "discharging" a weapon during a crime.
"bungling bank robber" and quoted one patron's reaction to the bank gunshot: "Melissa in the lobby popped up and said, 'Oh, my God, has he shot Nora?' "
"bungling bank robber."
Accidents happen,
Guam
the Pacific Ocean
Air Force
"I have been broke and homeless."
Dupre is a 22-year-old would-be singer from
identified Ashley Youmans
liaison on a federal wiretap.
Ashley Alexandra Dupre
prostitution ring,
she is "the best sister you could have."
she is "the best sister you could have."
a motor scooter
more than 100 million
this weekend,
Tropical storm Cristobal
Storm Cristobal
off the coast of the Carolinas.
tribal areas.
Pakistan's
Florida and Georgia,
an assisted suicide,
counseling, support and even guidance to self-deliverance
Wednesday
that the GBI and other law enforcement agencies have pursued this matter vigorously and that their investigation has led to the arrests reported today."
to "hate rhetoric" by some religious and political leaders.
United States,
"hate rhetoric"
investigate whether the slaying was a hate crime
the workers
their lack of skills.
unlicensed nurses
Bendigo and Villabroza instructed the workers to lie about their status and used the names of licensed nurses on documents, the indictment says.
bilked the state out of nearly $4.6 million and put the lives of disabled children at risk,
dealers and artists, including Damien Hirst,
a secret.
Britain's
Depicting things such as riot police with smiley acid-house faces and camera-wielding rats, his
Brad Pitt
Brad Pitt
a secret.
Banksy
subversive and satirical public art. Depicting things such as riot police with smiley acid-house faces
Tower Hamlets council authority
"a media star...but
Britain's
his graffiti from their streets.
Banksy
Banksy's identity
two
terrorist group called Al-Shabaab, which has ties to al Qaeda.
Jamal Bana
"The mosque -- the mission of the mosque -- is to worship. And people come to worship and go. We don't have any control over
Anglican Church
Benedict XVI
a software glitch that is causing problems with its braking.
a software glitch
will cost it about 100,000 sales this year and $2 billion in repair costs and lost revenue.
More than 92 percent
end their work stoppage over residuals for writing in the digital age,
buy real estate.
[Barack Obama]?
doing odd jobs and herding sheep,
said it received a telephone tip in June
molesting two girls,
Federal agents have apprehended accused child molester Edward Eugene
Edward Eugene Harper
pays people up to $4,500 for trading an older-model vehicle with low fuel efficiency for new vehicles that get better miles per gallon.
trading an older-model vehicle with low fuel efficiency for new vehicles that get better miles per gallon.
"Cash for Clunkers"
Clunkers" program
Taliban gunmen executed a young couple for trying to elope in rural Afghanistan,
Kash Rud district of Nimruz province,
forced by her parents to become engaged to a man she did not like,
Glastonbury,
Dorough
1999
O'Connell,
Tia Mowry and Cory Hardrict
Hoffenheim.
4-2
Leverkusen
$1.2 million
spent more than $1.2 million in company funds
Campbell Brown
James Thomson of the University of Wisconsin-Madison,
opposes the use of stem cells
reprogrammed human skin cells to act like the stem cells, which have the potential of morphing into other cells and thereby curing disease.
all alternatives as we search for treatments for diabetes, Parkinson's and spinal cord injuries."
"By avoiding techniques that destroy life, while vigorously supporting alternative approaches, President
Sen. Tom Harkin, D-Iowa, who has pushed for federal funding of embryonic stem cell research and said he will continue to do so.
"By avoiding techniques that destroy life, while vigorously supporting alternative approaches, President Bush is encouraging scientific advancement within ethical boundaries,"
twice vetoed bills that would have eased limits on funding for embryonic stem cell research.
to act like the stem
Vietnam.
of 1969
Joe Namath briefly retires
toolkits to learn how to side step security measures or create their own "botnet" -- referring
Twitter
(cyber criminals)
onslaught of links with malicious software, or "malware,"
his salary by 30 percent.
grandson
Akio Toyoda
president Akio Toyoda
who has custody of the three children, objected to provisions of the deal that would give AEG Live a share of rights to video of her son's final rehearsals.
estate law expert Margaret Lodise
their interests might sometimes conflict with their grandmother's.
Jackson's mother, Katherine Jackson,
decides if he'll approve a contract between Jackson's estate and concert promoter AEG Live.
to terms given to AEG,
20,000 will comprise four ground/maneuvering brigades,
military officials said Defense Secretary Robert Gates signed a deployment order to move an additional 3,000 troops to Afghanistan next year.
The additional 10,000 likely refers to
helicopters
Up to 30,000
Mexican
occurred in
who understands the world today, the future we seek and the change we
former Virginia Gov. Mark Warner
Democratic
step up."
bipartisan rhetoric Obama has espoused
bipartisan
us to step up."
the kind of bipartisan rhetoric Obama has espoused on the campaign trail.
bipartisan
CNN
they think his legacy will be,
Steve Irwin,
a global outpouring of grief from fans, children and hundreds of early I-Report contributors,
long-term improvement of water and sanitation is
leaving more than 230,000 dead
(Indonesia)
cleared and rebuilt homes and towns,
9.0-magnitude earthquake
because even when there is no hope, even when nothing you do shows any sign of promise, you keep writing anyway.
wouldn't budge past the 75-page mark. Nothing I wrote past
writing
75
typewriters are an anachronism
filling out property vouchers
"It's so antiquated,"
"It's so antiquated," said one officer who did not want to be identified.
New York City signed a $432,900 contract for typewriter maintenance with in 2008.
Fiorentina
seasonal monsoon
1,330 relief camps
India
around 300
truancy
around 300
15
DeKalb
15
parents in DeKalb County, Georgia, are facing one of the more aggressive anti-truancy programs in the country, one where punishment can include time behind bars.
90
as many as 90 civilians
has not undermined the nations' relationship.
in communications with Afghan military forces
U.S. airstrike in Afghanistan.
90
Gov. Jennifer Granholm.
we are doing everything we can to become the home of this new electric
Ann Marie Sastry, director of the energy systems engineering program at the
a major factor in the companies being willing to take the risk of creating the new types of cars.
"Gov. Granholm
John McCain
the country needs it. The country needs a change.
Obama
character.
is that these students want to come back and be lifelong learners -- that they understand that in today's economy, you have to continue to keep your job skills relevant and up to date,"
students want to come back and be lifelong learners
Montgomery County Community College.
cut or frozen tuition
laid-off workers,
tuition-free community college courses
200 lashes
more than doubled the sentence
Human Rights Watch.
serve six months in prison
his license
Abdulrahman al-Lahim,
gang-raped
win to race ratio
win to race ratio
Formula One
the yellow jersey
39
the yellow jersey
39
the subject of a criminal investigation,
150 years
might 'furnish a link in the chain of evidence' for a criminal prosecution,"
Peter Madoff,
150 years in prison.
The holiday commemorates three university
three university students killed
life sentence
20th
take place at Arlington National Cemetery and at New York's Syracuse University, which lost 35 students in the bombing.
the bombing of an American airliner over the Scottish
20th anniversary
270
Antelope County, Nebraska.
after a relative told authorities he spoke to his kin and said they are doing well.
Friday
Silver City, South Dakota.
Nebraska
2006
October 26, 2006,
Raymond Lee Oyler
38, of Beaumont was convicted in March of five counts of first-degree murder.
London's subway system
to improve the safety and security of public transport in London and create a better environment
at least 17
engulfed by thousands of revelers
social networking Web sites,
Dr. John Jain,
it's rare for anyone older than 55 to get the go-ahead for IVF,
51,
Georgia Dardick,
Carnival
the world's first International Cougar
about 10:30 p.m. Monday,
about 10:30 p.m. Monday,
to believe the child has been abducted."
power-sharing talks to take place in the next few weeks.
Zimbabwean
Zimbabwe,
"I love the black Barbie. It's about time,"
The new black Barbies released by Mattel
Others jeered them, saying they're not black enough.
Some have cheered
"Many people have criticized the dolls for either having hair that's too long or too straight,
released by Mattel have fuller lips, curlier hair and other features that the company says more accurately represent African-American women.
US Airways
showed passengers trying to flee the aircraft almost immediately after it settled in the water and began to float along the river current.
the Hudson River
"soft-body
aircraft struck birds, disabling both engines,
a US Airways jet
Some
brought down by a flock of birds.
Hudson River
Karadzic's arrest after a decade-long hunt is the equivalent of catching Europe's Osama
"longed hoped for day."
leading the worst acts of brutality Europe has seen since the Nazi campaigns of World War II.
worst war crimes
catching Europe's Osama
the Dalai Lama
small minority
the Dalai Lama's current "middle way approach,"
Thousands of visitors from colder climates
At less than 11 miles in length
Longboat Key, Florida,
biking and tennis,
private beach.
LBK
biking and tennis,
John McCain bumper
McCain and running mate Sarah Palin
attacked at an ATM
Sarah Palin
is being held in a facility
head-on
"I'm skeptical about any motor vehicle accident in Zimbabwe involving an opposition figure,"
T-Pain iPhone app?
series of videos that Auto-Tune cable newscasts and political speeches.
"Auto-Tune
Andrew Gregory,
57 members of the House Progressive Caucus
be merged with two separate versions
with two separate versions passed by other House panels
said too many issues remained unresolved to sign on to a deal
the same reimbursement rates as in the government's Medicare program
the government-run public insurance option to be reimbursed on rates determined by negotiations with the insurance industry.
public option with reimbursement rates based on Medicare rates
how authorities handled the cases against Purvis and five other teens accused of the December 2006 beating of fellow student Justin Barker.
September
"Jena 6"
second degree aggravated battery
December 2006
five
second-degree attempted murder and conspiracy,
"Jena 6"
against Purvis
second degree aggravated battery
weekdays from 7 a.m. to 6 p.m.
larger
would not
Dr. George Tiller,
the defense of the unborn."
late-term abortions.
Ted Rowlands
In focusing taking a more holistic approach to his craft, Kuma has promoted the humanizing elements of architecture and its ability of improve people's lives.
nearly 60 projects on the go
across the world,
architecture
the Transportation Security Administration
their birth dates and genders
birth dates and genders
federal government,
in Angola
Benedict XVI
Benedict also expressed "deep sorrow" at the death of two women killed in a stampede at one of his events in Angola on Saturday,
in Angola,
Kashmir
India and Pakistan
improve the relations and lead
Kashmir
Kashmir
than 60 years.
Kashmir
Kashmir
India and Pakistan opened a symbolic trade route in the disputed region
is in very good mental and physical condition,"
"When we saw him, he looked like a very tired little boy off a long trans-Atlantic flight,"
allowed CNN to see a copy of a letter addressed to the Ministry of Education and signed by Artyem's adoptive mother, Torry Hansen, which the little boy carried when he arrived.
several previous cases in recent years of abuse involving adopted Russian children in the United States.
copy of a letter
series of summer concerts at the O2.
London's O2 arena,
four
The box
first-ever pictures of planets outside the solar system
consecrated an openly gay man, Rev. Gene Robinson, as bishop of New Hampshire.
about 100,000 members,
several issues, ranging from interpretation of the Bible to homosexuality.
was a sex offender.
the Garrido household
One of the first red flags authorities might have caught was in
twice a month
20 years
on the Black Sea coast in Bulgaria.
Gary Player
six
development of two courses on the Black Sea coast in Bulgaria.
is a high increase in interest and it'll evolve quite quickly.
two
college students
specific sleep-related mechanisms
Provigil, is already giving a competitive
to keep the workers of tomorrow not just awake, but alert, on-task and feeling fine through the night and well into the next day.
specific sleep-related mechanisms in the
jittery or wired,
undercover DEA officers
Spain
last year.
Paris, Texas.
on the side of a rural road,
in Paris, Texas.
run over, dragged, and killed.
three years
after Zhang posted a blog.
three years
Chinese
why your car is worth X amount.
they're worth.
Clarence Center,
icing
violent pitching and rolling
passengers
"Terminator Salvation"
the growing sophistication of the moviegoing public, whom they believe can "feel" the difference between actors standing in front of a green screen versus actors interacting with the real thing.
Stan Winston
"Terminator Salvation"
Joseph McGinty Nichol
"Terminator
Health care is just the latest example of government dysfunction; it's been derailed by hyper-partisanship, over-spending and the disproportionate influence
largest and fastest growing segment of the electorate, hold the balance of power in American politics, but they have once again been shut out of the debate.
army defectors, including members of the Free Syrian Army,
At least 12 people
41.
northern Mexico
died from smoke inhalation and not burns,
Chavez
Mexico City
Mexico
shake hands or kiss,
two
the shooting deaths of his father and another
by himself,
juvenile detention center.
characterize the person as lawless and criminal.
he is committed to moving forward with a pledge to remove all American combat brigades from Iraq by the end of August 2010, as well as all U.S. troops by the end of
al-Maliki
imposing peace and security
no
removed 30 of 55 generals in the national
the retirements had to do with a reorganization of a bloated institution,
with white lights while the
no damage
Runway 27R
taxiway
Atlanta's
Rod Blagojevich
Gov. Rod Blagojevich
Meanwhile, Blagojevich continued an ambitious media blitz, appearing in
Rod Blagojevich
FBI recordings of his phone calls.
Alexandra Township,
attacks
Locals angry about the rising number of foreigners arriving in South Africa
airborne for 200 feet
died at the scene.
oak tree,
split in two in the wreck,
died at the scene.
2008 BMW
U.S. Major League Soccer side Kansas City Wizards
Sport business expert Professor Simon Chadwick, founder of the Center for the International Business of Sport (CIBS) at Coventry University,
announced they would drop ticket prices for the coming season.
drawdown of the 160,000 U.S. troops in
argue against pulling out.
Veterans of Foreign Wars
"Whatever your position in that debate, one unmistakable legacy of Vietnam is that the price of America's withdrawal was paid by millions of innocent citizens, whose agonies would add to our vocabulary new terms like 'boat people,' 're-education
Vietnam
an effort to "provide broader context" for the debate over the upcoming Iraq progress report
Veterans of Foreign Wars
"Whatever your position in that debate, one unmistakable legacy of Vietnam is that the price of America's withdrawal was paid by millions of innocent citizens, whose agonies would add to our vocabulary new terms like 'boat people,' 're-education
"President Bush's
twist on comparisons of the
"Here at home, some can argue our withdrawal from Vietnam carried no price to American credibility, but the terrorists see things differently,"
argue against pulling out.
"Today, in defiance of the critics, Japan
"Here at home, some can argue our withdrawal from Vietnam carried no price to American credibility, but the
twist on comparisons of the war to Vietnam
how we got into the Vietnam War and how we left,"
Foreign Wars
the Veterans of Foreign Wars
historical comparisons from Asia, including
"provide broader context" for the debate over the upcoming Iraq progress report
The couple have been married four years and have two children, who have been interviewed for the investigation,
accidental drowning.
his wife ran off with another man,
was found drowned in a bathtub in 2004,
Stacy
Savio's sister, Sue Doman, said Savio expressed fear of Drew Peterson.
"I would say that right now, Drew Peterson has gone from being a person of interest to being a suspect."
Five
7,860 percent.
said Dr. Abdullah Al-Rabbeeah, the Saudi health minister.
pilgrims in the city of Mina,
40
A rare rainstorm inundated pilgrims in the city of Mina, flooding tents and making conditions miserable for the 2.5 million pilgrims performing the ancient rituals,
Fahmi al-Rashidi
"I've had it. I can't do this. I want my life back."
compared 4G networks from the four major U.S. carriers in 27
download
at least three megabits per second
"AT&T, T-Mobile, and Sprint
24-year-old decorated Green Beret from Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, was electrocuted in a shower in his Baghdad quarters
14,000 deficiencies
there is insufficient evidence to prove or disprove that any one person, persons or entity was criminally culpable"
14,000
The "vast right-wing conspiracy"
a 1994-like surge at the polls
President Clinton
The "vast right-wing conspiracy"
Iraqi
to accommodate 40,000 to 50,000 Iraqi students this year.
accommodate 40,000
even illegal refugees with no paperwork can send their kids to school
roughly 20 percent
20 percent
state-funded schools.
roughly 20
mainstream line of education,"
"Five members."
One in 5 students
Qutaiba
"All Iraqi girls come outside now. All Iraqi girls. Iraqi girls only!"
Qutaiba
Amman, Jordan,
five
All Iraqi girls.
Iranian president
the Iranian
Iranian president
Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
Nkepile Mabuse
the Pulse SmartPen
"pencast."
technology
dragged for 17 miles by the
New York City's highways and roads
Fresh Bread & Company in Shanghai.
Roberto Lee Jr, 35, is the
an MBA from USC Marshall School of Business and an Executive MBA (EMBA) from INSEAD and Tsinghua University in Beijing.
Tsinghua/INSEAD
a prosecution psychologist
raped
"You might as well get that our of your mind; you are going with me, you have got no choice,"
Phillip Garrido
its fight against terrorists and narcotraffickers,
at seven military bases in the South American nation.
an act of war
terrorists and narcotraffickers,
trade pact
saying privately in 2008 that Obama could be successful as a black candidate in part because of his "light-skinned" appearance and speaking patterns "with no Negro dialect, unless he wanted to have one."
rejected the calls
following a "double standard,"
its inspectors were leaving for the much-anticipated inspection.
Iran is pursuing nuclear weapons capabilities.
Iran
it needs more time to decide whether to sign onto a deal that could help end the international showdown over its nuclear activities.
Saturday its inspectors were leaving for the much-anticipated inspection. The agency declined to give more details on Sunday.
it needs more time to decide whether to sign onto a deal that could help end the international showdown over its nuclear activities.
that it needs more time to decide whether to sign onto a deal that could help end the international showdown over its nuclear activities.
Kansas City, Missouri.
"I felt angry,"
131
are recognizing the need to preserve mother-child relationships. They have staffed nurseries and day care centers to keep families connected.
The "Get on the Bus"
armed robbery.
three people died and 16 others
"The Islamic insurgents were just guessing the arrival of the president so they started firing mortars,
three
three people died and 16 others were wounded
insurgents began firing mortars, resulted in a clash with African Union peacekeepers,
Stubborn, delusionally optimistic, creative, fearless, flexible
"You need to be in denial or in ignorance
reporter and editor at the Wall Street Journal,
aggressive melanoma
Clinton
an aggressive melanoma that spread to his brain,
64.
Open champion Roger Federer
Wimbledon
"overwhelmed and exhausted"
"She carries with her just the right combination of heart and edginess for the part of Dede, and we're incredibly excited to share her acting talent with audiences."
is honing her acting chops to star as free-spirited
"She carries with her just the right combination of heart and edginess for the part of Dede, and we're incredibly excited to share her acting talent with audiences."
acting
Knoxville, Tenn.-based
Stan Brock
Los Angeles
health care is often associated with developing countries,
a Los Angeles sports arena
at least 4,557
at least 4,557
"Seventy-five percent of our guests are members of our points program,"
karaoke machines, PlayStation game consoles, DVD players, a variety of cosmetics, customized condoms and indoor-outdoor Jacuzzis.
"The industry
Located in a prime spot overlooking Ipanema beach, the hotel has 82 rooms, ten suites and three mini apartments -- all
SURFING AND SAMBA:
Villa Mangiacane
samba
SURFING AND SAMBA: Fasano
City"
"It Happened One Night,"
its sharp writing, polished acting and engaging
"Mad Men"
Banana Republic,
fashion trends.
"took a fair amount of planning,"
prison
crime "took a fair amount of planning," and he criticized the former hedge fund manager for "thumbing his nose at the system."
"took a fair amount of planning,"
a 20-year
unknown soldier
Afghanistan.
unknown soldier in Afghanistan
is only going to come from the private sector,"
the private sector,"
of Obama's own party that the White House and the Democratic congressional leadership are not doing enough to help the unemployed.
CEOs, small-business owners, business leaders, mayors and academics
their attacker
a video
in "residential settings"
four former members of the same sorority,
released a video
Delta Sigma Theta,
Obama was leading
Sen. Hillary Clinton is the winner
Hillary Clinton
received the most votes in two pivotal Democratic primary contests Tuesday,
home in Clarence Center, New York,
"it might be best to disconnect autopilot so that the pilot might have a better feel" for the aircraft's conditions.
The aircraft crashed into a home in Clarence Center,
possible prison term of 12 to 18 months
a Virginia grand jury
marijuana use,
Atlanta Falcons quarterback Michael Vick
state charges of running a dogfighting ring at the home.
Michael Vick
"submit to any method of testing required by the pretrial services officer or the supervising officer for determining whether the defendant is using a prohibited substance."
Vick not use narcotic drugs or other controlled substances unless prescribed by a doctor.
marijuana use,
drug
participate in substance abuse therapy and mental health counseling
Vick, 27, must participate in substance abuse therapy and mental health counseling "if deemed advisable by the pretrial services officer or supervising officer"
of running a dogfighting ring at the home.
marijuana
Surry County, Virginia.
fist-bumpers
handshakes
H1N1 swine
"fist bumps"
human beings touch their own faces with their own fingertips hundreds, if not thousands of times a day.
80,000 of the
an additional 10,000
British Prime Minister Gordon Brown
"take all the action necessary to protect them."
113 people
British Prime Minister Gordon Brown
Belfast City Church,
images of the explosion
a fuel storage complex
at least 350 people
Caribbean Petroleum Corp.,
on the Internet,
is accused of taping Andrews while she was nude in two hotel rooms. He then made eight videos that he posted on the Internet,
Erin Andrews
People's Mujahedin,
People's Mujahedin
United States
Iraq's government
expel the Iranians
al-Rubaie
Edwin van der Sar
West Ham
Read through our picks and tell us if you disagree or if we've missed anyone in the Sound Off box below.
British
best goalkeepers in history.
San Bernardino, California.
Ruben Jurado,
Will Smith
"Karate Kid" remake.
TNT
incest
her musician father,
incest
highly stigmatized form of sexual abuse, often leaves the victim ashamed, isolated and unable to tell others
get professional help,
between the two countries is less a partnership and more an uneasy marriage with a history fraught with decades of mutual mistrust and disappointment.
not to repeat history,
social and economic development
"I am not the bad person or the beast
pay restitution and never again use "a single dollar that I have earned for anything but to help people."
leniency.
Vick
financing a dogfighting ring and
"I am not the bad person or the beast
self defense
self defense in punching businessman
threatening behavior.
Steve Donnelly,
said he decided to yank the welcome mat for the 16,000 residents of Wainuiomata because "each time they visited, our life became less exciting."
Benedict responded by praising the role of religion in the United States.
Mass
Washington
the church's relationship with other faiths, the U.S.-led war in Iraq
the sexual abuse of children by priests has caused a "deep shame" and called it "gravely immoral behavior."
Benedict said the sexual abuse of children by priests has caused a "deep shame" and called it "gravely immoral behavior."
Nationals Park,
"gravely immoral
"It's a really hard time for her teammates, for her friends, for her family,"
Madeline Loftus,
State College
Her teammates
aboard Continental Connection Flight 3407
one of 49 people to die aboard Continental Connection Flight 3407
produced by Baxter Healthcare Corp. that has
"reacts like heparin in some of the conventional
more than a dozen
produced by Baxter Healthcare Corp. that has
"a heparin-like compound -- that is not heparin -- present in some of the active pharmaceutical ingredients"
police officer
Thursday
mass shooting
police officer
until they are 100 years old,
$80 million
of Leeds in northern England
scientists at the University of Leeds
body parts
Insurance rates for errant actors can
her legal troubles
required a lot of calculation and risk management.
$5 million to $100 million
Shirley MacLaine.
anywhere from 1 percent to 3 percent of a movie's production budget,
1 percent to 3 percent of a movie's production budget,
from 1
"Georgia Rule,"
Lindsay
Lindsay Lohan
1 percent to 3 percent
pop cultural angst, filtering Cold War nihilism and disillusionment through the inspired pulp idiom of mundane masked crimefighters and one genuine, possibly radioactive, superhero.
the popular graphic novel.
living on borrowed time.
of the popular graphic novel.
pop cultural angst, filtering Cold War nihilism
cinematic.
Cleveland, Ohio, home of a convicted
10
charged Anthony Sowell with five counts of aggravated murder
Nemanja Vidic
Catalan
A member of the protest group Hawaiian Kingdom Government
museum,
Hawaiian Kingdom Government
Iolani Palace,
member of the protest group Hawaiian Kingdom Government
Thursday morning,
two years,
July 2011,
U.S. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton
July 2011.
suspicion of domestic assault.
Ekaterina Ivanova,
adultery.
blissfully empty beaches:
five-hour drive
Los Destiladeros, Modroño, and the black-sand Playa Venao
cow-town vibe:
short drives
Celina, holds the
at nearly every level of the judicial system
Windstorms
hundreds of
no one
his living room,
Atlanta,
splitting his house in half and
226
New Zealand
South Africa
Dale Steyn
career-best 5-34
179 for two
a career-best five for 34
179
South African fast bowler Dale Steyn
Proteas
South Africa
Barack Obama ringtones,
vital fashion statements,
Christy Harness
download
"The Good, The Bad, and The Ugly."
one-third
change their ringtones frequently.
there is possibly something unpleasant and embarrassing that
Jeffrey Toobin
She's also apparently retained
a search warrant,
Tiger Woods
Can the police do anything about it if Woods continues to refuse to talk to them?
Tiger Woods is under no legal obligation to speak with police.
would welcome closer ties with the West.
Foreign Secretary David Miliband
"the Ukrainian government should ensure that the letter of the agreements are stuck
Ukraine
Israeli authorities
Mark Regev
his country would be willing to grant the students visas.
it erred last week when it rescinded the awards because of travel restrictions that Israel imposes on the Palestinian territory.
Greek Prime Minister George Papandreou
slashing government jobs, privatizing some businesses and reducing pensions.
Antonis Samaras
Greek Prime Minister George Papandreou
An explosion at close range, and not a direct hit,
Yellow Sea near the western sea border with North Korea
An explosion at close range, and not a direct hit,
women
MEXICO
more pleasant now that bus rides steer clear of too-close-for-comfort contact with men.
Mexico
seven complaints
sexual abuse aboard
government
Department of Health and Human Services said
health care workers
women's health care
of health care
Department of Health and Human Services
regulation would
care for their patients in accord
Nineteen of the 30 private sellers the undercover investigators dealt with
"It is basic law enforcement, plain and simple."
"Closing the gun show loophole has nothing to do with the Second Amendment,"
"Closing the gun show loophole has nothing to do with the Second Amendment,"
Nineteen of the 30
The sales were made at seven gun shows in Ohio, Tennessee and Nevada, the
on militarism.
his songwriting and recording methods,
touring and
since she was 3
$20,000
a coming-of-age ritual in Latin culture,
preparing for a day she's dreamed about since she was 3 years old.
womanhood.
the first taste of raw
(Search for Extraterrestrial Intelligence) data collected by the Allen Telescope Array in California.
our beginnings and our place among the stars
SETI
shut down Internet accounts of illegal downloaders.
"X-Men Origins: Wolverine"
digital watermarks
tech-savvy thieves
"The Hulk" appeared on the Internet two
a myriad of sophisticated methods
of having lied.
cutting all ties with Colombia
broke protocol.
Chavez
having lied.
of having lied.
Uribe
to help secure the release of hundreds of hostages being held by the leftist rebel group Armed Revolutionary Front of Colombia (FARC) and the National Liberation Army (ELN).
help secure the release of hundreds of hostages
Chavez
secure the release of hundreds of hostages
withdrew his support for the Venezuelan leader's mediation efforts with the FARC.
help secure the release of hundreds of hostages
citing his direct communication
Colombia
will not have any type of relation with him or with the government of Colombia,"
his arms are open
Venezuelan president,
President Hugo Chavez
Uribe
EPA
rat poisons
on rat poisons to help reduce the threat of accidental exposure to children and wildlife.
said it believes the restrictions will not only keep the products out of children's hands, but also reduce the ecological and wildlife risks associated with exposure to rat poison.
threat of accidental exposure to children and wildlife.
seats out of the small plane and put in a drum of fuel to cause maximum damage.
single-engine Piper Cherokee PA-28
Fred Kollar, undersheriff of El Dorado County. "There was nothing that would cause you to question it. You can't see it from either adjoining property. It was presumably well arranged."
a backyard compound of sheds and tarps
Nobody else knew she was there except the couple who snatched her off the street in front of her house in South Lake Tahoe, California, in 1991, and took her straight
18 years
18 years
two
dismal
2009 MotoGP
to the Italian club.
playing football
the Los Angeles Galaxy.
Denver
Claude Monet, Pierre-Auguste Renoir and Paul Cézanne.
Denver
through January
"The Louvre and the Ancient World"
Denver
"The Eye of Josephine,"
Impressionists.
an Israeli envoy and the rupture of diplomatic relations
"Due to the decision of Venezuela to cut relations with us
Roland Betancourt
Venezuelan Foreign Minister Nicolas Maduro
Venezuela's ambassador
60 percent
to a notorious militant group,
The U.S. government is delaying "tens of millions" of dollars in crucial
whether its aid helps fund Al-Shabaab.
a way to connect to job seekers, and
a career training scholarship, personal and resume makeovers and a $100 gas card.
Florida,
Orlando-area job placement organization; and a local advertising agency.
Orange County School Board; Workforce Central Florida, an Orlando-area job placement organization; and a local advertising agency.
The grand prize is worth $8,000 and includes a career training scholarship, personal and resume makeovers and a $100 gas card.
Orange County School Board; Workforce Central Florida,
New York's Ed Sullivan
Ed Sullivan Theater,
1964.
"Paul's character had to learn that it's all right to take a little distance from your significant other
to talk about their emotions while hoping to maintain a dispassionate, hard-edged, prototypically manly façade.
"I Love You, Man"
Sunday
a crepe shop, an art gallery and a sign shop.
Cleveland Cavaliers.
a 15 percent stake in the Cleveland Cavaliers.
Three Chinese nationals
Authorities
three Chinese citizens
The alleged leaders of the counterfeit operations are three Chinese citizens
300,000
sophisticated criminal conspiracy
Chong Lam,
luxury handbags
backs of legitimate companies
Burberry, Gucci
three Chinese citizens
importing thousands of counterfeit luxury handbags
14
result in hardship
we have adjusted our actions with regard
ensuring that all prescription drugs on the market are
Arkansas police
Forty people were hurt
two bus riders.
30-year-old Danny Okurily
Interstate-40 east of Forrest City,
bus hopped a highway median and crashed into a pickup truck
the pickup driver and two bus riders.
Forty people were hurt in Sunday night's crash,
highway median
13-mile stretch of Interstate-40 east of Forrest City, Arkansas,
Sea The Stars
English Derby,
(2,400 meters)
cable, land-line phones, dining at restaurants and allowances
iReport.com:
many Americans
her ideal wedding.
because of financial struggles:
many Americans
cable, land-line phones, dining at restaurants and allowances for her children.
personal spending habits.
"Body of War"
disabled Iraq war veteran,
shot in the spine,
independent film, "Body of War,"
an independent film, "Body of War,"
made "Body of War"
is our attempt to show the harm in harm's way. In the middle of the most sanitized war of my lifetime, nobody sees this pain. These people are all below the radar.
illegal conspiracy to prescribe, administer and dispense controlled substances to an addict.
Robert Perry
of Eroshevich and Smith "naked in the bathtub in intimate embraces,"
photos of Eroshevich and Smith "naked in the bathtub in intimate embraces,"
evidence that Eroshevich, a woman, had a sexual relationship with Smith,
expert witness who would say such a sexual relationship between a doctor and an addicted patient could compromise the care,
might not be able to post the $250,000 bail before Thursday because he didn't have time to make the arrangements.
additional child sex charges
Wednesday
"a media circus,"
Cape Town International Jazz Festival
several major sporting events
several major sporting events
several major sporting events
General Assembly
of killing and dismembering a 22-year-old woman in 1991,
Ohio inmate, convicted of killing and dismembering a 22-year-old woman in 1991,
Potiskum,
left 65 people dead in northeastern Nigeria,
Potiskum,
65
the police headquarters and the anti-terror office
sodomy
Both are
three
a great deal of praise
"I think that both officers who stepped forward acted in a responsible, if not a heroic, way," Brooklyn
grand jury
Andrew Morales
Daryeel Bulasho Guud
Nairobi, Kenya,
Somalis
suspend all
cyanide capsule
25-year
cyanide
more than 70,000 dead.
a cyanide capsule
more than 70,000
invented the suicide belt.
its refineries now meet the required EPA standards on sulfur emissions.
Baytown, Texas,
required EPA
Beaumont, Texas; Baton Rouge, Louisiana;
a pill containing the molecular compound
a major national investment
a major national investment
Kate Mulgrew.
We must invest today in research that will most swiftly lead to the ultimate cure: prevention.
discovery of the ultimate cure for Alzheimer's disease: its prevention.
Reggae legend Lucky Dube,
his death cast a shadow over festivities
cast a shadow over festivities
Johannesburg
Johannesburg
South Africa's
was the headline in many Friday newspapers, knocking the World Cup off the front pages for the first time in days.
I'm doing it because I want to help her, I want to protect her from men,'"
new generation of Cameroonian women
breast ironing.
H1N1
Pork
crime of identity theft is not a top FBI priority."
$15.6 billion
crime of identity theft is not a top FBI priority."
Afghanistan's Helmand province
mock Afghan village
Afghanistan
high three-meter walls
Norfolk, England.
The Taliban insurgents
Luce's rhetoric is off-putting, hateful
one part concert, one part Christian revival.
seek to "stage a reverse revolution" against secular popular culture.
"stage a reverse revolution" against secular popular culture.
"stage a reverse revolution"
concert,
Luce is imposing conservative values
attended an Acquire the Fire
imposing conservative values on vulnerable teenagers.
Luce is imposing conservative values on vulnerable teenagers.
Christian revival,
Acquire the Fire
to "stage a reverse revolution" against secular popular culture.
"stage a reverse revolution" against secular popular culture. They have the pull of headlining rock concerts,
Ron Luce,
Acquire the Fire
BP
nearly 240 pounds
after he lost
240
an all-expense-paid trip to one of China's most famous boot camps for the obese.
cocaine and a smoking device, and battery against an airport screener
cocaine and a smoking device, and battery
charged
Coolio
2,100
The FBI
fbijobs.gov.
current needs are much more wide-ranging.
FBI
posted openings for 850 special agents and more than 2,100 professional support personnel. Officials say it's the largest
Dubai.
five British sailors
they had accidentally wandered into the country's waters,
The parents
Carl Fredricksen, who, frustrated with his mundane life, ties the thousands of balloons to his house and sets off for adventures in South America. A small boy ends up marooned on board, and hilarity ensues.
make even the hardest animation problems look simple
Carl Fredricksen,
production team at Pixar
more than 10,000 helium
by painful stings and strong currents,
Florida.
third
"I've never been in any pain, ever, like that in my whole life,"
swim from Cuba to Florida
appear to be hanging on well despite such
gorillas have survived
200 of the world's 700 mountain gorillas
appear to be hanging on
"The camp
about the entertainment and sports industries.
teens from underserved communities
mentor and a friend.
Usher's
"improvised explosive device"
"weaknesses in TSA procedures and other vulnerabilities."
canned-pork-loving family.
The Vent Haven Ventriloquist
Visitors
anyone interested in the grotesque.
SPAM®
Austin, Minnesota,
National
The Vent Haven Ventriloquist
anyone interested
Vent Haven Ventriloquist
Visitors
SPAM
underwent plastic surgery
it would not have cost that much for all of Ray's travels.
still-unsolved bank robbery.
The partially burned shotgun and the stocking masks
.30-06 high-powered hunting rifle
wooded area near a cemetery
create 1 million homeownership vouchers to cover the carrying costs of homes up to the 25th percentile of area home prices.
Administration own about 250,000 foreclosed
foreclosed properties
construction
Scottish Premier League
municipal water utilities
test results,
The Food and Drug Administration
store-bought stuff is actually less regulated than the water you get out of your faucet for free.
municipal water utilities
Omar al-Bashir
"Why hasn't the United Nations moved to protect the Palestinians in Gaza from Israeli barbarity and criminality, while it pretends to cry over the suffering of the people of Darfur? Why hasn't the United Nations and the international community intervened to lift the siege from Gaza, while it pretends to cry over the people of Darfur being deprived of relief and aid?"
13 international aid groups
the Sudanese president pandered to the West.
13 international aid groups to leave the country,
Iran and the United States
it comes to the sport of wrestling, longtime adversaries
widely
Iran and the United States
"They know their wrestling as well as anyone in the world. They treat our athletes like kings."
Andy Hrovat,
often leaves the victim ashamed, isolated and unable to tell others
Mackenzie Phillips
that incest survivors are "incredibly underrepresented."
sexual relationship
Ed McMahon
several health problems in
including a neck injury caused by a 2007 fall.
"TV's Bloopers and Practical Jokes,"
"Heeeeeeerre's Johnny!"
2005.
President Barack Obama
record in Tambourine Studios which was here.
Malmo.
record in Tambourine Studios which was here.
music, inspiration and life after "Lovefool."
Southern Swedish town
varies very much from project to project
Scoville
Chilies
entry into the Guinness World Records.
two minutes
most cases, eligibility for travel will be approved immediately.
register
up to two years or until their passport expires,
register
72
short-term visitors must register
Phoenix, Arizona,
Twenty-six passengers in the other cars, including several children,
into the neighborhood.
Phoenix, Arizona,
carrying 45 students
elementary school bus
Tuesday.
broad ecosystem consequences of hydrocarbons released into the environment,"
following the BP oil
oxygen
estimates that 70 to 79 percent of the oil that leaked from the well "has not been recovered and remains a threat to the ecosystem."
Guantanamo Bay
Together, these steps
Former U.S. President Jimmy Carter
centrality of human rights
to close GuantÃ¡namo Bay detention center and end U.S.-sponsored torture. Also under
Jimmy Carter
improved ties with President Barack Obama;
Hugo Chavez
the Jewish Holocaust.
that the Holocaust
improved ties with President Barack Obama;
U.S. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton
Pakistan
the Meena Bazaar
deadly strike on a Pakistani marketplace
security
Michael Vick
illegal dogfighting operation,
Vick
NFL
charges involving an illegal dogfighting operation,
asked CNN.com readers whether they thought Vick would -- or should -- play professional football again as well as their opinions on the case.
plea deal
The Killers
The Killers
Massive eco-friendly art installations
Frontman Brandon Flowers
MMS Director Elizabeth Birnbaum
agency long before the oil spill in the Gulf of Mexico
The Food and Agriculture Organization
an increase of 40 million people
higher food prices.
curriculum policy, adopted in 2009, bars teachers from taking a position on homosexuality in the classroom and says such matters are best addressed outside of school. It's become known as the neutrality policy.
a safe place for their son to attend school
instructing administrators to track bullying incidents related to the harassment of lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender students.
creating a safe environment
human skull."
nearly the entire skeleton of a man
impersonating a Rockefeller
killing a Southern California man who has been missing since the mid-1980s.
Bill Richardson
President Bill Clinton
New Mexico Gov. Bill Richardson
Gov. Bill Richardson
secretary of commerce,
secretary of commerce,
Ohio
rebuilding of lives.
Cincinnati, Ohio
Ike
panic attacks, hallucinations, delusions, vomiting, increased agitation and dilated pupils.
panic attacks, hallucinations, delusions, vomiting, increased agitation
sold online or in local stores,
A series of major international sporting events, a weak currency and
Cape Town
Cape Town's picturesque Victoria & Alfred Waterfront,
A series of major international sporting events, a weak currency and its perennially
The Indian Premier League cricket tournament
will "help pave the way toward more open trade."
the charges in the ruling.
requiring importers to channel media products
six.
murder
1,000 Rifles, and soldiers
more than 1,000 Rifles,
force structure and military posture—more airpower and naval,
based on strategy
Obama
Pink Floyd
Jessica Schuette's
via webcam
Endicott Performing Arts Center,
Jessica Schuette's
Casey Anthony
photos or X-rays of Caylee
lawsuit filed against Anthony
did not want the defense to copy, print or send any photos or X-rays of Caylee to their experts, many of whom were outside Florida, out of concern they might wind up in the media's hands.
suffered a minor heart attack at his home Monday night.
"Jeopardy,"
a local hospital,
suffered a minor heart attack
local hospital,
at a local hospital,
Katrina
A. Painting Contractor
is the founder and editor of McSweeney's, an independent publishing house based in San Francisco.
New Orleans
Jableh, a dusty fishing town on the coast of Syria,
Heath Ledger,
based in California and another in Texas.
California and another in Texas.
Evo Morales
the Chinese embassy in London
Tibet
the 50th
Protesters
50th anniversary of the Tibet uprising.
supporters,
Suu Kyi,
13
murder Valentinian and seize power.
Attila
Eugenius,
Attila, king of the Huns.
was married off to an elderly Roman senator,
Valentinian III,
Attila
set her eyes on the throne.
Employing her ample charms, she seduced her brother's royal chamberlain, Eugenius, and together, they plotted to murder Valentinian and seize power.
famine and disease that devastated the
She was married off to an elderly Roman senator,
satellite-based commercial mobile system for the transportation industry.
6,100 United States
Qualcomm's
been listed among Fortune's "100 Best Companies to Work For in America" for nine years in a row and the magazine's list of" Most Admired Companies."
largest satellite-based commercial mobile system
United States
6,100 United States patents
U.S. District Judge Dale Kimball ordered him
Brian Mitchell
"Those things can exist side by side: manipulativeness and mental illness,"
Sandra Cantu,
dairy-farm pond
stuffed into a suitcase in a dairy-farm pond near her Tracy, California, home.
more than one person may have been involved
8-year-old Sandra Cantu,
Vietnam
Don McCullin
inanimate objects
war
Vietnam, Bangladesh, the Congo, El Salvador, Biafra, Cambodia
Germany
Czech Republic
Men's Fitness magazine's
The power rests within yourself to enact any change in your life you desire.
Set a goal:
disabled
mother
the move could infringe human rights and would set a "disturbing precedent."
the womb of her severely disabled daughter
Britain
legal advice
a huge multi-colored hot-air balloon
portrait of Jesus.
ornaments and tinsel;
trying to root out sectarian violence
that the security situation in Baghdad is improving.
"We are just attesting that things are changing in Baghdad, slowly, but we hope that this change actually is real. We will wait for the future to tell us the truth about this."
There is nothing healthy about smoking.
they tracked the carcinogen and nicotine levels in nearly 500 smokers through a simple urine test and discovered a link between the level of a specific carcinogen and lung cancer.
between the level of a specific carcinogen and lung cancer.
link between the level of a specific carcinogen and lung cancer.
the carcinogen and nicotine levels in nearly 500 smokers
House Committee
sworn in Tuesday at a congressional hearing.
a September 16 shootout
Erik Prince,
congressional
Erik Prince,
House Committee
Prince,
Blackwater USA,
Erik Prince,
the House Committee
FBI
Department of State
Prince,
September 16 shootout
bird's-eye view
satellite
to locate ruins
in some of the most remote and forbidding places
scientists
troop withdrawal "is simply too little, too late, and unacceptable
"is simply too little, too late, and unacceptable to this Congress,
of 40,000 to 50,000 troops.
"Sen. Obama would withdraw only one to two combat brigades a month between now and the end of next year,"
"too little, too late."
"is simply too little, too late, and unacceptable to this Congress, and to the American people who have made clear their strong desire to bring our troops home, and end this war."
Obama
immediate withdrawal of 40,000 to 50,000 troops.
immediate drawdown of combat operations
30,000
President Bush's
immediate drawdown of combat operations at a pace of one or two brigades every month, to be completed by the end of next year,
"too little, too late."
Presidential candidate
Libya
of a deal reached this summer.
Libya has paid $1.5 billion to the families of terrorism victims,
attacks involving the two countries,
to encourage U.S. companies to invest in
Libya
Libya
fastest goal in Scottish
African Nations Cup duty
Rangers
4-1
the power-sharing agreement reached after violence disrupted this year's presidential election.
Constitutional Amendment
President Robert Mugabe,
parliament
19 details the posts and institutions that were created by the power-sharing deal, including the position of prime minister intended for Morgan Tsvangirai, leader of the Movement for Democratic Change.
Zimbabwe President Robert Mugabe published a draft constitutional amendment
President Robert Mugabe, left, and opposition leader Morgan Tsvangirai
Mir Hossein Moussavi,
in the city of Shahr-e Kurd.
Nasrollah Torabi
plainclothes militia
Nasrollah Torabi
April 2007 incident,
in London
George O'Dowd,
anarchist rioters and the police,
"Serenity: Float Out,"
"Firefly"
Captain Mal and friends
Wash, the wise-cracking ace pilot
"We are going to clear every drop of oil off the shore,"
at dawn Wednesday.
Gulf of Mexico,
President Obama
The Venetian Resort Hotel Casino and the Sands Expo and Convention Center
The Venetian Resort Hotel Casino
Sands Macau
May 2004,
opened in May 1999,
May 2004,
Venetian
opened in May 1999,
Venetian Casino Resort
Las Vegas Sands
gaming facilities,
added the 1,013-suite Venezia tower
The Sands Macau
expanding his mobile phone services into North Korea,
40 percent
OPEC,
OPEC,
"There is no problem with His Majesty's conditions. From my chats with doctors, there is nothing to be concerned about," Abhisit said
Thailand's King Bhumibol Adulyadej,
fever and fatigue,
earn enough money
almost certain death
An 18-year-old Guatemalan man
Rome, Georgia,
various crimes, which
should serve as a warning to those who are contemplating committing such crimes,
convicted of various crimes, ranging from murder to being a
Iranian drug dealer
hanged
Betty Dukes,
billions
Circuit Court of Appeals
alleges that the company's "strong, centralized structure fosters or facilitates gender stereotyping and discrimination."
"vocal-learning species" include dolphins, elephants, seals and walruses.
14 types of parrot species and one elephant
Alex, an African grey parrot,
keep time with a tune.
devastated by last week's 7.0-magnitude earthquake,
The capital's airport, the country's roads and its ports were devastated
the United States
possibility of opening an airstrip at the city of Jacmel
some equipment and other materials
chanting in a bar.
Nippon Airways
passengers to use the restroom before flying to reduce weight.
airline industry in Japan
reduce the amount of carbon expelled on 38 domestic routes
passengers to use the restroom before flying to reduce weight.
reduce carbon dioxide by 4.2 tons a month.
400 IU vitamin D a day
darker skin
tend to
Taliban fighters posing in the uniforms of 10 French soldiers
10 French soldiers
Michael Jordan
at the Harding Park course in San Francisco.
tobacco
Michael Jordan
a severely injured McCain talking on camera in the so-called "Hanoi Hilton."
being interrogated
showing Pfc. Bowe Bergdahl,
Sen. John McCain,
Sen. John McCain,
Syrian government's ongoing crackdown on dissidents,
by the end of the year,
Nano
350,000
delivery of the Nano,
July.
"take down" threatening airplanes,
"Our job is to make sure that we stay safe going forward and that we show that the terrorists didn't win and that New York City is back,"
"The New York City Police Department has a lot of capabilities that you don't know
Bristol
Johnston over custody of their son be kept private to avoid a "media circus."
her mother is not involved in the custody case, except as a grandmother.
Kathmandu,
near Nepal's iconic Mount Everest
Nepal's iconic Mount Everest
bad
Independence Day
Independence Day
The American Society of Sydney,
July Fourth celebration
the 7th annual Fourth of July picnic,
Fourth of July soirees
between 15,000 and 20,000
Bush
"The House of Representatives
endless series of failed votes to pull our troops out
valuable time
for troops.
"The House of Representatives
funding for troops.
House Majority Leader Steny Hoyer,
Bush
Congress
"hold hostage"
State Children's Health Insurance Program
Congress
reminds us that congressional Republicans remain ready and willing to rubber-stamp the
Democratic-controlled Congress
In May 1939,
Tugend's father
An adventurous spirit mixed with a touch of wanderlust
Korean
Stade Rennes
Stade Rennes
slumped to a 1-0 home defeat against Monaco,
France
is what you stand for and what makes you special. [It's] composed of values, a mission, and a positioning statement that depict what you do and who your audience is. [It] is an indicator for how valuable you are to employers and customers at every stage of your career."
you stand for and
CareerBuilder.com:
get a shelter dog.
Goldendoodle or a Labradoodle.
kind of dog he should get and
are trying to determine possible
two weeks ago
woman walking her dog
six
killed and injured U.S. soldiers,
Muslim-Americans
The U.S. population is expected to top out at close to 312.8 million people
drops the Waterford Crystal ball at 11:59 p.m. ET on New Year's Eve.
312.8 million
The Big Apple
Susan Boyle,
A 47-year-old charity worker
She told the judges and the audience of the show that she was single, she lived with her cat, Pebbles, and she had never been kissed.
Susan Boyle,
leave
two
November 2.
Pregnant women in Peru are dying at scandalous rates,
"Health services for pregnant women in Peru are like a lottery:
"The rates of maternal mortality in Peru are scandalous. The fact that so many women are dying from preventable causes is a human rights violation.
of maternal deaths is high,
240 per 100,000,
"The Peruvian
"Health services for pregnant women in Peru are like a lottery: If you are poor and indigenous, the chances are you
to keep girls out of public schools.
has issued a new threat to foreign aid workers,
Bijou
Michelle Phillips,
that no one would go out of their way to admit having a consensual incestuous relationship.
sexual relationship with her father,
her sexual relationship with her father,
"This news was confusing and also scary, because I'd lived alone with him since I was 3,"
detailed account of her sexual relationship with her father,
have vehemently denied Mackenzie
London
conspiracy to murder and cause explosions.
Bilal Abdulla
London and
she is the best 'actor' in comics,"
humanity in a world where gender has been all but eliminated from the equation.
"Y: The Last Man,"
asylum in Britain.
Osama bin Laden's sons
Omar bin Laden,
One of Osama bin Laden's sons
U.N. High Commissioner for Refugees
A Malaysian model,
the end of the Islamic holy month of Ramadan.
in public.
end of the Islamic holy month of Ramadan.
Iran
David Miliband
alleged irregularities during the election process
tourist
as a result of the political violence,
40 billion Kenyan Shillings
orgy of violence that has greeted
stealing jobs from real
has been nominated by President Barack Obama to the Court,
confirmation hearings
Sonia Sotomayor
affirms that Latinos matter in America.
marginalized and demonized and feared.
Sonia Sotomayor's nomination
Maguindanao province,
Maguindanao province,
English city of Manchester
northwest English city of Manchester
Norway
Almost two decades after she left the Eritrean orphanage
her father was alive and well, living back home with her brothers and sister.
Judge Daniel Dawson
Rifqa Bary,
her father
Ari Abdallah Morales and Marcelles James Peter,
not guilty
Richmond High School campus, in the Richmond community north of Oakland on San Francisco Bay.
Oliver Stone
his father, President George H.W.
timing was right for his upcoming film, "W."
President Bush
the mosque of Bilal.
Rachel's
as Ibrahimi mosque
"I'm going to go on a six-week trip with my husband, and I'm sure there will be long-enough flights for me to think about all the things we could have done better.
she would do the job again --
Friday.
take a vacation
$81 million (£56 million)
involved the borrowing companies creating "overriding" leases.
fraud
$81 million (£56 million) fraud on the corporate banking department of Allied Irish Banks
Allied Irish Banks
The induction ceremony
4 million
is $9,369.
registered lobbyist
Obama's health care
Daschle
Former Sen. Tom Daschle,
lead the Department of Health and Human Services,
universal health care coverage
reforming health care in the United
United
four
The Gunners
Premier
suspended.
installing videocameras
mentally handicapped adults
state school for
Seven school
-- the motherless cub defended by Elphaba in "Wicked."
children's books
14 years
14
tells the story of the Cowardly Lion
Saudi Arabia.
disqualified
Nawaz Sharif
filed paperwork
Nawaz Sharif
his candidacy
that the treaty could produce "the possibility of a detente" between Washington and Moscow,
July 1963
calling the practice unnecessary, unnatural, and reprehensible
for serious conditions like motor neuron disease,
hybrid human-animal
The Human Fertilization and Embryology
calling the practice unnecessary, unnatural, and reprehensible
the pontiff to pray for him
"I am writing with deep humility to ask that you pray for me as my own health declines,"
Cristiano Ronaldo and Lionel Messi,
Ricardo Izecson dos Santos Leite
Ricardo
Ricardo Izecson dos Santos Leite
Kaka
Kaka
Asif Ali Zardari,
"For standing up outside the car,
Asif Ali Zardari,
Asif Ali Zardari,
he admitted that he had fathered a child with Hunter,
by 2 p.m. Wednesday,
Andrew Young
he admitted that he had fathered a child with Hunter,
One woman
Tiber river.
southern region of Calabria
One
southern region of Calabria
second victim was found in
a paragraph about the king and crown prince
illegal to defame, insult
a paragraph about the king and crown prince
he was released Friday and taken to the Australian embassy
their plane crashed in a remote region of the country.
five years in captivity
remote region of Colombia.
U.S. government contractors
he recently received bomb-making training in the Waziristan region of Pakistan.
suspect
McDonald's
all
breading-free poultry.
Popeye's,
the question of whether land around the temple belongs to Thailand or Cambodia.
application to have the temple listed as a World Heritage Site
Thailand sent troops to retrieve the trio and gradually built up their numbers.
dispute arose from the fact that the Cambodian government used a map drawn during the French occupation of Cambodia -- a map that places the temple and surrounding area in Cambodian territory.
Thailand sent troops to retrieve the trio and gradually built up their numbers.
the question of whether land around the temple belongs
brought the homeless to light,
20-25 degrees cooler,
Newcastle teammates Lee Bowyer
Newcastle teammates Lee Bowyer (left) and Kieron Dyer turn against one-another.
children and teens
less than a year old
The surgeries are performed free
were successfully separated
Sami Al-Shalan,
less than a year old
accept noncelibate clergy members and lay leaders who are in "lifelong" and "monogamous" same-sex relationships.
accept noncelibate clergy members and lay leaders who are in "lifelong" and "monogamous" same-sex relationships.
gay and lesbian clergy,
Evangelical Lutheran Church
accept noncelibate clergy members and lay leaders who are in "lifelong" and "monogamous" same-sex relationships.
accept noncelibate clergy members and lay leaders who are in "lifelong" and "monogamous" same-sex relationships.
not extremely
at times.
fortune and glory
stunning narrative about Nathan's search for a lost city called Iram of the Pillars.
The puzzles
has admitted using crystal methamphetamine
tennis
lied to the sport's governing bodies in the same period about a positive drugs test to avoid a ban.
by vast sadness. Then comes a tidal wave of euphoria that sweeps away every negative thought in my head.
He faces one charge of securities fraud in connection
up to 20 years in prison and a $5 million fine if convicted.
$15.5 million
November 25, 2008
$5.5 million
brokerage firm
up to 20 years in prison and a $5 million fine if convicted.
The wife of accused swindler Bernard Madoff
the five-day format.
"I am not interested in 20/20 at all. Maybe I am an old fogey but I think it is destroying Test cricket,"
the 20/20 version of the
Test cricket is not being helped by the way the sport's governing body,
military "code of conduct"
U.S. and Afghan military officials
attacks aimed at avoiding the killing of civilians, but U.S.
Taliban military
bring comfort and entertainment
in Iraq
USO
Colbert, Jon Stewart, Scarlett Johansson, Kid Rock, Queensryche, Toby Keith, Lewis Black and Robin Williams.
a scramble at gas stations
jumped 57 cents per gallon overnight in Milton, Ontario.
DETROIT, Michigan
NCAA men's basketball Final
Michigan State
The participation of Michigan State
The NCAA men's basketball Final Four
parts of northwestern Alabama.
Tupelo, Mississippi,
damaging trees, power lines
Tupelo, Mississippi,
parts of Tupelo, Mississippi,
to not include a camera in the new iPod Touch
camera
iPod Touch,
Biz Stone
attacks shut down the social networking site Twitter
unclear
Christian Louboutin
shoemaker Christian Louboutin
injunction that would have kept fellow designer Yves Saint Laurent from selling shoes with red soles.
Lagos
pick up some tasteful, but admittedly, not cheap, Nigerian art
The former capital of Nigeria, Lagos
At Tarkwa Bay
Lagos
Caliente on Goriola Street,
being less than impressed by Danny Boyle's Oscar-winning film, "Slumdog Millionaire."
Bachchan
comments from readers on his blog had been mistakenly attributed to him.
Amitabh Bachchan
as "The Big B"
General Motors
it would close its Saturn line
an additional $700 million
being fought along the border.
second staph infection.
infection
About 30 percent of people carry staph in their noses without exhibiting symptoms,
second staph infection
items that come into contact with your skin,
Experts say Methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus, or MRSA, a form of staph resistant to common antibiotics,
recommends practicing good personal hygiene and taking care of your skin, which includes wearing protective clothing and covering cuts and abrasions with clean, dry bandages.
had a second staph infection and has accused his team of covering it up.
At least 50
Arrow Stage Lines
the bus lost control on a curve,
Nine
state Highway 163, about five miles north of Mexican Hat,
state Highway 163, about five miles north of Mexican Hat,
people were killed and 19 injured
Monday.
rolled over
Nine
a weekend ski trip to Telluride,
the bus lost control on a curve, ran off the road and rolled over
people
operated 36 child pornography Web sites in the United States and Mexico.
wounded several times during the attack. Though still in intensive care, his ventilator was removed over the weekend, and he began talking afterwards,
the alleged gunman acted alone and was not part of a broader terrorist plot."
Maj. Nidal Malik Hasan,
Yemen
FBI disclosed that Hasan came to its attention as part of an unrelated terrorism
South American World Cup qualifying clash
Lionel
South Africa.
South Africa.
CNN.com
Football
the values of honesty, solidarity and fraternity,
Bayern Munich
"The sport of football can be a vehicle of education for the values of honesty, solidarity and fraternity, especially for the younger generation,"
Bayern Munich
of education for
honesty, solidarity
honesty, solidarity
Bayern Munich
day in which police divers worked in water
The man's
the submerged Piper Saratoga PA-32 fixed-wing plane that was carrying three people when it collided Saturday with a tourist
on a day in which police divers worked in water made treacherous by poor visibility and strong currents.
Silvia Rigamonti,
eighth body
man's body
Monday
"They were professionals."
cautiously optimistic.
Troy Corsby Thomas,
Michael J. Fox
You've long fought for that.
a documentary
talented inner-city kids
tours of college campuses
16
star in "The Day the Earth Stood
alien being,
movie never comes up with a convincing explanation for why his superpowers don't extend to, say, picking up a telephone.
Rapper Rick Ross
a Delta flight to Memphis
Ross was taken to a Florida hospital after he suffered an unidentified medical emergency
Rick Ross
Baath Party,
recalled their ambassadors
al Qaeda,
Islamic State of Iraq
hand over two suspects in last week's deadly bombings in the Iraqi capital.
in the same 92-acre parcel west of Albuquerque, New Mexico,
earlier this month
National Gallery in London
National Gallery in London
head and shoulders of Christ
Dianne Modestini,
detailing the use of terror interrogations
CIA officials and others
four Bush-era memos detailing the use of terror interrogations such as waterboarding, a technique used to simulate drowning.
are dying earlier
that their aversion to doctors stems from the Tuskegee Syphilis Experiment,
reluctance to go to the doctor.
The artist, Sean Delonas,
reaction "ridiculous,"
Col Allan,
mauling of a Connecticut woman by a pet chimp,
mauling of a Connecticut woman by a pet chimp,
African-American leaders
"We suffered a terrible tragedy at Ocean Isle this morning,"
they were not yet releasing their
officials had not yet contacted all the
Beach, North Carolina,
participating in "alternative spring break" programs
65,000 students
community service-based opportunities dealing
volunteering
community service-based opportunities dealing with the most pressing issues of the day, including hunger and homelessness, disaster
community service-based opportunities
make sure this doesn't happen again,
froze
Bay City, Michigan,
Bay Medical Center,"
93-year-old World War II medic
over $600,000
local hospital,
"puerile" tactics in the way it adds credit card fees on to advertised fares.
the no-frills carrier was playing a "funny game" by imposing fees for anyone not using an obscure credit card.
UK's Office of Fair Trading
John Fingleton,
"Ryanair
many Haitians are using broken pieces of buildings as construction material,
"These things can just collapse all over again."
that the place could collapse, undermining his backbreaking work,
immunodeficiency,
on Thursday
heart
five to eight
five to eight cases in one million live births.
"Never again!"
"Managerially, software-wise, procedure-wise, training-wise, there is no confidence that these people will be ready in less than 50 days for the election we are all going to have,"
optical reading device.
2000
"Managerially, software-wise, procedure-wise, training-wise, there is no confidence that these people will be ready in less than 50 days for the
after the terrorist assaults on the World Trade Center and the Pentagon
the Statue of Liberty,
Statue of Liberty,
Lady Liberty's crown
West Virginia's
At least 22 others
At least 22
Corey Davis,
Joshua Napper
More than 50 people
"not normally found in this
Country Cottage
gym
the bedrooms of their two-floor home
St. Louis,
threatening messages
gym to work out.
GPS and Wi-Fi card that can be integrated into the company's netbooks to turn them into gizmos that can offer turn-by-turn direction as well as any Garmin or TomTom.
pop open a netbook and get directions and also also make their netbook location aware.
a GPS and Wi-Fi card
Dell
George Zinkhan,
George Zinkhan,
about a mile
George Zinkhan,
piano
album you've made since becoming a mother.
$40,000 in jewelry and his luxury SUV
Brisco,
gold watch, bracelet, chain
British Mitchell,
gold watch, bracelet, chain and pendant were taken from him, along with the keys to his Range Rover.
the government
Okavango Delta
mid-range camps,
For mid-range camps,
EpiSurveyor.
in the developing
the spread of the virus,"
those are in the developing world,"
Kenya
to meet the low asking price, Amazon will sell the Kindle Fire at a loss when it debuts on November 15,
In order to meet the low asking price, Amazon will sell the Kindle Fire at a loss when it debuts on November 15,
$199
a married couple
two vehicles while landing, then spun and
oncoming traffic.
single-engine airplane made an emergency landing on a California highway Sunday morning,
24
Citizens for Responsibility and Ethics in Washington.
"Hellboy II: The Golden Army."
Hellboy
His skin is red; he has two shorn-off horns on his head, a gargantuan club fist and a long,
Cement Mountain
A Texas couple
At least 49
Cleopatra
Philadelphia Eagles
People
natives
Kool-Aid pickles
outdoor vats without lids
Sultan Munad,
Stephen Farrell
Crossfire during the raid also killed a woman and a
Local Afghans
Sultan Munad,
Wednesday
Jurors
I want to apologize,"
to spare his life
murdering Jessie Davis and their baby,
Bobby Lee Cutts Jr.
57 years to life in prison.
of two counts of aggravated murder
his life be spared.
sometimes for fuel,
The Indira Gandhi Children's Hospital in central Kabul has to run on an operating budget of less than $1,200 a month,
The government
less than $1,200 a month,
ranks as the oldest active duty unit in the Army.
Caisson Platoon of the 3rd U.S. Infantry regiment, also known as the Old Guard,
a riderless horse with boots facing backwards in the
According to Army
40
white actors
of the overall presence of Latinos in film and television,
how Latinos have been depicted on the big screen
"La Bamba"
Turkish warplanes pounded Kurdish separatist targets in northern Iraq on Saturday and Sunday as well as last week.
U.S., Turkish and Iraqi leaders
Turkey,
United States, Turkey and Iraq
talked about the dangers of the Kurdish separatist rebels along the Turkish-Iraqi border,
PKK
Turkey
Turkey,
Turkish warplanes
ligament damage
Patrice Evra
his back problem
Rio Ferdinand
$1.74 a gallon,
gasoline
$4.623,
highest gas prices in the nation,
in the nation, with a gallon of regular gasoline at $4.623, followed by California at $4.583 as of June 30. Hawaii, Connecticut and Washington make up the top five states with
Missouri
oil and gas
Hit Song Science
breaking down more than 60 elements of a
claims to be able to predict whether a song will be a pop hit
Music Intelligence Solutions,
compute whether a song has chart-topping potential,
a piece of software claims it can compute whether a song has chart-topping potential, and a number of record companies and musicians are using Hit Song Science (HSS) to gauge whether they have a hit on their hands.
6-3 6-7 6-3 7-5 win over Britain's 10th seed Andy Murray.
win over 15th seed
Fernando Verdasco
A ninth person remains in critical condition,
the identities of eight
also said that he removed a shotgun from the residence and hid it in the trunk of his car.
eight people who were killed in a mobile
the sex industry,
Chinese government
they can avoid HIV infections by taking a pill.
700,000
sex industry,
the direction that
the first African American to lead a major
is the man for this job."
Former President Bill Clinton
Pervaiz Mahsi
stop the suicide bomber
of 1959
powerful networking groups.
use the Internet to hook up with powerful networking groups.
Paying your car note
which debts
Web design, programming, marketing
guns
guns,
But the operation has mainly shown just how big a problem exists,
a flood of guns,
drug cartels.
operation has mainly shown just how big a problem exists,
People whose immune system are suppressed, from HIV or drugs taken after organ transplants are at
When anal cancer is caught early, chemotherapy and radiation are highly effective.
anal cancer,
location of the tumor
5,000
anal
Cancer
50,000
foreign country,
weigh in on where I go and
CNN.com
The destination
CNN.com
McNair, 36, and Sahel Kazemi,
grown frustrated with their relationship
she was stressed and needed money to pay bills.
Steve McNair,
"I actually was more concerned for his family,"
pirate
Capt. Richard Phillips
Gurnon
The bout, at Helsinki's Hartwall-Arena,
Ruslan Chagaev
two years
National Front Coalition,
Prime Minister Abdullah Ahmad Badawi,
passing laws that favor
Abdullah
gain the two-thirds majority
Prime Minister
failed
an industry for kidnapping,"
no ransoms,
standoff "a classic hostage situation,
you in essence create an industry for kidnapping,"
"The U.S. has a very clear policy of no concessions; that's different than no negotiations,"
public television and public radio.
travel shows on public television and public radio.
two weeks ago,
their home in Columbus, Georgia,
The remains were discovered in a wooded area of Columbus
23-month-old girls, Aliyah and Agana Battle, and his son, Cedric Harrington, 3,
that Harrington had threatened them
Columbus, Georgia,
Columbus, Georgia,
China
Credit card debt
133
China
32
China
up 32 percent
Thompson's campaign,
the Iraq war.
Sen. John McCain,
submitted by the public
bringing the troops home from Iraq
the Iraq war.
Rep. Ron Paul,
bringing the troops home from Iraq
views on immigration, the Iraq war, abortion, gun control and even whether they believed every word in the Bible was true.
Iraq war.
Former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani and former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney
Former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani and former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney
communication program,
CenterPoint Energy's Critical Care Program
The Public Utility Commission of Texas
Brooke Henson,
Harvard University and Columbia University
assumed the identity of
Brooke Henson,
Police
left altimeter was giving "erroneous" information, indicating that the
pilots
Turkish Airlines Flight 1951
who fly its 737
a faulty altimeter contributed to the recent crash of a 737 in the Netherlands.
Hamburg
Hamburg
Ivica Olic celebrates his opening goal for Hamburg as they
fourth
Stuttgart
Stuttgart,
was not meant to portray the Virgin Mary,
Playboy
María Florencia Onori from Argentina
María Florencia Onori
depiction of the Virgin Mary.
economic downturn.
a half-million dollars
pastor of a non-denominational
highest offering ever.
Cross Timbers Community
tallest building,
tallest building,
innovative, exciting skyscrapers
highlight of the rebuilt World Trade Center.
over a kilometer (3,281 feet)
over a kilometer (3,281 feet) high.
revolution -- plans for a 50-story building have been given the green light, which will make it the first
$10,000
$10,000
is a "joke,"
spent $10,000 on a security system, hired a bodyguard for his son's wedding and never leaves home without a .45-caliber handgun strapped to his chest.
$1,000 per witness.
is a "joke,"
her son was never told
gunned down
Colorado's witness protection
witness intimidation
practice of releasing non-Mexican immigrants,
Michael Friel.
the U.S.-Mexico
that stepped-up enforcement is working.
illegal immigrants arrested along U.S. borders
releasing non-Mexican immigrants,
releasing non-Mexican immigrants,
illegal immigrants
said the reasons for the change are varied and complex,
23 percent
The number of illegal immigrants arrested along U.S. borders
Koreans moved against the attackers after the Williams
Three wounded
Somalia
North Korean
benzene.
were being held aboard the North Korean vessel,
crew members of a North Korean freighter regained control of their ship from pirates
a man. If he's going to cheat, it has nothing to do with his emotional attachment to you or his feelings for you."
profess, provide and protect. "If you don't say to your man: 'Okay, look, next time she calls, do not leave us in the middle of the night. We're unprotected,'"
They think they can get away with it
"Ladies, you're not going to get closure from a man,"
The president dismissed talks of a pardon,
Khodorkovsky once headed the Yukos oil company,
"Concerning the possibility of a pardon for someone, Khodorkovsky or anyone else, the procedure has to be carried out in accordance with our country's rules,"
vote might be put off.
the killing of Armenians by Ottoman Turks
calling the killing of Armenians by Ottoman Turks genocide
incensed by the resolution
Ottoman Turks genocide
calling the killing of Armenians by Ottoman Turks genocide
Incirlik
a number of people
by Ottoman Turks genocide
plans for redeployment of our troops in the future,"
"I said I thought we would bring this up prior to us leaving here," said Hoyer
10,000- and 9,000-foot runways and 57 hardened aircraft shelters,
Incirlik,
killing of Armenians by Ottoman Turks
was incensed by the resolution calling the killing of Armenians by Ottoman Turks genocide
was incensed by the resolution calling the killing of Armenians by Ottoman Turks genocide
there are a number of people who are revisiting their own positions. We will have to determine where everybody is."
Ankara acknowledges the killings of Armenians
the apparent victim of an ammonia leak
apparent victim of an ammonia leak
woman's body
that the woman had been driving north when she encountered the plume and tried to turn around, but her car stalled.
how his family reacted to the scandal,
how his family reacted to the scandal, to what he feels he learnt from the whole experience,
(CNN)
the whole experience,
welterweight world champion
Mayweather Jr.
John Allen Muhammad,
shot 13 people, killing 10.
dates
Manassas, Virginia,
Crawford, Texas.
Inauguration Day,
Inauguration Day,
summer of 2008
Crawford, Texas.
champion
Italian Open
European
Embassy in the capital, Baku,
a radical Islamic terror plot against the U.S.
Islamic terror plot
Britain also shut its
shut its embassy in Baku
encourages Americans to maintain a high level of vigilance
The U.S. Embassy in Baku issued a warden message warning Americans in Azerbaijan to take precautions.
shut
Sean McCormack
the public
U.S.
Embassy
shut its embassy
close its doors to the public Monday,
U.S.
radical Islamic terror plot
on Monday
U.S.
More than 2,000 of his
Iran
counseling to married couples, even sex therapy.
Vancouver, British Columbia.
Christopher Guest, Michael McKean and Harry Shearer
Spinal Tap
Michael McKean and Harry Shearer
emergency airworthiness directive,
in the Atlantic Ocean off the coast of Newfoundland.
a municipal building in Baghdad's Sadr City,
two soldiers and two civilians from the Defense and State departments
Four
two soldiers and two civilians from the Defense and State departments
The U.S. military
More than half
care, but also life expectancy.
More than half of people cannot pinpoint the exact
U.S.
poorer quality of health care,
"Moving to a more comprehensive primary care delivery model
wide variation in the medical centers' facilities and programs for female veterans.
the Government Accountability Office
by 30 percent
the Government Accountability Office
it is taking comprehensive steps to improve,
Gomez and Mendoza-Villegas were sentenced to 24 years in federal prison; Reyes was sentenced to 26 years.
decades in prison,
chained to a mattress
kidnapping
right place at the right time,
why some people are successful
reasons why planes operated by members of particular cultures have a greater likelihood of crashing.
belligerent
Colorado Springs, Colorado,
passenger appeared to be intoxicated,
pathetic pining and pandering for middle-class votes
lofty talk and simplistic solutions
Education
middle class
middle-class
Jobs
Jobs
nationally syndicated columnist and Chicago, Illinois-based radio host.
447
Debris
on June 1.
Flight 447 went down in the Atlantic Ocean
"the powerful differential between the victim and the perpetrator,"
between 1994 and 2009,
Coach
July 1999,
Nineteen
Myanmar
Aung San Suu Kyi
Aung San Suu Kyi
a dense dust storm
One
series of highway pileups
Interstate 10 in central Arizona,
on Interstate 10 in central Arizona,
Scarlett Johansson and Mila Kunis and
Scarlett Johansson and Mila Kunis and singer Christina Aguilera.
break into e-mails
CNN.
worked on Wall Street.
Moving to New York after graduating he worked
Bobby Chinn
changed everything.
American singer-songwriter, Tucker Crowe,
Philip Markoff, a pre-med student at Boston University
22-year-old college
with the death of a woman
with the death of a woman who may have been contacted through a Craigslist ad,
Gavriel Noach Holtzberg,
Anti-Terrorism
a Virginia meditation group
gunfire
build on the 400 acres of prime real estate in the bustling
Max Eggrel,
Blob's Park lives again.
German-style biergarten.
Max Eggrel,
February 6, 1958,
remembrance on the 50th anniversary of the Munich air disaster.
when Flight 609 ZU crashed
Flight 609 ZU crashed on the third attempt
Eight players
Manchester United's Busby Babes
"underwear bomber"
Air France-KLM
to comment on the lawsuit.
tackled the "underwear bomber"
on Saturday
The Swiss-mediated peace
Armenia and Turkey
Armenia and Turkey
"Our operations are strong and during this process
restructure its finances.
its finances.
Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection.
"We expect to continue our operations as normal during the reorganization and are planning for new product launches in 2009,"
worrying about offending men
be such wimps in the face of an odious man is in our DNA. And young
"No,"
CSP plants
green energy
could generate enough electricity for the whole country.
"concentrated solar power"
"concentrated solar power" (CSP)
Sanlucar, Spain
"concentrated solar power"
6,000 homes
nine
James "Junior" Ortega,
13
12 soldiers and one civilian
Fort Hood shooting
40
40
DNA analysis
Just how much health-relevant information consumers can glean
how much health-relevant information consumers can glean
retail genomics,
for retail genomics,
23andMe,
Google-backed 23andMe,
eight.
Police Foundation,
their emergency plans
eight."
it's a matter of money.
murderous rampage
give you tips on how
CNN.com
immortality.
such gang activity is spreading across the nation,
Colur Tyme Tattoo Parlor
a major bust
establishing a "pipeline" for illegal arms more than 500 miles away in Mississippi.
Annie Le.
"He's a nice man, always,"
Yale School of Medicine
interest in any of the other girls at [the
murder in the death of Yale graduate
an SNL
Barack Obama and the debate moderators
"Maybe we should ask [Obama] if he's comfortable and needs another pillow,"
Hillary Clinton
newspaper and polythene
in newspaper and polythene with only their heads showing.
Customs and Border Protection service
23-year-old man
A mother and her teenage son
shrink wrap,
a blowtorch.
charged Tuesday
the kidnapping and killing of Spadafora
face justice in the case of the killing of Hugo Spadafora,
Romania as a giant Dracula-inspired
to visit with his family in Florida,
has no plans to step aside,
forgive her husband,
forgive Mark for his actions.
Saudi Aramco
Indian Ocean waters seas near the Gulf of Aden,
Gulf of Aden,
July
believed to have started as a way for Mongols to train for military and hunting expeditions.
every July,
July,
the Naadam
says the movement is catching on. "The trend toward a smoke-free country is going on everywhere," says Daniel Smith, president of the
smoker,
college-age students,
a smoke-free country
nearly 60
college students
£20 million
turns 18 on Monday,
in a trust fund
"I don't think I'll be particularly extravagant.
have some sort of party,"
£20 million
Daniel Radcliffe
Monday,
books
held in a trust fund
£20 million
books
Daniel Radcliffe
as he turns 18 on Monday,
£20 million
will eventually push it through similar experiences
urban organic agriculture,
"Special Period"
become more resilient and self-sufficient
organic foods,
faced with dramatically reduced amounts of hydrocarbon energy,
has until 5 p.m. Tuesday
Fulton County's
5 p.m. Tuesday
a margin of 620 votes.
5 p.m.
Mary Norwood.
to make their voices heard.
Obama's
Erica Williams says the idea that young people don't care about the health care issue is wrong.
Obama's reform plan,
2008
survivors
these sorts of hoaxes?
"History on Trial: My Day in Court with David Irving."
Credulous reporters, who should have sought some form of verification, kept writing about this "miraculous" event.
anti-government demonstrations
Tehran
in front of the building that once housed the U.S. diplomatic corps.
a disputed presidential election.
Kate Moss
of supermodel Kate Moss
heavily slashing profit forecasts.
Northern Rock building society,
Northern Rock branch in southeast London
bank and there is absolutely no reason for either mortgage customers or savers to worry."
lender was bailed out by the Bank of England
withdraw cash from a Northern Rock branch
UK
Northern Rock
Northern Rock
a leading UK mortgage
Customers are believed to have already withdrawn about £1 billion ($2 billion)
worried customers ignored reassurances from the
declared a state of emergency and ordered 2,000 members of the army and the police to help rescue workers.
turning the gun on himself.
turning the gun on himself.
shot four family members,
Dennis Carter Sr., 50, also shot and critically injured his pregnant daughter-in-law,
shot four family members, three fatally,
his pregnant daughter-in-law,
Dennis Carter Sr.
Senior Adviser and Assistant to the President for Intergovernmental Affairs and Public Liaison.
trusts her completely and considers her family.
a Yemeni cleric
Mohamed Alanssi, testified that al-Moayad boasted about giving money, weapons and recruits to al Qaeda leader Osama bin Laden.
Sheik Mohammed Ali al-Moayad and Mohammed Mohsen Zayed,
York appeals court
Jennings, Louisiana.
eight
eight killings in four years
eight
He encouraged anyone with information
"We chose Vietnam [to launch the bike] because there are 22 million scooters in a country of 85 million people. That's a lot of people riding scooters
"The nano-crystalline material
its new electric motor
$800
Iraq
President Bush drew parallels between the aftermath of the Vietnam War
rally behind a strong central government,
draws parallels Wednesday between the cost of pulling out of Iraq and "the tragedy of Vietnam."
"America lost the war in Vietnam because our troops were trapped in a distant country we did not understand supporting a government that lacked sufficient legitimacy with its people," Kennedy
how we got into the Vietnam War and how we left,"
Sunday
Big Ben's
1859,
named after Sir Benjamin Hall,
more than 60
over the past two years
disputed maritime territory
dispute over their sea border
Peru's foreign minister, Jose Antonio Garcia Belaunde,
disputed maritime territory between the South American neighbors.
sought to downplay the row.
has bubbled anew
South American
the origins of everything from a dessert and a fruit to pisco, a grape liquor.
"the most free election anywhere in the world."
protests,
country's affairs, including the post-election situation.
Mahmoud Ahmadinejad,
"is the key to the success of a nation."
Logan Peak's
10:30 a.m. (12:30 p.m. ET)
Two
died after being
down the mountain,
drug-related killings
Monday,
Colombia, Mexico, Guatemala
the presidents
drug-related killings
cleaning machine
$1,500 a month
Rep. Jason Chaffetz
cleaning machine
the former football player didn't put any money toward the bail that allowed him to leave jail in September.
O.J. Simpson
posting $250,000
assault
$250,000
O.J. Simpson
a bruised and battered Rihanna.
who leaked a picture
a picture
Rihanna.
BP-CNPC
The Iraqi government
oil
to increase production at the oil field by 50 percent, to 285,000 barrels a day,
collaborating with the Colombian government,
at least 27
at least 27
accused of collaborating with the Colombian government,
collaborating with the Colombian government,
some of the Awa
American Airlines
flown a combined 58 times before the problems were corrected
maintenance issues and problems with its drug- and alcohol-testing programs.
maintenance issues and problems with its drug- and alcohol-testing programs.
American Airlines
American Airlines
The 18 year old whose name is not yet
two weeks ago,
12:30 a.m. October 9
a CNN viewer
future
William is also a second lieutenant in the British Army,
join the HMS Iron Duke
Royal Air Force
pilot's wings upon graduating in April.
second lieutenant
Falgout Canal in Dularge, Louisiana,
about 10 p.m. Wednesday
Bayou Dularge,
Wednesday
to house federal prisoners, including some detainees from Guantanamo Bay, in a largely
to house federal prisoners,
statement releasing the ambulance company from liability.
testified for the second time in a case against paramedic Tarino Lightbourne and former Bahamian Sen. Pleasant Bridgewater.
"the death of my son was intentional and I was culpable somehow."
Vermont court
civil union
jurisdiction
Virginia
really happened: Hurricane Katrina.
President Bush can't seem to see the failure of his administration's response to Hurricane
President Bush's
can't seem to see the failure of his administration's response to Hurricane Katrina.
New Orleans was a city for a time abandoned by the government;
President Bush
controversial decisions of his presidency,
south of Atlanta
a Federal Aviation Administration facility,
through a facility in Salt Lake City, Utah,
Salt Lake City, Utah,
12,000
ISLAMABAD, Pakistan
of 18 and 25.
ISLAMABAD, Pakistan
Islamabad.
18 and 25.
than 12,000
Islamic International University
Chris Robinson
$264.6
amounting to $264.6 million,
News Corporation's MySpace.com,
Holland,
1946,
Russia and Chelsea
Korea, adored in Australia, revered in Russia and admired in England?
Chelsea
Ricardo Izecson dos Santos Leite,
2007
Ballon d'Or Award
2000.
AC Milan.
Ricardo Izecson dos Santos Leite,
bring down violence,
decriminalize drugs
"They're trying to make the state go into reverse."
Mexican government's stepped-up fight against the drug cartels.
opposed
Nuclear safety critics criticized the reopening, with the power company receiving more than 200 calls
March earthquake
reopening,
March 11
March
David Cameron
The prime minister, together with other senior British politicians,
cerebral palsy and severe epilepsy,
6-year-old
UK opposition leader David Cameron
three people
sweeping three people into the churning ocean,
three
Maine's Acadia National Park
offshore
NATO supply
Eight
the NATO supply routes transporting goods
checkpost
blew up
unknown militants
November 2, 1789,
New York Society
complex that will include a memorial with a tree-shaded plaza and reflecting pools, and an underground museum with an entry pavilion.
New York
Thursday
a tree-shaded plaza and reflecting pools, and an underground museum with an entry pavilion.
10th anniversary of the attacks.
not guilty to charges of voluntary manslaughter and other serious crimes stemming from their involvement in the September 16, 2007, shootings in a Baghdad square.
the implications"
security companies
not guilty
which contracted the company to protect American diplomats
Dr. Conrad Murray's office
confirmed that Los Angeles Police detectives and federal Drug Enforcement Administration agents used a search warrant to enter Murray's office in northeast Houston on Wednesday morning.
a computer; 27 tablets of Phentermine, a prescription-strength appetite suppressant; 1 tablet of clonazepam, an anti-anxiety medication; and some Rolodex cards.
handed over the files to officials with the coroner's office.
22 percent of
about 11 percent
11 percent
1 percent of
11
post-traumatic stress disorder.
Bay
nearly 400
the ship's owner had said only 140 gallons had spilled from the Cosco Busan.
inaugural
"Human error factors" probably were involved in a ship crash
A, D, E and K,
"Blue"
celebrities
particular health ailment or beauty concern.
intravenous vitamin "drips"
B 12.
"I'm just getting started."
"there is a sense of momentum and a desire to get things done."
forget about New Orleans,"
"there is a sense of momentum and a desire to get things done."
other areas of the Gulf Coast
been to New Orleans five times since Katrina, and that since Obama took office, there have been 35
"I never thought any of this was going to be easy,"
"Antichrist."
mighty strange kind of
Charlotte Gainsbourg and Willem Dafoe
Dafoe and Gainsbourg are riveting as the ill-matched
go to the Western Ghats,
Mumbai
offers "offbeat sightseeing tours" of six Indian cities, including Mumbai, Delhi and Jaipur.
Cube.
Grand Slam, which is four patties stacked on a bun. This
the 1990s.
Starbucks
Senate Finance
public option;
new tax on health insurance companies
new tax on health insurance companies
new tax on health insurance companies
Hillary Clinton
tempered the thawing of relations by saying that Washington remains concerned with Syria's close ties to Iran.
Phillip Jackson, a well-known political activist
This is a national catastrophe
36 Chicago-area students
he will not pay interest on the nation's foreign
287
All of the area's cardinals and bishops, along with 100 priests, attended the special funeral Mass.
in tents
auto workers around the country, including Detroit, Michigan,
Georgia,
in 25 years.
West Point, Georgia,
will be unable to support moving forward
his stamp
Seven
women
contact with minors.
violated her probation by hugging a young co-worker,
probation
have any contact with minors.
don't come back,"
required to register as a sex offender and ordered not to have any contact with minors.
violated her probation by hugging a young co-worker,
have contact with anyone under 18.
She is not allowed to have contact with anyone under 18.
minors
violated her probation by hugging a young co-worker,
middle school teacher
of having sex with a student,
"Please don't come back," he scolded.
violated her probation
the founder of the Special Olympics,
"She was the light of our lives, a mother, wife, grandmother, sister and aunt who taught us by example and with passion
the sister of President John F.
blood poisoning
Bedfordshire clergymen,
Jasper Newton "Jack" Daniel of Tennessee whiskey fame
whiskey
It's a similar situation to after the September 11, 2001, terror attacks in the United States,"
"The daytime really isn't a problem, but the night can be. Your rights are reduced after 6 p.m. The police can stop you for virtually any reason. It's a similar situation to after the September 11, 2001, terror attacks in the United States,"
"The daytime really isn't a problem, but the night can be. Your rights are reduced after 6 p.m. The police can stop you for virtually any reason. It's a similar situation to after the September 11, 2001, terror attacks in the United States,"
even failing to show up
people
to scavenge for food and hide in abandoned houses in the coastal city of Sirte.
"Black Box" of Moammar Gadhafi's regime
Jaref,
the "Black Box" of Moammar Gadhafi's regime
parts of Europe.
tested a surface-to-surface missile that is capable of reaching parts of Europe.
tested a missile-launching system and several types of short- and medium-range missiles
short-range missile
it tested a surface-to-surface missile that is capable of reaching parts of Europe.
the couple met in 2006
"The important thing in life is to try to live and do the best you can,"
"The important thing in life is to try to live and do the best you can,"
6 years
live and do the best you can,"
a legend of the past
"Little Man"
longer-range ballistic and anti-ship missiles
People's Republic of China,"
militaries.
Chinese and U.S. militaries.
developing longer-range ballistic and anti-ship missiles
the cessation of talks between the Chinese and U.S. militaries.
Ciudad Juarez, Mexico,
Ciudad Juarez, Mexico,
as drug cartels fight both each other and Mexican authorities.
Mexico,
March 12, 2008,
Camryn died
the remains of another son.
forensic anthropology,
bones
Srebrenica.
more than 8,000 men and boys
DNA, forensic anthropology and anything else
Friday morning
born in Boston, Massachusetts,
'what kind of people are we?'
Rep. Eric Cantor,
offices across the country. A coffin placed on a lawmaker's lawn. Hate-filled voice mail messages left on
Democratic members
incidents
between 2003 and 2008,
President Roh Moo-Hyun,
Some bowed their heads or wept openly. Others, still stunned from the loss, stood quietly in black as the hearse drove by.
hometown village of Bonghwa in Gimhae.
decision not to show Gaza aid appeal.
Disasters Emergency Committee,
Sky News,
The Disasters Emergency Committee
Sky News,
London
About 5,000 people demonstrated in front of the BBC's Broadcasting House in central London
centrists
The New Hampshire primary,
Romney
Princess Diana
that Henri Paul was drunk
must decide whether the deaths of Diana and Dodi on August 31, 1997 was an accident or murder.
August 31, 1997
watched video from security cameras at the Ritz
a new book and iPhone app.
"Lists for Life: The Essential Guide to Getting Organized and Tackling Tough To-Dos"
"The
help readers navigate everything they might
Four of five
no blacks
Four
the Kutacane district in Aceh province
the mountains of western Indonesia,
the Kutacane district in Aceh province
"To cooperate is to lose your independence,"
Asking the National Assembly to vote on the issue
France
4,300 dead
more than 4,300
$150,000 to $450,000 a month,
Noe Ramirez Mandujano
$450,000 a month,
Noe Ramirez Mandujano
$450,000 a
Mexico.
Mariska Hargitay plays Olivia Benson
long-time Libyan leader's
confirm that the dead man is indeed Moammar Gadhafi.
is captured alive and in good health in Sirte,
DNA samples
Jackson,
Michael Jackson
British fans are much more forgiving
1977,
almost 9 inches (22.9 cm),
almost 9
Gov. Milton Slocum Latham and railroad magnate Mark Harper,
Renaissance gilt, carved, inlaid and ebonized bed
suit
the past six years.
post-traumatic stress disorder
provide full benefits
past six years.
former U.N. Secretary-General Kofi Annan
World Economic Forum
"We've been living in the Western world way above our means. We've been on a great binge and it's come to an end and we have to live though the correction,"
Kofi Annan
three high-level
Tellez,
Luis Tellez Kuenzler.
July.
Mexico's
changes,
taped comments
resigned.
of protectionism in
Canada
to the detriment of both the U.S. and
will not trump existing trade agreements such as
they perceive as rising protectionist sentiment in the United States that could potentially spark a trade war and, in their opinion, deepen the global economic crisis.
"leaders of men"
the beacon of moral and physical courage, the shepherd of lost boys, pater familias in a place called Happy Valley.
the beacon of moral and physical courage, the shepherd of lost boys, pater familias in a place called Happy Valley.
13,
a plane crash
"The fact that she so far doesn't
Francesca apparently
apparently fell out of the plane or was ejected on impact,
first made landfall on August 25
More than 1,800
Eighty percent of the the $114 billion allocated to the region
More than 1,800 people
eBay and Craigslist,
Tuesday's
Michael
took steps Monday to thwart the ticket sellers.
Mexico's Yucatan Peninsula and Chiapas
more than 420 people.
David Puckett and his U.S.-based
Mexico,
has provided free artificial limbs, orthopedic braces and care to more than 420 people.
prosthetist/orthotist
the Lamar Edward Salon,
female condoms
Thailand
Boo Htoo,
Boo Htoo,
Phoenix, Arizona.
I first read her stories in my 20s and loved them, and then a little later, the [collected] letters came up,
the streets of the Brazilian city.
too young to fill a role normally reserved for voluptuous adult dancers.
drum corps queen for the Viradouro School of Samba
dancers
David Prowse,
at a hospital in south London
revealed he is suffering from prostate cancer
Hudson River,
discovered underwater,
underwater,
Hudson River,
temporarily closed its government facilities in South Africa
The U.S. Embassy in Pretoria and other government offices in South Africa
"possible threat" to its embassy,
"no threat to the public" from a massive
elevated toxic chemicals."
"no threat to the public"
anyone arrested.
Since September of last year,
more than 40 times the number from the year before.
the immigration status of anyone arrested.
Criminal Alien Program.
anyone arrested.
referrals for deportations
selling the capital's airport
state's budget deficit.
must become more visible now, even amid a global
Celso Amorim
"The government, in spite of all the difficulties, should appear more to the people,"
a crowded market in Lahore
12
A blast hit near a building housing Pakistan's intelligence service, ISI,
eastern city of Multan
an affair
the time of deaths May 5 was between 11 p.m. and 3 a.m., hours before Coleman said he drove to a gym, said
two young
Testifying at a hearing at the Monroe County Courthouse, the chief
messages scrawled in red spray paint throughout the house match Coleman's handwriting.
banish the myth that young women are not at risk for breast cancer.
terrifying.
she wants to banish the myth that young women are not at risk for breast cancer.
terrifying.
"every three minutes,"
says she wants to banish the myth that young women are not at risk for breast cancer.
first steps in breast cancer detection,
Jhumpa Lahiri's novel about loss and family,
"Salaam Bombay!"
"The Namesake."
Kal Penn plays Gogol
different
"Monsoon Wedding" and "Salaam Bombay!"
David and Christina Macfarlane
were nachos and salsa, tuna sandwiches,
nachos and salsa, tuna sandwiches,
down because he does a lot of the work himself
meat pies and fish and chips
Two
domestic dispute
at the home of the suspect's ex-girlfriend,
Two
Moses
expected to live,
you refuse to meet my podiatrist's brother-in-law
Paul Collingwood's side were
Yuvraj Singh
Singh smashed six sixes in one over
cricket's
fastest 50
fastest 50 in Twenty20 history,
then lost by 18 runs to the Singh-inspired Indians,
six consecutive sixes
England
India's Yuvraj Singh smashed six sixes in one over
South Africa
India's
218-4.
The Liberal Party and the leftist New Democratic Party
The Liberal Party and the leftist New Democratic Party
Bloc Quebecois,
Harper had used a "maneuver to escape accountability."
"maneuver to escape accountability."
a no-confidence vote
"maneuver to escape accountability."
terrorists
terrorists are methodically and intentionally targeting young people and children in this country. They are radicalising, indoctrinating and grooming young, vulnerable people to carry out acts of terrorism,"
could be double.
young, vulnerable
2,000
at least 2,000
at least 2,000 people
that at least 2,000 people in Britain pose a threat to the country's security because of their support for al Qaeda-inspired terrorism.
terrorist
Britain
that at least 2,000 people in Britain pose a threat to the country's security because of their support for al Qaeda-inspired terrorism.
in Britain
Jonathan Evans, the chief of MI5,
in this country.
photographer at a New York airport
TMZ photographer
relatives of a woman
lay convulsing for more than a hour
six trains to break down,
cancel all services
informing the Cuban government about the oil spill
efforts to contain and clean up oil gushing from
a ruptured pipe
Doug Suttles,
tutoring.
Dugard
the public,
tutoring.
$100,000
Scott
there is no question that she knows that terrible and wrong things were done to her and that those people must be held accountable," Scott
more than $100,000
about harassment
video of lawyers debating points of constitutional law
Prop 8 trial
same-sex marriage
daughter
Six
of South Carolina
18-year-old daughter
he jumped out of a third-story window into a canal to
six
six
"always up for a good fight."
Senate seat in Louisiana
Sen. David Vitter.
Republican Sen.
his administration would impose stiffer sanctions against the country's military regime.
trampling on human rights
Wednesday,
Brown
his administration would impose stiffer sanctions against the country's military regime.
special envoy
found dead
Briton Meredith Kercher
Guede, Knox and Sollecito
30 years
Veterans' representatives and members of Congress
controversial plan to charge private insurers
abandoning a controversial plan to charge private
and cooling systems
the highest LEED Platinum rating ever awarded by the U.S. Green Building Council for a new construction building,
$246 per square foot, or just over $7.5 million
the
at least 60 percent on
$246 per square foot, or just over $7.5 million for demolition through construction.
Jackson family
the family rallied around.
the Jacksons
or holy war, against Israel for its Gaza campaign.
"an invitation" from bin Laden to take part in "jihad to stop the aggression against Gaza."
"jihad to stop the aggression against Gaza."
a radical Islamist Web site
America is no longer feared
spokesman Gordon Johndroe said the message "demonstrates [bin Laden's] isolation and continued attempts to remain relevant at a time when al Qaeda's ideology, mission and agenda are being questioned and challenged throughout the world."
Minnesota and North Dakota
waters of the Red River are forecast to rise another foot
in the Sunday vote,
a grand rethink of the whole euro currency project,
conservatives
Prime Minister Jose Maria Aznar
David Frum.
his recent conversation
some in Havana
"With Obama, one can talk whenever he wants, because we're not preachers of violence or war,"
President Fidel Castro
"With Obama, one can talk whenever he wants, because we're not preachers of violence or war,"
Cuba
that the impending change in leadership in the United States will translate in to a changed Cuban policy.
in the villages of Silangkum and Baguindan on the southern island province of Basilan,
44 people, including 23 Filipino soldiers,
Basilan,
al Qaeda
Misty,
Misty
three strange
Chandrasekhar Reddy Komma and Kiran Kumar Allam,
international graduate
use caution,
Louisiana State University
bodies
Louisiana State University campus,
graduate students were found shot to death
bodies of Chandrasekhar Reddy Komma and Kiran Kumar Allam,
People were warned in the text messages to use caution,
53 percent to 44 percent.
47 percent to 39 percent.
explosive growth of Northern
Virginia conservatives
more liberal
Sen. John McCain,
McCain
U.S. security coordinator
for strategy, plans and policy on the Army staff.
nearly 40
sent private cables to Obama last week,
China, Taiwan, Hong Kong and Mongolia,
anything.
inaugural
King that we would have a day when everyone would come together. This is that day. I am excited. I am joyful. It brings tears to my eyes."
capped five decades of struggle
The bridge
tractor-trailer trucks
Pharr-Reynosa International Bridge
tractor-trailer trucks crashed and burst into flames
April 12.
The cherry blossom trees were a
were a gift of friendship to the U.S. government from Japan in 1912, according to the National Park Service.
"Jeopardy!"
"Jeopardy!" host
Alex Trebek
listeria monocytogenes
2,498 cartons of chopped or shredded romaine lettuce
Ten
into a crowd celebrating the Spanish side's victory,
by Manchester United's defeat to Barcelona in the final of
Barcelona city
"angered" by Manchester United's defeat to Barcelona in the final of
Ten
many irregularities for their allegations, including the government's refusal to allow foreign and local monitors, the delay in tabulating ballots and discrepancies between results certified by election officials and the tallies released on television.
many irregularities
Opponents of Nicaraguan President Daniel Ortega's Sandinista party
MANAGUA, Nicaragua
ballot tally sheets from Managua
REO Speedwagon
Chicago and Earth, Wind & Fire
recording songs to promote a tour featuring a pairing of acts
team up on the new song
have teamed up
the in-flight meal.
"crime scene cookies", "baaji custard"
Virgin Atlantic
38,000 miles of Earth,
Robert McNaught of the Australian National University.
Monday.
to prevent swine flu.
the younger population, from 6 months to 24 years,
the best way to give the pandemic H1N1 flu vaccine,"
children.
younger population, from 6 months to 24
typical characteristics of a mass murderer,
showed in his writings typical characteristics of a mass murderer,
"A lot of times, when there's this level of hatred against women, there's also a very antagonistic relationship with the mother, but it gets shifted onto other women."
killed three women and wounded nine others before killing himself
must be able to choose their own representatives in open and fair elections, without the specter of violence or intimidation, and free of outside interference,"
Lebanon
choose their own representatives in open and fair elections,
U.S. support for the country and its push for free elections.
the United States will not forgo its support of the country
end one relationship until they have another one in progress.
you will never
cheating,
Continental Airlines plane that crashed in Clarence Center, New York, late Thursday
Denver International Airport in Denver.
3407
3407
Clarence Center, New York,
Continental Flight 1404
Denver International
Election tension
Assess the situation:
around 600 kilograms in race trim,
The average F1
KERS powered cars
Strasbourg, France,
NATO summit meetings
London,
war veterans do not want the opposition in power.
opposition party from taking power.
arrested twice
lost on March
decriminalization of marijuana for personal use and a change in tactics on the war on drugs,
Ex-presidents Ernesto Zedillo of Mexico, Cesar Gaviria of Colombia and Fernando Henrique Cardoso of Brazil
drug cartels and organized crime
the decriminalization of marijuana for personal use and a change in tactics on the war on drugs,
marijuana for personal use
transforming the theater into a sanctuary every Sunday.
"The moment you define yourself as 'We're just going to rent this facility,' you're saying that you're not necessarily here to stay,"
268 people, up from 91 last year,
other drawbacks,
"We're reaching out to those who have no religious background
from 91 last year,
whether she could adopt a girl
2006.
biological father
to proceed,
the young boy's biological father
judge's decision
Mercy James, a 3-year-old girl
new president
a Chinese company.
"freedom"
One World Trade Center."
One World Trade Center."
"Mr. LiMandri obviously has never watched 'The Apprentice' if he believes that Mr. Trump could be so easily fooled.
Keith Lewis
a letter
"You know, when you have a contract, when you're working for someone, you have a responsibility to follow through on
final warning to retract statements made about the former beauty queen or face a defamation lawsuit.
statements made about the former
Prejean could keep her title
industrial peanut butter
industrial peanut butter and products that contain it
Make your own spread.
The recent recall of industrial peanut butter and products that contain it
the local American Samoan government had been diverting millions of those dollars for its own uses.
to create local government jobs
tonight's "AC 360"
American Samoa
on tonight's "AC 360"
American Samoa
an explosive device
walk-through metal detector and put his shoulder bag
"a review to
"a review to ... figure out why an individual with the chemical explosive he had
suspect arrested in the hijacking of the Maersk Alabama
New York City
late Monday.
Cristiano Ronaldo
Cristiano Ronaldo
he's a great ambassador for the game.
Cristiano Ronaldo
the FIFA World
2008.
Geoff Armitage,
the Trabant,
stem-cell research.
The White House
Nancy
a new statue of President Reagan
television on the CBS network in 1952.
to television on the CBS network in 1952.
first aired on NBC radio in 1937 as a 15-minute
NBC
wind tipped
The plane recovered and landed safely
blustery weather,
on the ground
A320 teetering as
the Lufthansa A320 as it attempts a landing
"I'm ready to leave the Italian Players Association. We are the principal actors, but also the people who are never listened to,"
a row over the starting date of the next Serie A
Serie A season.
"I'm ready to leave the Italian Players Association. We are the principal actors, but also the people who are never listened to,"
Francesco Totti has threatened to quit the Italian Players Association,
Roma
India's Home Minister Shivraj Patil
the five-year-old cease-fire with Pakistan
India's Home Minister Shivraj Patil
terrorist attacks
alleged Pakistani ties
five adopted children.
adoption of a local child
raise the world's consciousness about the African orphan crisis.
Madonna's adoption of a local child
it was a sad day for the country's democracy and the African continent that the South African government had denied the Dalai Lama a visa. South Africa should not succumb to international pressure,
"South Africa has made this decision,"
it was a sad day for the country's democracy and the African continent that the South African government had denied the Dalai Lama a visa. South Africa should not succumb to international pressure,
visa. South Africa should not succumb
keeping the prisoner in stress positions for extended periods of time, sleep deprivation, slapping, enclosing the prisoner in a box with insects, and waterboarding, which simulates drowning.
Abu Ghraib prison in Iraq
The photographs from Abu Ghraib prison in Iraq
techniques
said last month that it would not object to the release of the photos.
and the interrogation techniques were widely reported and have since been banned.
at any time,
December 19,
December 14.
December 19,
at Jacksonville's bus station,
incident at Camp Lejeune
he was burned on about 65 percent of his body.
along with three other youths,
two
two boys who, along with three other youths,
Conan O'Brien,
the vaccine be made available to boys and young men aged 9 to 26 for protection against genital warts caused by HPV.
infection by four types of human papillomavirus.
Gardasil,
25
drug-related violence in Juarez
459
About 70 percent
have teachers and they treat me like parents,"
Southern California.
Shiro, Harry and Ken
Amache, Colorado.
four
to recruit Japanese-speaking volunteers as interpreters, they joined so they could prove their loyalty to their country.
internment camp in Amache, Colorado.
Kal Penn,
Barack Obama's election,
was rekindled when he campaigned for Barack Obama's election,
Kal Penn,
the Obama White House.
Public Liaison.
is now just trickling in.
has poured
producer's strike
audits,"
comfortable and confident.
He explained that scientists had embedded in the genetic code of the new cell three quotations,
J. Craig Venter's team,
it's necessary to know how to create it.
"What I cannot build, I cannot understand."
"According to official estimates, 15 people died, 69 people were hospitalized and over 100,000 others, complaining of nausea and vomiting after inhaling fumes, sought medical treatment after the incident,"
deaths of 15 people and thousands of illnesses
not harm anyone.
world's first commercially cloned dog,
a chance to clone their family dog,
stories of struggling families in swing states
Sen. Barack Obama's
laid out his plans for the economy and for bringing
not progressing fast enough.
"We have blockages
five
arson and murder,
assault weapons, other kinds of weapons
technology
crackdown on the flow of weapons and money into Mexico.
weapons and money
inspect southbound vehicles.
part of our plan is increasing the number of agents who are going to inspect southbound vehicles. That's why we're sending technology to the border that will allow us to scan or do noninvasive X-rays to see whether cars are carrying assault weapons, other kinds of weapons that are now flowing into Mexico to fuel these drug cartels. And to find these huge truckloads, basically, of cash that are garnered in the United States and sent to Mexico.
the United States, China, Russia, France, and Britain
United States, Russia, China and other key nations
The United States, Russia, China
resumes Monday night where it left off in September
Kyra Sedgwick
TNT
"The Closer."
executive producer's role on the show,
Screen Actors Guild Awards,
an ocean
seven miles of sandy beach.
love holy war and defend Muslim lands.
defend Muslim lands.
wife of Osama bin Laden
to release messages.
"It signals that al Qaeda seems to be aggressively reaching out to the female population, whereas in the past their focus was mainly on men,"
violence
support for militias and outlaws in Iraq,
E supplements
People who take vitamin E supplements regularly for years
leaders living up to their rhetoric about commitment to lasting peace in the Mideast,
Saudi Prince
leaders living up to their rhetoric about commitment to lasting peace
President Bush,
Hamas.
Saudi Prince Turki al-Faisal
Heeney, now 83, describes growing up on an Oklahoma farm during the
36
rapid population growth and unwise agricultural choices.
At least 36
United States,
an undercover detective
sending images depicting child pornography
Robert A. Singer
are "horrified" by news of Singer's arrest.
detective for the New York Police Department.
"horrified"
sending images depicting child pornography to people he believed to be a 12-year-old girl and her 33-year-old mother,
Robert A.
a spokesman for the National Children's Museum,
sending images depicting child pornography to people he believed to be a 12-year-old girl and her 33-year-old mother,
begin increased deployments in Afghanistan.
at least 12 military groups in Afghanistan.
their two sons
of their two sons "until further order of the court,"
July.
July.
July.
Kevin Federline,
July.
July.
July.
Portland,
into the Ocean Point Inn & Spa
Oswald West State Park.
along the Pacific Ocean,
fish-packing facility on the Columbia River.
was built on the site of a fish-packing facility on the Columbia River.
tiny residential community
Belgrade
U.S. Embassy in Belgrade
protect its assets.
The U.S. ambassador, Cameron Munter, is staying,
it has a responsibility to protect its assets.
near the Amchitka Pass, a strait that connects the Bering Sea to the Pacific Ocean.
Four of the boat's crew members
Aleutian Islands about 1,400 miles southwest of Anchorage, Alaska.
natural gas deliveries
Russia,"
10 a.m. Thursday (2 a.m. ET).
a day later.
Ukraine
January 1, 2006,
January 1, 2006,
her own weight-loss program,
changing to an organic diet and following Organic Liaison,
ABC
protesters didn't manage to get
United States
Cameron Munter, is staying,
mob attacked
protect its assets.
U.S. ambassador, Cameron Munter,
Serbia
Simply isolate;
Simply isolate; refuse
Co-workers
five:
dysfunctional co-worker
Boss Haters, Stars, Sliders, Pity Parties, and Self-Promoters.
weakness
Israel
reduced
Qabatiya,
shut down the terminal again
militants,
local Islamic Jihad leader
militants,
Israel
More than 170 people around the globe, including at least 61 in the United States,
child pornographers,
11 girls in the United States, ages 3 to 13,
major operation targeting international child pornographers,
pornographic
11 girls
about 11,000.
At least 30
January 24 and 25,
more than 200
Chen Jin,
a lookout.
cowered in a back room on the ground floor.
Mingora.
the roof of a bus,"
around the Swat Valley.
50 terrified orphans, accompanied by adult support staff,
that the move would further divide the 77 million-member worldwide denomination that includes the Episcopal Church in the United States.
Williams did not go far enough in his rebuke,
Archbishop of Canterbury Rowan Williams,
openly gay bishop ordained
the move would further divide the 77 million-member worldwide denomination that includes the Episcopal Church in the United States.
the International Criminal Court,
arrest on war crimes charges
could put him at risk of arrest on war crimes charges leveled by a U.N. tribunal.
President Omar al-Bashir
south of Kabul,
security against the Taliban and the insurgents.
gives them the opportunity to learn a trade,
weatherize and rehabilitate homes.
letting them see that there is another way,
TARP funds
TBS and TNT
Comcast and Time Warner
Hulu
online
war between Georgia and Russia,
war between Georgia and Russia,
Georgia and Russia,
a Swiss diplomat and former United Nations special representative for Georgia,
European Union
Georgia and Russia,
former United Nations special representative for Georgia,
starting the conflict
had targeted the camps,
Torrential rain
Torrential
Hutu
Democratic Republic of Congo
forces
from their homes
Felipe Massa
a loose spring from Rubens Barrichello's Brawn hit him in the helmet
2010
The skater's brother, Mark,
Kenneth Cole
draw attention
And I think we also have these walls around us, and when people disagree, we're inclined not to listen, but to a degree you can break through that wall often
you can make yourself look better, and if you look better, you'll feel better, and it becomes self-fulfilling. I think
social issues
Kenneth Cole
off the coast of East Africa
the Dutch ship,
A Russian naval
pirates
United Nations
pirates
The first U.N. group
Dutch ship,
"It is devastating for us to put all of the money and the time and the genetics and work to produce a great product and then just have it half-eaten and left to die."
1,600
more than 1,600
legally shoot a wolf they see attacking
220
330
to stop the hunts.
four years
failing to pay taxes,
tax returns
Rohingya refugees
goodwill ambassador for the U.N. High Commissioner for Refugees.
Angelina Jolie
Myanmar,
knowledgeable in the history of witchcraft,
the history of witchcraft,
witches
of witchcraft,
discovered
Paktia province,
southeastern Afghan compound
Schiller
17-inch unibody MacBook Pro with a more powerful battery,
4.5
Thursday evening,
just a mile from San Bernadino's city hall,
Fourteen
returning from a raid on a compound,
Fourteen Americans
helicopter
four Americans
Monday,
global warming
threatens to stress water resources, challenge crops and livestock,
Obama administration
Longer and more intense heat waves; increased heavy downpours likely to cause widespread complications such as flooding and waterborne diseases; reduced summer runoff, creating greater competition for water, especially in the West; rising ocean water temperatures that will threaten coral reefs; an increase in wildfires and insect infestations; and more frequent coastal flooding caused by rising seas.
Michio Kanda
435 miles south of Adak, Alaska,
Michio Kanda
two Coast Guard C130 Hercules planes
Japanese balloonist
Japanese balloonist Michio Kanda
balloon
U.S. Coast Guard
U.S. Coast Guard
Japanese balloonist Michio Kanda
searches continued Friday and are ongoing,
Japanese balloonist Michio Kanda
435 miles south of Adak, Alaska,
435 miles south of Adak, Alaska,
Darfur villages,
Helicopter gunships and fixed-wing aircraft
Helicopter gunships and fixed-wing aircraft
believe Lovett was the man seen in a surveillance-camera
first-degree murder
of North Carolina
convenience-store
Corps is the only branch of the armed services that houses two to a room.
housing gay and heterosexual Marines
"My argument is that even at the beginning, they just used much more land per person, so even though there weren't that many
He said Ruddiman is "exaggerating the importance of early man."
around 5, 6, 7,000 years ago
burn down a forest, poke a hole in the soil between the stumps, drop seeds in the holes and grow a crop on that
Immigration and Customs Enforcement,
his agency
training.
U.S. Central Intelligence Agency
alleged third-world arms
media critical of the current government and President Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner,
Lawmakers
media critical of the current government
Nicaragua, Venezuela, Bolivia, Ecuador and Argentina,
Lawmakers opposed to the measure
it's not the best way to date.
women
Morning Show." His first book, "Act Like a Lady, Think Like a Man," is shooting to the top of the best-seller lists, and Oprah Winfrey says she loves everything it has to say!
"Slow down, ladies,"
auto plant
light box
genetic mutation in the eye could play a role in seasonal affective disorder.
antidepressants
autumn and winter
genetic mutation in the eye
cognitive behavioral therapy
Light therapy
Between 4 and 6 percent
Islamic Maghreb claimed responsibility.
two
at least 26,
26,
Algiers
76
government count
United Nations headquarters
in Algiers hoping to find survivors after a powerful
in Algiers
a militant Islamic group with ties to al Qaeda
76
Algiers
death toll is unclear:
young blogger
died in Evin prison,
extra doses of medication
Kardashian and her new husband, basketball player Lamar Odom, have found themselves a
al Qaeda in Iraq senior leaders,
six explosions
"Pirate Defendant,"
Biostorage
$400,000
100
almost $400,000
sending them a birthday card.
Don't haunt the person
Don't haunt the person
"How Not to Be"
"How Not to Be"
Don't haunt the person
Harry Connick Jr.
Australian popular culture
Gabriella Cilmi
Australian
first
not doing
from doctors, from friends, even from steroids meant for horses.
"baseline"
NFL
drug-testing policy
each person in the WWE
can make you aggressive,
Chris Benoit
WWE
doctors,
suspended,
"Raw"
James Hines'
fit a 6-foot,
Police Detective Donnie Hutto
County Coroner Hayzen Black
The Large Hadron Collider
the world's largest particle
look at how the universe formed by analyzing particle collisions.
Sen. Mitch McConnell,
a military officer
"a nightmare with no end in sight."
Sen. Lindsey Graham
former coalition commander retired Lt. Gen. Ricardo
retired Gen. Ricardo Sanchez
Lawmakers
South Carolina Republican Sen. Lindsey Graham
should have spoken out at the time
criticized the war effort.
Sen. Mitch McConnell,
that he had given us the benefit of that knowledge at the time,"
astounded,
Iraq
coalition commander
"a nightmare with no end in sight."
blistering criticism
we have enough troops; Guard and reserves aren't being strained,"
of the Iraq war
former Senate majority leader from South Dakota
Tom Daschle
health care clients.
set up her own company
used a call-girl service eight times in recent months.
Ashley Alexandra Dupre
one of the ring's employees.
North Fork Bank notified the Treasury Department about suspicious transfers of money from Spitzer's bank accounts.
Ashley Alexandra Dupre
money from Spitzer's bank accounts.
some type of money-laundering
prostitution
some type of money-laundering
New York Gov. Eliot Spitzer
who have shaped American society with their work,
comedians
that recognizes comedy," and he was honored to receive it.
with praise
Susan Levy
Guandique
added more people than any other state
Michigan and Rhode Island,
about 500,000
sodium dichromate.
Michael Partain,
the Federal Triangles club in Washington D.C.,
2008 Gay World Soccer Championship
26 teams
players from the U.S., United Kingdom, Ireland, Canada, Germany, Australia, Denmark, Belgium, Sweden, Argentina, Italy, and Norway all taking part.
local Major League Soccer (MLS) side D.C. United.
International Gay & Lesbian Football Association (IGLFA),
The siblings pick at each other relentlessly between
"Jack and Jill"
loudmouthed, overweight twin Jill
"The ship of the pirates was destroyed by the Danish Navy, and the pirates were captured and handed to the Dutch authority.
cargo ship with Dutch Antilles flag was attacked,
almost 34 years
were captured by the Dutch Navy in January 2009 in the Gulf of Aden,
A Pablo Picasso sketchbook with 33 pencil drawings
The sketchbook has a red varnished cover with the word "Album" inscribed on
between 1917 and 1924
33 pencil drawings
The Jordan Times in Amman,
two missing
Holli Chmela,
Byblos and Tripoli
three days,
Holli Chmela, 27, and her male companion, Taylor Luck, 23,
the clown car of the vice presidential nominee.
we've invested over a billion dollars in abstinence education programs under George
has been the clown car of the vice presidential nominee. You never know
never know
of understanding worldwide,
"Shara'a Simsim," the Palestinian version of "Sesame Street."
XT-1
the sun.
XT-1
appear to be wavering on a highly contentious House resolution labeling
Armenians
redeployment of our troops in the future,"
treatment of Armenians in World War
Turkey,
redeployment of our troops in the future,"
Some Democrats
Turkey's treatment of Armenians in World War I
Democratic Rep. Ike Skelton, the chairman of the House Armed Services Committee,
Incirlik
the resolution calling the killing of Armenians by Ottoman Turks genocide
a major resupply center for U.S. operations in Iraq and elsewhere in the Mideast and Asia.
Turkey,"
there are a number of people who are revisiting
killing of Armenians by Ottoman Turks genocide
Turkey,
Incirlik
an old textile mill
local community college
sustained fractures to her jawbone, ribs and to a cervical vertebra, in addition to the drowning.
her jawbone, ribs and
the "whale's aggressive nature,"
"whale's aggressive nature,"
spinal cord was severed, and she sustained fractures to her jawbone, ribs and to a cervical vertebra, in addition to the drowning.
Fifty
floating in a river or in three mass graves inside the compound of the Rifles,
headquarters of the Bangladesh Rifles
72 bodies
72
taken time to author a couple of best-selling books.
Bill Clinton
focused most of his efforts on the William J.
President Kim Jong Il
devoted to global philanthropic interests and speeches,
former President George H.W. Bush
Africa, the Middle East and South America.
illegally purchasing U.S. cargo planes to ferry weapons to warring parties and regimes in Africa and the Middle East.
extradite Bout to New York from Thailand,
from Kinsasha to the eastern city of Goma
in the area
from Kinsasha to the eastern city of Goma
Search and rescue crews were not immediately able to land their helicopter in the area and determine whether anyone survived the crash in the east
Goma
1-2 million
100,000
I felt so much pain."
more than 3,000
3,000
about 100,000
between 1-2 million people,
about 100,000 people
He is also he leading scorer in the league
4-1
Barcelona
Trainer Dawn Brancheau
last year,
make a classy speech last night. But, you know, they all make a classy speech when they lose.
the McCain campaign
He's the president.
Terribly. I think it even disappointed the people who were voting for him.
he's not stupid. He's not angry. He's not a phony. He's not fat. He's not cheating on his wife.
She's a very ambitious person.
Alzheimer's
depression and smoking. Midlife hypertension, midlife obesity, low educational attainment and diabetes
early detection.
physical inactivity
preliminary information for incidents is often incomplete or incorrect.
St. Louis, Missouri.
through a Freedom of Information Act request,
the pilot had "full authority of the aircraft."
move the plane's nose up and down.
The owner of the plane
-- it would have to be President Clinton. It could only be President Clinton to secure the release of herself and Euna.
Laura Ling
Hana, their 4-year-old
Laura Ling and Euna Lee
Uruguay, Colombia and Venezuela.
when jobs, security and cash were scarce.
wool for food.
the eventual champion
L.G. National Texting Championship
a good amount
Georgian police cars had been blocking the road and the police told Russian tank commanders that they were carrying out orders. The tanks proceeded to plow ahead, damaging the police cars in the process.
Georgian police cars
Georgia
outside the Georgian city of Gori
Russian tanks
that Somalia could turn into a safe haven for terrorists,
Thursday
1993 battle involving Somali militias in which the bodies of U.S. troops were dragged through the streets,
the body
Ethiopian
after gun battles with Islamic insurgents killed 19 people,
Mogadishu
a brutal echo of a 1993 battle involving Somali militias
harboring suspected al Qaeda figures,
An enraged crowd
Mogadishu
Thursday
could turn into a safe haven for terrorists,
An enraged crowd dragged the body of an Ethiopian
19 people,
ICU of harboring suspected al Qaeda figures,
the northern Mogadishu neighborhood of Suqa Holaha,
northern Mogadishu neighborhood of Suqa Holaha,
through the streets,
1,000 people
hotel in Varablanca.
there were 14 dead and 22 missing.
22
graduate student Annie
Yale lab technician Raymond Clark,
"Even now, Annie is gone. But I still have you and love you very much, like my son, Christopher."
Holy Trinity Catholic Church in El Dorado Hills, California.
Yale
Raymond Clark,
Raymond Clark,
burglary with battery, felony battery, aggravated child abuse and kidnapping,
first-degree murder
threw him from a car on a Florida interstate.
by the roadside
snatched the infant, Emanuel Wesley Murray,
Serbia
1-0
struck at the end of a first half that Fatih Terim's Turkey dominated,
the Euro 2008 finals
Portugal
Barack Obama action figure:
T-shirts and merchandise
U.S. President Barack
Pens, pin badges and $5 cookies emblazoned with Obama's image
Obama T-shirts and merchandise
Obama T-shirts and merchandise are flying off the shelves at the moment.
Leah Bird and her husband, Ed Wright, have
stand in front of their new home: a 1974 Airstream trailer.
1974 Airstream trailer.
a private firm in Beverly Hills.
ate one last time
$100,000
has been certainly down, but not devastating,"
"people who have money should go out and spend it."
twice.
Nieto
rejection,"
twice.
feeling of rejection,"
Cuba
Saturday.
of Guantanamo,
U.S. State Department
President Jose Manuel Zelaya
that it would pull the visas of members of Honduras' de facto regime.
Pierchic at Madinat Jumeirah Hotel.
A Spanish fishing boat
Somalia.
Spain
sodium dichromate,
nasal tumors
the company knew
that this stuff was incredibly dangerous.
Heather Browne
the company knowingly exposed the soldiers to a cancer-causing toxic chemical.
nasal tumors or respiratory system problems
Thirty-six people were killed
did not appear to be a suicide attack but could instead have been bombs detonated by remote control,
Thirty-six
killed at least
Iraqi
A female suicide bomber apparently targeting Shiite worshippers killed at least
U.S.
at least
Baghdad
Baghdad,
at least
Reagan,
Mexico Gov. Bill Richardson,
attorney general
a major Democratic donor and billionaire financier charged with federal tax evasion.
the Justice Department
Barack Obama's
Republicans
Mark Rich, a major Democratic donor and billionaire financier charged with federal tax evasion.
Biochar's high carbon content
a highly porous charcoal made from organic waste.
can help soil retain water, nutrients, protect soil microbes.
harmful CO2
"black gold" for agriculture.
for both offenses in state and federal court
kidnapping Utah teenager Elizabeth Smart
A French nuclear submarine joined the hunt
Legal Medical Institute in Recife
Fort Stevens State Park, near Astoria
stunning mountain scenes.
dramatic water displays
Humbug Mountain
We are looking with scrutiny at the companies a lot at the moment and we have several sectors. We will evaluate each sector, from the service side, finance, accounting. And any sector that we believe we need further development in terms of economic growth, then we will focus on that: on increasing the acquisition or the
first female minister of economy in the Gulf,
protectionism or
cocaine.
inside a shipment of frozen sharks.
Harcharand Singh
the current government
A police officer watches as a crowd beats an accused thief. Then the policeman binds the suspect and ends up dragging him behind a motorcycle leaving large raw patches of skin on the suspect's body.
An Indian police office grabs two fists-full of a suspect's hair;
within ten years.
is better for animal welfare,
protein
President-elect Barack Obama
"Trying to live together is really
privacy and the discipline of the children,
Having a grandparent
President-elect Barack Obama
charged with two counts of second-degree murder
Christopher Drotleff and Justin Cannon
the issue of the role and conduct of U.S. security contractors in Afghanistan.
Christopher Drotleff and Justin Cannon
wouldn't pat himself on the back
recession, wars in Iraq and Afghanistan
wouldn't
"I don't pat myself on the back,"
his first year in
"I don't pat myself on the back,"
the high unemployment rate
nearly six hours
Mesaba
a "nightmare,"
the airport was closed to passengers for security reasons.
the Austrian government
two Austrian nationals
al Qaeda group
police had asked him to help provide information
that Afzali be sentenced anywhere from zero to six months in prison.
subsequently pleaded
lying
remains
Harrington's purse,
skeletal remains
at a hospital in the Indian capital
The check-up
hospital
undergo a routine medical examination
a routine medical examination
"They had 90 billion pieces of mail,"
redirecting mail to more than seven million people
no heat.
sorting the mail.
Nearly 800 women
poised to bounce back
GOP
Republican Party
Checks and balances:
gives a preference
bulletins or getting updates via social-networking tools
could harm young people's emotional development.
Scientists
updates on networking tools
showed humans can process and respond very quickly to signs of physical pain in others, but took longer to show admiration or compassion.
networking tools such as Twitter are often too quick for the
unemployment benefits and the promotion of job sharing.
turn around the recession in the world's second largest economy.
stimulus package
Friday
keep Japan's economy from cracking open,
judge's car on fire
Israel,
Israeli immigration authorities,
Micky Louis Mayon,
of setting a judge's car on fire in Pennsylvania,
in a week.
five
politics.
Barham Saleh
extended by one hour,
to have provided technical assistance,
within five
300
thousands
threat:
depths of Loch Ness,
Shine
the prospects for many other Democratic elected officials
Republican Mitt Romney
rather dismal.
southern region of Calabria
Calabria
Calabria
Somalia
add some harsher steps in our dealings with hostages, particularly American and French hostages,"
two pirates and one hostage
raid Friday that killed two pirates and one hostage and freed four hostages.
United States will confront pirates and hold them "accountable for their crimes."
Danish warship
a Danish warship
turned them over to Yemen's coast guard Friday morning,
Danish
he had with an 18-year-old male
2005,
an 18-year-old male
Union on Monday removed the People's Mujajedeen of Iran from its list of terrorist
Israel and Hamas during a three-week conflict that ended January 18.
January 18.
abuses
law and international humanitarian law that might have been committed at any time in the context of the military operations that were conducted in
security officials
behavior screening
is a bad idea.
and the FBI,
the body language and demeanor of fans
local police officer
Sens. Dianne Feinstein of California and Charles Schumer of New York
the president
assured
Democratic senators
he can't support the Mukasey nomination
Senate Judiciary Committee Chairman Sen. Patrick Leahy, D-Vermont,
on the Mukasey nomination
confirmation of Michael Mukasey as attorney general
The confirmation of Michael Mukasey as attorney general
Friday
they would support the retired federal judge
Chad.
Chad.
Chad.
Three French journalists
Chad
Sunday,
were accused of trying to fly 103 children out of Chad in a kidnapping and adoption operation.
Three French journalists
seven Europeans
Sarkozy
promoting the idea of the "open society" and challenging the region's Soviet-backed regimes.
1984.
United Kingdom.
The UK
major trauma
Scotland Yard
this injury being an entry or exit wound as a result of gunshot.
a 2-year-old boy,
Israel,
a hundred gunshots,"
Samuel
Sandra Samuel
Israel,
Gavriel Holtzberg
nanny
of mourners and emissaries from the ultra-Orthodox Jewish Chabad
Mumbai
Benjamin Netanyahu,
Thousands of mourners and emissaries from the ultra-Orthodox Jewish Chabad
ballots
Human Rights Watch
President Robert Mugabe intends to rig
"War is politics with blood; politics is war without blood,"
Lee Atwater.
"It would be like me saying to you, 'you know who my favorite political philosopher is? Adolf Hitler.' Have you read Mein Kampf? [She wants to] fight your fight like Hitler did,"
GOP strategist Lee Atwater.
(B3, B6, B9, B12)
But don't expect superhuman results,
contains: citicoline, tyrosine, phenylalanine, taurine, malic acid, glucuronolactone and caffeine.
B
5-Hour
The overall health impact of the shots' energy blend is a little fuzzy,
Rear Adm.
Rear Adm.
Navy
A Navy admiral engaged in sexual relations in the White House in 1990 with a federal
was demoted and fired from his post as director of the Navy staff.
Lashkar-e-Jhangvi, was planning to conduct attacks in Karachi,
numerous suicide attacks,
the plot were arrested hours later in Sargodha,
At least 13
Mehsud
people carrying suicide jackets and explosives
two Shiite mosques, police stations, and a Norwegian telecommunications company in Punjab,
statehood
operated as a museum,
old Hawaiian monarchy's
group of native Hawaiians
group later reopened the
Social media users
preparing for Hurricane Dean.
a deadly earthquake.
"Americans can be proud of the history that was made yesterday,"
the president-elect he can count on "complete cooperation" as he makes the transition to the White House.
downtown Seoul
early Sunday
Michael Essien
Dutchman
people tend to go along with the majority view, even if that view is objectively incorrect.
decision-making bodies that operate by consensus,
people tend to go along with the majority view, even if that view is objectively incorrect.
reflections of people's reliance on one another for knowledge of the world,
in Neuron,
basis for principles of social psychology in the brain.
theories of conformity
"We show that a deviation from the group opinion is regarded by the brain as a punishment,"
Nearly 2.6 million customers
Nearly 2.6 million customers in Texas and Louisiana lack
heavy flooding and scattered debris.
D.J. Knight of Pearlman, Texas, decided to ride
left four people dead,
20,000
near 80 mph,
The Heritage Foundation
$787 billion stimulus
result in a massive government
national energy tax,
health care
presenting "misleading" evidence to stewards.
Jarno Trulli
"misleading"
last weekend's Australian Grand Prix
all over the globe
Jyrki Vaananen
2009
as far afield as Australia and New Zealand
1978 Foreign Intelligence
the new FISA bill
voting in favor.
fight the legislation in court.
"District 9," the alien action pic
"District 9,"
needs to overcome Casey Anthony's statements and behavior.
her alibi
lack of a cause of death and the absence of any soft tissue on the toddler's skeletal remains
last summer.
no evidence
Caylee Anthony's
€1.8 billion
Naples
re-open
profiteering
golf course
city government officials use the state of emergency to quickly
€1.8 billion (more than $2.5 billion)
€1.8 billion (more than $2.5 billion)
garbage
The garbage crisis
€1.8 billion
criminal investigations
has had problems in finding sites for municipal dumps
Naples
clans have now managed to burrow their way so deeply into the system that every attempt to fix the problem has proved futile.
No one has claimed responsibility
least 33
At least 33
Sunni Arab and Shiite
terror attacks in Afghanistan
military and technical capabilities
has strengthened its military and technical capabilities
Taliban
"The Taliban-led insurgency
supporters in neighboring Pakistan
stability and to the expansion of government authority,
Africa
had captured one of four pirates who hijacked their vessel, but they released him in a failed hostage trade.
The ship had eluded the pirates for more than three hours off the coast of Somalia before being boarded,
eluded the pirates
Ken Quinn
United Arab Emirates
Shahar Peer told CNN she learned of her visa ban Saturday, just before her scheduled flight to Dubai.
London's
Four suicide bombers detonate themselves aboard
bombings and attempted bomb attacks
52
gas and nails
July 7, 2005:
gas and nails
fuel, gas cylinders and nails
produced in Iran
is pursuing nuclear weapons capabilities.
peaceful purposes,
the WTA Tour
May 12
$300,000 fine
WTA Tour
7.0-magnitude quake.
their hands and brawn
Ray Gosling,
carried out a so-called mercy killing
the City of Los Angeles' Web
putting extra police on the streets, trash pickup, sanitation, traffic control and more for the Tuesday event,
Three thousand police officers
putting extra police on the streets, trash pickup, sanitation, traffic control and more
Los Angeles'
new Mac Pro high-end desktop powered by Intel's "Nehalem" processor,
"Nehalem" processor, a new and more graphics-intensive Mac Mini machine,
U.N. Human Rights Council,
the U.N. Human Rights Council,
routinely and intentionally put children in harm's way during their 22-day
of war crimes and other violations
the response by Israel
southern Austrian city of Klagenfurt
southern Austrian city of Klagenfurt
Klagenfurt,
that they themselves weren't able to fulfill, and he too expected things of
"Many people expected things of Joerg
1.7 million copies.
drugs, sex, pregnancy, abortion, rape and disease.
1.7 million
keitai shosetsu,
putting cellphone novels into print.
cell phone novels
earlier this year,
Jett,
urging fans to see his latest movie, "The Taking of Pelham 123,"
is a violation of Resolution 1701 and is rejected by Lebanon,"
the firing of rockets into northern Israel
rockets
source of rockets
Lebanese Prime Minister
ended the service with a wedding ceremony,
marriage
the wedding
he passed away
make their union official.
Ahmadi
Ahmadis regard themselves as Muslim. But the government says they aren't,
regard themselves as Muslim.
regard themselves as Muslim. But the government says they aren't,
warned the Punjab provincial government about threats to the Ahmadi community center in Model Town for more than a year.
Abraham Lincoln
has made his name playing famous historical figures.
famous historical figures.
Wally, the Monaco superyacht company, to build
$145 million
Wally, the Monaco superyacht company, to build a $145 million (€100 million) yacht.
The annual end-of-summer yachting industry and yacht owners' conference
more than 15 percent
more than 15 percent
Fargo, North Dakota,
(3 degrees Fahrenheit),
Southeast,
felt like 40 below
through the weekend,
icy cold front
40 below
her lover
how they came by their deaths,"
Diana wearing a swimsuit could not be proof she was pregnant
Previously unseen footage of Diana,
just hours before
Diana, Princess of Wales, taken just hours before
Fayed's father, Mohammed Al Fayed,
holding veterans
of holding veterans care funding hostage.
legislation funding veterans programs to a $150.7 billion bill that also funded a number of domestic priorities, including health, labor and education.
veterans programs
"The president
not sending a bill
welcomed a dialogue on spending,
would fund veterans' care programs to the president's desk by Veterans Day.
On Saturday,
clean bill to fund the veterans,"
holding veterans care funding hostage.
veterans care funding
not sending a bill
The House passed a health-labor-education bill 269-142 last week with the veterans
$150.7 billion bill that
a number of domestic priorities, including health, labor and education.
veterans funding
that also funded a number of domestic priorities, including health, labor and education.
spending,
A total of 96
Liverpool fans
A total of 96 supporters died on April 15, 1989 before the FA Cup semifinal between Liverpool and Nottingham Forest at Sheffield Wednesday's stadium,
20th anniversary of the Hillsborough disaster in a
Leppings Lane
creation of all-seater stadia.
memorial service at Anfield
96
co-workers
Checkers
Drew
I
Arlan and Sarah Calderon
Arlan and Sarah Calderon
13-year-old
Obama joined Secretary of State Hillary Clinton to celebrate
Clinton
State Department Women of Courage Awards,
the State Department Women of Courage Awards,
the new documents prove nothing.
killed himself in July as the Justice Department prepared to charge him in the anthrax case,
"Yes! Yes! Yes!!!!!!! I finally know who mailed the anthrax letters in the fall of 2001. I've pieced it together! Now we can finally get this over and done with," the e-mail reads.
maintains Ivins didn't carry out the attacks and says the new documents prove nothing.
five people
anthrax
kill
the hearing on estate and custody matters.
until the end of the year
the General Administration of Quality Supervision, Inspection, and Quarantine (AQSIQ)
vomit and lose consciousness.
vomit and lose consciousness.
can become comatose, develop respiratory depression or have seizures,"
Chinese-made
"date rape" drug.
Aqua Dots toys that contain a chemical that converts into a "date rape" drug.
three
U.S.
Australia
Australia swallowed large quantities of the beads and were
an investigation by quality control agencies
under the name "Bindeez Beads."
Melbourne-based Moose Enterprise Pty. Ltd.
vomit and lose consciousness.
China
Australia
vomit and lose consciousness.
Aqua Dots
Wednesday
between Barcelona and Manchester United in Rome on Wednesday
A snowstorm is threatening parts of the Northeast with as much as 15 inches of snowfall.
Maine to the Carolinas,
Massachusetts,
Washington,
Winter storm warnings
was the result of fear and an inferiority complex by the Chileans.
air force officer was spying for the neighboring country,
Peruvian air force officer was spying for the neighboring country,
Chile
foreign minister and justice department
north of Lima,
turn over to Chilean authorities all evidence into allegations that a
Claire
has a wound on his neck that keeps reopening for no apparent reason.
created the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., or FDIC, gave rise to the Securities and Exchange Commission, or SEC, and separated investment banks from commercial banks.
psychology plays a huge role in financial markets.
failures
1920s.
was a financial panic,
it's important to remember that psychology plays a huge role in financial markets.
the Great Crash of 1929 and the ensuing Great Depression,
has been at bottom a crisis of confidence.
Kosovo
Milan Milutinovic
war crimes
war crimes
crimes by the former Yugoslav and Serbian forces during a military campaign against Kosovo's ethnic Albanians in 1999.
grave
hometown of al-Ouja near Tikrit in Salaheddin north of Baghdad.
schoolchildren
One video shows schoolchildren at the grave in December; they carried banners at Hussein's grave that said "We won't forget you father" and they read pro-Hussein poetry.
of the head of a pin
poison
Bulgarian dissident Georgi Markov
FBI
the perpetrators
mass killers
Dennis Hastert
because he was elected president and he wasn't George Bush. Well, if that is the case, maybe all of those millions of Americans who voted for him
millions of Americans
Tiger Woods
British court
The High
Tiger Woods
a party at a friend's house,
YouTube
in coffins or body bags.
would be sent back in coffins or body bags.
Chileans used "improper terms" that are not shared by the Peruvian people,
would be sent back in coffins or body bags.
the mosque be rebuilt as soon as possible and that its original architecture be preserved,
in Bab Berdieyinne mosque in Meknes,
Jay-Z. Besides
gifts for people who were absolutely impossible to shop for.
Charles Beyer
store called Gran Bwa
bandanna slippers
systems at airports will go further than originally expected,
airline workers at the ticketing counters place the bags on conveyor belts, which pass through explosive detectors on their way to the aircraft.
will be used to speed up construction of in-line baggage screening systems,
Washington Dulles International
"I'm a big history buff," President Obama
the Civil War,
Civil War
"inclusive"
Scotland's
Climate change could be shrinking Soay sheep in Scotland.
climate change can trump natural selection.
how wide-ranging the effects of global climate change can be,
between 18 and 24 months.
Children's Hospital
between 18 and 24 months.
Toilet Training School
at Children's Hospital
Leonard Abess Jr., a Miami banker
the kind of "responsibility" the president has called for from high-profile financial CEOs,
Leonard Abess Jr.
a Miami banker
the slow response to the typhoon.
least 117
travelers rough-housing in the streets outside
the mere election of President Obama
loud, rude and thoughtless
helped to improve America's reputation worldwide.
bitter defeat"
Steinmeier,
33.7
defeated her foreign minister
The U.S. Commission on International Religious Freedom
the smaller groups
Judith Ingram
"safe and fair provincial elections" and "security and safety for all
Obama
Commission on International Religious Freedom
adequate official protection."
U.S. Coast Guard
Crystal Beach, Bolivar Peninsula
more than 120 people
prisoners at the South Dakota State Penitentiary
Wheelchairs for Iraqi
organizing the distribution of wheelchairs,
Wheelchairs for Iraqi Kids.
make life a little easier
prisoners
Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi's
L'Aquila,
Prime Minister
Pakistan
member of a pro-government anti-Taliban militia
hijack a Turkish Airlines flight
"urgent situation"
Russian authorities promptly arrested a "slightly intoxicated" passenger from Uzbekistan,
en route from Turkey to Russia
Lukla airstrip
airports
Hong Kong International Airport,
Business Traveller page on CNN iReport
world's worst airport?
Charles de Gaulle
Hong Kong International
Hong Kong International
Gough Island in the middle of the south Atlantic.
Predatory mice
Gough
albatross chicks
the England defender had made a fair tackle.
Fulham,
Arsenal
Newcastle
Killings, kidnappings and torture of those suspected of homosexual conduct have intensified
Hundreds of gay men have been tortured and killed in Iraq
Hundreds of gay men have been tortured and killed in Iraq
Authorities are unable to provide homosexuals with special protection,
Killings, kidnappings and torture
O2 Arena,
Los Angeles Staples Center arena,
gathered at arenas and record stores, big screens, parks
Berlin's O2 World arena,
Los Angeles
at arenas and record stores, big screens, parks and makeshift
on pace for a Sunday
gas venting system,
shuttle Discovery
deliver supplies needed to expand the station's crew to six people.
launch
Sunday
deliver supplies
The Chronicles of Narnia
books
She's Come Undone
Aslan,
Tucuman
Fundacion Maria de los Angeles,
Veron left her house in the northern Argentine province of
Argentina's
a level-7 event on the international scale for nuclear disasters
"Every time I come back, I feel conditions have improved. This is due to your hard work,"
Fukushima Daiichi's
Officer Andrew Dunton,
police officer
Omar Edwards,
Director Robert Mueller and representatives of other relevant agencies to discuss
"a lot of progress has been made" in treating patients wounded in the rampage
FBI Director Robert Mueller and representatives of other relevant agencies
"acted alone."
12 soldiers and one civilian dead and 42
to increase taxes on luxury items such as Hummers,
20 percent
near schools, churches and cultural centers will not be granted licenses to
drinking and smoking.
campaign to make Venezuelans cut back on drinking and smoking.
stores near schools, churches and cultural centers
stores near schools, churches and cultural centers will
cigarettes are 20
Venezuela
Venezuela
The Venezuelan government
alcohol and cigarettes
near schools, churches and cultural centers will not be granted licenses to
50 percent to 70 percent
2007.
the Penza region
Vitaly Nedogon,
May.
Vitaly Nedogon,
Thirty-five
Pei-Pu, a singer
At least 400 Civil War soldiers
At least 400
city of Jodhpur,
dress up like a member
India
400 Civil War soldiers
Zahra Rahnavard
reformists and women,
presidential hopeful Mir Hossein Mousavi,
the state
Three
Syria
of the state
"Death to Israel."
the dangers of division and disunity, using the language of Islam.
Ayatollah Ali Khamenei,
the dangers of division and disunity,
the United States, Israel and Britain.
Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad.
five members of parliament serving prison sentences
confidence vote
60 seats in
kowtowing to the U.S.
were freed
Immigration and Customs Enforcement,
engine and parts are listed on the U.S. Munitions List and may not be exported from the United States without a license from the State Department,
Immigration and Customs Enforcement,
California
Costa Mesa Police Department
Steely Dan's
thousands of albums
Repasky
"Can't Buy a Thrill" by Steely Dan.
Abu Ghraib and a lack of progress in the Middle East and a certain way in which we deal with the world on international issues,
Abu Ghraib and a lack of progress in the Middle East and a certain way in which we deal with the world on international issues,
Wednesday that he just didn't have it in him.
Gen. Colin Powell
to run the race and to succeed in the quest,"
that he and others were unaware of the provision in the legislation, which he said "has so many articles."
"has so many articles."
criticized by human-rights groups and Western leaders, including U.S. President Barack Obama.
legalizes marital rape.
legalizes rape
"comprehensive rearmament"
2020,
a "comprehensive rearmament" of
the process had already begun and would accelerate through 2011.
significant weaknesses within Russia's armed forces.
Russia is planning a "comprehensive rearmament" of its military,
salvos of trade disputes between China and the U.S.
down only 3.5 percent,
reduce the protectionist rhetoric,
9.5 percent
the country's top clubs
1989
Hillsborough,
fans were crushed to death
"Premier League"
fans were crushed to death during an FA Cup semifinal
of 14 inches (22.3 inches including legs),
pea-sized seahorse,
mistrial in the retrial of six men accused of plotting
last December
Golden Globe
O'Neil
Each earned critical plaudits
"Oscar voters like reality,"
reality,"
O'Neil
in a chemistry lab,
authorities
said, "She is showing signs of improvement,
that Berlusconi and businessman Gianpaolo Tarantini repeatedly discussed bringing women to parties.
Silvio Berlusconi
separate trial in Milan
nearly 1,800
Brazil, Argentina, Chile, Mexico and the United States
half of the nation's population may contract the disease and 90,000
nearly 1,800
she did not know waterboarding
Pelosi
Harman
that she did not know waterboarding
waterboarding
Pelosi
Nancy Pelosi didn't object about waterboard usage because she wasn't personally briefed about it.
actually used on CIA detainee Abu Zubaydah.
Sheikh Khalifa bin Zayed Al Nahyan has promised to appoint an ambassador to Iraq.
I just knew this was the day it was going to end,"
"I got everybody together and said, 'okay, this is it,'"
the square
Brazilian
Deco
Villarreal
Valdes, Jorquera; Puyol, Thuram, Sylvinho, Oleguer, Abidal, Milito; Iniesta, Ronaldinho, Messi, Xavi, Giovani, Crosas; Henry, Ezquerro, Gudjohnsen, Bojan.
Russ Lancaster of
Fred Thorne
Kurt Cobain
Derek Ivy,
the incident still weighs heavily on his mind.
a racial slur
Chapman
slur threatened to end the television
Duane "Dog the Bounty Hunter"
Sri Lanka's war zone.
in northern Sri Lanka's Vanni region.
70,000
died while vacationing with her fiance at a Thailand resort.
suffocated
died while vacationing
downpour
heavy rain,
Turkey
vestiges of the 600-year-old capital.
Steps away from City Hall subway station
The tranquility of the palace grounds are a great
the military cannot accommodate certain religious practices,
"Both are concluding their training and are slated to begin active duty in July 2009. However, the U.S. Army is now disputing their ability to serve with their
their unshorn hair and turbans "would not be a problem."
confronting the challenge of female suicide bombers,
Umm-al-Moumineen, or "the mother of the believers."
operations targeting members of families of suspected female bombers trying to break up the rings that are recruiting the women and girls.
their camera and use their wireless remote shutter for a few shots of the two of them.
squirrel
squirrel
It's appeared on the Web sites of news outlets around the world,
"completely authentic"
Epcot
Eric Goodman,
Wednesday
Epcot
"Sum of All Thrills" interactive ride,
Interactive rides
"Sum of All Thrills"
hodgepodge of life before and after:
Leogane, Haiti
former minister
at least 50
mosque in northern Pakistan
targeting Aftab Ahmad Khan Sherpao,
mosque in northern Pakistan
four people
A man, a woman and two boys were found dead
Addison, Illinois,
four people
two
"The Hand With Eyes"
It
we've chosen to live in a city where we are not the most interesting people.
"Sex and the City" movie.
the government immediately restore judges the previous president had ousted,
President Asif Ali Zardari
Zardari's Pakistan Peoples Party promised to reinstate the judges within 30 days of taking office.
to reinstate the judges within 30 days of taking office.
Karachi
reinstate
lawyers
a desire for status among people who lived as relative equals without a formal leadership system.
Peru
the oldest piece of gold jewelry ever found in the Americas,
National Institute of Peru
Peru
16 Indiana National Guard soldiers
company knowingly exposed the soldiers to a cancer-causing toxic chemical.
Kellogg Brown and Root,
Houston-based company Kellogg Brown
nasal tumors
cancer-causing toxic chemical.
the main reason is so many people have allergic reactions to animal dander," Dean of Student Affairs Bruce Reitman said. "It's one thing in a family, where everyone agrees that this is what they want and no one has an allergic reaction to the animal. But in a residence hall, where there is no such communication or agreement, it's hard and people are affected."
allergic reaction to the animal.
MIT
Sophomore Kara Brown,
many people have allergic reactions to animal dander,"
Atlanta, Georgia,
hundreds of trees
3,500 signatures,
Donald Rumsfeld's
to appoint Rumsfeld.
an online petition
greatest names in golf have
Jack Nicklaus
charity called Plan International,
a charity called Plan International,
Mumbai
Hollywood
Indian slum
Mubarak
restore access to the internet and cell phone
he must make good on his promises
might drive the government into a survivalist mentality,
collective consequences of the government's actions
asking his government to resign and would soon announce a new one,
A man on a revenge mission, Lee travels to a mysterious island to fight in a deadly tournament hosted by an evil billionaire. Along with being technically amazing -- the nunchucks scene is jaw-dropping
Kill Bill 1 & 2
Jean-Claude Van Damme has
Tony Jaa
the killer punch
"The Da Vinci Code"
Tom Hanks
"Angels & Demons,"
while "The Da Vinci Code" and "Angels & Demons" are inextricably linked, the latter can stand on its own.
you get the audience thinking 'Well, maybe it's not all true, but probably some of it is true.' " Ted Baehr,
their melding of history and storytelling.
grossly unnatural
the way we raise animals for food
an agricultural production system or consumption patterns."
animal suffering,
antibiotics
the growth of antimicrobial-resistant pathogens
Michael Zantow,
"His sole reason for being on Flight 253 was to kill all of the passengers and himself. He thought he'd end up in heaven."
AbdulMutallab was in the bathroom for about 15 to 20 minutes,
his wife, Linda,
a death threat
Linda
O.J. Simpson,
The European Union
The European Union
EU
were imposed after accusations of human rights violations and election fraud.
"I have always been disappointed with sanctions on Zimbabwe,"
illegally purchased weapons and sold them in Iraq,
"in any way associated or complicit in unlawful arms activities
A U.S. government official
Blackwater immediately fired them and invited the
Blackwater USA
of Blackwater
illegally purchased weapons and sold them in Iraq,
last weekend
Blackwater
scamming an Australian
British engineer working with a multinational company in Nigeria.
college student
56-year-old
a multinational company in Nigeria.
his choice not to put his hand on his heart is a behavior that "would disqualify about three-quarters of the people who have ever gone to a football game or
Sen. Barack Obama defended himself and his wife against recent suggestions that they are not patriotic.
Sen. Barack Obama defended himself and his wife against recent suggestions that they are not patriotic.
in late 1994.
in late 1994.
against humanity, and war
Theoneste Bagosora,
1994
"practicing"
Compatibility
LPGA
Compatibility
A good golf instructor
personality type, mutual goals, similar outlooks on the game, and
appealed to the citizenry to stand behind the Islamic republic.
public support
Haft-e-Tir Square in central Tehran
legal action against Web sites that it said were inciting people to riot.
Turan
"Up,"
"Up."
20
a court in Lahore,
20
20
Pro-Taliban militants with ties to al Qaeda are carrying out the attacks,
drinking in a popular party spot in a
more than 50
5,000
in a cave at the park
508,000
used receipts and surveillance camera footage from a nearby store to hunt down the
popular party spot in a cave at the park
"indecent sexual relation"
the U.S. Interests section of the Swiss Embassy
Swiss
"indecent sexual relation" with an Iranian woman in his car,
Blagojevich
Chicago
Blagojevich
a tireless campaigner.
Chicagoan,
Chicago
started working in the father's office,
Illinois Gov. Rod Blagojevich,
first state to implement a "Cannabis & Controlled Substances Tax" in order
Arizona
more than 30
Army Gen. David Petraeus,
the top U.S. commander in Iraq,
U.S. forces in East Africa, the Middle East and Central Asia,
chief of U.S. Central Command,
progress,"
the generals' promotions
Army Gen. David Petraeus,
he will
Gates
third kidney transplant.
four
third
lupus
India
four
Irungu
New Delhi, India,
while in the Peace Corps in Ecuador from 1977-80.
transform the economic and social condition of families,"
Pedals for Progress
new life.
Mexico
the virus "is in its declining phase."
Gregory Hartl,
the Army
active-duty force declined in 2010, the number of suicides in the Army Reserve and National Guard increased,
number of suicides
active-duty force declined in 2010, the number of suicides in the Army Reserve and National Guard increased,
Pakistani territory
root out terrorists within its borders.
planned inside Pakistan,
is obligated to root out terrorists within its borders.
Lashkar-e-Tayyiba (LeT),
terrorists operating within its borders.
hydrofluoric acid
tractor-trailer carrying 33,000 pounds of toxic hydrofluoric acid overturned
Ontario, Canada.
toxic hydrofluoric acid
help stop illegal immigrants from making a sprint into southern Arizona.
blames the fence for more risky crossings in less-populated desert areas.
help stop illegal immigrants
to halt any further construction of the fence,
Yuma Sector
Congress in 2006
their flights are less hectic now because while you can still clearly see the trails in the sand and in some hilly areas below, there is considerably less traffic.
England
England
England
England
Juan Martin Del Potro.
umpire Jake Garner
his first grand slam,
five-set
$1,500 fine
Jake Garner
murder
"drug-fueled sex game."
"drug-fueled sex game."
was not at the girls' villa the night her roommate died,
September
police
Ratko Mladic
being conducted around the town of Arandjelovac, 45 miles (75 kilometers) south of Belgrade,
Belgrade.
Mladic
45 miles
The Democratic presidential candidate
The Democratic presidential candidate
this loss of life
husband and two daughters.
already had a 9-year-old daughter,
put it behind her
a C-section,
Monica
George H.W. Bush
White House's press briefing
hardest part of the night was saying goodbye to the White House residence staff a second time.
smiled.
More than 150
Explorer
More than 150
captain and the first
owned by Gap Adventures,
More than 150
154 people
Musician Jesse Dayton has branched out to a new fanbase by collaborating with Rob Zombie.
time on screen.
a hard core following in Texas.
horror movie
that's gonna be my career. People are gonna either really like me or they're really not and just get f***ing used to it 'cause this is the deal,"
Palm D'Or at Cannes
"Pulp Fiction"
kidnapping, raping
murder, rape
Aguilar was a cashier at Toys R Us,
Oncologist Nick Spirtos
Cancer
"Over time, her cancer would progress and she'd pass away."
its newly announced military strategy,
a new U.S. defense strategy
new U.S. defense strategy
"It's the hardest thing to teach when it comes to fly-fishing,"
Learning the fundamentals of fly-fishing
phase out its imports from Iran
The United States is exploring ways to cut off Iran's central bank from the global financial system and reduce the country's oil revenues,
to block the Strait of Hormuz
dozens of Rohingya refugees from Myanmar
dozens of Rohingya refugees from Myanmar
Samuel Eto'o,
a five-year contract
Barcelona.
"Dollhouse,"
sisters Kamille, Kassidy, and Kyle
Earlier this month,
Kourtney, Kim, and KhloÃ©'s
"they should be trusted to speak freely in public."
announces the U.S. policy allowing cell phones to Cuba at the White House on Wednesday.
Americans to send mobile phones to relatives in Cuba
own mobile phones for the first time."
for decades.
Aberdeen
Playing the Nintendo Wii Fit could
"Falls
of using the Wii to help Parkinson's sufferers.
Ian Fisher
Sunday,
30 years,
thousands of students, educators and supporters
protests over education budget
education budget
education budget
March 4
Karachi,
deliberately bring the plane down in a less densely populated residential area
Gulistan-e Johar section of Karachi,
"Christina's World,"
captured America in his paintings of his native Pennsylvania and Maine,"
Thursday
"Mr. Wyeth captured America in his paintings of his native Pennsylvania and Maine,"
a neighbor,
$410 billion
$410 billion
60 percent
site of a fish-packing facility on the Columbia River.
along the Pacific Ocean,
Cannery Pier Hotel
addressing the attacks
least 10 Indian
Political tension
India
students from India
a severe thunderstorm capable of producing a tornado.
lost the ability to send passengers through security because of a power outage.
A rare tornado
tornado
tornado
Fresno's Yosemite International Airport
Suu Kyi's home
Aung San Suu Kyi's
next year's scheduled elections will reintroduce democracy in
"grateful that she's alive, grateful that the entire world is watching
"grateful that she's alive, grateful that the entire world is watching
hostages and trapped civilians,
the causalities of civilians.
Taj hotel
layout of the hotel,"
200
help,
200
doctor
A doctor excommunicated
A doctor excommunicated by the Catholic Church for performing an abortion
Ampyra (generic name dalfampridine, formerly known as fampridine),
walking speed.
the extent to which the
MS therapy
requested that the VA look into potential contamination at its facilities.
improperly sterilized endoscopy equipment and a veteran's positive HIV test.
hepatitis
bomb went off
Algeria faces a continuing Islamic insurgency,
to see Algeria's president in Batna,
no immediate claim of
Qaeda-affiliated group.
to see Algeria's president in Batna,
July,
15 minutes before the expected arrival of President Abdel-Aziz Bouteflika.
apparent suicide bombings in Algiers
15 minutes before the expected arrival of President Abdel-Aziz Bouteflika.
Batna, Algeria.
Batna,
to see Algeria's president in Batna,
no immediate claim of
5 p.m.
Thursday
to see Algeria's president in Batna,
10
10 other men, from Morocco, Algeria or Spain's
March 2004
they helped four suspects from the Madrid train bombings to flee.
killed 191 people and wounded more than 1,800.
golf,
Obama
"a multibillion-dollar speed bump," which will slow, but not stop, illegal immigration.
to build a border fence.
Department of Homeland Security
Eloisa Tamez
U.S. government
are fighting it.
border fence
"a multibillion-dollar speed bump," which will slow, but not stop, illegal immigration.
about 100 landowners, those like Eloisa Tamez
two
sexually assaulted
had ordered protesters to leave the park
more than a dozen
Portland, Oregon.
that the missiles could be crossing the border.
"to anything that flies,"
"to anything that flies,"
tracking down and destroying "MANPADs," shoulder-fired, heat-seeking missiles
U.S. Gen. Carter Ham,
Bechtel Jacobs, the Department of Energy's prime environmental management contractor
sell the "pieces of scrap"
attempted to sell the "pieces of scrap" to someone he thought was a French agent
A "barrier" is used to
federal court in Knoxville
uranium enrichment
Roy Lynn Oakley,
charges of stealing restricted nuclear
identify rogue employees attempting
to break rods "into little pieces" and throw them away.
FBI field office
on charges of stealing restricted nuclear
security at the memorial.
Between 5,000 and 15,000 people
estimated $2 million
her acting chops and sing as well.
singer
club owner
Mary J. Blige
"Nationwide, 7 percent of beach water samples are so contaminated with human or animal waste that they're not conducive for swimming,"
Laguna Beach in Orange County, California,
having pristine, nearly pollution-free shores.
Laguna Beach in Orange County, California,
FDA
The FDA
90 days
60 days
Boehringer Ingelheim Roxane Inc., Columbus, Ohio; Cody Laboratories Inc., Cody, Wyoming; Glenmark Pharmaceuticals Inc., Mahwah, New Jersey; Lannett Company Inc., Philadelphia, Pennsylvania; Lehigh Valley Technologies Inc., Allentown, Pennsylvania; Mallinckrodt Inc. Pharmaceuticals Group, St. Louis, Missouri; Physicians Total Care Inc., Tulsa, Oklahoma; Roxane Laboratories Inc., Columbus, Ohio; and Xanodyne Pharmaceuticals Inc., Newport, Kentucky.
helped win him the U.S. presidency
"People have access now to more
he's still doing a fine job at being an up-to-date online communicator.
he's still doing a fine job at being an up-to-date online communicator.
health care fight is the
Democrats have made a number of "online gaffes" that have drawn attention away from their talking points. He said there is "so much noise"
offered herself up for sex.
Iraqi Red Crescent
an 18-year-old approached him
Dia'a,
the ripple effect it will have in the long term
Proenza
petition
"They wanted me to be quiet about it."
the QuikSCAT, but also
after nearly half of the NHC staff signed a petition calling for his ouster.
nearly half
half of the NHC staff
the environment at the center
comments about a key hurricane satellite called QuikSCAT.
left his position
his ouster.
calling for his ouster.
half of the
his comments
half of the NHC staff
both nations to "significantly fewer strategic arms within seven years"
"the most comprehensive arms control agreement in nearly two decades"
builds on a previous agreement that expired in December.
Aun Sung Suu Kyi and other opposition leaders
Wednesday's Wall Street Journal.
Aun Sung Suu Kyi and other opposition leaders
in Wednesday's Wall Street Journal.
"step aside," give up the "terror campaigns"
military junta to "step aside," give up the "terror campaigns" against its people and allow for a democratic
Myanmar's
Burma [Myanmar]
"should step aside
Aun Sung Suu Kyi and other opposition leaders
100,000
breeding thoroughbreds
gunned down four Lakewood, Washington, police officers Sunday.
"Ninety-two percent
May 2000,
36-carat diamond
the highest price for a diamond sold at auction.
mined in India nearly 400 years ago,
400 years ago,
Acute encephalitis
has mostly struck children up to 15 years old,
in northern India
bacterial or viral infection; the ingesting of toxic substances; and complications of a disease.
120 people
could rise above 42.
reflects ominous trends: the deterioration of the immigration debate, the rise of anti-immigrant hostility as
Los Angeles, California,
alien-supporting nuts."
"city upon a hill."
American values in other countries
as if Americans put their country ahead of any
Americans' pride in their
America's ideology
Americans' pride in their country is not evangelistic.
January 15
January 15
the water
circumstances surrounding the US Airways Flight 1549 emergency landing on New York's Hudson River.
hitting a flock of Canada geese.
bird strike.
Shays, R-Connecticut,
increased their 36-seat majority in the U.S. House,
she was confident Democrats would ride a "wave" of pro-Democratic sentiment across the country and add to their
confident Democrats would ride a "wave" of pro-Democratic
Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
are using new technology to spread their message.
Mir Hossein Mousavi
average of $4,018 to lease,
they found signs of a cover-up at the scene, including pieces of a first-aid kit scattered around the scene and a handwritten note documenting the attack,
"She cut me," the boy said in a high-pitched voice in an audio recording
filed a notice of intent to present an insanity defense, according to court records.
first-degree murder, attempted murder and child endangerment causing serious injury.
is an all-new vehicle,
an engineer
2010 Ford Taurus.
attempted kidnapping of a 19-year-old Queens college student,
of first-degree murder last month in the 2006 death of Imette St. Guillen, 24,
Raymond Soeoth of Indonesia and Amadou Diouf of Senegal in West Africa,
Sen. Joe Lieberman,
1,073 immigration
forcibly injecting them with psychotropic drugs
"Senator Lieberman intends to follow up with ICE
CNN
Immigration and Customs Enforcement
intends to follow up with ICE
Sen.
physicians
alleged practice and unspecified damages.
ICE forcibly drugging deportees
1,073 immigration detainees
intends to follow up with ICE to ensure that detainees are not drugged unless there
"Department of Homeland Security law enforcement personnel
forcibly injecting them with psychotropic drugs while trying to shuttle them out of the country during their deportation.
disappeared
two
two
members of the Presidential Security Group
Timothy Kern
the two bodies discovered Friday
Valentino Rossi
Valentino Rossi
an eighth world title,
last week.
off the coast of Somalia
worth half a million dollars.
worth half a million dollars.
in Mexico,
chemical diabetes
about 20,000
recess,
your senator or representative's office
the time and location,
trying to set the record straight
Kansas City Wizards
Newcastle United
Professor Simon Chadwick,
Manchester City, Sunderland, Everton, Portsmouth and Newcastle United
Football fans
accused of plotting to wage holy war
conspiracy to support terrorists and conspiracy to murder.
was charged with conspiracy to support
charged with conspiracy to support terrorists and conspiracy to murder.
conspiracy to support terrorists
milk safety,
detergent,"
cows,
"It is a victory for democracy that proves that our country provides possibilities for all people,"
Sen. Obama on this historic accomplishment. I thank him for accepting the torch that was lit by our forefathers and proudly carrying it through the darkness of our struggles, trials and tribulations, bringing light and hope to
this is not just a victory for
Sen. Obama
"To date we have contracts in place to supply 195 million doses of the vaccine," Chief Executive Andrew Witty said. "We also have a variety of agreements in place with the U.S. government to supply pandemic products worth $250 million. Discussions with over 50 governments are ongoing, with many at advanced stages, and I therefore expect further significant orders. Shipments are expected in the second half of 2009 and early 2010."
more than 98,000
Relenza
Jonathan Campos
cause of death was self-inflicted asphyxiation,
Seaman August Provost,
Petty Officer Jonathan Campos
Petty Officer Jonathan Campos
Seaman August Provost,
Seaman August Provost.
four.
recalled all of its Chinese-made candy
Cadbury Dairy Milk Cookies Chocolate (bulk pack 5kg) and Cadbury Dairy Milk Hazelnut Chocolate (bulk pack 5kg).
personal relationship
The Red Cross Board of Governors
Everson's relationship with a female
the situation reflected poor judgment on Mr. Everson's part and diminished his ability to lead the organization in the future,"
CEO Mark W. Everson
Red Cross
The organization
Tehran.
defying reports
power plant
cooperating
Putin,
Iran should be allowed to pursue its nuclear program for peaceful purposes,
an assassination plot against him,
the U.S.
Russia, Kazakhstan, Turkmenistan and Azerbaijan
attempt on his life
to attend a summit of Caspian Sea nations,
"peaceful nuclear activities
of Caspian Sea nations,
impose stronger U.N.
Putin,
Tehran.
Orlando, Florida.
forgery, fraudulent use of personal information and petty theft,
forgery, fraudulent use of personal information and petty theft,
false official statements
overthrow President Sheikh Sharif Sheikh Ahmed for cooperating with the West.
Abu Mansoor al-Amriki,
audience of potential recruits in America,
hip-hop jihad vibe.
Abu Mansoor al-Amriki,
"Mortar by mortar, shell by shell, only going to stop when I send them to hell,"
Abu Mansoor al-Amriki,
an audio message
America,
$5 million
$5 million in hurricane relief.
Cuban
direct U.S. assistance for hurricane victims.
Facebook
The update adds a "Sort" link at the top of the News Feed. Clicking it brings up two
lets people sort information by Recent
September
Milan
pitch-invading supporter approach
Celtic
A fan ran onto the field
"lack of organisation and improper conduct of supporters",
theatrical over-reaction
two matches
pitch-invading supporter
AC Milan's Dida
Celtic
AC Milan's Dida
she was disturbed by how the criminal
creative control of the film
O'Neal said.
"Basically, it's a gonzo trip,"
creative control of the film
'Farrah's Story,'
an upheaval in a previously isolated, distant, inaccessible location suddenly was available on television sets in living rooms and foreign ministries around the world. It was a pivotal moment
stop broadcasting
an upheaval in a previously isolated, distant, inaccessible location suddenly was available on television sets in living rooms and foreign ministries around the world. It was a pivotal moment
China.
Tiananmen Square
1957,
"Larry King
"Larry King
Larry King?"
27-year-old mum's boyfriend
brutally abused
facial
Peter.
public
in Britain,
Rancagua
Three strong earthquakes
new president,
1,864 veterans and survivors,
individual claims files for all the recipients to determine who received the letter by mistake,
1,864
fatal neurological condition.
fatal neurological condition.
President Obama,
Barack Obama
"those on the right"
Fred Armisen
Lou Dobbs
return to a traditional role of regulation.
aggressive intervention on an institution-by-institution basis.
Henry Paulson
House Republicans and House Democrats
motorcycle gang
A motorcycle gang
eight sets of human remains
two
help identify the dead,
Erik Kohler
Erik Kohler
police found eight sets of human remains
the University of Wyoming
DHS official
an alleged claim of responsibility by al Qaeda for former Pakistani Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto's assassination,
al Qaeda Afghanistan commander and spokesman Mustafa Abu Al-Yazid
Mustafa Abu Al-Yazid
an alleged claim of responsibility by al Qaeda for former Pakistani Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto's assassination,
responsibility by al Qaeda for former Pakistani Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto's assassination,
Thursday
animals are not adapting well to rising
Pacific walrus, ringed seal, hooded seal, ivory gull, narwhal and polar bear,
are responding in various ways to the region's changes in climate over the last 150 years,
native Arctic foxes.
reindeer populations and their ability to reproduce are up, while mortality is down.
some native Arctic species have also benefited
flora and fauna of the Arctic are responding in various ways to the region's changes in climate
Organization for Women's Freedom in Iraq.
pounds the streets of Baghdad looking for these victims often too humiliated to come forward.
Prostitution
They have been driven to sell their bodies
"People shouldn't criticize women, or talk badly about them,"
put food on the table for their children
their children
survive.
put food on the table
humanitarian workers.
$8 a day.
Violence,
compile information
decision in May to suspend the nation's Olympic Committee and form a temporary committee
nation's Olympic Committee
political interference in sports.
International Olympic Committee banned Iraq
the International Olympic Committee
June
Summer Olympics.
Recovery efforts by more than 50 deputies and volunteers involved collect and preserving the remains,
a mushroom cloud of flames lit up the evening sky.
mushroom cloud
Six
a new beau
super-sized
stuffed animal or a hastily purchased bouquet of flowers.
Felicia Sullivan, of Brooklyn.
Brian Wise,
Spam.
pretty much nil. That way, anything that
Black Monday..."
stuffed animal
would not give her permission to travel.
convicted killer at home,
shotgun slaying of her husband,
would not give her permission to travel.
permission to travel.
the shotgun slaying of her husband, Matthew,
a human lie detector
Tim Roth
"Reservoir Dogs" and "Pulp Fiction."
a human lie detector on the hit series "Lie to Me."
Tim Roth
strong winds,
Roma
Manchester
Nemanja Vidic
Nemanja Vidic
Alex Ferguson
Manchester United
Tuesday's Champions League clash away to Dynamo Kiev.
Spartak Moscow player
Sporting Lisbon and Roma
Leicester Stovell
he is the father
the athlete and his family
timing
mutineers
authorities foiled an attempted army mutiny that they believe was designed to disrupt
NATO
of the mutineers
an undercover tape
deadly mosque attack
near the Afghanistan border.
Pakistan
an estimated 2 million
estimated 2 million
Friday
There is a long history of Taliban presence in the area, including foreign fighters in leadership roles,
estimated 2 million Pakistanis
earthquake
"I think there's no doubt that there was some confusion,"
MEND
attacks were made on Royal Dutch Shell oil facilities in Nigeria on Sunday,
the Movement for the Emancipation of the Niger Delta, or MEND
Movement for the Emancipation of the Niger Delta,
lure new buyers.
Maury Wilkins
GM dealer
he gears up for an enormous challenge: protecting his decades-old family business.
Houston; Dallas, Texas; and New Orleans, Louisiana,
1980.
1980.
Iran
will not
they have suffered enough and the government's accusation is "insulting."
1,354 have tested positive for abnormal levels of lead
Korea Hyoksin Trading
a proliferator of weapons of mass destruction.
Trading Corporation
country's nuclear weapons program.
Hyoksin
The order
fewer than 10 percent of the 1.3 million
"see" through the tongue.
fewer than 10 percent
electrically stimulates the tactile receptors
AMD.
fewer than 10
Pope Benedict XVI.
are those
the apostle St. Paul
in the Basilica of St. Paul in Rome
inserting a probe into a small opening in the sarcophagus,
"traces of a precious linen cloth, purple in color and laminated with pure gold, and a blue colored textile with linen filaments,"
"Tiny fragments of bone"
happens to be some of the most incredibly
diners
no need for new laws to deal with the problem.
paparazzi.
monks,
not cut back on health care.
$26 billion each year,
cerebral palsy, vision problems, learning disabilities, and developmental delays,
before the 37th week of pregnancy.
prime minister's house in Rome.
the authenticity of the excerpts released Monday.
La Repubblica and its sister magazine L'Espresso
The daily La Repubblica and its sister magazine L'Espresso
Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi talking with an escort at the center of a corruption probe.
her attorney,
corruption probe.
at the University of South Carolina,
smoked marijuana on a college campus.
British newspaper
as 67
off Turks and Caicos,
200
67
four who had died.
the Haitian port of Cap Haitien,
15 years ago
county jail
a county jail in Casper, Wyoming,
Edward Eugene Harper
he would consider a recommendation to boost U.S. troops beyond the level of 68,000 already approved.
Gen. Stanley McChrystal
Stanley McChrystal
68,000
a recommendation to boost U.S. troops beyond the level of 68,000 already approved.
a recommendation to boost U.S. troops
north,"
headed toward Durban, South Africa,
dead
son of a former Iranian Revolutionary Guard commander was found dead in a
son of a former Iranian Revolutionary Guard commander
Messi
H
Barcelona
Barcelona
touches on art and antiquities theft, crosses back into the world of blogging and zips over to the stock market in less than 400 pages.
Bushnell said each one is based on a common type of person.
life of New York City women through the lens of where they live.
Candace Bushnell
many of the other
reports of dangerous animals such as snakes and crocodiles appearing in the floodwaters and every day we see children playing in the water, bathing or wading through it trying to make their way to dry ground,"
Mark Kerrigan
a violent argument and struggle between the father and his son,
pleaded not guilty
the father collapsed
responsibility in the death.
Mark Sullivan
between the father
Deputy Interior Minister Gen. Mohammed Bin Abdullah al-Qawsi
Houthi rebels
troops and rebels
one
the compact disc,
in movies, video games and music.
transportation
2,000 transportation projects
are under way.
the agency's $48 billion stimulus budget.
Air was established as a private airline
SkyTeam,
South Africa police commissioner
South Africa police commissioner Jackie Selebi, facing
Jackie Selebi,
more than 40 over-the-counter drugs
more than 40 over-the-counter
more than 40 over-the-counter
quality standards.
western Australia
sinking of the Australian ship and the loss of its entire crew of 645.
November 19, 1941.
last year,
Kormoran
when Formula One makes its debut in his home country of India
Formula One
it would be "magic" to be on the grid
MJ's
Elizabeth Taylor,
8 a.m. (11 a.m. ET)
Tuesday morning ahead of the public service.
the Staples Center downtown Tuesday.
subway system
National Transportation Safety Board
June 22
was not
Nine people were killed and 52 taken to hospitals June 22 when a southbound Metrorail
It was not clear
the World Health
stay at home and avoid public places
the death toll from swine flu continues to climb.
stay at home and avoid public places upon return.
Congress and other authorities use the findings to help decide where to invest in high-speed rail projects and other measures to ease airport congestion.
New York; Chicago, Illinois; Philadelphia, Pennsylvania; Miami, Florida; Atlanta, Georgia; and San Francisco, California.
choose the smaller one.
Mark Hamill,
the Joker,
gamers
Saturday,
a nice guy when they first met, but that he "seemed sketchy" after she got to know him better.
four people wounded, two critically,
its coral reefs
overfishing, pollution
one-fifth
the family
Staff Sgt. Phillip Myers
Dover Air Force
Air Force Base in Delaware.
a Nevada ranch.
spotted at 11 a.m. less than 20 miles from the ranch's airport.
Nevada ranch.
A month-long
a long-range missile
Sunday
and then got out of hand.
"There have been some threats made to them for both civil and criminal prosecution,"
Bigfoot
a joke.
have found the carcass of Bigfoot
its image in the technology industry and particularly with people who develop mobile phone apps,
Verizon Wireless,
its image in the technology industry
Palo Alto, California.
Verizon
AT&T
Palo Alto, California.
Madagascar
political instability
rising food prices
hour and half
Aviation Administration revoked the licenses of two Northwest Airlines
chastised the pair, saying they endangered the public
Minneapolis-St. Paul
piloting Flight 188 from San Diego, California, to the Minneapolis-St. Paul airport in Minnesota on Wednesday
and the army have come under criticism in recent weeks for allowing the security situation in Swat to deteriorate in the past few months.
The Pakistani government and the army
tourists and skiers,
allowing the security situation in Swat to deteriorate in the past few months.
Swat region.
Barack Obama
37
61 former
Since 2007, more than 100
61
more than 100
Powell
the band's October 1977 plane crash in Mississippi
you, Billy. I can hear your fingertips rolling off those ivory keys right now. Thanks for being you. Rest in peace and may God bless you,"
Orange Park,
chest pains.
Shiner, Texas.
street machines he services.
Texas.
he was too ill and frail to be sent overseas.
prisoner of war
camp guard.
a camp guard.
multiple charges of rape,
incest and other charges,
as early as Thursday,
Thursday,
convert a 1985 diesel station wagon to run on vegetable
collecting and filtering the grease can be time-consuming and a bit messy.
vegetable
is a writer,
$1,000 each,
local restaurants, and each week, his suppliers leave him five-gallon drums that he must pick up.
smell.
Boston, Massachusetts,
Misty
Misty,
Ronald Cummings
Ronald Cummings
wife,
blue-collar place like a factory,
material
a factory owner,
Mila Kunis, Kristen Wiig, J.K. Simmons and a long-haired and heavily bearded Ben Affleck,
Bhutto's husband
exhumation
Bhutto's assassination
Thursday's
manages Rawalpindi General Hospital.
chief stopped
ISLAMABAD, Pakistan
conserve species threatened by deadly fungus, habitat loss, pollution, pesticides and climate change.
one in three of the 6,000 recognized amphibian species
Earth for more than 360 million years, one in three of the 6,000 recognized
one in three of the 6,000 recognized
conserve species threatened by deadly fungus, habitat loss, pollution, pesticides and climate change.
122
122 species
third-party developers will have access to a feed of all content posted to news feeds--notes, photos, videos, links, "likes" and comments, and activity from other applications built on the social network's platform.
a feed of all content posted
the big application program interface (API)
Facebook
news feeds--notes, photos, videos, links, "likes" and comments, and activity from other applications built on the social network's platform.
the big application program interface (API)
third-party developers
feed of all content
the fact his wife may not be around when he comes back.
to serve my country
faces deportation
safe
while they're defending their country overseas.
Eduardo Gonzalez
Mildred
"Defending the country that's trying to kick my family out is a thought that always runs through my mind."
have 60 days to voluntarily leave the country or face deportation.
a policy to deal with such cases.
Mildred
U.S.
COMO, Mississippi
COMO, Mississippi
Mary Dowden
"white and black
two
weapons go hand in hand.
clean renewable energy and one more
Every dollar
Vast amounts of
hundreds of dollars,
$1 million
inspired to do this by the Lord.
tickets to the inaugural events
Catholic
Gisele Bundchen
Forbes.com
to the Super Bowl
from 78 to 98,
Carthage, North Carolina, nursing home
was in custody, and his condition was unknown
Three other people, including the police officer and a visitor to the nursing home,
78 to 98,
two U.S. contractors
four U.S. soldiers died
remains
Brent Burns
radio host
he affected their lives, and in some cases their careers.
Paul Harvey
Hargis
too angry, too negative and too sarcastic.
she and her husband
Michelle Obama
Michelle Obama
her family and humble upbringing on Chicago's South Side, aides said.
Michelle Obama
details about her family and humble upbringing on Chicago's South Side,
was rough.
two Russian cosmonauts and the first Malaysian astronaut.
Russia
is not the
northern Kazakhstan
car
the white SUV with its hood blown up and its front end extensively damaged.
the white SUV with its hood blown up and its front end extensively damaged.
SUV
a bomb,
pirates
Richard Phillips,
a U.S.-flagged
The Liberty Sun,
that all the occupants on the Beechcraft 1900 plane died.
Goma
Kinsasha to the eastern
not immediately
is a kaleidoscope of real people,
more textured
direct education and training programs.
two Russian cosmonauts and the first Malaysian astronaut.
northern Kazakhstan
landed in northern Kazakhstan on Saturday, 260 miles (418 kilometers) off its mark,
two Russian cosmonauts and the first Malaysian astronaut.
space ship
unharmed.
South Korean bioengineer Yi So-yeon, American astronaut Peggy Whitson
Yi So-yeon,
Ayman al-Zawahiri
tribal areas
Ayman al-Zawahiri
Ayman al-Zawahiri
reforms he would pursue
more oversight in Washington.
government's proposed rescue plan.
$700 billion bailout
to shepherd the government's proposed $700 billion bailout plan.
a government bailout
"We cannot give a blank check to Washington with no oversight and accountability,
McCain
$700 billion bailout
war crimes during its military offensive in Gaza last winter.
war crimes
accused Israel of committing "actions amounting to war crimes, possibly crimes against humanity" during its military incursion into Gaza from December 27 to January 18.
to "punish" Israel
U.N.
war crimes
Cuban-American
Cuban.
Armando Christian Perez,
learns from setbacks:
Armando Christian Perez,
in the Top 10 on the mainstream Billboard chart.
Obama online portals, the
Office of Management and Budget
show taxpayers where their stimulus-package dollars are being spent.
"Better transparency makes evaluation much easier."
fix almost anything that can fit in the front door,
fancy purse
chairs
trash heading for the landfill.
"I love the variety of projects,"
will fix almost anything
Caucus-goers
The central
Iowa's most
where the caucus-goers live, where they meet and the weather.
home to the most
30-year
feared that it would have been overwhelmed in the event of a Soviet
Greenpeace
is not properly recycled.
e-waste trading.
Toxins from dumped electronics
television station
he dumped Holloway's body "in a swamp on the north end of the island."
advise Hillary Clinton's presidential
Mark Penn
chief strategist of the Clinton campaign,"
not know of any
awareness regarding "terrorist interest"
"terrorist interest"
The Department of Homeland Security and FBI
are also attractive targets for
awareness regarding "terrorist interest" in attacking sports and entertainment venues as well as luxury hotels.
Hanin Zoabi,
security
the third consecutive day without a drug slaying.
security is the
military,"
dispersants,
more toxic and less effective
remains the best option for subsea application,"
effective, less toxic alternative
a less toxic but equally effective chemical than its current product, Corexit 9500
Brat product "contains a small amount of a chemical that may degrade to a nonylphenol."
some parts of south Australia
southeastern state of Victoria
southeastern state of Victoria
more than 170 people
after a devastating brush fire ravaged the southeastern state of Victoria in February,
more than 170
104 F (40 C)
water crisis.
Daren Payne,
to require the Army Corps of Engineers to restrict water flows from the lake and other north
Georgia
help in easing regulations
help in easing regulations
wanted to find a better way to dispose of the mattresses
30
innovative
prison mattresses
recycle the mattresses
Sports Illustrated photographer
three World Cup events and the X Games, shooting White and his competitors in preparation
Robert Beck
of logging and fires and the smoke can make it very difficult to shoot."
Prince Charles
Royal Botanical Gardens at Kew in London, the Hotel de Ville, Paris, the Alexa Center, Berlin and the Mercy Corps Action Center, New York.
photographic
tropical deforestation.
British
United Kingdom and the Netherlands,
billions of dollars
"There is widespread frustration over the claim on ordinary citizens in Iceland to pay the price for the irresponsible behavior of reckless bankers,"
The Ministry of Health
United States.
France.
silicone breast implant
Vice President
to make more memos public.
"enhanced interrogations" of suspected al Qaeda members.
submitted a request to the National Archives calling for the release of other documents.
Democrats between those
Republicans
the United States
Honduras.
a list of lawmakers
$1.8 million
members of the House and Senate who use the earmarking process to funnel money to projects on their home turf.
Citizens Against Government Waste
genocide
crimes against humanity, including murder, extermination, forcible transfer, torture and rape.
western Sudan's Darfur region.
President Omar al-Bashir
18 other women
August 4.
18
problems attracting crowds to the home matches.
to cut costs,
Mano Menezes has been entrusted to lead Brazil into the next World Cup
Dunga.
No one has claimed responsibility
authorities have arrested 13 people in connection with blasts
Istanbul
"work of the bloody separatist group," but did not identify a group by name.
bombing
Czech Republic
A passenger train
Bangkok,
Bangkok,
more than 113,000
113,000 people
Thailand's Prime Minister Yingluck Shinawatra
eight or nine young
eight or nine
Internet contest
contracts
the women said they signed contracts requiring them to pay fines of more then $30,000 if they left the
Barbara West
to ask those questions and get those answers,
were Marxist.
she was doing her job as a reporter
don't believe I
no place in the
Patrick Vieira,
(Rennes),
Toulouse
Andre-Pierre Gignac
17
Zainab's father died when she was just a toddler, leaving her mother and three siblings to fend for themselves in a country with often-unfavorable conditions for a single mother. All four children dropped out of school at a young age so they could work as laborers to provide for their family,
"Stuff White People Like"
more to discuss
people
flow charts on "How to Name a White Child" and "White Career Trajectories" as well as a test of the reader's "whiteness."
"The goal was to literally make Miles and a few of my friends laugh, and it just took off."
It's playing off white stereotypes, but it's not stereotypes in a demeaning way.
Mohammad Omar Aly Hassan
North Carolina
Pakistan and Afghanistan,
Mohammad Omar Aly Hassan are two of the seven men charged.
caused a toxic cloud to form above the site.
toxic chemical spill
spill caused a toxic cloud to form above the site.
highly corrosive hydrochloric acid
about 3,500 homes and businesses
above the site.
Sam Mendes
On July 7,
pop singer will be interred in a private ceremony Thursday evening at Forest Lawn Memorial Park in Glendale,
Thursday
The cost of the burial is a secret
the world of wildlife
Animals in zoos, aquariums and museums
a vital connection to the world of wildlife
bankruptcy of the solar energy company Solyndra linked the
"American taxpayers are already on the hook for the half-billion-dollar Solyndra bust --
the U.S. Department of Energy's Loan
live dove
truly magical and revolutionary product"
national historic landmark,
Playing ball
torpedo bomber closing in on him
torpedo bomber closing in on him
machinist in the Navy during World War II.
U.S. Navy
southern Sumatra
8:52 a.m. local time
Aid
the death toll would climb into the thousands.
earthquake
$80,000
2008)
Chiropractors
human papillomavirus,"
that it's painful, and I think some dizziness has been reported."
Disease Control
a far-reaching location-based services
far-reaching location-based services
keeping the glass on the back of your iDevice from breaking in the event of a fall.
Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez
of assisting leftist rebels in the Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia, or FARC, with narcotics trafficking.
Venezuelan
Venezuelan
Cheaptickets.com.
Virginia Pozo
tries to get a refund on the fare difference,
that racism led to
Pennsylvania's death row,
murder of officer Daniel Faulkner, 25, in Philadelphia.
Mumia Abu-Jamal
for the December 9, 1981, murder of
Mumia Abu-Jamal
outside the Palace Barracks in the Belfast neighborhood of Holywood
British army base in Northern Ireland
a pregnant woman and two other people
drive-by shootings
warning to U.S. citizens regarding travel to Mexico.
Los Aztecas,
four
Alabama,
trucker Bruce Mendenhall implicated himself as a serial killer.
six
appeared to be blood inside the cab of his rig,
headed out to sea,
22
cardiomyopathy
a new donated heart
many teenagers do during the summer holidays: Work at a summer job.
1994
Teenager
16-year-old with a shy laugh and a love of animals.
cardiomyopathy
F1's
Formula One
four
Michael Schumacher
between 160,000 and 200,000 troops.
recommended expanding the Afghan army to between 160,000 and 200,000 troops.
establish a larger military headquarters capable of executing "the necessary planning and coordination for a nationwide counterinsurgency campaign."
GOP
you are losing.
new gadgetry and meet NASA specifications.
help small aerospace companies to get off the ground,"
a not-for-profit that helps aerospace companies test space technology.
aerospace companies test space technology.
help small aerospace companies
recreates the unique conditions of a journey into space
to help small aerospace companies to get off the ground,"
Obama
"He has to be very careful
"It is with profound sorrow that the Yemeni government reports finding three bodies," according to a statement from Mohammed Albasha, a spokesman for
the group was apparently seized by Houthi rebels, Shiite militants who have been fighting the government for years,
drug cartels
valley of Shiao Lin.
more than 120
more than 120
immigrants
Discovery,
Mexican President Felipe Calderon
LPGA Tour's Wegmans
No. 1 Tiger's half-brother, Earl Jnr.
Ali Hassan al-Majeed
death
15 years in custody for crimes against humanity,
a cousin of
about 6 percent of all
six
a device that would reduce cell phone usage in cars.
talking on a hands-free cell phone while driving is just as dangerous as a handheld one.
nearly 300
200 guests and 100 staff members
24 hours
200 guests
200 guests
the SARS epidemic in 2004 that killed nearly 300 people
three years ago.
Leslie Adams,
an old boyfriend
Billy Joe Cook,
civil ceremony
her husband, actor Ashton Kutcher,
at the actor's home in the islands in the West Indies
A small, private ceremony
Willis' daughters, Rumer, 20; Scout, 17; and Tallulah Belle, 14. Their mother and Willis' first wife, actress Demi Moore and her husband, actor Ashton Kutcher,
Ashton Kutcher,
protests and rallies by the Tea Party
Thursday.
to get their wedding license
civil ceremony
Alex Freyre and Jose Maria di Bello
filed an injunction to stop the union until the issue can be reviewed further.
a huge mistake
he wants is respect.
United States
has made very clear the leadership of the United States, his concern
claims of a successful rocket launch
leadership is living in a parallel universe of acting as if the launch was a success, when tracking and everything has shown that in fact, it is a failure.
pilots
about 1,000
against German-based Lufthansa,
Zimbabwe's
more than a decade
sanctions
sanctions
$1,000
Zimbabwe
undisclosed residence
on an area of the Whitewater River,
disappeared
He said his department will also search on an area of the Whitewater River, in southern Kansas, on Saturday near where Adam Herrman was last seen.
feared authorities would take Adam and his siblings away because of the spanking.
she spanked him with a belt.
Adam
Whitewater River,
Adam Herrman
Lasantha Wickrematunga.
more than 65,000
January 8
Lasantha Wickrematunga,
The 25-year-old
more than 65,000
Czechoslovakia
Tuesday.
Michael Strank,
helped launch
backpack
March 27.
James McLaughlin,
the Church of Scientology.
Way to Happiness" as a how-to supplement to his sermons.
critics
Christian congregations,
70- to 80-percent
cult.
their ultimate goal
borrowing from Scientology
little more than cult-like mind control.
Christian congregations,
critics
Pentecostal Scientologist,
Scientologists to achieve their ultimate goal
at about 9:30 a.m. by a utility meter reader who alerted authorities,
the remains of a small child
Anthony home,
reduce their energy use a little,
solar power
July,
With my art thing, it's completely self-indulgent.
July.
painting and drawing
greatest hits collection
a contestant so unique that you can't wait
Adam Lambert
Kara DioGuardi, to the longtime triumvirate of Simon Cowell, Randy Jackson and Paula Abdul, which in the end added nothing but time. Producers also added a "judges' save," which became a throwaway.
Adam Lambert
more semifinalists
takes a look at the world of policymakers and screen actors
the world of policymakers and screen actors
Levinson takes a look at the world of policymakers and screen actors and ends up voicing his own ideas in the process.
John F. Kennedy was probably the first television politician.
I don't think that we can tell the difference between the celebrity and the
world of policymakers
Best Student
to dance a solo at the opening ceremony of the 2008 Beijing Olympics.
classical Chinese
"Silk Road,"
allows the presence of American troops in Iraq for three more years.
approved the U.S.-Iraq security agreement
the U.S.-Iraq security agreement
the agreement to be ratified by the Iraqi government,
council's ratification of
the council's ratification of the measures.
sky-dived
George H.W. Bush
former president George H.W. Bush
sky-dives
his 85th birthday.
former president George H.W. Bush
"You can't resolve it with the distribution of condoms,"
condoms
the use of condoms and other forms of birth control
sailing
WSSRC had received about 50 formal applications for speed attempts
passed away.
new seats were not in shouting distance of the visiting team,
losing bid for Montgomery County Executive.
counseling.
Buckingham Palace
Rollen Stewart
Chicago Bulls
Bobby Murcer's
a hoops junkie. During
And he's now serving three life sentences for holding a maid hostage at a Los Angeles Hyatt, also in 1992.
he's now serving three life sentences for holding a maid hostage
serving three life sentences
Gillian Gibbons,
Gillian Gibbons
insulting religion
insulting religion
a British teacher guilty of insulting religion and sentenced
A Sudanese court
one of her attorneys
journalists and British officials
journalists
insulting religion
kept journalists
adolescents,
Kawasaki disease,
genetics, stroke, brain tumor, lack of oxygen, low blood sugar, drugs, even certain medications,"
inflammatory disorder of the artery walls that most commonly occurs in young children.
and Kelly Preston's two children.
convince both the education and private sectors that existing education systems need reinvigoration.
equal rights for men and women
world's most likeable and photogenic leaders,
a platform for entertaining, non-hostile debate.
dedication to bringing about change.
Mayweather Jr
Floyd Mayweather Jr,
Mayweather Jr will have to pay Juan Manuel Marquez a reported $600,000
north-northwest motion and approach the southwestern tip of Baja California
4 storm,
Hurricane Jimena
Shirley Robertson
New Zealand's Russell
U.S. billionaire Larry Ellison,
Shirley Robertson
surviving remnants of a NASA satellite
a sighting from airplanes, ships or island inhabitants in the region.
atmosphere
300 to 800 miles northeast of the re-entry point.
a tremendous opportunity
$5,000 monthly stipend for
Khartoum's Friendship Hall,
United Nations General Assembly in New York,
Sudan and Iran were subject to "pressures" from the West because of their political positions.
as a
by 15 to 20 percent
80 percent
I was born in Nizhny Novgorod
building playgrounds.
supermodel
Moscow
Russia
my foundation in 2005, after the Beslan tragedy [the 2004 school siege in which at least 339 hostages were killed]. I was in Moscow at the
playground
smart cards
more than $3 million annually
Thursday afternoon
Scofflaws could hack the smart cards
Jake Appelbaum
Chene Thompson
My son and I are
Blogger Michelle Malkin,
the circumstances of Hughes' appearance
several infants who were separated from their mothers or orphaned
to breast-feed several infants who were separated from their mothers or orphaned by China's devastating earthquake.
Jiang Xiaojuan, 29,
"In a quake zone, many people do things for others.
shoes
3-1-1
for liquids and gels:
second opinion.
shock jock
learning the results of a biopsy
Don Imus
heavy snowstorm
646 meters or 2,120 feet,
of jokes,
Jackson barreled through the song "They Don't Care About Us."
He popped his signature moonwalk and dance spins
Staples Center arena in Los Angeles,
the Staples Center arena in Los Angeles, California,
divorced in 1999. Soon after,
a long-running custody dispute between James and Lia Boldt,
Judaism
have the circumcision procedure.
12-year-old boy
have the circumcision procedure.
whether M agrees or objects to the circumcision."
$10,000 each,
$10,000 each,
50 million Americans
Flash floods killed at least 20 people in the southern French region of Var,
Wednesday evening,
an Afghan grain dealer has reportedly been detained, a senior U.S. State Department
tortured a business associate
an Afghan grain dealer
emerged last month in a federal civil lawsuit filed in Houston, Texas, by Bassam Nabulsi, a U.S. citizen, against the sheikh.
a civil nuclear
Pushpa Kamal Dahal, also known as Prachanda,
The assembly
the Maoist candidate.
Nepal
parties in the assembly
sending 1,200 National Guard troops to the U.S.-Mexico border
Arizona Gov. Jan Brewer
the National Guard reallocate reconnaissance helicopters and robotic surveillance craft
100
unexploded bomblets lie scattered across a target area, often exploding only when handled or disturbed
United States, Russia, China
retailer J.Crew.
Internet shopping,
ivory
American designers
Medicare patients.
$4 billion
about $4 billion
two types of identities: those of
the recession
charter fees
charter
the impact of the recession.
a chance to provide our 'Expeditions to the Extraordinary' in the San Juan Islands at a price any luxury traveler can afford
$100,000 a week
Sonia Sotomayor
Sonia Sotomayor
Wednesday,
hoarding of goods.
of raw materials like paper and leather, and an increase in wartime piety,
forbade the hoarding of goods.
period of "irrational exuberance."
the rulers of the newly-formed Austro-Hungarian Empire encouraged their bankers to be more free with their lending standards.
1860s,
1943,
over-speculation in building, massive default on borrowed funds, and economic collapse throughout Central Europe.
Booth Memorial Hospital
lost his balance
the death as an accident.
Shea Stadium
Police
In Mobile, heavy
a blizzard
parts of the Plains
southwest Kansas.
Mobile, Alabama,
decapitated
The suspect
"There was a bloodcurdling scream. I was just reading my book, and all of a sudden, I heard it,"
a trucker
a trucker
suspect
Judge Stephanie Sautner
Chief Coroner Craig Harvey
10 a.m. ET Thursday
a commercial satellite
sometime between April 4 and April 8.
satellite imagery,
"Top Gun"
retired Navy F-14 fighter pilot
"Top Gun"
"And the future is ahead of me and that's very interesting because I'm really not sure exactly
Sony.
President Bush
Judge Mukasey
New York,
could not categorically say whether the technique amounts to
Michael Mukasey's
resigned in September.
a form of
Michael Mukasey's
questions that arose from his views on the terror interrogation technique known as waterboarding and the president's power
a technique that involves restraining a suspect and pouring water on him to produce the sensation of drowning.
Pakistan military
The Taliban
a busy market in Peshawar
Ten attacks have been carried out so far this month, resulting in nearly 400 deaths,
it's a retaliatory action to the seizing of Kotkai, a town in the South Waziristan district by Pakistani troops almost two weeks ago on October 17.
government workers involved in the flood relief effort.
the samples of cookie dough
Thirty-four people
of cookie dough his agency has tested do not contain the E. coli strain that sickened 74 people in 32 states.
describe challenges such as how to get the Saudis more involved in solving the Palestinian-Israeli conflict, how to get them more engaged against terrorism, how to address the Arab view that the United States always sides with Israel and how to build up moderate Palestinians to counter extremists.
nuclear deterrent,
nuclear deterrent,
documents released by the Nixon Presidential Library,
Nixon Presidential
the military wing of the Palestine Liberation
San Diego's Qualcomm Stadium,
FEMA ready,
the Katrina experience.
the fires aren't covering every square foot of the region,
freeing up federal funds for families affected by the wildfires in seven counties in Southern California.
significantly different challenges in the fire zone than they did on the Gulf Coast in 2005.
"I think there's no question that [there were] a couple of the lessons
wildfires
planning and preparation in advance for these kinds of challenges,
wiped out
were poor and had no means of transportation.
the Katrina experience.
planning and preparation in advance for these kinds of challenges,
wearing clothing deemed indecent by Sudanese authorities
40 lashes
40 lashes
wearing clothing deemed indecent
found her guilty but ordered instead that she pay a fine.
at the Pentagon,
Family members and friends of
planes crashed
classic movie stars like Marilyn Monroe and John Wayne as well as today's hottest fan favorites like the cast of the movie "Twilight."
various starlets
movie "Twilight"
various starlets including Eva Mendes, Jessica Alba and Salma Hayek.
New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani.
Sen. John Edwards of North Carolina has 14
42
51 percent to 45
51 percent to 45 percent.
49
Clinton was supported by 51 percent of Democratic voters and had a 30 point lead over Obama.
Sen. Hillary Clinton
New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani.
44 percent
GOP front-runner,
the top choice of 44 percent of the likely Democratic voters interviewed for the
51
44 percent
Nearly two hours after the fatality
Nearly two hours after the fatality occurred,
Amtrak
halted
a 14-year-old
President Bush
children's health insurance bill
expand the State Children's Health Insurance program
the State Children's Health Insurance program by up to 4 million children.
State Children's Health Insurance legislation
smoke inhalation or were trampled in a rush to get out
about 12:35 a.m.
fire
Bangkok's busiest commercial districts.
59
fireworks
Santika,
upscale nightclubs,
AC Milan
Kaka
the Kaka bid, and his possible departure,
third place
a host of banners
seventh minute goal
seventh minute goal
put food on the table,
New Jersey.
Palisades Park, New Jersey.
"All you get in this country is bitterness,
bitterness, sadness and loneliness,"
the money,
it's better to be paid by the day instead of the hour.
$90
save a little bit and go back
an antidote to cynicism.
some of the heavier (but also excellent) end-of-year releases.
is a little schmaltzy and sentimental.
"It has not been ruled anything at this time."
National Park Service
car driving over the edge,"
about 6 a.m. Monday,
"It has not been ruled anything at this time."
Li
their
small groups or individuals could carry out such attacks on U.S. soil.
"The prospect of young men, indoctrinated and radicalized within their own communities and induced to travel to Somalia to take up arms -- and to kill themselves and perhaps many others
recent terror attacks
the Mumbai attack could be replicated in the United States.
St. John's School for the Deaf closed in 1983,
Vatican officials,
Suzanne Malveaux
time of September 11
President Bush
Suzanne Malveaux
President Bush
"raw," "fascinating"
Defense of Marriage
a Justice Department motion filed last week in support of the Defense of Marriage
over a Justice Department motion filed last week in support of the Defense of Marriage Act
Carisa Cunningham,
California
octuplets
California
How Nadya Suleman ended up with eight is a mystery.
chief executive of The Hastings Center,
would-be parents
Marseille
100km per hour
ThÃ©bault told CNN he had a long-held dream of skippering a
Alain Thebault
the Slingshot, a water purifying device.
the Slingshot,
a portable, low energy machine that is designed to purify water in remote villages
remote villages
Palestinian militants
12 miles (19 km)
It was the first such attack into the city of Ashkelon since the two sides declared a cease-fire,
1,300 Palestinians
12 miles (19 km) north of Gaza.
McTear had hit her several times and threatened "to kill the both of y'all,"
thrown out of a moving car.
burglary with battery, felony battery, aggravated child abuse and kidnapping,
Jason Bird,
thrown out of a moving car.
"The Dark Knight"
keep a low profile
until at least next week.
Gen. Stanley McChrystal,
how and when U.S. troops would turn over responsibility to the Afghan government.
Cristiano Ronaldo
Manchester
Football Fan Zone
more than 40
Sullenberger
Lt. Gen. John Regni,
an Air Force veteran
"Sully"
free speech problems.
Wednesday
rejected an
The Supreme Court
underage users of the Web.
not because she writes well and easily, because she has amazing talent, because everything she does is golden.
the Pulitzer Prize in 2008.
that she would not be granted a visa.
recent events in the region and not alienate or put at risk the players and the many tennis fans of different nationalities
Israeli men's doubles team
Sony Ericsson WTA Tour
Organizers
Bluestonehenge
part of a funeral complex.
The new find, dubbed "Bluestonehenge" after the color of the 25 Welsh stones of which it was once
color of the 25 Welsh stones of which it was once
A stone circle discovered near Stonehenge
long-forgotten handgun
gunshot wound to the head
the injury of a child
found the men guilty in February of crimes that included murder, rape, sexual slavery and forced marriages stemming
February
of crimes that included murder, rape, sexual slavery and forced marriages
crimes that included murder, rape, sexual slavery and forced marriages
former guerrilla leaders
increased 6.2 years
appear to actually thrive on adversity,
During recessions, with less work to do, employees may work slower, sleep longer and spend more time with family and friends, he said. With less money, they may spend less on alcohol and tobacco.
population health tends to improve
Depression, 1930-1933,
from 1920 to 1940.
two
two
1944.
"Five of us for the United States
seven
Japan.
six
Chip Auman said his 18-year-old daughter
into the canal."
a canal
Two college campuses mourned
Auman's daughter
The six
out of a third-story window into a canal
University of South Carolina
18-year-old
seven college students died
Chip Auman
Six
survived the fire but was hospitalized
up to life in prison
claim Jeffs' medical condition influenced his state of mind when the statements were made.
"immorality" with a "sister" and a daughter more than 30 years ago.
Jeffs'
threw himself against the wall and banged his head on the wall.
sect leader Warren Jeffs
"immorality" with a "sister" and a daughter more than 30 years ago.
"immorality" with a "sister" and a daughter more than 30 years ago.
"I am not the prophet.
on separate occasions threw himself against the wall and banged his head on the wall.
September 25
November 20.
two counts of being an accomplice to rape.
threw himself against the wall and banged his head
being convicted on two counts of being an accomplice to rape.
claim Jeffs' medical condition influenced
November 20.
his head
followers to coerce a 14-year-old girl into marriage to her 19-year-old cousin.
sentenced November 20.
a frog croaking or a human burping
a frog croaking or a human burping when talking.
an entire Neanderthal sentence,
simulate an entire Neanderthal sentence,
they sounded
Michael Jackson,
Michael Jackson,
the entertainer
vitiligo.
1984,
mini-messages
Heffron:
John Heffron:
won the award for funniest comedy routine on XM Satellite Radio.
a winner of "Last Comic Standing."
A 20th person received a commutation of a
of presidents issuing pardons and commutations during the holiday season.
issuing pardons and commutations
earthquake.
half
A blast
killing at least 12 people
Islamic militants
148
Gangs of young men
About 120
Kenya
a church filled with Kenyans seeking refuge from the violence.
burned a church filled with Kenyans seeking refuge from the violence.
that the smell of burning animals was making him sick,
Valley Music and Arts Festival
2002.
July,
"I'm trying to determine whether it's efficient to have the ongoing investigation handled by my office or somebody else,"
Ramsey family
plans to take
Paul Dini
Batman and his most notorious nemesis, the Joker,
Scots
Scotland's
Italy
Chinese
American-Chinese
Mandarin-language
Jay Chou
Mandarin-language
86.
"Maude"
her roles as television's "Maude" and the sardonic Dorothy
her sons Matthew and Daniel and grandchildren Kyra and Violet,
October
Kansas City home.
positive "hit" for the scent of a body,
Lisa's parents
spotted a speedboat found to be carrying nearly a ton of cocaine
bust a speed boat smuggling $80 million worth of cocaine.
he spotted a speedboat found
worth a minimum of $80 million.
Moshe Katsav
from 2000 to 2007.
former President Moshe Katsav
a bad economy and the Internet generation.
bad economy and the Internet generation.
put up for sale
two
a bad economy
more than 200 editorial employees,
defeat poverty and racial injustice. He
Lyndon Johnson's sprawling legislative attempts
won't permit him to be another Lyndon Johnson."
Johnson
Great Society
during a training mission
training mission
Meanwhile, Zelaya remained holed up inside the Brazilian Embassy
inside the Brazilian Embassy
that Zelaya's removal was a constitutional
The announcement of the arrest warrants
was unable or unwilling to answer even the most basic questions."
was unable or unwilling to answer even the most basic questions."
Brett Beasley,
about 50
of 30 years,
federal Protect
30 years,
carrying a maximum prison sentence of 30 years,
with sexually exploiting Cambodian children
Jo-Wilfried Tsonga
seven,
in a local home
in a local home
aggravated murder, rape, felonious assault and kidnapping
will be the
Congress
between Johnson and Obama
Johnson
presidency resembles that of
resembles that of Lyndon B. Johnson.
so far the Obama presidency resembles that of Lyndon B. Johnson.
that of Lyndon B. Johnson.
pulmonary thromboembolism
takes full responsibility for her death and offers a "full apology."
Alan Aviles,
Kings County Hospital,
Esmin Green
their commitment to the U.S.-Pakistan bilateral relationship,
this regrettable incident was not a deliberate attack on Pakistan and reiterated the United States' strong commitment to a full investigation,"
not a deliberate attack on Pakistan
Fernando Torres
7.5 percent.
is about 7.5 percent.
7.5 percent.
China's
China
the United States
the most important is geological: oil.
he discerned "hopeful signs of a desire for freedom in the Middle East.
David Frum.
Iraq
"hopeful signs of a desire for freedom in the Middle East. Arab intellectuals have called on Arab governments to address the 'freedom gap' so their peoples can fully share in the progress of our times.
dramatic and inspiring example of freedom
Iraq
40 miles from George Town, Cayman Islands,
"There was quite a bit of shaking,"
Conlin, who covered sports throughout Pennsylvania for the newspaper, weighed in on the Penn State scandal
Thursday morning's
magnitude 6.4
and the mainly Christian south.
More than 200
Harare, Zimbabwe.
is being exaggerated by the West
cholera outbreak
that the president talk to "a joint Congressional committee made up of the leaders of the House and the Senate as well as the chairmen and ranking members of key committees."
that recommended a new
a new War Powers Act.
James Baker,
"ineffective, and it should be repealed and it should be replaced,"
James Baker
traced to Mugabe's land redistribution policies,
Two
Inflation
Inflation
Chinese child prodigy
Lang Lang
Jazz legend Hancock.
at the age of 3,
every major city in the world.
Hamish
struck the waters of eastern Australia
The Pacific Adventurer
Australia's Maritime Safety Authority in Brisbane,
hit a fan at a charity ball,
the possibility of another potentially damaging court case
with "common assault"
Amy Winehouse
29
Asia's
Boston Symphony
Spaniard
Carlos Moya
Federer
Gary Lamont Sumner
two surveillance tapes taken from the front and rear of the Billingses' home.
The crime was "a very well-planned and methodical operation," Morgan said.
Nine of the couple's children were home at the time of the incident,
Gary Lamont Sumner faces a murder charge for his alleged role in the deaths of Byrd and Melanie Billings on Thursday,
two surveillance tapes taken from the front and rear of the Billingses'
open even more doors
study at Hebrew University,
an election-year topic on the show and online.
an election-year topic on the show and online.
students and teachers.
students and teachers.
CNN Student News.
bong
will not face criminal
Richland County Sheriff Leon Lott
a bong
the University of South Carolina in Columbia.
News of the World
swimming champion Michael Phelps
Vice President Dick Cheney
anesthetized for a routine colonoscopy,
Vice President Dick Cheney
Vice President Dick Cheney will serve as acting president
colonoscopy,
a routine colonoscopy,
Vice President Dick Cheney will serve as acting president
no abnormalities were found,
no abnormalities
President Bush is anesthetized for a routine
woman and three children
three
gray Pontiac,
a car
a loss of confidence in his ability to command,
submarine USS Hartford and amphibious
Fifteen sailors aboard the Hartford were slightly hurt in the incident, and both vessels suffered extensive damage,
to administrative duty in Bahrain.
10 people survived
Hokkaido's
Ten
32-year-old
5.7
Mexico City,
thousands of people perished in a massive
Mexico City
magnitude 5.7,
Brandon Boyd
July,
With my art thing, it's completely self-indulgent.
formed in the Atlantic,
most of the southern half of Baja California
a new tropical storm was forming in the
Thursday morning,
135 mph,
Cabo San Lucas
a new tropical storm
Banafsha, an 11-year-old girl
Kabul,
Banafsha, an 11-year-old girl
60,000 street kids
Banafsha, an 11-year-old girl
about their mortgage problems.
foreclosure
the million people
Ed McMahon,
Ed McMahon
Economy problems.
embassy staff
clean up corruption within his government,
inauguration.
Karzai's inauguration
U.S. Ambassador Karl Eikenberry and Gen. Stanley McChrystal, the commander of U.S. forces in Afghanistan.
Afghanistan.
at a French restaurant
May 3
it was not the missing child.
4-year-old Madeleine McCann
Nico Rosberg
season finale at the new Yas Marina circuit,
Lee Ielpi
the president's strategy,
nothing ever found of her,"
"I support President Obama's decision to send more troops to Afghanistan and the war against al Qaeda and the Taliban,"
about the renewed commitment to the Afghanistan war
the strategic mistakes of Vietnam.
ranked 22nd
of Gdansk,
Poland's export
has grown every year
free market reforms.
the authorities opened part of the Underground City
Nick Frisch
a vast network of tunnels built beneath Beijing's city
"We've seen Washington launch policy after policy, yet our dependence on foreign oil has only grown, even as the world's resources are disappearing,"
$150 billion over 10 years
Carol Browner
Grossman Burn Center
support for
all medical costs
"Our child is everything."
Sherman Oaks, California,
about how he tried
Sherman Oaks, California,
The foundation says it will cover all medical costs
provides support
"I didn't think the reaction would be this big."
thank everyone who has come forward,"
"I didn't think the reaction would be this big."
Sherman Oaks, California,
birthday
couldn't stop smiling.
5-year-old
potential for recovery from his severe burns.
leaders
"Denied citizenship, subject to tight restrictions on movement, employment and religious freedoms, this Muslim minority have been the target of abuses by the Burmese military
boat people
stripping
immediately
outside Hyattsville, Maryland
100 mph,
Sunday,
life in prison.
a man
The joint virtual lifetime electronic record
virtual lifetime electronic record
help ensure a streamlined transition of health care
duty station to a local VA health center. Their electronic records will transition along with them and remain with them forever,"
veterans to start receiving their benefits more quickly,
the Emancipation of the Niger Delta (MEND),
Shell
two
Royal Dutch Shell
after an attack on its major pipeline.
Rohingya refugees
agreement
during the 14th ASEAN summit, a meeting of Southeast Asian nations held in Thailand over the weekend,
"They will have to be sent back,
"things like forced relocation, forced conscription, forced labor
over the weekend,
Zacarias Moussaoui.
Zacarias Moussaoui.
whether they are dealing with breast, lung or countless other types of cancer.
doctors
where in the body the cancer has originated and
for more research in the hope that it will lead to better treatment.
John Symons
alleged members of the Gambino crime family
murder, racketeering,
alleged members of the Gambino crime family
The incident
polygamous sect leader Warren Jeffs
sexual assault
Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints,
Jason,
new, purple-spotted sea anemone.
a trench
three new species (the anemone, the sea squirt, and a new kind of barnacle)
Jason, a remotely-operated submersible the size of a small car.
if changes in the ocean followed or proceeded changes in the atmosphere.
more than four kilometers
raw prepackaged cookie dough,"
Buitoni pasta and sauce
Danville, Virginia,
70
cookie-dough products
Bob Greene
confirm her quickly as secretary of state.
the 67th U.S. secretary of state
the former first lady's late father
Sen. John McCain,
U.S. secretary of state
Port-au-Prince.
"The government gave us 1500 gallons of fuel to go back to Jeremie to evacuate more people,"
luggage, and children,
Greenhouse gas emissions pose a threat to public health and welfare,
Copenhagen Climate Conference
radio
more than 50
50
Kabakumba Masiko.
Gwyneth Paltrow, George Michael and Elle MacPherson.
the phones of thousands of public figures including Gwyneth Paltrow, George Michael and Elle MacPherson.
Metropolitan
phones
at least another five cycles of chemotherapy
court
medical
Danny Hauser
Georgia
"Wide Open,"
I'm nervous. If you have an album that you're kind of on the fence
a cowboy hat in L.A. makes you stand out a little bit.
Male singers
Jason Aldean
Mitt Romney or Tim Pawlenty.
influence a campaign.
Palin
largely unknown,
abused her power in firing the state's public safety commissioner,
the GOP ticket
Palin's selection as John McCain's
a kidney he gave her.
get my children back.
the number of poor and dying patients across the country who are yearning
people donating kidneys?
for me to get my children back.
2001.
back in 2001.
12.
"Well it didn't feel like raping, I was feeling very bad but as I was ordered, I had to do something.
as young as five
He told me he was conscripted by force in to the Sudanese army
Adam
in Darfur.
Darfur.
a woman
a woman wearing an abaya,
was a woman
during a Shia pilgrimage
at least 40
Rev. Martin Luther King Jr.
Alex Castellanos
No.
means more investment is going into those crops, meaning less land and less investment going in for food crops, causing a massive conflict and resulting in rising prices, which is having a huge negative impact, especially on developing countries,"
violence in some developing countries, and biofuels are bearing at least part of the blame.
battling global warming by promoting biofuels
in the team locker
Bartelstein said, "I'm not going to get into details."
Gilbert Arenas
December 21
Arenas and Javaris Crittenton both brandished firearms in the team's locker room.
Arenas and Javaris Crittenton
Obama
Ann Cooper
Ann Nixon Cooper
a Girls Club for African-American youth
16
a Taliban militant advance in the country's North West Frontier Province.
at least 16
week-long
at least 16 militants
100
they have killed at least 16 militants
Taliban militant
"breathing problem"
on-air anxiety
Tottenham
win over QPR
The United States
dissuade the North Koreans from going forward,
North Korean
U.N. Security Council
missile
sex scandal
telling them to continue to work for the people of Detroit as hard as they did to get him out of office.
agreed to resign from office,
defiant Mayor
Mayor Kwame Kilpatrick
get a smarter guy in the White
is a great leader.
need for increased fitness across the country is striking.
FitWit Foundation
FitWit Foundation
Shiite rebel group
a new offensive
remove the family planning provision
remove the family planning provision
Republican
11 Democrats also voted against the $819 billion package.
tax cuts.
Obama's
soldiers are entitled to settle in Britain,
Have three years' continuous residence in Britain, before or after service;
Nepalese soldiers
in 1815.
soldiers
for the lost city of Atlantis.
gizmos: Helicopters, fishing boats, luxury speed boats
Helicopters, fishing boats, luxury speed boats and state-of-the-art navigation gear
glacial fjords.
They also come with an impressive array of gadgets and gizmos: Helicopters, fishing boats, luxury speed boats and state-of-the-art navigation gear are all among the play things likely to be aboard.
as an actor and a respected rugby broadcaster.
aged 56,
center
Gravell became president of Llanelli RFC and the Llanelli Scarlets.
Spanish Mediterranean island
president of Llanelli RFC and the Llanelli Scarlets.
president of Llanelli RFC and the Llanelli Scarlets.
president of Llanelli RFC and the Llanelli Scarlets.
became president of Llanelli RFC
made 23 appearances for
president of Llanelli RFC
had been on holiday with his family in the Spanish Mediterranean island of Mallorca at the time.
Ahmadinejad
Mir Hossein Moussavi plans to form a new political party
Ahmadinejad
form a new political party
Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
Minister of Security Oscar Arturo Alvarez Guerrero
strengthen our investigations aimed at clearing up these events,
the elephants are healthy, well cared for and they're thriving in Ringling Bros. care." Besides
a federal
Ringling Bros. and Barnum & Bailey elephants
the nation's most famous circus,
54 Asian elephants,
the 1973 Endangered Species Act.
the Dominican
Jose Manuel Zelaya will be granted safe passage
a diplomatic impasse that kept him trapped in Honduras,
Johanna Sigurdardottir
Sigurardottir's Social Democratic Alliance Party and potential coalition partners.
stock market.
the world's first openly gay prime
David Cameron and Germany's Angela Merkel
Britain
Original Mother's
African-American
200 of their white classmates.
not immediately returned.
personnel cited dress code violations -- specifically baggy jeans -- in barring the African-American students,
C-12 plane
three American contractors
mountains of Nuristan province
died in a plane crash
third straight
32
at least 32 people killed
Shiite holy
The Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia,
it would be interested in addressing certain issues at a "hypothetical negotiating table."
more than 25 million
blue
are at increased risk for heart attacks and strokes,"
oral medication for erectile dysfunction
increased risk for heart attacks and strokes,"
freaky for "Juno" boosters, and could have used more straight-ahead scares and sustained suspense
horror comedy
responses to Dr. King
explaining what life is like in the U.S. today and to what extent his dream has been realized.
the reality of present-day life.
Dr. Martin Luther King Jr.'s
more than 25,000
Zimbabwe,
Betty Makoni
helped rescue 35,000 girls from abuse
Girl Child Network
35,000
Abdullah Hassan Talea' Asiri,
in Yemen,
Saudi Prince Mohammed bin Naif,
Saudi Prince Mohammed bin Naif, the assistant minister of Interior for Security Affairs.
work is inspired by the distinctive shapes, colors, textures and calligraphy of the country.
Designer Azza Fahmy
Azza Fahmy
Fahmy's business,
as an art in itself, "the movement of the lines and the balance of the lines and the meaning in the text."
Egyptian capital,
National Naval Medical Center in Bethesda, Maryland,
no abnormalities
Vice
Doctors removed five small
sensitive test for colon cancer,
Bush is in good humor,
Bush
He spoke to first lady Laura
routine microscopic examination,
removed five small polyps from
Bush reclaimed presidential
Bush
a repeat procedure in about five years.
five
Chevy Chase/B.F.Saul
powerful Service Employees International Union
targeting the banks for unionizing.
$700 billion
fake,
her breasts were fake,
violating her privacy by confirming to reporters that her breasts were fake,
her breasts were fake,
breast augmentation
Jim Bouton
Yankee Stadium
Pete Sheehy
tear it down.
Jim Bouton
Yankee Stadium
Former Yankee pitcher
adopting a 14-month-old boy.
Yuriy Pavlenko, Ukraine's Family, Youth and Sports Minister.
David Furnish
Yuriy Pavlenko, Ukraine's Family, Youth and Sports Minister.
the caliber of people we were in line with
John Terry
protective mask
Center-back
John Terry
Sunday.
Saturday's 0-0 draw with Fulham,
broken cheekbone
John Terry
CareerBuilder.com,
best-kept-secret careers,
"Best Careers"
Accent-reduction specialist
A Utah man
Salt Lake
the sheriff's office of Utah County.
in a crevice of a popular cave tourist attraction
about 18 inches
Utah
10 inches high.
David Crosby, Jackson Brown, Devo, Third Eye Blind, Yo La Tengo, Lloyd Cole, The Guthrie Family and filmmaker/activist Michael Moore
Occupy Wall Street General Fund.
the Occupy Wall Street General Fund.
the Occupy Wall Street movement
David Crosby, Jackson Brown, Devo, Third Eye Blind, Yo La Tengo, Lloyd Cole, The Guthrie Family
the Occupy Wall Street movement
the Occupy movement,
Chelsea
two points clear at the top of the table
21-year-old Idaho man charged with trying to assassinate President Obama
trying to assassinate President Obama
Colin Powell and Condoleezza Rice
"direct opposite of honorable black Americans"
Colin Powell and Condoleezza Rice
Ayman al-Zawahiri
al Qaeda
al Qaeda message
East Meadow, Long Island, in
they do not share the
DNA test shows he's Steven Damman,
results reveal that a Michigan man is not a Long Island, New York, boy who went missing
Benigno "Noynoy" Aquino III
Corazon Aquino.
Saudi court
pardoned a rape victim
King Abdullah
Abdullah Bin Mohammad al-Sheikh
King Abdullah
A Saudi court
premiere of "The Day the Earth Stood Still."
"The Day the Earth Stood Still,"
"It's the bane of my existence. Goofy hair,"
deportees would have been unsafe due to political conflict or natural disasters,
temporary protected status, which will allow her to work legally,
unauthorized Haitian immigrants
temporary protected status
President Jalal Talabani's political party
Jalal Talabani
"It's about corruption," Ala Talabani said of the
Patriotic Union of Kurdistan
the delicate balance of power in Iraqi Kurdistan,
five
Kurdish
would heat the water faster and accelerate formation of hurricanes,
make its way up and bring the
Haiti,
the results are anyone's guess,
be completely contaminating the oil inland."
roughly 1.5 million displaced people are at risk.
be completely contaminating the
"cuspers" are staking out a separate identity from the baby boomer generation.
Cuspers, the age cohort that have been living in the shadow of the boomers,
baby boom
cusper
"The Greediest Generation."
student Annie Le was found dead
that person is a "suspect."
using the loose term "person of interest" can tarnish the person's reputation, mislead the public, and possibly hurt the investigation.
"They are suspicious of that person, but the police don't have the evidence they need."
"The 'person of interest' tells you nothing," says Cynthia Hujar Orr, president of the National Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers. "They are suspicious of that person, but the police don't have the evidence they need."
tarnish the person's reputation, mislead the public, and possibly hurt the
believe the phrase became widely used after the 1996 Olympic Park bombings in Atlanta, Georgia,
The Dutch financial giant
7,000
$1.4 billion.
up to 7,000
insurance group ING is cutting up to 7,000
Hezbollah
the United States, the government of Iraq and the international community
Sunni and Shiite militias in Iraq
Sunni and Shiite militias
United States, the government of Iraq
Juve,
Rafael Benitez
Ciro Ferrara
sixth
Mount Redoubt volcano
as 45,000
1:30 p.m. (5:30 p.m. ET),
The eruptions are the latest in a series that began March 22.
"best job in the world"
Ben Southall
Ben Southall
feed the fish, clean the pool and send weekly blog and video reports
of attempted first-degree murder,
shooting deaths of four
Carla Merhige and Lisa Knight;
sisters,
Hussein,
HIV-tainted blood
mailing a letter with
mental evaluation of Hussein,
Angelina Jolie
Angelina Jolie
Tiger Woods
Oprah Winfrey
executive assistant
Girl's Guide to Homelessness,
an executive assistant
Brianna Karp's
camped in a Los Angeles-area Walmart parking lot.
"She's a voice we haven't heard, and I'm excited for her future."
Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles, California,
a stroke.
a stroke.
a dancer and actress
a stroke.
people from flooding caused by the remnants of Tropical Storm Ida.
at least 155,000 customers
155,000 customers were without power in the state
flood
areas of coastal Pennsylvania, Delaware and New Jersey.
At least 160 National Guard
thousands
a small pleasure cruiser.
rescued 26 people from a capsized boat off the
the U.S. Coast Guard
a small pleasure cruiser.
26
Pastor
John and Barack
Rick Warren
318
325
initially believed
275
airline
and American Airlines
reformer?
Moussavi
Hossein Moussavi,
Moussavi
political
life support
Guy Heinze Jr.,
eight people killed
Eluana Englaro
Eluana Englaro
northeastern Italian city of Udine
17 years
feeding tube removed,
Islamabad was having its first ever fashion week,
Islamabad
Islamabad
William Fairman
Islamabad
fashion week
immediately
protested Al-Razine's statement,
900 riyals [$240]
were shocked to learn the remarks came from a
abuse.
a fire at her
her husband had knocked her down, held a loaded gun to her head and then threatened to commit suicide,
Thursday
"still trying to absorb the impact of this week's stunning events."
No one was inside the apartment at the time of the fire, police said.
Lt. Holley Wimunc.
for frisking a former president of the country as he was to travel to New York
Former president APJ Abdul Kalam was exempt from body checks,
American air-safety
filed a police complaint against Continental Airlines
Chesley Sullenberger,
Chesley Sullenberger
Arthur still managed to get elected on James Garfield's 1880 ticket. After Garfield passed away 199 days into his presidency, Arthur didn't hesitate to sign the Pendleton Civil Service Reform Act.
labor camp
February 26.
9/11,
extremist religious organization,
Aziza Dadahanov
Republic of Uzbekistan,
Amir Zaki
failed to report back to his club following international duty.
Inter Milan striker
unprofessional.
Wigan manager Steve Bruce
has mended relations with his club manager.
as CoRoT-7b, was detected early last year,
about five times
the CoRoT satellite,
not quite twice as large in circumference),
Dante's Inferno,
67 percent
Dwayne Johnson
$14.7 million.
automatically refreshes a Web page every few seconds,
like Facebook and Twitter,
economic and security issues,
doubling American exports by 2014
Celebrity photographer Annie Leibovitz
provides financial and consulting services to artists, galleries and
photographed a nude and extremely pregnant Demi Moore for the cover of Vanity Fair.
nude and extremely pregnant
her entire portfolio
Army Gen. Ray Odierno
Army Gen. Ray Odierno
fomenting violence inside Iraq.
damaged many of the country's buildings, including some at Toussaint Louverture International Airport, in the capital.
on Friday,
American employees and folks from a construction firm
Haiti, on Friday, making it the first airline to do so.
day.
students in most schools in the nation's capital
Muzak
pop, string-filled arrangements of rock songs in your elevator,
$105 million
Muzak CEO Stephen Villa
likely melted much of a glacier that once covered the Great Lakes region,
species,
The heat generated by the extraterrestrial impact
the cold waves of glacial runoff into the Gulf of Mexico shifted Atlantic Ocean currents,
North American
Clovis culture
major decline in population
the most this last attempt would be would be either one baby or twins,
death threats
anti-U.S. billboards and 138 huge black
scrolling
across 25 windows of the U.S. interests section,
Havana's main seaside strip with anti-Cuba slogans
erecting anti-U.S. billboards and 138 huge black flags to commemorate victims of so-called U.S. aggression.
details of his new surroundings
Afghanistan.
died in Monday's attack on a luxury hotel in Afghanistan.
canceled
only localized in this one area
localized in this one area
post-concussion syndrome,
sixth
protect its players.
multiple head injuries,
concussion,
The Sports Legacy Institute.
played college football at Harvard
U.S. diplomatic courtship with Iraq in the 1980s
U.S.-Iraqi Relations:
U.S.-Iraqi Relations:
U.S.-Iraqi Relations:
in 1996
John McCain
the fourth
Minnesota
73
with recreational, educational and cultural programming rooted in a spirit of cooperation and coexistence.
owes it $1.7 million
court battle
Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin's daughter,
Palin family.
Alaska governor
someone having sex with a teenage girl is funny."
it was a flawed joke,"
Tunisians
Dhafer L'Abidine
of a charming host whose job was to look after the film's four main characters on a trip to Abu Dhabi.
Tunisia's
21 Senate Republicans joined 47 Democrats and two independents
voted to halt planned cuts in Medicare payments
a 10.6 percent cut in Medicare payments to doctors,
planned cuts in Medicare payments to doctors
to enact the law over Bush's objections,
to enact the law
voted to halt planned cuts in Medicare payments to doctors
the federal health insurance program for seniors.
new law stops a 10.6 percent cut in Medicare payments to doctors,
his client's case,
Abdul Rahman al-Lahem
as punishment for speaking
Abdul Rahman al-Lahem
an unrelated man.
violated
had never been revoked.
Islamic law
WaterMill,
a cholera epidemic
rock-bottom prices,
gift cards.
if you want really rock-bottom prices, wait until January 5. Retailers are going to be stuck with massive amounts of goods and those will be reduced to fire sale prices.
criticize Latin American leaders.
be partners.
structure their democratic practices
kidnapping
she woke up hungry in a cold house because her husband controlled everything.
kidnapping their daughter, Reigh, for six days
kidnapping their daughter, Reigh,
of kidnapping their daughter, Reigh,
Sandra Boss
"I was completely traumatized,"
$200 a month
$200 a month
$200 a month
U.S. $200
the dead and the injured to the hospital.
promote the German language
German government, the European Recovery Program and others interested in promoting Germany's culture
Madsen,
investigating a car accident
they are investigating a car accident in which Prince
The Bullring Shopping Centre
The Bullring Shopping Centre in Birmingham
The Bullring Shopping Centre in Birmingham was voted as the country's ugliest building.
the incomplete Ryugyong Hotel
The Bullring Shopping Centre
Air Jordan Retro
athletic shoes
violence and police officer injuries
three Foot Locker
drew 1,000 people for a midnight sale of the new Air Jordan Retro
government tolerated some quasi-private businesses, raised civil servants' salaries and deregulated prices of some commodities.
China
North Korea, formally called the Democratic People's Republic of Korea,
Hermit Kingdom
waves of North Korean refugees
Kanye
his mother
mother, Donda,
Kanye West
at Neverland Ranch.
two
Staples Center in Los Angeles,
Father Henry Willenborg, the Franciscan
Father Henry Willenborg,
The Franciscan
an agreement acknowledging the boy's paternity
AIDS and HIV
reiterated the Vatican's policy on condom use
Africa
Sub-Saharan Africa
Nine out of 10 children
not
technical problems on the airplane might be the main cause of the
least 12 airplanes
Oberstdorf
Gregor Schlierenzauer
since 1979.
2005.
The United States
Islamic revolution
"Right now, the world is entering the era of dialogue," Ahmadinejad told hundreds of thousands of people in a celebration of the 30th anniversary of the
Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
President Barack Obama said the United States is
talks
steer a $780 million contract to a favored contractor,
Michael Alexander, 55, and Kerry Khan,
an alleged conspiracy involving more than $20 million in bribes and kickbacks, as well as a plan to try to steer a $780 million contract to a favored contractor,
company that did business with the federal government,
steer a $780 million contract to a favored contractor,
$780 million contract
experts cited by the news agency.
said Tehran has shown its new Iranian-made
to a representative of the International Atomic Energy Agency
1,000 megawatts
almost 500
peanut butter
A salmonella outbreak
urging companies that make these foods to check whether they use peanut butter or paste produced by the company.
foods that contain peanut butter
almost 500 people
Streets in London
London
levity
in the band's career 20 years ago
Davis Guggenheim's
Middleton
Bryant Middleton
they believe the bodies are classmates who disappeared after being savagely beaten by administrators and workers.
They'd say, "Well, he ran away and the swamp got him,"
the past five years
Juan Manuel Santos.
Manuel Mejia Munera was a drug lord with ties to paramilitary groups,
drug traffickers
short- and long-range weapons
United States.
Colombia's
identity documents
movie Web site The Auteurs.
new movie Web site
The first four rescued works from Scorsese's
The Auteurs.
Scorsese's World Cinema Foundation (WCF)
Social networking, Martin Scorsese and cinema classics on demand:
26 years ago
Kimberly Munley,
everyone started to console each other
Wounded and dead soldiers were everywhere.
people
More rain
"State of Play"
"17 Again,"
"17 Again,"
Prime Minister Gordon Brown
UK Prime Minister Gordon Brown
UK Prime Minister Gordon Brown
bigoted
stereo Bluetooth
Jabra BT3030
comparable to most MP3 players on the market.
quite good,
pendant is slim and compact
Motorola Rokr S9
wife
Franz Polzer.
steroid use.
steroids
steroid use.
Feluccas
Camel
Sultan Hassan Mosque
Abu El Sid
Egyptian
54
King island.
whales and dolphins to strand together.
King island.
190
King island.
would do -- ever -- is tell me who she's voting for,
Pete Wentz
realistic appreciation of the limits of his authority and the power of the forces arrayed against him, including a large, albeit amorphous, strain of racial resentment.
U.S.
in Baku
credible threat information
Baku,
the U.S.
Baku
in the capital, Baku,
Embassy in the capital, Baku, prompting the facility to close its doors
medications
further tests must be carried out before
prescription medications
"I think the drugs killed him."
film Koenig was making in
2008,
inspired by the 1987 film "The Lost Boys."
10 counts related
Mexicles
Monday.
both buds need to come out
The sooner you can reply properly, the better. Never leave someone hanging.
your iPod, remove both earbuds
promptly
If you run into someone while you're listening to your iPod, remove both earbuds to talk to her,
be plugged in without being impolite.
Goodwill
Goodwill
dress
"Business has really boomed,"
buying used clothing
Hurley said things really took off after they launched a viral marketing campaign
Goodwill
claim the Bush administration had decided to remove the Iraqi dictator by force by the end of
published in September 2002, that Saddam had weapons of mass destruction (WMDs) ready to deploy within 45 minutes.
David Kelly,
claim the Bush administration had decided to remove the Iraqi dictator by force by the end of 2002 and that
"standing up for paid leave, and paid sick leave, because no one should be punished for getting sick or dealing with a family crisis."
Obama
commitment to equal pay for women.
Barack Obama
join forces.
file papers shortly with an appeals court seeking an emergency stay to stop the judge's order in its tracks.
"There is a pressing need for them
A federal judge
the immediate release into the United States of 17 Chinese
Chinese
autonomous region in western China.
Sharipova and another female bomber, Dzhennet Abdullayeva,
Maryam Sharipova,
fatal Moscow subway attacks
Maryam Sharipova,
was no trauma visible on the "completely skeletonized" remains of slain
"homicide by undetermined means."
There was no trauma visible on the "completely skeletonized"
the Joker
Middle East and Venezuela,"
invest $150 billion over the next 10 years and leverage billions more in private capital to build a new energy economy
wilderness areas
said the new president was a "man of great vision and moral purpose"
"man of great vision and moral purpose"
"On this special day we recall the remarkable journey you have traveled to become the leader of your great country. Through that journey you have inspired many young and old people, not only in America but around the world with a strong message of hope.
"On this special day we recall the remarkable journey you have traveled to become the leader of your great country. Through that journey you have inspired many young and old people, not only in America but around the world with a strong message of hope.
the new president was a "man of great vision and moral purpose"
intravenous vitamin "drips"
caution against using injectable vitamin supplements because the quantities are not regulated.
caution against using injectable vitamin supplements
British Nutrition Foundation.
lauded the
$3.55 trillion budget
U.S. House
the House vote.
they were told Almaribe made comments "insulting to prophet Mohammed's relatives."
they were told Almaribe made comments "insulting to prophet Mohammed's relatives."
made comments "insulting to prophet Mohammed's relatives."
Rohingya refugees
persecution by the country's hard-line government
David Russ,
"We are still hoping for new tips that could lead us to finding Jennifer Kesse."
he'd eavesdropped on other inmates.
they already had.
15 people suffered injuries,
Friday at a Phoenix, Arizona, airport
electrical
stories
"Jonah Hex,"
it appears that producers are hoping to attract a casual movie-going audience by sacrificing the original flavor of the character and story.
not a
1970s and 1980s,
exposing Libby's 100,000 residents to asbestos for decades,
W.R. Grace & Company and three of its former executives
knowingly exposed mine workers and residents of Libby, Montana, to asbestos. The
knowingly exposed mine workers and residents of Libby, Montana, to asbestos.
exposing Libby's 100,000 residents to asbestos for decades, resulting in more than 200 deaths and 1,000 illnesses.
48
northwestern Mexico
48
Mark Ruffalo and Adrien Brody
successful con artists.
pair of con-artist brothers,
details from the new Steve Jobs biography.
the statements were lies,
he was with the Alabama teen
visiting Aruba with
Usain Bolt
150 meter sprint
sings for her friend Taylor Love
12-year-old
sent to Fort Hood along with
Asheville, North Carolina; Newark
Florida
a month
to pursue the death penalty as a potential sentence,"
killing her daughter,
the real powerhouse in Washington.
embrace of the 25-year-old son of recently deceased Ohio Rep. Stephanie Tubbs Jones
Tubbs Jones
58,
brain aneurysm.
Mervyn Jones Jr.'s
beta blockers, statin drugs, aspirin or other medications,
185
nearly 200,000
185 patients
nearly 200,000
an accident or near accident.
17th
17th
those who text while driving have an exponentially greater
two miles a day
British soldier Phil Packer
a rare form of leukemia.
a rare form of leukemia.
U.S. troops in Afghanistan,
20
a protest against U.S.-led coalition and NATO forces
U.S.
insurgents
military forces landed at a compound in Pakistan to battle targets linked to recent attacks
the troops came out of a chopper and fired on civilians.
responsible for training and equipping insurgents who have been crossing the border into Afghanistan in increasing numbers in recent months and staging large-scale, high-profile attacks against U.S. and coalition forces.
colon
cancer
Tony Snow
he will "sadly accept" Snow's resignation.
White House press secretary
that he will "sadly accept" Snow's resignation.
the president
Dana Perino,
Dana Perino,
his former role as "Chief Yahoo"
Jerry Yang,
Jerry Yang,
Jerry Yang,
failing to turn around the company.
falling short of reaching an agreement to sell the company to Microsoft.
Eid al-Adha.
at least 28
about 2,000 people,
avoidance of the phrase "act of war" is both a question of how legal experts may evaluate
"war"
"It's always great to feel like you're the girl in the book and the handsome guy is coming to rescue you,"
New York
Harlequin
"It's always fun for the reader."
cover art
Georgia
AR-15 semi-automatic rifle
in suburban Atlanta
planned to "do harm" at the school with a weapon,
an AR-15 semi-automatic rifle and a Mini-14 assault rifle, as well as 200 rounds of ammunition,
Mark Zuckerberg,
the population of the United States.
now has 300 million users -- almost as many as the population of the United
thanked the site's users for helping its online community
hate
gay community
LZ Granderson.
gay people
there has been a dramatic increase in the amount of time college-educated mothers are spending with their older children,
sacrificing careers to usher their children through the increasingly competitive college admissions process.
Kumar
she was drunk the night the infant disappeared.
told her that she failed a lie detector test,
6:40 p.m. October 3,
Helen McCormick
Willard InterContinental Hotel in Washington.
various disabled children with kidney (ailments), children that are literally terminally ill, children with cerebral palsy, Down syndrome and autism,"
children with special needs.
Helen McCormick
McCormick
those with special needs.
This year's prom,
flipping through acceptance packages from two top MBA programs.
two top MBA programs.
wanted to be a National Geographic
applied to business school
bedroom of his apartment
positions in the Autonomous Region in Muslim Mindanao, including governor of the region, governor of Maguindanao and mayor of Datu Unsay.
southern Philippines
has agreed to face questioning,
Andal Ampatuan Jr.
All four
Myk Manon
25 percent of Haiti's customers,
60 percent of Port-au-Prince's 3 million residents had electricity; nationwide, the figure was 40 percent,
Sen. Carl Levin,
bars openly gay and lesbian soldiers from military service.
Hezbollah-dominated alliance.
United States
terror attacks on India's financial capital
Israel,
2-year-old boy,
terror attacks
in Israel
Rajasthan
solve his state's water problems, one raindrop at a time.
solve water issues in Rajasthan
spent the last 25 years of his life practicing
retro-R&B singer
break through
Beijing's underground music scene
music
"The Witches of Eastwick,"
"Rabbit, Run" (1960), "Couples" (1968), "The Witches of Eastwick" (1984) and "Terrorist" (2006)
John Updike
through prevention,
more than 1.5 million people have been infected so far in the United States,
through prevention,
high fever, a horrible headache and body aches.
five other
Alabama.
Kristin Helm of the Tennessee Bureau of Investigation told CNN on Saturday that authorities have Jacob Shafer in
authorities
Jacob Shafer
sixth body
build the Pentagon memorial.
heroes rose,"
9/11
Bush
"We come each year to stand alongside those who loved and lost the most, to bear witness to the day which began like any other and ended as none ever has," Bloomberg said.
Ireland's expulsion of a Russian diplomat over spying allegations is "clearly an unfriendly
somewhere in a warehouse in New Jersey."
1952.
a softer, more innocent 24-year-old budding starlet in a more peaceful time,
murder, rape, sexual slavery and forced marriages,
Sierra Leone
notorious for brutality.
more than 10 years
welcomed the convictions, but said much more needs to be done to bring hundreds of other perpetrators to justice.
one of several scenic houseboat communities in Sausalito.
a 10-minute walk
watching sailboats.
Rapper Soulja Boy
at a home in Stockbridge, 20 miles south of Atlanta,
police
milling around the house, which appeared to be abandoned.
DeAndre Cortez Way,
they were at the home to film a video.
a Little Rock, Arkansas, hospital,
gallbladder issues,"
several U.S. airports including Minneapolis-St. Paul, Minnesota; Denver, Colorado; and Boston, Massachusetts.
threats, including explosive devices, hidden under clothing,
threats, including explosive devices,
the Passive Millimeter Wave.
we are reaching funding capacity limits,"
MyRichUncle's president and co-founder, Raza Khan,
suspend its private student loan program,
his right leg
Sen. Sherrod Brown,
from Orlando, Florida, to Philadelphia, Pennsylvania,
panel, on the trailing edge of the upper side of the left wing,
economy.
any registered voter
Michigan's primary
except for Sen. Hillary Clinton.
Kate died of cancer
nine
cancer
Larry
Larry Shine
90
a pair of hijacked fuel trucks
90 people
a pair of hijacked fuel trucks
at least 90 people
in 2007.
Robert Levinson's
not know
a business trip to Iran's Kish Island
a central town
terrorist groups like Al Shabaab pose a threat to the broader international community.
terrorist groups like Al Shabaab pose a threat to the broader international community.
Burde is now under the control of government forces after our forces overran a stiff resistance at the entrance bridge of the town by Al Shabaab fighters,"
fall
carry out the murder,
conspiring to support terrorists
the circumstances surrounding
I would like. Let's see, I agree completely with the president of FIFA. Now I have to wait and see, but I do not know where I will begin the season."
"modern slavery".
agreed
the practice of binding players to lengthy contracts amounts to "modern slavery".
European champions Manchester
roadside bombs,
accused
Najaf.
Baghdad
in the parking lot
parking lot just beyond the center field fence.
California's
that if he returned, he faced arrest in connection with the 2007 assassination of former Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto.
late January
2008.
a "very, very detailed" medical check
Mexico City
Atlanta-area
federal conspiracy charge of bankrolling a dogfighting operation at a home he owned
suburban Atlanta
"unnamed international terror group" for the attack,
Islamic militant group Harkat-ul-Jihad al-Islami
disease,
"promote multiple export industries, develop a skilled work force, and create space for small and medium-sized businesses that create jobs."
President Obama
"Despite the progress that has been made -- and there has been considerable progress in parts of Africa -- we also know that much of that promise has yet to be fulfilled,"
"I think it was particularly important for Malia and Sasha, who are being raised in a very blessed way, that history can take some cruel turns,"
Ghana's Parliament
"I don't want to grow old,"
"He was trying to reclaim his life,"
30
FIFA 09
nothing
The ball pings around nicely, the weight of pass remains just about right and long passes are much improved. It mostly feels like a game of computer football should.
nothing
might not be cutting-edge in its presentation and options, but you still can't beat a 10-minute match with a mate beside on you on the sofa.
PES' reputation
The financial damage caused by the rain and flooding -- including damaged homes and crops
killed at least 16 people and left hundreds
traffic,
text messages to more than 1 million people to take precautions
northwestern Pakistan
militants
Pakistani city of Peshawar,
blew himself up.
three
with his sexually suggestive dance sequence that included simulated oral sex
Lambert
"Good Morning America"
singer's live performance scheduled for Wednesday morning.
tucked inside a plastic bag and left in a basket
four
1990,
four
1988.
at his Hope Mills, North Carolina, home
Tuesday
and Patino had been stationed together in Germany and had dated.
unborn child,
Sgt. Edgar Patino
first-degree murder charge
Tuesday
to dismiss the first-degree murder charge against
Colorado prosecutor
rape and murder two decades ago
rape and murder
said that a stay is necessary so Gray can pursue his federal appeal.
into the new
complete one game and transfer their character to the next one in the series.
drama
Tropical Storm
Tuesday
contract with FedEx Corp.,
Lubbock, Texas, airport,
FedEx
a small fire on the plane,
dire shortage of donated organs
in rich countries
donation programs.
$30,000 in the United States.
who travel to poor countries to buy body parts from people with few other routes to a better living.
Pakistan,
a dire shortage of donated organs
China, Pakistan, Turkey, Egypt, Colombia
who travel to poor countries to buy body parts from people
abducting people, drugging them and stealing their kidneys.
That April, he paid 260,000 yuan ($34,380) for a transplant
$30,000
who travel to poor countries to buy body parts from people with few other routes to a better living.
$300 to $1,000
sending foreigners with end-stage illnesses to poorer places like China, Pakistan, Turkey, Egypt, Colombia and the Philippines to buy a new lease of life.
travel to poor countries to buy body parts from people with few other routes to a better living.
body parts from people
HONG KONG,
"transplant tourists"
$30,700
"transplant tourists"
Roman Catholic
"I'm very disappointed in Chaput's actions, but he has a history of politicizing issues,"
Other liberal Catholic and gay groups
Other liberal Catholic and gay groups
Other liberal Catholic and gay groups
another Catholic school in the archdiocese.
retain their unbeaten record this season,
Inter the lead
mobbed by team-mates
Juventus a 1-1 home draw
1-1
Juventus a 1-1 home draw
unbeaten
goalkeeper Julio Cesar
Luciano Spaletti's
Daniele Galloppa
Julio Cruz
the lead in their 1-1 draw at Juventus.
Argentine
1-1
Another construction worker
24
all construction crane activity
two
Seven
Puerto Rico and some portions of the northern Leeward Islands, which includes the Virgin Islands,
115
acute leukemia,
Cleveland Indians
Brooklyn Bridge,
New York
nation's financial system,
rains and flooding
World Food Programme
159
the poor and vulnerable
rains and flooding
Islamist militias
the country's capital and other key cities;
the radical Islamist militia
Sharif Sheikh Ahmed,
Ethiopian forces
Ethiopian forces out of Somalia is gone.
second from the bottom of the German Bundesliga.
sixth loss
second from the bottom
More than 600
details in the coming weeks of how fans can receive a refund on their admission ticket.
in the coming weeks
Cottbus
President Obama
winds strong enough to delay a
the concepts explored in the program.
environmental conflicts between growing populations and natural resources.
the environmental conflicts between growing populations and natural resources.
environmental struggles in the real world.
to focus students' attention on the concepts explored in the program.
heart
70,
jazz
heart disease,
Art Blakey, Oliver Nelson, Ornette Coleman, Herbie Hancock and Wayne Shorter.
fusion-oriented albums,
National Endowment for the Arts Jazz Master
Grammy-winning
Freddie Hubbard
Ian Khama
Sunday Standard
criminal or terrorism-related offense.
of being an al Qaeda "sleeper agent,"
Qatari
the cartoonist for the Danish newspaper Morgenavisen Jullands-Posten,
Morgenavisen Jullands-Posten,
provoked widespread outrage in the Muslim world
terrorism
Dane of Moroccan origin and two Tunisians.
"terror-related assassination" of a cartoonist
provoked widespread outrage
Morgenavisen Jullands-Posten,
unidentified man
five service members were wounded in the attack and a building suffered minor damage.
Bagram Air Base
to enter bunkers when the base came under attack and were allowed to return to their huts and tents about 90 minutes later.
20 armed men wearing suicide vests stormed the base around 4 a.m.
I wrote suicide notes,
George and Cindy Anthony,
their lives have been like under the
They're picking apart the fact that we're standing behind our daughter. They're picking apart the fact that we are trying to make something out of Caylee's tragedy.
George and Cindy Anthony,
Because every time we go to the jail to see her, it's videotaped and then it's all over "Nancy Grace"
the jail
"Until the Day Is Done"
"Anderson Cooper
on CNN's "Anderson Cooper
"Until the Day
October 23
"Bad Day"
R.E.M.
R.E.M.
Tuesday
Rock group R.E.M.
Wednesday
Tuesday
Tuesday
R.E.M.
Cesar Laurean,
the party,
she was attending a Christmas
to see if Lauterbach's unborn baby was fathered by Cesar Laurean,
CNN.
is being conducted
Mexico.
Mexico.
at least 17
17
deadly bombing near the Indian Embassy in Kabul.
troop numbers,
Shaw was a fan of the movie "Fight Club"
Memorial Day.
"Project Mayhem"
Kyle Shaw,
Starbucks
in the driver's seat of a gold Mitsubishi Galant at an intersection in Lauderdale Lakes, Florida, near Fort Lauderdale.
two other males, in the
are Angel Cruz, 23; his brother from Oregon, Christopher Harter, 29; Peter MacDonald, 18; and Lernio Colin, 20.
four men are in
Now four men are
on social networking sites and via text messages.
The permanent ceasefire,
members of the Taliban and leaders of Swat Valley,
July to flush out militants
"We have not and will not negotiate with extremist
the cease-fire would not close girls' schools in the troubled region.
expensive gifts
had been flung open, and I could fly again."
Yovanna Guzman
head of the North Valle Cartel.
1968.
Afghanistan
75 days,
violent extremists
transfer of power
the transition is in good hands,
Obama
"We're in a struggle against violent extremists determined to attack us, and they would like nothing more than to exploit this period of change to harm the American people,"
"ensuring that this transition is as smooth as possible
on Wednesday boarded and temporarily held a U.S.-flagged vessel,
off the coast of Africa.
increased the number of attacks
Retired Major General Tom Wilkerson
task force of international navies
pirates.
Chinese President Hu Jintao cut his trip short to return to China after the earthquake in Qinghai province near the Tibetan border killed more than 700 people.
his trip
leaders of Brazil, Russia, India and China
The
she never considered
"Our country is facing the most profound public policy questions in our lifetime
not run for re-election
economy, taxes, healthcare, the environment and national security,"
he would not run for re-election
four
Atlanta, Georgia.
The World Barista Championship
the page doesn't violate the company's content policies.
"while it may be considered distasteful
has received more than 600,000
a snide "prayer"
northern border region of Ecuador, including Esmeraldas.
his fiancée was beaten and raped.
Esmeraldas, on Ecuador's northern coast.
brutal attack
Ecuador
father
President Bush
New York
leading GOP politicians.
Long Island mortgage fraud scheme.
near Buffalo, New York,
Marvin Renslow's incorrect response to the plane's precarious drop in speed: He overrode an emergency system known as a "stick pusher," which sends the plane into a dive so it can regain speed and avoid a stall.
Colgan Air,
Britney Spears
second hospitalization
Spears
second hospitalization
Spears' psychiatrist.
Spears' psychiatrist.
second hospitalization
flooding
Heavy rains triggered by El Nino weather patterns
Heavy rains triggered by El Nino weather patterns
Kenya, Somalia, Tanzania and Uganda are facing mudslides, crop destruction, waterborne diseases and disrupted road networks,
The cars run on electricity and biofuels as well as gasoline. Tuesday's
bucket truck
3,200
Potomac Riverboat Company,
at least an hour early
closure of all bridges
seven
"Meet the Press,"
Buffalo Mayor Byron W. Brown
at work
Tim
journalist
Tim Russert
influential journalist in Washington,
be lowered immediately
Wednesday.
admitted to a hospital in April for multiple organ failure,
organ failure,
his wife,
Elisabeth,
hospital in Amstetten,
2004.
Dr. Maria Siemionow,
Dr. Maria Siemionow,
Siemionow
eight surgeons at the Cleveland Clinic.
nose, cheeks, upper jaw and facial tissue from a female
80
80 percent of a woman's face
he would need surgery on both knees to save his career.
Michael Watson
Hong Kong
HK$100 million (US$12.85 million),
rooftop structures
Caribbean,
Natasha Richardson
isn't fair.
"such a family."
Liam Neeson
Ali Hassan al-Majeed
had been delayed for political rather than legal reasons.
for political
right-wing nationalist Avigdor Lieberman
Lieberman
Lieberman
Israel's next foreign minister.
Prime Minister-designate Benjamin Netanyahu
A teenager and three elderly people
the pilgrims' countries of origin.
the pilgrims' countries of origin.
be banned from this year's event
the pilgrims'
several groups might even be banned from
Lyon
Arsenal
it takes to form democracy. It just won't be easy or fast.
freedoms are at stake.
Xe
private security firm
held classified contracts with the Central Intelligence Agency for nearly a decade,
"this is the best day of my life."
football
"I think this is the day of my dreams -- to score a goal like that on my debut."
Old Trafford.
Federico Macheda
3-2 win
helping them to a 3-2 win
"I think this is the day of my dreams -- to score a goal like that on my debut."
at Cafe Argana in Place Jemaa el Fna,
charges including lying to Bush administration officials during his 2004 nomination.
New York City Police Commissioner
48-month
an Academy Award:
breast cancer,
More than 200 civilians and at least 30 children
4 months old
shells slammed
11
11 high-ranking security officials
Renee Zellweger, Jennifer Aniston, Mariah Carey, Jennifer
independent films and television,
lead roles in big-budget
magazine geared toward women over 40.
Renee Zellweger, Jennifer Aniston, Mariah Carey, Jennifer
celebrates after upsetting
Roger Federer
victory in the final of the Madrid Masters
German legend Boris Becker
victory in the final of the Madrid Masters
Roger Federer
Nalbandian
David Nalbandian
1-6 6-3 6-3
1-6 6-3 6-3
ranked 25th
Midwest and upper Great Lakes
northern Great Lakes and the Upper Peninsula of Michigan.
the West Coast and the East
Washington
Harris-Moore
Colton "Colt" Harris-Moore
Granite Falls, Washington.
Police say Colton "Colt" Harris-Moore has been linked to crimes in five counties involving planes, luxury cars and boats.
Colton "Colt" Harris-Moore
don't think the two thefts are a coincidence.
wilderness camping
ability to sing not only from the heart, but in a way that transcended her age and experience and became something universal."
evacuated 300,000
destroying green crops like cabbage and collard greens and contaminating the water supply,
350,000
worm-like larvae
350,000
Tens of millions of the worm-like larvae have
hordes of ravenous caterpillars
a state of emergency
AT&T. Apple's
cell phone systems around the world
Moammar Gadhafi
Chairmanship of the AU
making the 1990 movie "State of Grace."
11 years.
when the Franciscans balked at paying for his care,
Father
when the Franciscans balked at paying for his care,
band trip to Chicago, Illinois,
band trip
about 6 a.m.,
killing one person.
Fareed Zakaria
any important national or international issue,
not qualified to lead the United States.
to choose Sarah Palin to be his running mate
it would be best for Republican presidential hopeful
Gov. Sarah Palin
bowed out as his vice presidential running mate.
"We have approved a declaration in which leaders of countries and governments present here reaffirm their support for the Republic of Argentina's legitimate rights in its sovereignty dispute with the United Kingdom,"
it had "every right to develop a hydrocarbons industry within our waters."
No injuries were reported in the five-minute incident.
Pakistani military fired shots at two American helicopters
shots at two American helicopters
81
announced Rio's successful bid for the 2016 Olympic Games
golf
Golf
81
three Gaza border crossings
Gaza home
more than 110.
dozens
a Palestinian
then, dozens of rockets
a spate of terror-related plots in the United States recently
it "will require a broad, sustained and integrated campaign that harnesses every tool of American power, military and civilian, kinetic and diplomatic."
broad, sustained
National Security Strategy
Robert D. Champion
November 26,
attackers were from Pakistan
Kasab had admitted he was one of 10 gunmen who attacked several targets in Mumbai on November 26,
The suspect, Mohammed Ajmal Amir Kasab,
he was one of 10 gunmen who attacked several targets in Mumbai
Alzheimer's disease.
help determine who's at greatest risk for developing Alzheimer's disease.
structural changes
patients in the MCI group whose scans showed minimal signs of atrophy
in the brain images of some patients
structural changes
one year after
mild cognitive impairment plus signs of atrophy were getting worse.
could help determine who's at greatest risk for developing Alzheimer's disease.
U.S. spacecraft
follow through the debris plume,
7:31 a.m.
debris plumes
follow through the debris plume, collecting and relaying data back to Earth before crashing into the Cabeus crater near the moon's south pole.
is calling for the withdrawal of French troops from Afghanistan by the end of February 2009.
central Paris
around 11 a.m. (5 a.m. ET),
Paris's Printemps department store,
February 2009.
Police evacuated a major department store in central Paris Tuesday after finding
Zimbabwe
Malnutrition has
killed 775 people and infected more than 15,000.
World Health Organization
death toll will skyrocket.
the death toll will skyrocket.
the situation is being exaggerated by the West in an effort to exert pressure on President Robert Mugabe to leave office.
people are forced to sift through garbage piles for any morsel of food.
cholera epidemic,
militants, drug labs and buildings connected to insurgents with ties to drug lords
kill or capture some 50 Afghan drug traffickers
Afghan drug traffickers
50
the Taliban
paints often contain toxic metals, such as lead and mercury.
polymer-lined tank for immersion.
these paints
celebrated the birthday of the elephant god
these paints often contain toxic metals, such as lead and mercury.
a polymer-lined tank for immersion.
Robert Mugabe
more than 16,000
Britain.
"a genocidal onslaught"
800 deaths
$55 million
Christian family in their home,
extremists.
Christian families
Phoenix
if you use during pregnancy, you're being prosecuted or you're losing your baby."
prosecute
from South Carolina's rural counties and its booming cities. They are loud and muted, lively and vacant, hopeful and desperate.
GREENVILLE, South Carolina
Ashley Hendrix
South Carolina
raising concerns about whether ice layers will form over pastures preventing reindeer from foraging.
view the depth of snow
Satellite maps
loss of pastures
providing snow melt maps
different forms of land-use change over time.
view the depth of snow and judge where the best foraging spots are to take their reindeer.
loss of pastures
Gonaives, Haiti,
at least 341
341
in a week.
17-year-old Kyree Flowers,
McCain presidential campaign yard sign.
McCain
Police say the man's sign is the only McCain sign on a street full of Obama signs.
Mexico and Florida,
552
contamination could have occurred in a packing shed, warehouse, supplier chain or distribution center.
552
Mexico
552
the alleged Barcelona plot had "not advanced sufficiently" to constitute a crime of conspiracy under Spanish law.
key police informant, known as F1
information on his and his family's income
make money from pyramid schemes that have defrauded millions.
$200 million
Colombian President Alvaro Uribe
3 million people
in the recent decades
deliver key spare parts to prolong the life of the international space station.
deliver key spare parts to prolong the life of the international space station.
the landing was a "picture-perfect end"
"A."
Delta Air Lines, JetBlue, Continental
Southwest received an "A."
government statistics, press reports, airline Web site data, reports on the group's hotline, and eyewitness accounts from January to December of 2008.
the former president's statue contains pieces of the Berlin Wall, "as a symbol of his commitment to national security and to his success."
activities marking Reagan's 100th birthday
California
Barack Obama's signing of legislation authorizing a Ronald Reagan Centennial
1868,
areas like Shibuya, Shinjuku and Akihabara; the skyscrapers glowing with illuminated signs, subway stops inside shopping malls and taxis with automated doors
Shibuya, Shinjuku and Akihabara;
tells of the city's Shinto heritage
the future will look like.
earthquakes, fires and devastating bombing.
The new article, "Preparing the Battlefield," is the latest in a series of articles accusing the Bush administration of preparing for war with Iran.
up to $400 million to fund the secret campaign,
troops were digging more than 320,000 graves to bury troops from any invading force
Iran,
the secret campaign,
denied
an eye for an eye,"
hundreds of poor, rural and indigenous pregnant women are dying because they are being denied the same health services as other women in the country.
they are being denied the same health services as other
lack of health staff who speak indigenous languages
Sheikh Mansour bin Zayed Al Nahyan.
Roman Abramovich
Sheikh Mansour bin Zayed Al Nahyan.
"Nobody 74 is going to be written off because they have cancer," he responded angrily. "That's a vicious, untrue rumor."
when a woman asked if the bill meant a 74-year-old man with cancer would be written off
forum in Lebanon,
Celtic League team Edinburgh
formerly coach of bitter rivals England,
England,
Scottish
national team boss.
Scottish Rugby Union
the National Museum of American History.
Voices recorded by inventor Alexander Graham Bell more than 125 years ago
"To be or not to be, that is the question,"
Georgetown neighborhood of Washington,
Reagan National Airport or at Washington Dulles International,
32.4 inches
Hundreds of
would review how anti-terrorist watch lists are maintained.
that officials would review how anti-terrorist watch lists are maintained.
how anti-terrorist watch lists are maintained.
sought-after targets for the authors of harmful programs.
program infects
Mac
Mac machines,
decision will determine whether politically charged documentaries can be regulated by the government in the same way as traditional campaign commercials.
a First Amendment case involving a movie about Hillary Clinton.
a First Amendment
whether politically charged documentaries can
the committee will have access to the full range of information, including secret documents, in order to identify lessons that can be learned from the war.
Top officials from the British and U.S. governments
The inquiry
A long-awaited inquiry into Britain's role in the Iraq war
Britain's role in the
public and
Joe Namath,
Europe's Ryder Cup team
has become renowned for upsetting the form book, frequently triumphing against higher ranked American opposition.
defeating the Soviets 4-3 in a match
hockey team
Europe's Ryder Cup
1969
available that allows developers to test their application running on simulated devices so they can see how it behaves.
A slew of problems have made managing Android apps a "nightmare,"
Android
Google's open source Android
to investigate two deaths at an Arizona sweat lodge.
his own
James Arthur Ray
Narayanthi Royal
KATHMANDU,
former Himalayan kingdom as
Nepal
The monarchy's end after 239 years of rule
new government has converted its deposed king's opulent palace into
Renault
hunger for F1
Griffiths-Novak
Josh Faiola
three
two American hikers
Iran
two American hikers
10 dead
Mildred Muhammad
visit him in prison with their son
details of the case.
some Republicans
False rumors about health care
False rumors about health care
the public option would create a subsidized competitor that would drive private insurers out of business, leading to the government taking over the health care system.
"When someone sends you something on the Internet that sounds crazy, how about just checking it a little bit?"
the end-of-life consultation provision
Martha Coakley,
Massachusetts Attorney General Martha Coakley, the Democratic candidate.
liberal Democrat Ted Kennedy.
the race,
Niger
Niger
South African Football Association
Sen. Hillary Clinton
50.1 percent.
Eight
Sen. Hillary Clinton
Sen. Hillary Clinton
weather-related
650,000
607,000
western Louisville,
Nine
three adults
Cheapoair.com
wasn't accepted.
Tapachula, Mexico.
A lifeguard
Florida
38-year-old
Florida
Bush
$300 billion farm bill.
80-14 to approve the measure
its continued subsidies for the wealthy and its use of budget gimmicks to hide a $20 billion increase in spending.
2,100 people.
said he knew almost all the victims.
Horne v. Flores
Nogales officials
ordering the state to rework its plan and increase funding.
Breckenridge, Colorado,
Paul Wampach,
communal atmosphere of hostels
"There's a sense of community, and there's a social aspect to it that's pretty significant," said Jim Williams, editor of "The Hostel Handbook" and a former hostel owner. "That is the
and regular backpackers are booking hostels at U.S. vacation destinations in full force this year.
phase 6
It is the highest on the WHO's pandemic alert system,
not
the designation
is the
in the custody of Phoenix child protective services
9 to 14
Italy's prime minister.
roller derby,
53-year-old
Librarian Hollis
Beth Hollis,
ageless dynamo
community recover from
Mayor Jerry Sanders
by early Thursday morning.
the earth
Moore
that the ground was shifting beneath the hillside community
landslide
landslide
Mayor Jerry Sanders
trees
"slow avalanche."
early Thursday morning.
the ground
are outraged that Barclays has purchased the naming rights to this subway stop, which sees about 10 million people go through it each day.
in Brooklyn.
Barclays
Atlantic Avenue-Pacific
Yang Liwei
In 2003 Yang Liwei became a national hero when he became the
China's
first Chinese man in space,
Zhai Zhigang
CNN.
Russian air company Vertikal-T,
the Russian air company Vertikal-T,
Kandahar airfield in southern Afghanistan
Kandahar airfield in southern Afghanistan
U.S. military helicopter
college correspondence courses and began to draw.
Washington area
he draws self-portraits that often show him with a tear running down his cheek.
"grappling with shame,
2002.
terrorized the Washington area five years ago this month in attacks that left 10 dead over a 23-day period.
The reporter,
Brooke Shields
taking her 75-year-old mother
The National Enquirer
indecency with a child, aggravated sexual assault and two counts of aggravated assault with a deadly weapon,
"He took the officers' weapons and
Comeaux
the guards' guns and wearing one of their gray correctional officer uniforms,
pulling a gun on two guards
the Oscars
partnered with The Heart Truth campaign to raise awareness of women's heart health
Sarah Jessica Parker's
Vienna, Austria,
ranked highest in personal safety.
Luxembourg City
Baghdad
daily flights of its EC-130J Commando Solo aircraft
attempting illegal crossings
Each one
spent five miserable years in poverty trying to perfect his idea. Then one day, it happened... the great discovery came in the winter of 1839.
series of cords (most typically polyester)
rubber.
200
A final note and credit to Charles Goodyear.
200 raw materials.
more than six years ago.
second-degree murder in the death of actress Lana Clarkson
Israel
are not
five
soldiers,
not alive, "as far as we know."
not allow amateurs
Bethpage State Park
Augusta National Golf club in the city of Augusta, Georgia,
Augusta National Golf club in the city of Augusta, Georgia,
a young American
must be stopped but also that the decision should be left to the individual woman,
a 13-year-old boy
14 and 15 years
The four teenagers, 14 and 15 years old,
four teenagers, 14 and 15 years old,
courtroom in downtown Buenos Aires,
names of three more victims found last week in or around
Anthony Sowell,
three more victims
of 10 people and skull of an 11th victim
H1N1
and the common cold
symptoms consist of fever, more painful body aches, dry cough, diarrhea
strains (H1N1
$10.75 million Hot Lotto jackpot
CEO Terry Rich
$77 million
unclaimed
"I am very excited. My parents took me to watch the movies and I saw all of them. So to play that is going to be fun,"
I cannot give you many details."
"I am very excited. My parents took me to watch the movies and I saw all of them. So to play that is going to be fun,"
So to play that is going to be fun," Bardem
on the West Coast,
A Web site
debate among professors about its ethical implications.
ban their exams
reached out to Iran in a videotaped message.
engagement with Iran that is "honest and grounded in mutual respect."
said the United States seeks engagement with Iran that is
no
U.S. President Barack Obama
Abdul Aziz al-Hakim,
20 years
future
20 years
a senior Iraqi Shiite leader
Iran
Baghdad, Iraq,
Iraqi Embassy in Tehran,
the final of the Sydney International
in the final of the Sydney International
driver's license.
June 29
skydiving instructor
tearing a muscle in his left leg
Tuesday night's 1-0 Champions League victory over Celtic.
Tuesday night's 1-0 Champions League victory over Celtic.
Lionel Messi
Lionel Messi
during Tuesday night's 1-0 Champions League victory
Paris Match
French uniforms, helmets
photo spread of Taliban fighters posing in the uniforms of 10 French soldiers killed
magazine photo spread of Taliban fighters posing in the uniforms of 10 French soldiers killed
French troops
greater say on executive compensation.
The Pay for Performance Act of 2009, which passed by a
TARP.
would give Treasury Secretary Tim Geithner greater say on executive compensation.
The Pay for Performance Act of 2009,
Timothy Geithner
success,
"Paranormal Activity"
"Paranormal Activity" tells the story of a couple determined to discover if their house is haunted.
Huntsman's "American values,"
An amateurish video
having to give up writing by hand,
right wrist
after he fell Thursday night,
that his skull was intact; and the team
the pharaoh's body,
that the mummy named Lady Hor was actually a man.
learning more about the funeral rituals of ancient Egyptians
differentiate among the various types of bone and soft tissue, and reconstruct three-dimensional images
the mummy named Lady Hor was actually a man.
$100,000
from $2 million per team to just $750,000,
only 11
$100,000
A 3-year-old girl
Beason, Illinois,
inside a Beason, Illinois, home
3-year-old girl
blunt-force trauma."
at a hospital,
by criticism
are going to stand the test of time,"
-- one on foreign policy and one about her parents.
tough
At least six members of the Ampatuan family
Philippine House of Representatives and Senate
raided at least one warehouse and ranch
her reasons for making the proclamation
Democratic VP candidate
Gov. Tim Kaine
Biden, Sen. Evan Bayh of Indiana and Virginia Gov. Tim Kaine
Saturday.
Democratic VP candidate
delivers a big speech
roaring enthusiasm
Obama
Three
about 180 miles from Port Aransas, Texas,
eight days
180 miles
about 180
his DWTS weight loss
December.
"Saturday Night Live"
"Saturday Night Live"
"SNL" creator Lorne Michaels
"Saturday Night Live"
UNESCO, the U.N. cultural, science, and education agency.
"You cannot expect Israel to continue to be restrained when the Palestinian Authority leadership repeatedly slams the door in our face,"
has said repeatedly that the Palestinians will not return to negotiations until Israel halts all settlement construction
a car
"It's extremely frustrating. We want her back safe. That's the bottom line.
Friday
Sandra Cantu, 8,
477
was likely that one day urgent action would need to be taken, above and beyond the current measures being discussed.
in a chamber, compressed and stored as liquid
Sen. Larry Craig
a misdemeanor disorderly conduct charge.
Idaho
latest folk-rock album
Guilin: 2 days
Guilin
off Nanluoguxiang, near the 13th-century Drum and Bell towers.
atmospheric hutong, or traditional alleyways,
from Solitary Beauty Peak
sanctions on American companies that sell arms
60 Black Hawk helicopters,
sanctions on American companies that sell arms
plans for visits between the Chinese and U.S. militaries
chief official White House photographer
President
Pete Souza,
"Hamas hasn't done anything for us,
of food, gas, and patience.
guns
After last June's takeover (or coup d'etat, as Fatah supporters call it), Hamas quickly imposed law and order, tried to reacquaint Gaza's drivers with long-forgotten traffic regulations, launched a municipal cleanup campaign, and forced the release of kidnapped BBC journalist Alan Johnston,
reports from Gaza on daily life and reality
CNN's Ben Wedeman
minimum of survival.
that we once again find ourselves at the mercy of events and people just beyond our control.
Neverland Ranch
the family
Jackson's brother Jermaine
Neverland Ranch
the family
$400.
state Cemetery and Funeral Bureau
Amanda Fulkerson
reported on Tuesday.
Cadena Ser
$92 million
is currently in Brazil
Schalke will host United
apologized in an online statement Tuesday, saying he "wants to ask for forgiveness if my actions have caused pain and sadness. ... I assure you that my service and dedication to God remain intact."
"wants to ask for forgiveness if my actions have caused pain and sadness. ... I assure you that my service and dedication to God remain intact."
"scandal."
"Father Oprah"
Archbishop John C. Favalora.
The Rev. Alberto Cutie
U.S. and Iraqi officials
Iraqi government
that guards "definitely" faced
accuses Blackwater guards of opening fire without provocation on civilians in
definitely incoming small arms fire
on rape and first-degree murder charges,
lake in Rancho Bernardo Community
candlelight vigil
fair elections
Moscow,
Saturday in Moscow,
from child mortality to access to education.
Sudan, Lebanon, Congo
the toughest issues facing Africa,
on CNN.com
tricks of the trade that have helped him conquer
the tricks of the trade
"Zlata Praha" or "Golden Prague"
is a tribute to this city that mixes architecture, history, art and beauty like no other.
Largely untouched by the ravages of
osteogenesis imperfecta,
"I decided a long time ago that if people were going to stare at me, they were going to pay me for it,"
artistic director of Open Circle Theatre,
embraced it,
osteogenesis imperfecta,
These strict financial eligibility limitations,
"I decided a long time ago that if people were going to stare at me, they were going to pay me for it,"
Pulitzer Prize
won the Pulitzer
"The Witches of Eastwick,"
76.
lung cancer.
76.
representing the 5th Congressional District in the northwest part of the Buckeye state.
"He was a good friend to all of us," said a somber Boehner. "He's going to be missed by us all."
House Committee on Financial Services,
Rep. Paul Gillmor of Ohio
European Union member states,
lawmakers
Iceland already benefits from a free trade arrangement with European Union member states,
temperatures
Gulf Coast of Louisiana, Mississippi, Alabama and most of Florida
A gradual warming is
stormy
President Obama's
hostile war zones,
"I'm glad he's going where he's needed. It would be a waste for him to go where he's not needed and not be able to do his job,"
1,500 Marines will be part of the initial wave of President Obama's surge plan
1,500 Marines
over $20 billion
Bharti Airtel Limited
"highly compelling,"
"highly compelling,"
combined
Trauerfeier," (translated as Sadness Party)
Sadness Party)
Berlin's O2 World arena,
hundreds of fans gathered at a Tower Records store -- where Jackson twice visited -- in Tokyo to watch his videos on a big screen.
homage
Rev. Andy Sidden,
The Grammy-award winning singer is on record as saying homosexuality is a choice,
Charleston, South Carolina,
disagree with Reverend [Donnie] McClurkin's
saying homosexuality is a choice, and
transgender community.
gay bloggers:
black vote
is on record as saying homosexuality is a choice,
$165,000.
disguised as wooden snakes, guitars and statues,
as wooden snakes, guitars and statues,
New York, New Jersey, Virginia and Texas.
Ugandan parliament,
"President Museveni is fast becoming the Robert Mugabe of Uganda and that's a threat to the civil rights of every Ugandan person -- gay or straight,"
sentenced to life in prison, while anyone found guilty of
reached the fourth round of the U.S. Open,
Julia Vakulenko
Davenport
Lindsay Davenport
Vera Zvonareva
only when basic services are in better shape.
Farris said he believes residents will return en masse only when basic services are in better shape.
threats posed by Iranian-backed Shiite militants,
old rivalries
have been wracked with sectarian warfare and terrorized by insurgents and death squads.
the cease-fire by radical Shiite cleric Muqtada al-Sadr's Mehdi Army
create neighborhood watch groups
en masse only
Iranian-backed Shiite militants,
threats posed by Iranian-backed Shiite militants,
bombs
Paterson lied under oath about intending to pay for the tickets.
it was reviewing the commission's findings.
his innocence
Beatles concert
Paul McCartney
The long-told story maintained that Beatlemania was deemed too potentially injurious to Israel's youth. A more recent theory, however, blamed the ban on a tiff between competing concert promoters.
43 years after
Paul McCartney
The Beatles
mid-1960s,
too potentially injurious
objectivity.
a discussion of the troubled state of journalism in America
it's vital that new media provide support for journalism that strives for objectivity.
financial capital to support an editorial and production staff
a 22-ton firetruck
a 22-ton firetruck that was nearly swallowed by a water-logged sinkhole.
by a water-logged sinkhole.
water main break,
escape roaming fighters,
the Lou Nuer tribe
Jonglei
aid effort is under way in a remote area of South Sudan to help an estimated 60,000
as tribes fight over grazing lands and water rights,
a robot in disguise.
can also change into a laptop, a desktop workstation, and other things which are decidedly un-phone-like.
Eighty-six
Eighty-six percent of people questioned
Anti-government protesters
"Blazing Saddles," "Silent
"The Cannonball Run"
I will miss him very much,"
"The Cannonball Run"
Mel Brooks films as well as films with his friend Burt Reynolds.
Seng Han Thong
came up behind him as he was sitting down for lunch, poured thinner on him and set him on fire,
came up behind him as he was sitting down for lunch, poured thinner on him and set him on fire,
a man set him on fire
had beauty
falling into the ocean
an office
October 1851
131
Reuters was first in Europe with news of President Lincoln's assassination in the United States.
In October 1851
learned that there are a lot of children in need.
started with ab work,
Parkway Bakery & Tavern. Whether
best po' boy in town:
Parkway Bakery & Tavern.
Magazine Street,
A classic meat biscuit
po' boy
New Orleans'
dishes such as grits and debris (roast-beef edges in gravy) or red-bean omelets with baked ham and biscuits
on the edge of the Central Business District,
certain police stop-and-search powers are a breach of human rights.
The case began in September 2003, when police stopped and searched two British nationals who were on their way to a London demonstration.
Gillan and Quinton
Hurt and their passionate, turbulent, at times violent relationship.
her relationship with William Hurt,
they took precautions,
New York Times
Sultan Munadi
as "hopelessly inept,"
Afghan journalist Sultan Munadi
his Taliban hostage-takers as "hopelessly inept," and praised his Afghan colleague who died in the rescue.
New York Times reporter
in a freak accident in qualifying for Saturday's Hungarian Grand Prix.
has improved in the past 24 hours with doctors taking him out of a medically-induced coma
Felipe Massa.
the implementation of sharia law in Swat,
Pakistan's Swat Valley.
"Let the judges and the lawyers go to Islamic university,"
the imposition of Islamic sharia law
publicly condemned the Taliban's strict interpretation of Islam.
the imposition of Islamic sharia law
would not
Michael Jackson
"became a cutting-edge example of black crossover artists,"
Michael Jackson
Gyanendra
all of his property will remain in the country and that he has no property outside the nation.
the Constituent Assembly.
former Himalayan kingdom
Himalayan kingdom
with pro-royalists and pro-republicans
civilian
is tasked with rewriting the constitution, deciding the country's future political system and governing the nation.
shut down Internet accounts of illegal downloaders.
The online leak of a pirated, unfinished version
hand grenades, bombs,"
Bush
Indian
"The killers that struck this week are brutal and violent. But terror will not have the final word,"
183
withstand this trial."
death toll from the attacks reached at least 183,
183
crashed in northeastern Italy
Four people
Aviano Air Base,
Aviano Air Base,
U.S. military
an Army H-60 Black Hawk
helicopter crashed in northeastern Italy
the helicopter crashed
Four people
the U.S. military
Black Hawk
northeastern Italy
Smoke
Buenos Aires
173,000
provinces of Buenos Aires and Entre Ríos.
173,000
two
Pakistan.
is "definitely safe,"
U.S. President Barack Obama
is "definitely safe,"
Barack Obama
Mwadawa Ruziga,
"Mama" Mwadawa Ruziga's
Political instability remains an issue in Ukraine -- the fragile ruling coalition recently
risked losing the right to stage the tournament
UEFA's executive committee
FIFA
shortage of adequate stadiums, high-quality hotels
transport issues.
key pieces of evidence
key pieces of evidence
there is no way the knife could be the murder weapon.
Knox's DNA is on the handle and that of Kercher is on the blade,
the knife could be the murder weapon.
Kercher's roommate;
Polish
black model being swapped for that of a white model
replaced with a white man,
apparent bad judgment
the head of a black model being swapped for that of a white model
helicopter,
the rear roof of the
Names of the two were not released.
The helicopter,
the rear roof of the
crashed into an apparently unoccupied house in
says it will allow companies making and distributing the unapproved drugs to continue, until 180 days after any company receives approval to manufacture a new morphine replacement drug of the same dosage.
A form of liquid morphine
ensure there is no shortage of the drug while patients wait for an approved product to take its place.
hardship for terminally ill patients and their caregivers,
there are several thousand drugs, mostly older products, marketed illegally without FDA approval in this country.
McCain
Obama
Obama
Bush.
watched the
"fundamental change"
Barack Obama
attacked businessman Marcus McGee
in a bar,
maximum penalty of six months in jail and a fine of $7,200.
fine of $7,200.
Egypt
Gabon and Equatorial Guinea
for January's tournament in Gabon and Equatorial Guinea
Stade d'Angonde in Libreville
the draw
two-thirds of all moviegoers and three-quarters of parents would be more likely to buy sensible snacks from concession stands
the option of healthier snacks with their flicks
85
training ground walk-out in Tenerife last week.
made an unscheduled departure,
Robinho will be fined
Robinho
the war,
and human rights violations has reached the president's desk.
$49,000,
Pedro Zapeta, an illegal immigrant,
returning home
detained, and
$49,000
2005.
al Qaeda in Iraq
al-Khazna village,
231
Tikrit,
Israel's offensive in Gaza,
anti-Semitic propaganda of the Nazi and Soviet eras."
anti-Semitic
the lives of
son,"
Archie Manning
detained after reportedly illegally entering the country
$100,000
The pilot and crew of the flight
lift it out Saturday morning.
frigid
Five million
the festive season."
$10 billion
Zimbabwe's central bank
of food aid in a nation that once exported food to its neighbors, the United Nations says.
"Zack and Miri Make a Porno."
comedy
writer-director's
"small business"
"small business"
excesses
to restore our health.
Robert Shiller
our current problems.
Robert Shiller
McCurry
was violating the prefix "Mc" and that
has won an eight-year legal battle against the hamburger giant.
McCurry
claimed
much, much
A.M.S.P Suppiah and his wife Kanageswary Suppiah.
Memorial Day
Texas
President Obama
the servicemen and women who gave their lives
"gave 200 percent"
doctors drinking, mugging for cameras and brandishing firearms amid the victims' suffering.
committee of the commonwealth's
doctors drinking, mugging for cameras and brandishing firearms
coming into the country illegally,
Hispanic immigrants
Hispanics
Hispanic immigrants
culture war with nativists.
Hispanics
a member of the editorial board of the San Diego Union-Tribune and a nationally syndicated columnist.
a culture war with nativists.
restrictionists
North Dakota,
English,
English-only.
Hispanic immigrants
Hispanic immigrants are
"Beyond Affairs,"
helping to give President Bush a "blank check" to take military action against Iran.
recent vote by Democratic presidential
her vote on the resolution
"flawed" judgment.
support a resolution declaring Iran's Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps, an elite part of the Iranian military, a foreign terrorist group.
make sure that voters understand that on big issues,
a nonbinding resolution. It's not an amendment. It's not a law."
Iran,"
Sen. Hillary Clinton has shown "flawed" judgment.
her vote on the resolution
vote to authorize the Iraq war five years ago.
"flawed" judgment.
April 6, 1994,
Susan Rice
her time in Rwanda working for the Clinton administration.
Rwanda
Rwanda
maintenance workers grading the land in preparation for the construction of a new building
It was not immediately known
shelter
116 cats
Harwood, Maryland.
nut allergies
isolated, stigmatized, or unfairly excluded from activities,
Osama bin Laden
the judge ruled on a lesser sentence to reflect the nearly six years
Ali al-Marri
aircraft struck birds, disabling both engines,
passengers trying to flee the aircraft
the plane was brought down by a flock of birds.
Hudson
left engine,
missing engine from a US Airways jet
to the New Jersey side of the river,
the bus.
Pakistani city of Lahore
gunmen
the user to move between 40 body layers to enable dissection.
"Anatomy Lab,"
more than 3,000
at medical and anatomy students who might not have the opportunity to dissect a real human body,
"A lot of medical professionals, especially in physical therapy and rehabilitative medicine, are using it to educate patients and show them the body parts they're discussing,"
the user to move between 40 body layers to enable dissection.
that most of the ships would be freed by Friday.
additional ice breakers."
coast of Sweden,
1991
Donald Tusk
Donald Tusk
white diamond,
diamond unearthed in the southern African nation of Lesotho
African nation of Lesotho
southern African nation of Lesotho.
478-carat
died
Peter Birch,
allows users to explore the ocean depths from their computers.
Peter Birch,
The fact that you now can explore the ocean through
Peter Birch,
explore the ocean depths from their computers.
Kristina Shannon.
Hugh Hefner
"staying young is
Hugh Hefner
a pair of 19-year-old twins, Karissa and Kristina Shannon.
Hugh Hefner
Lewis Hamilton
Hamilton
Schumacher
Lewis Hamilton
become one of the most marketable sport stars in the world
"People at risk can see Roh's death as an example and say, 'Well if he can do it, so can I'. Neither Roh nor any of the high-profile people who have committed suicide would have thought about this affect. There are a number of
of honor and public "face"
caused by mental disorders, but socio-cultural and economic pressures play a large part.
each case of suicide
traditional concepts of honor and public "face"
is a progress for me, and things are getting better
Kimberly Munley
Yemen,
snipers
Yemen,
Sanaa
buried under recently added concrete at a home in Plant City, Florida,
remains found buried under recently added concrete
luxury industry
has special coverage of one of the world's biggest gatherings of the
luxury industry from Basel, Switzerland,
CNN's investigation
abuse and abandonment at sea
refugees being towed out to sea
refugees
on their rickety boats being towed out
the Thai army has been systematically towing boat-loads of Rohingya
the hard-line military regime in Myanmar, also known as Burma.
refugees being towed out to sea by the Thai army.
"All men dead,"
opened indiscriminate and unprovoked fire at its positions in northern Kashmir
India
indiscriminate and unprovoked fire at its positions in northern Kashmir
India
Ten
Peanut Corp.'s Blakely, Georgia, plant shipped tainted product without retesting.
salmonella
salmonella
not consistent with the subsequent analysis
only after subsequent tests on them came back negative.
positive for the bacteria
confirmed Friday the Peanut Corp.'s Blakely, Georgia, plant shipped tainted product without retesting.
experts
species loss can be reversed.
species loss can be reversed.
agriculture, deforestation, hunting and pollution,
threatening almost one-sixth of Europe's total land mammal population.
agriculture, deforestation, hunting and pollution,
WFP spokesperson Gabrielle Menezes,
succumbing to cold, disease and exposure.
death,"
Somalia, Ethiopia
1977
Polanski pleaded guilty in 1977 to a single count of having unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor.
unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor.
"The medal and the diploma
did not explain
"The medal and the diploma
Ebadi
a call to action against human rights violations by the Iranian government against Iranians
"United for Neda,"
non-violent resistance.
more than two dozen
said 660 Pakistanis entered the country illegally last year.
the former Arkansas governor had "no foreign policy credentials"
Bhutto's death
Pakistan crisis
British Advisory, Conciliation and Arbitration Service.
workers' employers and ACAS,
"unofficial, illegal walk out."
More than six hundred
they no longer have jobs
They returned to work
Saturday,
survivors and relatives of victims in the anthrax attacks,
Federal investigators
in the fall of 2001, Ivins borrowed a machine that can convert wet anthrax, the kind used at Fort Detrick, into dry powder, which was found in the anthrax letters.
source familiar with
lyophilizer
38-year-old "Little Master"
Vincent Astor Foundation,
At least 111 people
the Samoan islands
Ledger
readers
Donal Logue,
CNN.com
"could not be more regretful"
an act of "karma."
another championship crown
cocaine use
a lethal arrhythmia of the heart caused by hypertensive and arteriosclerotic heart disease,"
June 28.
hypertensive and arteriosclerotic heart disease,"
cocaine
Baghdad's Sadr City,
two rocket attacks
a suspect
Stand, Dallas, Texas According
careless cook at a Pig Stand
Fried Twinkie
Louis' Lunch,
careless cook at a Pig Stand location in Dallas
credit card
you to pay an upfront fee, plus a monthly retainer.
National Foundation for Credit Counseling (NFCC),
complaints about debt-settlement firms
debt-settlement firms
increased dramatically
college-aged males,
fights between homeless men
hate crime
is an advocacy group
around child soldiers, refugees, warlords and the International Criminal Court. "Law & Order:
child soldiers, refugees, warlords and the International Criminal Court.
Enough Project co-founder John Prendergast as a consultant throughout the
the United Nations
"Law & Order: SVU"
The Enough Project
Alavi Foundation's interest in the 36-story office tower located on Fifth Avenue in Midtown Manhattan.
links to the Iranian government.
Alavi Foundation
the Alavi Foundation
Alavi Foundation
has effectively been a front for the government of Iran,"
some point in the future,
FAA
about 600 nautical
16 Filipinos, nine Greeks, two Ukrainians and a Romanian,
The M/V Maran Centaurus
91-year
Bialys are a lighter, softer cousin
Ali and Shah
one of the largest mining companies in the world.
the United States Air Force and Defense Logistics Agency
"Most-Wanted List"
FBI's "Most-Wanted List"
had contracts with three companies with ties to Warren Jeffs' polygamous
three companies owned by members of the Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints,
Utah Tool and Die, Western Precision and NewEra Manufacturing.
Bob Maginnis,
who now works with a contractor for the Pentagon, said the department does background checks before signing contracts.
new population of orangutans
Indonesia
Indonesia
in the eastern edge of Borneo,
Malaysia and Indonesia:
Borneo,
have not seen for decades,
30 or 40 years."
Carlos Lage Davila,
for the last 30 or 40 years."
German giants Bayern Munich
considering refinancing
into the mire of enormous debt,
Atlantic.
Hurricane
120 mph
a very small chance
a very small chance
1,500
Zimbabwe's
the Prison Service has not been able to supply adequate rations to inmates.
adequate rations
Pakistan's Swat Valley,
Pakistanis
Those who have left their homes tell of the whole valley being turned into a battlefield as citizens flee on foot, many of them with no shoes.
more than 2 million civilians.
"The people of Swat
Romney
Mitt Romney
"I believe like so many (that) it's Romney's to lose."
Romney
Mitt Romney.
race for second place is much less clear.
allowing some of the energy produced to be shared by businesses on site.
the London Thames Gateway Development Corporation (LTGDC)
sharing of material by-products, water and energy by local industries rather than importing resources from outside
Bradbury
the park
sharing of material by-products, water and energy by local industries
is doing his "patriotic" duty as an arms dealer,
said it would get the ammunition from
22-year-old
international
The company's contract
Efraim Diveroli,
AEY Inc.,
model and television personality
two
Bethpage Black in Long Island, New York,
at Bethpage Black in Long Island, New York,
one of the toughest courses in the game.
The U.S. Open
of Germany's "Holocaust shame,"
further sanctions on Iran
that it does not want the nuclear bomb."
the two-state solution to the Mideast
"The Holocaust fills us with shame,"
the best building in the
In late October,
Norman Foster, Zaha Hadid
Lord Norman Foster, Zaha Hadid and Wolf D Prix.
LONDON,
at the end of the program
Greek ship
Three
Bertrand Bisimwa,
displaced persons
within 12 miles
within 12 miles
hurled rocks at U.N. armored personnel carriers
Congolese
Shon Meckfessel,
illegally entering the country from Iraq's Kurdistan region
four American friends
four American friends
four American friends
Forest Lawn's Glendale
Michael Jackson
Forest Lawn Glendale
Bette Davis
underperforming schools throughout America, are caught in a frustrating and almost comical paradox. They're turned away, shunned, treated with condescension and even insulted by self-serving public school "edu-crats" who treat these institutions like their own private offices
"firewall
that America's public schools often underperform and help cheat students out of brighter futures
that America's public schools often underperform and help cheat students out of brighter futures
"please fire Arne Duncan and let him go back to the basketball court."
to protect their members from the scrutiny and standards
to the final of the Italian Cup,
Milan
"tireless advocate for social justice and one of the first openly HIV-positive Latino leaders in the country."
former New York City human rights commissioner and long-time AIDS
"pioneer" and a "visionary,"
government
the activist group Sea Shepherd Conservation Society.
Japan,
government was providing consular assistance to
Sea Shepherd Conservation
make a citizen's arrest of the Shonan Maru 2 skipper for the collision that sank the Ady Gil,
Trimarco's story
April 3, 2002,
travels around Argentina constantly, educating people about human trafficking, and following up on clues about Marita. She is also raising Marita's daughter,
Veron left her house in the northern Argentine province of
telenovela
chemicals
near Rockford
about 600
The fatality was a woman,
derailed,
A train carrying chemicals
cargo train
international criticism
bong smoking
tells Larry King her son has strong values.
a 62-year-old woman
HIV variants
a 62-year-old woman
Cameroon,
distant friend of the girl's family,
now 7,
"survivalist type"
child pornography,
suspect,
Stiles
in Las Vegas
not aware of anything
Stiles
girl who was shown on a videotape being sexually assaulted
videotape being sexually assaulted in Las Vegas has been found and
who was shown on a videotape being
former swimsuit model
Jasmine Fiore.
teeth had been extracted and fingers removed
breast implants' serial number,
was found Saturday in a Dumpster behind an apartment complex in Buena Park, just outside Anaheim, California.
Jasmine Fiore.
Grant,
officer Johannes Mehserle
he was arrested
Johannes Mehserle,
Oscar Grant III.
Johannes Mehserle,
Oscar Grant III
5-foot-tall, 35-pound robot
technology might not be as far away as most people think.
5-foot-tall, 35-pound robot
the swap deal that saw Zlatan Ibrahimovic and Samuel Eto'o switch clubs
Your own sun-blessed, beach-fringed island
America's business elite
nearly $1 million
inside her old bed
security
security
a wave of people also trying to find the mattress and its contents
gave her elderly mother a new mattress as a surprise gift,
China's human rights
demonstrated against China's human rights
protesters demonstrated against China's human rights
the U.S. Open,
a shoulder injury.
Sheehan hit the deck and played dead.
Norris Hall,
23
29
Sheehan
protect people's privacy
doesn't require an Internet user to actively seek out something they're interested in.
people's privacy
Friday, November 18.
Friday, November 18.
iPhoto 09
photos.
Apple's iPhone
full-body imaging machines
The deployment of 150 of those machines in front-line use at 11 U.S. airports
Nashville
at least 31 people dead
amounts of rain
Salim Abdallah Ashur al-Shujayri, also known as Abu Uthman, and Ali Rash Nasir Jiyad al-Shammari, also known as Abu Tiba.
Carroll's abduction,
two men
Jill Carroll,
Salim Abdallah Ashur al-Shujayri, also known as Abu Uthman, and Ali Rash Nasir Jiyad al-Shammari, also known as Abu Tiba.
lawyers
KARACHI, Pakistan
judges the previous president had ousted,
Bob Dylan, Eric Clapton, David Crosby and John Mayer.
The factory of C.F. Martin
Guitars
unique.
Bob Dylan, Eric Clapton, David Crosby and John Mayer.
Bob Dylan, Eric Clapton,
was established in 1833
participated in physical assaults and failed to report the abuse.
he and others were abused at the Florida School for Boys during the 1960s.
Xe
Xe made
Raytheon, Northrop Grumman, Lockheed Martin Integrated Systems, ARINC
Xe spokesman Mark Corallo.
some of the most gigantic pumpkins in the world,
carving a pumpkin.
fascinating transformation that takes place when carving a pumpkin.
some of the most gigantic pumpkins in the world, going through a metamorphosis from blobs of orange to art as night falls.
(some weighing well over 1,000 pounds).
Halloween
an unregulated environment.
stem cell treatment
there's no telling if they will work or have serious side effects.
projected to grow 35% annually,
outside most polling booths in Colombo
A contingent of 85,000 police
Queues
a tough challenge from his one-time confidante and former Army commander, retired General Sarath Fonseka.
Medamulana,
Queues were large outside most polling booths in Colombo and principal towns,
Target
Target
Gregg Steinhafel, Target president and CEO, said in a news release that month.
more than 4,300
the presence of people, giving
roughly 200 remain,
roughly 200
conservation biologist Le Khac Quyet,
"We think it's very doubtful that it was the result of a terrorist attack, because at the scene, there were no traces of explosives as we know for now,"
The National Transportation Safety Board
crash
Antoine Ghanem,
the coffin of assassinated deputy Antoine Ghamen.
thousands
Antoine Ghanem,
streets of Beirut
anti-Syrian Lebanese MP killed in
to the unit's Minuteman III nuclear missiles,
90
90
this time because of failure to document its handling of nuclear missiles and other critical issues,
Inauguration
Great Depression.
is George C. Pardee and Helen N. Pardee Professor of Economics and
November 5.
Polish
pullout of government security forces
to secure Stancza's release.
the U.S.,
Ethiopian peacekeeping force
two-year
diplomats and regional leaders
regional Islamic extremist groups, some with links to al-Qaeda.
fractured, unstable nation of Somalia.
The United Nations Security Council unanimously adopted a
NAACP
fight lynching's and mob violence.
6,000
drug cartels
secretary for a top prosecutor
1,600
Juarez,
killed police officers,
6,000
violence
pound-for-pound pugilist,
President Barack Obama
President Barack Obama
by several thousand cheering people
left engine found evidence of "soft body impact damage,"
town square in Danville, California,
left engine
Danville, California.
German Bundesliga
the signing of Brazil playmaker Diego from German Bundesliga
Italy captain Fabio Cannavaro is rejoining them after three years at Real Madrid.
Fabio Cannavaro
15 million
Life magazine
Park in Los Angeles, California.
a softer, more innocent 24-year-old budding starlet
lived 2,700 years
cannabis
burned pot
nomadic people,
tomb of a Gushi shaman.
a U.S. helicopter crashed in northeastern Baghdad as
Baghdad,
Iraqi
that a U.S. helicopter crashed in northeastern Baghdad as a result of clashes between U.S.-backed Iraqi forces and gunmen.
a range of options to pregnant women, including abortion.
could advertise abortion
about a range of options to pregnant women, including abortion.
pregnancy advisory services
would be for pregnancy advisory services that
about $200 billion from oil.
almost 16 percent
is estimated to have raked in about $200 billion from oil.
$200 billion
increased almost 16 percent
studying whether remedies like a minimum wage could ease the pain
Saudi
crossfire by insurgent small arms fire,
Afghanistan,
woman was killed
militants,
killed 12 insurgents
conducted by Afghan National Security Forces
is the annual convention in Los Angeles where game companies typically make their biggest announcements.
2012 International Consumer Electronics
weapons.
John Phillip Hernandez and a friend
a quick-firing 7.62-caliber firearm and
government study
for meeting its national security goals
haven" in Pakistan's Federally Administrated Tribal Areas.
deployed its missile defense system in anticipation of North Korea's planned rocket launch.
in the coming days,
sometime between April 4 and April 8.
missile defense system
recently mobilized its missile defense system
sometime between April 4 and April 8.
North Korea
Secretary of State Colin Powell
seize this moment as an opportunity not only to articulate a plan for North Korean nuclear disarmament but to take concrete steps towards a secure and stable Korean Peninsula. The president should use the momentum Clinton's trip has generated to unfold a comprehensive, consistent regional security strategy.
effective diplomacy looks like.
effective diplomacy looks like.
Joseph Cirincione.
then-Secretary of State Madeleine Albright
seize this moment as an opportunity not only to articulate a plan for North Korean nuclear disarmament
"It isn't just the DNA or on one specific thing,"
remains "satisfied"
the family remains "satisfied" with Knox's conviction and believes it was right, short of someone else coming along and saying, "I
Amanda Knox
to overturn her conviction
Afghan President Hamid Karzai
Western pressure
inside Nazi Germany.
350 soldiers held as slaves inside Nazi Germany.
350
horrific
a subcamp of the notorious concentration camp Buchenwald.
taken into custody for allegedly burning four children with sulfuric acid.
of the 7-year-old "is not very good, I don't think. The others are stable."
sulfuric acid
four children
to keep videos and photos
to keep videos and photos related to her death out of the public eye.
videos and photos related to her death out of the public eye.
outside the restaurant's front door,
Testolini's
ballroom,
she hid under her bed for several hours
passed dead bodies in the hotel's halls
Testolini
saw a man get shot to death outside the restaurant's front door,
music icon Prince
Testolini
Coca-Cola
ethical stance
Innocent,
£30 million
Coca-Cola,
Andy Murray,
Roger Federer's
Fabrice Santoro
against the Serb.
Fabrice Santoro
Novak Djokovic
Roger Federer's
Frenchman Fabrice Santoro
Novak Djokovic
6-3 6-2
third round
Fabrice Santoro
Andy Murray,
Dr. Maria Siemionow,
Thomas Culp,
end of British rule in 1947.
60 years.
Line of Control,
2004,
Kashmir
Line of Control,
the peace agreement
"Tower Heist"
He's nowhere to be found in the
Palm Beach,
has been
drug lord Teodoro Garcia Simental, also known as "el Teo," a powerful drug trafficker.
he disposed of about 300 bodies by dissolving them in acid.
have not specifically said whether they believe that all elements of Meza's
about the location of their friends and relatives.
$600
"Teo's stewmaker"
drug lord Teodoro Garcia Simental,
information about the location of their friends and relatives.
Lohan's teeth
"There are so many more important issues the media should be focusing on, such as homelessness, lack of funding for public education and relations between America and its allies,"
Lindsay Lohan's need for a better toothpaste should not outshine more important
Caylee,
evidence
Well, I think he's absolutely right. Billions of dollars is being given to banks and others. You know, once you start using taxpayer money, it's a whole new game. So I absolutely think he's right.
executives
President Obama is trying to solve the nation's economic woes, but it's "trial and error."
Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin
presidential
Sen. Joe Biden and Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin
For Palin, the stakes are high. After skyrocketing onto the national stage and energizing the Republican faithful, the first-term Alaskan governor has struggled recently to regain her footing after several shaky network TV interviews with ABC's Charlie Gibson and CBS's Katie Couric.
weekend arrest on gun charges,
Harris won two
Friday,
a bond hearing Friday,
gun charges,
three machine guns
his bodyguard-turned-informant delivered three machine guns and two silencers to the hip-hop star,
weekend
gun charges,
rapper
six other guns,
two
will remain in custody
Nelly and Kanye West. Harris
won two
derailment of an express train in Russia
was no immediate word on who or what group might have been behind the action.
about 100,
derailment of an express train in Russia
Tehran, IRNA
at least 17
A passenger plane
the northeastern
always no.
trying to kidnap them.
primary custodian
trying to kidnap them.
return
Christopher Savoie
conviction of Peru's ex-president is a warning to those who deny human rights.
Peruvian Supreme
will help give momentum to efforts currently underway in many Latin American countries to bring other human rights violators to justice.
authorizing killings and kidnappings by paramilitary death squads.
for death squad killings carried out during his rule in the 1990s.
visitors to wander the island at will.
secluded coves and mysterious caves,
Kim Francis
Jason Clarke.
there haven't been any reports of an actual bomb."
robbed the banks, often while claiming to have a bomb.
Heather Brown
"egregious"
A CPC designation
13
Obama administration designate them as "countries of particular concern"
Secretary of State Hillary Clinton "a range of specific policy options to address serious violations of religious freedom."
17 women
Mardin province
Three others
bombs and automatic weapons,
Mardin
"I remember him with great affection, and I remember him [as] very solid whenever I hosted the show. ... When you needed him, he was a rock. A real rock,"
Joan Rivers
"Tonight," "Star Search," "TV's Bloopers and Practical Jokes"
Tuesday.
For 30 years on the "Tonight Show"
luxury brand items
world's most expensive apartment
homes
Mall
WWI veteran,
Frank Buckles
to represent
Nick Adenhart and two others,"
22 years of
Los Angeles Angels
three counts of murder,
charged with three counts of murder, driving under the influence and leaving the scene of a crime,
three
ethnic Hutu, backed
of the Rwandan genocide
conflict in eastern Congo.
Congo
Congolese forces
1994
looked like a completely normal landing
completely normal
sunscreens
Food and Drug Administration
penetrate the skin and pose health concerns, anything from hormone disruption to cancer.
its new Helioplex technology provides broad-spectrum UV defense against sun damage.
we underestimated the capacity of our facilities
Creative Steps Day Care
a contract allowing the children to use Girard's facilities this summer,
the Pennsylvania
Adelaide
struck Grant in the upper right arm,
northern Australia
bargain shopping,
cars
"We're doing way more business. The phones are ringing, you know, customers are walking in,"
"Most of the customers right now we see, they don't really have much extra money to ... buy a new car. So that's why they just do repair,"
The C40 group was established in
December.
SEOUL,
"What are you going to do and how much are you going to spend?"
they need to take the lead now in fighting climate change.
woodland burial place in Penwith, Cornwall,
over 100
more than 30
accused Iran of plotting to assassinate the Saudi ambassador to Washington.
the Quds Force's M.O.
"It's sloppy. It's uncharacteristic,"
76 people were killed in the two blasts.
a militant Islamic group with ties to al Qaeda
United Nations headquarters
in Algiers
at least 26,
The offices of the UN High Commissioner
Kaka, Milan's Brazilian superstar
$150 million bid from super-rich English club Manchester City
anger and sarcasm
displayed a mix of anger and sarcasm
Brazilian superstar and a former world footballer of the year,
Kaka, Milan's Brazilian superstar and a former
Kaka
Westham Island, south of Vancouver,
sixth discovered
five feet
including foul play and the chance they could belong to victims of a plane crash.
separated human foot inside a shoe
on the south arm of the Fraser River
multiple possibilities on the origin of the
Before Tuesday, five
a separated human foot inside a shoe
Wally
Wally
super-yacht designers
giant mega-yacht
a full garden and pool, a tennis court, or several heli-pads.
full garden and pool, a tennis court,
Moisture
clouds and haze
will not necessarily stop a show,
Thunderstorms
boat carrying 250 people
for Europe
23
African migrants
Europe off
350
they tried to put the children on a plane to France,
journalists and the flight crew will be freed,
Chad
International
But the four women and three men are
Darfur,
Hundreds of women protest
hopes the journalists and the flight crew will be freed,
Chadian President Idriss Deby
Six
hopes the journalists and the flight crew will be freed,
The Red Cross, UNHCR and UNICEF
are neither Sudanese
Red Cross, UNHCR and UNICEF
Activist Tom Burke
Minneapolis, Minnesota,
FBI
anti-war activists in the Midwest
Financial barriers
Can we cope emotionally and physically with another child?
Republican presidents,
Sonia Sotomayor
Donohue
transformed the global financial landscape, bankrupting established names
European and Asian stock markets fall
crashes nearly 700 points
the global financial landscape,
European and Asian stock markets
international financial system.
a member of the Dutch parliament
Netherlands.
About 50 students
is a member of the Dutch parliament
flag,
brutal horrors
armies from countries who came to help them
the Taliban
U.S. and NATO forces
development to help them earn a decent living and raise their families.
people want nothing to
the App Store.
the App Store.
getting a screen similar to a Windows Phone-style
edit their 3-D avatars,
"A full face-lift that would cost $20,000 in the U.S. runs about $1,250 in South Africa,"
South Africa, Argentina, Thailand, Brazil, Costa Rica, India and Singapore
abroad
medical
more testing is necessary
HIV
by blocking the integrase enzyme,
first of a new class of HIV drugs
by blocking the integrase enzyme,
six
"From orbit: Launch was awesome!! I am feeling great, working hard, & enjoying the magnificent views, the adventure of a lifetime has begun!" he wrote at 4:30 p.m. ET Tuesday.
make repairs.
A seven-member crew aboard
Rosalio Reta and his friend, Gabriel Cardona,
a Mexican
military-style
Just days before his death,
Four months after Davis' husband
MySpace
which sat at 181 on Wednesday, could reach as high as 300.
arsonists
Arson is
is thought responsible for all the destruction in the towns of Marysville and Kinglake.
181 on Wednesday, could reach as high as 300.
Yang
failing to turn around the company.
falling short of reaching an agreement to sell the company to Microsoft.
Yang
June 2007
wasn't our intention
Gaza.
expressed sorrow for the deaths of innocent
at least 19
country's assault on Hamas in Gaza.
end "to the 18-month blockade of the 1.5 million Palestinians in Gaza,"
Xavier University.
Dezmine Wells
brawl between their schools' basketball players.
it would suspend players Yancy Gates, Octavius Ellis and Cheikh Mbodj for six games and Ge'Lawn Guyn for one game.
Yancy Gates, Octavius Ellis and Cheikh Mbodj
it would suspend players Yancy Gates, Octavius Ellis and Cheikh Mbodj
two giant statues of Buddha.
Bamiyan.
Afghanistan's Bamiyan province.
eight years ago.
Kaka
millions of people like me, are being
CBS Interactive Inc.
to 10 percent,
You should be able to
formal reorganization is the
work closely with the Saab management
(CNN)
shed tens of thousands of employees, close factories, cut product lines and wants billions of dollars in government funding
General Motors,
10
Texas
Utah
183
opium and heroin
stop poppy crops and, ultimately, the production of opium and heroin.
stop poppy crops and, ultimately, the production of opium and heroin.
opium and heroin
which is offering seeds, fertilizers and improved irrigation to the region
seeds, fertilizers and improved irrigation
international humanitarian law that qualify as a "war crime."
Colombia
confidential
Colombian military intelligence
neutral Red Cross organization was used in a hostage rescue mission that freed 15 people
French President Nicolas Sarkozy said his "determination is intact" to continue "this battle against terrorism for democracy and liberty."
"The cause is
NATO-led force and Khost governor
"AC Milan
Los Angeles Galaxy
Filippo Inzaghi
northeastern Missouri,
the mayor
Pensacola, Florida,
it had discovered water on the moon,
Michael Wargo,
As June approached, Spieker, 36, was told his hours and commission were being cut as Florida's economy sank.
Trenton, Florida.
information technology
"out in the woods"
Revolutionary
Bahari was accused of propagandizing against Iran,
A Newsweek journalist
arrested
making false accusations against the Iranian
military's suicide-prevention programs.
help for military members, especially for those returning from war.
images of the small girl being sexually assaulted.
7
Roger Bergendorff
Roger Bergendorff
possession of a biological toxin, possession of unregistered firearms
Thomas Tholen
exposure to the deadly biological agent
failing to report production and possession of ricin.
Las Vegas,
failing to report production and possession of ricin.
surtax on incomes above $1 million "would hit very few small businesses."
surtax on incomes above $1 million "would hit very few small businesses."
extending the lower payroll tax rate
citizens to
he has decided not to attend the ceremony.
an honorary degree.
disagrees with the stem-cell research and abortion views
appearance at the May 17 ceremony,
has recently reaffirmed, and has now placed in public policy, his long-stated unwillingness to hold human life as sacred,"
81.
as a comedy writer for radio in the 1940s.
various programs,
comedy writer for radio in the 1940s.
"Tootsie"
green job creation
"green jobs."
creation and long-term transformation of the economy for sustainability and prosperity
retooling of old jobs
"green jobs."
maintenance is
It's less costly to build and therefore to buy
4WD is similar to Full-Time 4WD but it has no two-wheel drive mode.
is the most commonly used system on the market.
less costly
four-wheel drive systems.
a "loser" in a society that tells only the truth.
Ricky Gervais
Ricky Gervais
Islamic Courts Union,
"There are also foreign Muslim jihadist brothers who are fighting side by side with us."
Al-Shabab
for information leading to the whereabouts of Tangena Hussain is $6,000.
missing since October 2
$6,000.
capability to produce energy.
denied offering any such deal
both sides have indicated interest in holding
British, French and German
offered
a deal whereby they stopped killing our forces in Iraq in return for them being allowed to carry on with their nuclear program
Gates,
beer.
police Sgt. James Crowley
about 46,000
Iraq.
in and around Iraq.
179
about 46,000
Basra.
joined the army at the age of 18 and fought in the Battle of Passchendaele at Ypres, Belgium, in 1917.
The last British
Harry Patch
World War I
buried
World War I
acting head of the British government and the wife of Prince Charles,
a year
Miladin Kovacevic
response has been little better.
change.
city's cheap bike-hire scheme, Velib,
bike-hire
Mosque Paris
The latest dance craze to hit the Parisian streets.
Tecktonik:
PARIS, France
10 NATO-led troops
10
International troops
attack on a convoy in western Afghanistan,
10 NATO-led troops
Iran
central bank,
"serious concerns" about Iran's nuclear program
Hamish Parker
by Pablo Picasso
Major Horace Parker,
Major Horace Parker,
concrete
freezing the assets
Exit Control List.
leaving the country.
a list, dating back several years, that prevented some government officials facing corruption charges
Exit Control
government officials facing corruption charges
ABC
"It was on the schedule long before the incident,"
Falcon Heene.
Heene family's first episode
sailed over Colorado on Thursday, purportedly carrying 6-year-old Falcon Heene.
Jund Ansar Allah
Islamic emirate in
Sheikh Abu al-Nour al-Maqdessi,
second place overall, five seconds behind Nocentini,
told CNN that two other people were injured and taken to hospital.
Saturday
married during last year's season finale of the TLC reality show "Sister Wives"
Kody Brown and his fourth
displaced people
"We suffered a lot because shelling was coming from everywhere,"
250,000 to 300,000
displacement camps
Annie Le's
an instance of "workplace violence"
"workplace violence"
the hell do we Republicans do now?
values
"Paranormal Activity
Kumakawa
Royal
Covent Garden, London.
left the Royal Ballet to found his own company
50-meter freestyle world record
50-meter freestyle
Australian Olympic trials in Sydney.
east of Port-au-Prince,
"What we're hearing from text messages, from e-mails is that all along the coast going west and then down south, towns are absolutely destroyed,"
Jacmel,
in the public squares of the densely populated area of Delmas,
Delmas,
United States pays about $160 million a year to buy fuel for American aircraft using the base.
Kyrgyzstan
Niagara Falls
Love Canal.
Center for Health, Environment & Justice.
Only seven states have laws preventing cities and towns from building
Niagara Falls neighborhood
sculpting
heading home
sculpting
Karkare
Crown Prince Sultan bin Abdulaziz Al-Saud,
Nayef bin Abdulaziz
pledge allegiance to him
"Nayef is widely seen as a hard-line conservative who, at best, is lukewarm to King Abdullah's reform initiatives,"
a classified U.S. Embassy cable
WikiLeaks.
The nasal spray version of the vaccine
Are you getting the H1N1 vaccine?
Calvin Borel
Rachel Alexandra
"She's the greatest
Rachel Alexandra
A militant splinter group, the Real IRA,
arrests of three men in the
Lurgan, Northern Ireland.
defied initial expectations.
babies
defied initial expectations.
were born with HIV/AIDS in the 1980s
mothers
antiretroviral drugs
dating, high school drama and rumors.
"the door was standing open."
Timothy B. Cheney
7:56 p.m. ET Wednesday night.
a wayward jet that overshot the runway by 150 miles
overshot the runway by 150 miles
radio communications,"
Frederic Piquionne
ALS6,
Valentine's Day
Logan sports teams,
cerebral palsy.
high school football stadium,
the town's high school football stadium,
speak to an assembled group
hasn't even said a word, and already he's been called a spoiled, petulant child who has lived in a sheltered world of handlers since he was 2 years old.
15,000
Jaguar Land Rover
Jaguar Land Rover
Tata
public-funded bailout
Sainz
Despres' Spanish team-mate Marc Coma
79km
Carlos Sainz
12 of the Dakar Rally.
says pageant officials wanted her to make appearances for Playboy and a gay movie premiere.
she declared her opposition to same-sex marriage
that I was fired.
make appearances for Playboy and a gay movie premiere.
opposition to same-sex marriage
the media
her Miss California USA crown
her crown
80th
Nazis
Jewish persecution in Nazi-occupied Amsterdam
a Nazi concentration camp,
Anne Frank,
pleaded guilty in Superior Court in the District of Columbia
guilty to a weapons charge
one year of unsupervised probation.
every year on a Saturday in June
every year on a Saturday in June
parade
Royal Air Force
The Royal Air Force
Queen Elizabeth celebrates her 82nd birthday Saturday with
the November 29 elections
human rights activists
"remains committed to help restore the democratic and constitutional order in Honduras in the wake of the June 28 coup d'etat that removed President Zelaya and led to the suspension of Honduras from the Organization of American States."
a boycott.
2005,
humanitarian affairs.
the men, one of whom
two men indicted for war crimes
the murder, rape, torture and forced displacement of civilians.
to determine if the only one of the six still behind bars can be released.
Jena High School,
six black teens
Thousands of protesters clogged the tiny town of
1,000
A huge water main burst under a road
basement's
while one
Sen. John McCain,
President Obama's response to massive rallies in Iran
405
meddling in Iranian elections,"
Foreign Affairs Committee Chairman Howard Berman, D-California, and two Republicans, Rep. Mike Pence of Indiana and House Minority Whip Eric Cantor of Virginia.
a massive flood-control project
Napa Valley Wine Train
massive flood-control project
a four-course meal, not including the wine.
Coburn's spokesman
Robaina kept his lands even when many ranches were nationalized
Saturday,
some of the best in the world.
on his farm in the western Cuban province of Pinar del Rio,
the British version of "Big Brother"
"Big Brother"
keep selling
Monday
People in Elkhart
Elkhart, Indiana,
Elkhart, Indiana,
admitted he made a mistake in handling the nomination
President Barack Obama
Daschle acknowledged the political problem he had created for the administration.
Tom Daschle
he's going to crack down on businesses using taxpayer money to excessively pay executives.
oil
Kurt Cobain
Nirvana
Courtney Love,
Courtney Love,
the NATO-led International Security Assistance Force in Afghanistan
the NATO-led International Security Assistance
Pakistan
any impact on ISAF's ability to carry out operations."
July 24.
upgraded the charges on Wednesday.
beaten
Prosecutors said they have not decided
deliberated
was beaten
human skull and crossbones,
another party
as a ballot box,
the skull and crossbones
the most part are better paid than the Afghan security forces,
long-term commitment,"
Afghanistan
U.S. Defense Secretary Robert Gates
the fact that we
Danville, Pennsylvania.
all our care
procedures and operations
this approach encourages teamwork, which leads to better results, less mistakes and increased profits.
"They beat me with a shovel, they pulled my teeth out with pliers, they would go like this and pull it,"
"When he tells me about how they would torture him, I can't tolerate it. I start crying,"
two years
iReporters
racial identity,
he's still not that good with "rows," the cornrow style that braids the hair close to the scalp, he can work other braided styles, twists and an occasional French braid.
the culture,
Maradona watched United trounce
striker
coach
coach Diego Maradona
Manchester United
reversed the collapse of hope and trust that the world's citizens had in America
President Obama,
reach a majority of the world's citizens with his message of hope for a better world.
tend to look at everything from a U.S.-centric lens,
the Nobel panel correctly decided Obama's approach to diplomacy holds great promise.
"Because of Thomas's criminal background, the close proximity of his homes to murder locations, similar victim descriptions [white elderly females] and other evidence that suggests the type of modus operandi used by the suspect, detectives strongly believe Thomas is very likely the suspect in 'The Westside Rapist' cases,"
John Floyd Thomas Jr., 72, may have begun his killings as far back as 1955 and he could be one of the worst serial killers in United States history,
murdered
Maybelle Hudson,
2-year-old
toddler
Riley Ann Sawyers
her mother and a man identified as her boyfriend
Riley Ann Sawyers may be "Baby Grace."
on an uninhabited island in Galveston's West Bay.
"Baby Grace."
Riley Ann Sawyers
The 32-floor
Las Vegas, Nevada,
no reports of major
Firefighters
try and cut the fire off.
was unknown.
the drivers, one after the other, hitting the girl in Foshan, Guangdong province.
Hu Jun,
3,000 U.S. troops
upcoming Iraqi elections
More than 3,000
United States
troop
withdraw all its combat troops from
ordered California to reduce its prison population by about 40,000 by mid-September.
provision that would set up a 16-member
Arizona City, Arizona.
Clem Pellett,
'Wow, what a thing this is!'
solar light
arrived and changed everything.
two years ago.
Solar power
very happy,"
'Wow,
villagers asked, 'What is this?'
GOP
could reap the benefit from their opposition.
could find itself in big trouble.
Julian Zelizer
oppose Obama's plans,
There was no immediate confirmation
North West Frontier Province's government
talks with the North West Frontier Province's government in the town of Timagera
across the Great Lakes area,
forecasters
upper Midwest
shoveling outside his home without gloves for 45 minutes in minus-17-degree weather, Williams suffered second-degree
The weather system, known as an "Alberta clipper," is expected to bring gusty winds, plummeting temperatures and a couple of inches of snow to Chicago, Illinois, on Wednesday morning,
second-degree frostbite,
Grand Forks, North Dakota,
second-degree frostbite,
"Ghost Town"
"The Office,"
often bandied
"It was my voice; it's something I could have written.
Ricky Gervais
"Ghost Town"
anti-social, cynical dentist
sexual slavery,"
40,000
says it freed 4,634 workers last year in 133 raids on large farms and businesses that rely on workers driven to take these jobs by hunger and the empty promises of labor recruiters.
Sudan, Nepal, India, Mauritania
40,000
it freed 4,634 workers last year in 133 raids on large farms and businesses that rely on workers driven to take these jobs by hunger and the empty promises of labor recruiters.
grow our own food
Researchers at the University of Arizona's
agencies with a whole new set of technological and logistical challenges.
need to grow our own food in
the State Department
looking for countries to enforce existing sanctions,
around the world
we think is the network here."
Secretary of State Hillary Clinton and other senior officials in the department
ordinary effort and excellence.
athletes like Lebron James show us the difference between
to your left
Chinese tapas on trolleys
archaeological treasures,
Yasui's hotel
barely 3 kilometers (about 2 miles) of paved roads.
"He will continue to closely monitor these and other global events."
Obama has pledged to make Middle East peace a priority
eight-minute
"He will continue to closely monitor these and other global events."
charges of sexually assaulting women
mischief.
1977
abortion
A dispute over abortion
Rep. Patrick Kennedy,
support for a woman's right
stop receiving Holy Communion
Poland's Legia Warsaw
helping devastate West Africa.
called Costa a "ludicrous man."
a "ludicrous man."
The United Nations' anti-drugs chief
star Amy Winehouse and supermodel Kate Moss,
star Amy Winehouse and supermodel Kate Moss,
their alleged drug use
The United Nations' anti-drugs chief
contributing to state failure on the other side of the world,"
victory in general elections
general elections
currency, stock market and leading banks crashed
people most in need,"
said she and her patients were "abandoned"
involvement in as many as nine deaths at the hospital.
Dr. Anna Pou
Cheri Landry and Lori Budo
'abandoned by their government.'
her appearance
The heartfelt display sparked a groundswell of emotion in the auditorium and around the world,
daddy has been the best father you could ever imagine,"
Paris Jackson,
Michael Jackson's daughter
the event's organizers,
also shocked the event's organizers, who said her appearance was not a planned part of Tuesday's star-studded tribute
whose foreign policy credentials were better.
R-Arizona.
Former Tennessee Sen. Fred Thompson
Pakistan's President Pervez Musharraf
New Mexico Gov.
President Pervez Musharraf
most qualified
Switzerland
persuade the locals to change their crops from poppies
city in Helmand province
confidence and support of the population
Marjah
veterans'
"It's bad for soldiers, it's bad for families,
financial
people fleeing wars in Afghanistan and Somalia,
Afghanistan and Somalia,
people seeking asylum
Afghanistan
not need to skip the ceremony
Soaring oil and food prices and possible steps against Zimbabwe
to attend next month's Olympics
China
his decision to attend next month's Olympics
close to 2 million
one-year, one-day
weapons charges.
one-year, one-day
APOEL Nicosia
kills in Afghanistan
U.S. military
protecting Afghan citizens rather than killing militants.
Washington (CNN)
catastrophe-related medical assistance
"When the economy turns unfriendly,
just about anything you can think of,"
President Obama
utmost concern is providing value to
has a tightly integrated health care system that has managed to dramatically improve quality and introduce innovations, all while keeping costs in check.
a decade later
cancer,
between $16 million and $20 million
gun
November 5
Afghanistan,
Afghanistan's president and President Obama.
al Qaeda continues to enjoy safe haven
build an enduring regional alliance with both countries,
the leaders of both countries
strategy for Afghanistan and neighboring Pakistan,
a 7-year-old girl,
to question
A
authorities
outside Los Angeles.
deaths of five U.S. Forest Service firefighters
Gaza
Cynthia McKinney
McKinney
Mediterranean Sea,
terrorist activities,
medical volunteers
in international waters about 90 miles off Gaza.
Only after the collision did the Israelis come on the radio to say they struck the boat because they believed it was involved in terrorist activities, the captain said.
capital markets will not support
capital markets will not support his plans
FIFA
Iraqi Football Association
Gary Coleman
in critical
concerns about growing insecurity
the Guatemalans
more than 53%
"Let's hope that it's not like it's been with the government in the past, that they aren't just lies. The truth is that it's important that we return our country to the right path. We need security, education, health. We really hope the new president does all this,"
The Oval
"I'd bet we've had every member of Congress and every senator in the restaurant at some point,"
American steakhouse
Charlie Palmer.
Latin American leaders and U.S. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton.
Mauricio Funes
Farabundo Marti National Liberation Front,
inauguration speech
Mauricio Funes
U.S. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton.
AC Milan's
AC Milan's Brazilian midfielder Kaka
Lionel Messi
AC Milan's Brazilian midfielder Kaka
Brazil's
mythic figure with a firm hold on our collective
Ronald C. White Jr.
They both have a real sense for oratory, how less is more; they have a compelling way of speaking.
he embodies the best of America.
lessons Lincoln has to offer Americans of today.
he embodies the best of America.
capable of taking full control of infected
China,
China,
1,300
Dalai Lama's office
GhostNet.
not only search a computer but see and hear the people using it,
Arab League
economic sanctions
economic sanctions
economic sanctions
iTunes,
comic book series called "Mayhem,"
"Mayhem,"
digitally.
first-ever digital comic book
hear that baby's heartbeat
ultrasound
In that moment, Anderson vowed to stay off drugs, something she'd been unable to do in more than a decade
three weeks
Democratic U.S. representative,
the whole book except for the final chapter,
approximately 200,000,
United Nations' data, put the death toll in Darfur at approximately 200,000,
He said the crisis in Sudan's western Darfur region is a "media fabrication."
crisis in Sudan's western Darfur region is a
Lloyd Waugh told reporters. They were among the 50 or so visitors at the Angel Valley Resort near Sedona attending Ray's "Spiritual Warrior" program.
It has Internal Revenue Service
James Arthur Ray,
religious
Pete Sampras and Roger Federer
Sampras and Federer
Bjorn Borg.
win at Les Internationaux de France de Roland Garros
Liberia's amputee football team
hosted the African Cup of Nations and won the tournament.
African Cup of Nations
a deal or trade,
"Of its own genus,"
9
grand larceny, insurance fraud and falsifying business records.
Hasidic Jewish
the afternoon of December 31, 2008.
Robert Phillips
$30,000
into how $30,000 disappeared after special forces snipers shot and killed three pirates, ending the multi-day siege and freeing the captain, who had been held hostage.
into how $30,000 disappeared
the repealing of seven remaining legislative decrees and the immediate lifting of the state of emergency and curfew in the city of Bagua.
Daysi Zapata,
created tension between the government and indigenous communities in the Amazon.
charges in Peru related to the clashes.
abandon further opposition efforts, including blockades of rivers and roads.
decrees
tension
worst flooding in decades,
10
wife and children,
22
are between the east African country of Tanzania and the
between the east African country of Tanzania and the
flight data recorder
One person, a 13-year-old French girl,
the Yemenia Airbus A310
between the east African country of Tanzania and the
35 suspected militants
in Pakistan Federally Administered Tribal Areas.
a bridge
NATO
Khata Kushta area of Jamrod
region between Pakistan and Afghanistan,
wedding
fund her children's education.
Shilpa Shetty.
a standing ovation after the signing of the register.
Theodore Roosevelt's
Obama's daughters
make the White House home
water balloons
(CNN)
to stay away from the Gulf Coast
Katrina
Hurricane Gustav
significant number of
are aimed at helping families like that
Fernando
Fernando was grabbed from a car
Audun Carlsen,
investigated alleged tampering with his computer.
he handcuffed Carlsen to his bed while he investigated alleged tampering with his computer.
he handcuffed Carlsen to his bed while he investigated alleged tampering with his computer.
1-0 defeat
14th minute
Mallorca's hopes of qualifying for the Champions League
Nino
Haleigh's father, her mother and other people connected to the case, including the father's 17-year-old girlfriend, Misty Croslin,
Satsuma, Florida,
blue double-wide trailer
Haleigh was abducted
he didn't even realize he was a part of a health care co-op.
"We can communicate with patients through secure e-mail for routine questions or concerns that in the private world physicians often aren't able or won't do because there's just no motivation to do that. There's no reimbursement. ... Here with Group Health's model, it's all
non-profit organizations,
Health Cooperative
2.9 million people
2.9 million people
India
about $270 million this year.
about $270 million this year.
foreign oil,
Natural gas
about $270 million
natural gas production
Honduran President Jose Manuel Zelaya
Wednesday.
the Honduran congress
111 lawmakers
117th Canadian troop
Trooper Karine Blais,
a female Canadian soldier
north of Kandahar in the Shah Wali Kowt District
codified a de facto gay ban in the military,
the DADT law,
that was reached on DADT
More than 14,000
the mechanisms for ending the gay ban once and for all.
firmly establish the mechanisms for ending the gay ban once and for all.
grant a visa to a female
Shahar Peer
she was "very, very disappointed" to be denied access to the tournament.
Facebook
study by market research firm Nielsen Claritas
affluent demographics
MySpace
manufacturing
Southern California.
here is not for the squeamish.
seized in the eastern Arizona
CNN
Nicole Smith's longtime partner and attorney Howard K. Stern and two doctors
Howard K. Stern
Khristine Eroshevich, 61,
"prescribing, administering or dispensing a controlled substance to an addict."
The young polar bear
their young
last month
polar bear
Lance Armstrong
Paisley, Scotland,
Paisley, Scotland,
invite fans to take part in the event in Paisley, Scotland and
The thyroid diagnosis
sluggish metabolism
thyroid diagnosis
hypothyroidism
Oprah Winfrey
Since 2006,
Paraguay
Brazil
Paraguay.
undergone some radical changes.
Brazil,
4 million
tear,
inflatable floats for babies in swimming pools,
Target, Toys "R" Us, Wal-Mart, Dollar General, Kmart, Walgreens, Ace Hardware
14
leg straps in the seat of the float can tear,
Steve Martin.
is a
everyday life.
to consult with Bettencourt on appealing the ruling and ask that its enforcement be suspended.
her mother was not mentally competent to handle her own affairs.
has been designated her guardian.
a poisonous spider
pet dog.
killed their pet dog.
certain birth defects
to both neural-tube
supplements
The U.S. Federal Aviation Administration
not currently enable a constant tracking of a jet by a ground crew at all times.
keep the planes on vectors,
primarily navigation tools for the crew,
My race
red light
five corruption and two human rights abuse charges.
five corruption and two human rights abuse charges.
Peruvian President Alberto Fujimori
twin daughters.
a son,
surrogate mother gave birth to twin girls
Sarah Jessica Parker and Matthew Broderick
about eight miles away in southwestern Michigan,
Richard Daley,
Monday
Grand Beach, Michigan, near the vacation home of Richard Daley, the mayor of Chicago, Illinois.
topless.
"Everyone's losing their homes, their ties, everything they own. People leave here happy and can't wait to come back. It's nice to see people smile again."
"treat everyone equally."
friendliness
waiters and waitresses serve their customers topless.
Ginni Labree
look at the world from a slightly different angle.
distilled and mindful and careful language that can both give us a moment of pause, a moment of contemplation and that can
Elizabeth Alexander
"American Sublime,"
will not decrease,
March.
propane
to give consumers a clear signal of stability,"
propane
a clear signal of stability,"
a rule change
more skilful players.
PGA
out of the rough.
Tiger Woods
change that will make it harder to play out of the rough.
from the start of 2010 the U-shaped grooves on wedges
retro renaissance:
jewel-like handcrafted chocolates
Hope and Greenwood,
The fight
Pakistan's Army
already suffering residents
"everything is in ruins."
was ready
he has found
OAS.
new leaders
not to pursue legal action against the coup plotters in exchange for their agreement to step aside and not to pursue his Cabinet ministers who are in hiding.
President Jose Zelaya.
the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.
in Iraq and Afghanistan.
Senate.
Sunset Boulevard and Vine Street.
in Hollywood
Bruce
43-year-old
the 43-year-old owner of a real estate company walked into the Carolina First Bank in Greenville, South Carolina, late Thursday with a mask and a handgun.
kidnapping
safely back in the United States
"They start firing before they climb, with AK-47,"
in the Gulf of Aden.
birth rate did go down."
increased numbers of patients coming in for vasectomies.
Dr. Marc Goldstein,
children
vasectomies.
uptick started around November
numbers of patients coming in for vasectomies.
finance
Larry David
Boris Yellnikoff
"You know, he had me at the letter,"
'If you have something better to do'?
American
24-year-old
50.22
50.22
Eight-time
Elle magazine
disappearance of more than $400,000
"happy to cooperate,"
an Elle magazine photo shoot of Lindsay Lohan.
export value of this year's poppy harvest stood at around $4 billion,
opium
the narcotics trade.
Afghan opium trade
Farming
Appathurai
insurgency,
Afghanistan's
urged NATO to take a more active role in countering the spread of the
opium
opium
Taliban stronghold of Helmand,
the insurgency,
in the lawless southern provinces and especially in the Taliban stronghold of Helmand,
Helmand,
"Drug trafficking is a transnational threat, and therefore national initiatives have their limitations,"
east end of the embassy complex.
U.S. Ambassador Christopher Hill
he could confirm only that one round hit, and he said it did not land in the International
weapons were fired or if Biden was near the location where the rounds hit.
this type of attack
Attacking type 2 diabetes
cancer medication.
insulin
withdraw combat troops within 16 months.
on Friday,
withdraw most combat troops
to withdraw combat troops within 16 months.
within 19 months,
late '40s
smoking.
commissioned by the Pentagon and the Department of Veterans Affairs
study commissioned by the Pentagon and the Department of Veterans Affairs
smoking.
commissioned by the Pentagon and the Department of Veterans Affairs
The band's entire studio catalog,
The band's entire studio catalog,
that he lied about
gender tests on runner Caster Semenya before her gold-medal win at the World Athletics Championships last month.
has always denied that it agreed to the tests before the race in Berlin, Germany
Toffelmakaren.
Marc Jacobs
Marc Jacobs
buying green,
Kit of Elsinore
Form Design Center.
Drottningtorget
a woman of "extraordinary intelligence and toughness"
a core vision of what's needed to keep the American people safe and to assure prosperity here at home and peace abroad,"
"a core vision of
secretary of state.
Sen. Hillary Clinton
Internet
high as 33 percent
Jackson's memorial service
an onslaught of traffic.
Michael Jackson's funeral service
Africa and Asia.
11.9
prevent early labor,
North America
in Africa and Asia.
India
mobile court
rural areas
estimated 300 million
comes to the village."
a group of 35 people
"I couldn't help but sob myself."
The local airport has now become a refugee camp,
diarrhea, vomiting, abdominal cramps and sometimes a low-grade fever.
urinated blood.
76 million
About 76 million
washing your hands after handling raw meat, poultry, and uncooked eggs.
diarrhea, vomiting, abdominal cramps
prevent these infections,
the better their chances of getting a good seat.
October 8
Aguilera, Leona Lewis, Smokey Robinson, Cee Lo Green
Los Angeles
The palace with its tombs "reflects technical achievements developed over many centuries,"
Tombs of the Buganda Kings
Kanye West
Dr. Khristine Eroshevich and Dr. Sandeep Kapoor
an illegal conspiracy to prescribe, administer and dispense controlled substances to an addict.
has more used vehicles than any other state
three
The two ballot measures
East German
Merkel
Brandenburg Gate,
German capital
German Chancellor Angela Merkel
Germany
Brandenburg Gate,
Investigators with the National Transportation Safety Board
Nevada
two people aboard
"rough-running engine"
Wash your hands, stay home if you're sick
expects U.S. numbers will grow and recommendations will change depending on
frequent hand washing
swine flu
Hewlett-Packard CEO Carly Fiorina
Barbara Boxer
California Assemblyman Chuck DeVore
The first woman to lead a Fortune 500 company
60
flooding
more than 300
more than 300
of not guilty
High Court Judge Justice Davis
"We have duty to keep cases under continuous review, and following expert evidence from a psychiatrist it was suggested no useful purpose would be served by Mr Thomas being detained and treated in a psychiatric hospital,"
"We have duty to keep cases under continuous review, and following expert evidence from a psychiatrist it was suggested no useful purpose would be served by Mr Thomas being detained and treated in a psychiatric hospital,"
government-run children's home.
abuses at a long-closed government-run children's home.
more than 160
rapes and indecent assaults."
man
Haut de la Garenne children's home.
160 allegations
"a number of historic rapes and indecent assaults."
"I am not without faults and I am far short of perfect. I am dealing with my behavior and personal failings behind closed doors with my family. Those feelings should be shared by us alone."
Woods had an affair
"transgressions"
Sonia Sotomayor
a young prosecutor,
Manhattan's district attorney.
former colleagues
"Americans have a right to know there are serious health risks associated with Avandia and GlaxoSmithKline had a responsibility to tell them,"
has been too cozy with drug makers and has been regularly outmaneuvered by companies that have a financial interest in downplaying or under-exploring potential safety risks,"
GlaxoSmithKline
tens of thousands of heart attacks,
Avandia
third
it could take up to four days contain the blaze.
Angel Island,
three to four more days.
it could take up to four days contain the blaze.
Mexican soldiers, in trucks and helicopters
early Monday morning
of Acapulco
18
two
347-pound
bomb dispersal, recon and other tactical operations.
1989.
1976.
African elephant ivory
New York, New Jersey, Virginia and Texas.
list-making
life's to-do's
Southern Poverty Law Center
Latino immigrants
murder of Marcelo Lucero, an Ecuadorian immigrant in Patchogue, New York.
found a pattern of ethnic intolerance going back 10 years.
"They are regularly taunted, spit upon and pelted with apples, full soda cans, beer bottles and other projectiles,"
Kristy McNichol
longtime girlfriend
"I'm overwhelmed with the love and support of my family, friends and fans,"
More than 80 percent of children in child care institutions have both their parents,
to the orphanage
"Be tough. I am sorry you have to go,"
his mother, Nuraini,
Botox
Selma Blair
Selma Blair,
Selma Blair
Selma Blair
fireworks from a staff member's dad's birthday celebration.
The Sun
"Octopus UFO"
The Falklands,
territory
transport tubes to the Falklands for
The Falklands, known as Las Malvinas in
fully licensed,
appeared to have been
numbered two girls, five boys and the school's headmistress
October 19.
inside his high school
eight
someone posted a message two weeks ago on the Web site,
had been purchased less than a month ago on October 19.
has died,
two girls, five boys
"Just Testing My Gun,"
fully licensed,
high school in
north of Helsinki.
The shooting
two girls, five boys and the school's headmistress at Jokela High in Tuusula,
$34 million
Owens
the controversial wide receiver
that found that people who go to the gym at least eight times a month have significantly lower health costs
people who go to the gym at least eight times a month have significantly lower health costs than those who don't.
Jean Chatzky
Jean Chatzky warns there
generic drugs instead of name brand,
that people who go to the gym at least eight times a month have significantly lower health costs than those who don't.
generic drugs instead of name brand,
Giving to others can
2:30.
2:30.
Robert Hyland.
Michelle May,
"I just felt a real need to be there with my friends, and I just wanted to be
Iranian police
"I just felt a real need to be there with my friends, and I just wanted to be a part of
in Tehran.
AP
2010
best-selling crime writer
Dr. Kay Scarpetta.
Two people
has claimed responsibility
students
Santos
loan deal in order to boost his hopes of playing at the World Cup finals in South Africa
made a winning second debut for Santos as he scored the decisive
Jim Tuckwell
former comrades
blew off his friend's legs
65th anniversary of the landings
he and many of his former comrades
65th anniversary of the landings
Tuckwell
Monday,
30-day
died
by July 31, 2009.
U.S. combat forces plan
in late December,
Aaviksoo
34 troops.
its platoon of 34 troops.
The British government
nuclear weapons
New York Philharmonic Orchestra
northeast of the Fernando de Noronha Islands,
issue a mayday.
Wednesday afternoon inside Paris' Notre Dame Cathedral
assaulting a man
not guilty along with the other defendants.
April 3
on Friday
$1 million
$1 million on the rape charges.
attempted murder, rape and kidnapping
2 tons of Nazi gold and
Nazi gold
almost 2 tons of Nazi gold
stolen items
$700,000 Norman Rockwell painting
Recovering masterpieces happens
14
started a Web site seeking donations.
single mother of 14 children,
donations.
Serie A champions Inter Milan
June 2012, killing off speculation that
Serie A champions Inter Milan
June 2012,
Italian giants
that he could be on his way to Real Madrid.
protesters
"box-by-box details" of the ballots
riot police and the pro-government Basij militia
"box-by-box details" of the ballots
"box-by-box details" of the ballots
Thousands of Iranians congregated and passed through Haft-e Tir Square,
budgeting
a pizza delivery man
Colombian media
Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia donated money to Correa's campaign.
President Rafael Correa denied Saturday that a Colombian guerrilla group donated
investigate the allegation.
an infrared camera, spotlight, loudspeaker and aluminum water cannon
robot
spraying water on people."
barbecue smoker
more than 265,000 people have been evacuated and nearly 4,900 firefighters are battling the fast-moving blazes, which began over the weekend.
San Diego Zoo's Wild Animal Park
Fires threatened the
265,000 people
10 percent
at least 123
Southern California.
a safer location,
wildfires
the federal Agriculture Department will provide fire crews, air tankers and helicopters to fight the fires, and the state will receive assistance grants to help pay firefighting costs.
Wednesday
high school gymnasium in Arnold,
a prime-time news conference in the East Room of the White House.
his 100th
Obama
Tibet.
H.E.A.R.T has worked to set up centers that teach and educate local nurse practitioners, villagers and expectant mothers on how to deliver and care for newborn
combat the high infant and maternal mortality rates in Tibet and around the world.
created One H.E.A.R.T. (Health Education And Research in Tibet) to combat the high infant and maternal mortality rates in Tibet and around the world.
One H.E.A.R.T
community-tailored birth kits.
two contestants.
Adam Lambert
Wednesday night
Adam Lambert and Kris Allen,
Kris Allen,
Wisconsin and Pennsylvania,
speech at the University of Wisconsin
Amin Gemayel
Joe Sterling, David Ariosto, Saad Abedine
1995
conspiracies, the car bombs, the threatening rhetoric and political deadlock are eerily familiar.
Joe Sterling, David Ariosto, Saad Abedine
the old curse of sectarian rivalries?
Lebanon's political actors now find themselves re-enacting scenes from the final act of the civil war 19 years ago. Once again, the term of the president is approaching its end; there is no agreement on his successor. Suspicion and fear are the political currency of the day.
"War of Liberation"
I watched the last throes of
1988,
I had seen people killed in front of me; children orphaned in seconds,
In 1988,
where religion and clan play the main roles threatens to set Lebanon back 20 years.
the cast in Lebanon's tragedy
eight national presidential
Barnett
Barnett,
If I'm playing the surrogate, if you will, if I'm the Republican for a Democrat, I try to prepare myself -- not to imitate; I'm not Darrell Hammond or Dana Carvey. I'm not that talented. But I try to be ready with
the role of
the question,
worked on eight national presidential
during peak summer season
January
to Hawaii from cities in the continental United States
The American visitor, John Yettaw,
an American man
government's action
her lakeside home
an excuse to extend her house arrest.
be released from house arrest
suspect
dismissed the espionage allegations.
European policymakers
European policymakers
have concluded that it is imperative to
that it is imperative to recapitalize Europe's banks and to erect an effective "firewall" around Spain and Italy to reassure markets that if Greece defaults, the crisis will be contained there.
European policymakers
gray wolf
fully recovered.
soon be killed by hunters and ranchers.
no wolf is "sacred"
fully
The gray wolf was officially removed from the Endangered
officially removed from the Endangered
estimate there are 1,500 gray
Nicolas Cage
"G-Force,"
kids
alleged sexual predators
Harris has made 83 arrests of alleged sexual predators
Mobile Spy
Danfung Dennis' documentary
Six months into his third tour of duty
he was wounded,
promotion exam that left too few minorities qualified for promotions.
minorities qualified
expressed concern about the results because none of the black firefighters and only one Latino who took the exam scored high enough to be promoted.
14
New Haven 20
Iowa,
cold.
broken when the temperature dropped to minus 29 degrees
president.
Bernice
Italian
defender
Lyon.
Navy admiral's investigation
the Air Force's reactions to the incidents.
handling of nuclear weapons,
Four officers were relieved of duty
The resignations
Robert Gates
"Focus of the Air Force
report on a Navy admiral's investigation that criticized the Air Force's reactions to the incidents.
Air Force's
a justice who shares his general views about law and the Constitution,
Americans can expect a roaring debate over
oysters from San Antonio Bay in Texas
gastroenteritis, also known as the stomach flu. They are highly contagious,
highly contagious virus.
Vincent Windell,
Kentucky,
Thursday
Vincent Windell,
Vincent Windell, 22, and another man
Boise, Idaho,
walk-in clinics can fill the access gap when patients have an acute problem
Ted Epperly
a license that granted Haddadi permission to play
at least twice
than two dozen times
1993.
$22,000 per patient per year
$22,000 per patient
daily heroin injections
treating heroin addicts by giving them heroin
hormone imbalance
the hormones
could be a symptom of a slew of underlying conditions, including cancer or diabetes.
Apple Inc.,
"hormone imbalance" could be a symptom of a slew of underlying conditions, including cancer or diabetes.
at Macworld Conference & Expo
two of the four Impressionist paintings stolen
Zurich, Switzerland
Impressionist paintings
Monet and van Gogh oil
denouncing him as a coward, a criminal and a stigma on the United States,
2006.
he is "truly sorry
Former U.S. soldier Steven Green
temporary Wal-Mart worker
Bruce Both,
Black Friday,
5 a.m.
Black Friday
hope for those
7 percent.
there is hope for those seeking jobs at job fairs which are drawing big crowds.
South continues to see growth in the oil and gas industries which means more job opportunities in related fields like engineering.
lowest unemployment rates in the country at 7 percent.
Scion xB
an image of youthful vigor, muscularity, agility and strength
The Michigan chapter of the Council on American-Islamic Relations
Judge Paul Paruk
religious groups,
a 2006 small claims case in Michigan filed by Ginnah Muhammad,
the next three were
2005
Seana Hogan
1995
2009
six civilians
20 decomposed bodies in the basement of an abandoned house in Tal Afar,
al Qaeda
Mosul,
in Mosul,
Iraqi army and police
fight against the Taliban and al Qaeda
20
20 suspected insurgents
20
al Qaeda in Afghanistan,
NATO-led service member
NATO members
Rihanna,
Thursday.
Rihanna,
felony counts of assault and making criminal threats,
Zimbabwean president
Nelson Chamisa
Robert Mugabe's
key ministries
power-sharing deal
ZANU-PF's unilaterally gazetted wish list of ministries,
Roger Federer
his sixth consecutive U.S. Open Final
Roger Federer
Flushing Meadows,
stunning
France, Spain, Israel
Mexican and American federal governments
2.
Brazil
Confederations Cup final
two years.
rise above issues of race, age and gender when
Brown,
by the election
same-sex marriage bans
by the election
same-sex marriage
Jim Smotherman, left, and Pat Wright of La Mesa, California,
his wife, Irene,
NBA franchise,
wife,
He was 85.
lead to millions of PCs being hijacked.
opens a link back to its point of origin,
PCs being hijacked.
"several pieces of aircraft equipment
into the Atlantic Ocean,
turbulence
into the Atlantic Ocean,
The plane reported no problems before takeoff,
probably crashed into the Atlantic Ocean,
09/09/09
all 12 Beatles albums in stereo, with track listings and artwork
09/09/09
"The Beatles: Rock Band" video game.
expressed its "grave concern"
the African Union
a peaceful rally, reportedly killing nearly 160 people,
Ian Kelly
58
Nelly Avila Moreno,
24 years with the FARC,
possible retribution from FARC loyalists,
Nelly Avila Moreno,
Nelly Avila Moreno,
Thirteen
had ever been terrorists and expressed gratitude toward U.S. President Barack Obama for working to free them.
including causing a rift between the United States and Britain.
Bermuda;
abuse
abuse toward Christians in Iraq.
abuse
Christian
Goldendale, Washington,
Phillip Paul, a killer
during a field trip to a fair
Phillip Paul,
he strangled and slit the throat of community activist Ruth Motley
had been planning the break for "at least the last several months,"
Japan's largest electronics maker,
Electronics makers Hitachi and NEC Corp., and carmaker Nissan all ended the year with a loss.
his sex life
LBC offices in Jeddah and Riyadh
caused an uproar
New York Gov. Eliot Spitzer
Eliot Spitzer
"As president, I will not support driver's licenses for undocumented people and will press for comprehensive immigration reform that deals with all of the issues around illegal immigration, including border security and fixing our broken system."
Sen. Chris Dodd, D-Connecticut,
sense of humor.
relaxed,
guys, friends, family and charting
my judgment,"
my judgment,"
red tape
to move within a few weeks to improve efficiency by cutting some of the red tape that can frustrate the most fervent of revolutionaries.
video
"There is a strong desire to protect and to gradually increase the incomes and savings of the population, particularly of those least favored,"
"The country's priority will be to meet the basic needs of the population,
Fidel Castro.
"Training Day"
Sundance Film Festival
November 11, 1918.
on Wednesday,
the fires
noon tomorrow [Friday]."
would close to evacuees.
President Bush
in a canyon in the path of the blaze Thursday.
Four bodies were
noon tomorrow [Friday]."
Iran and China
SparesGlobal Inc., was sentenced for lying about an illegal export of products that can be used in nuclear reactions and in the nose cones of ballistic missiles.
SparesGlobal Inc.,
growing
United States will tighten monitoring of export licenses and increase export restrictions on technologies that could have both civilian and military applications
lying about an illegal export of products
illegal export of U.S. military technology
U.S. military technology
Mariah, Madonna,
Pink's
'90s
Robyn,
Sweden's Robyn,
A blast at a busy market in northwest Pakistan killed at least 35 people
The bomb
protection payments
seeking "damages for terrorism, war crimes
Chiquita Brands International
Chiquita Brands International
$7.86 billion
nearly 400 Colombian families
$10 million in compensatory
a pitch-perfect performance, accurately capturing the look, sound and general aura of the United Kingdom's first female premier.
"The Iron Lady,"
offbeat companies fueled by the fantasy football craze;
$1 million.
cherry, Carpathian elm and Swarovski crystal
reverse the Taliban's momentum
the
U.S. troops
Keith Monahan,
he was found in a tub next to a dead body,
still burning,
one count of arson of
on Santiago Canyon Road
Catalino Pineda
lighting a fire
driver of a white truck
Catalino Pineda
14 homes and various other structures.
Santiago
Anthony Riperti,
persons responsible for the blaze.
arson
person or persons responsible for the blaze.
one of five people
fire started,
Catalino Pineda is one of five people
San Bernardino County
Catalino Pineda
Jordan's King Abdullah
Bashar al-Assad
Syria
Los Angeles County women
Police Chief William Bratton,
the "Britney Law"
it would be difficult to enforce.
impossible to enforce.
"ghost detainees,"
documents
the release of Guantanamo Bay prisoners
agencies in hiding internees from the Red Cross.
The Pentagon considered delaying the release of detainees from Guantanamo Bay because of
detainee" program in Iraq and to delay the release of Guantanamo Bay prisoners to avoid bad press, three human
24 hours following
Tigers to lay down their arms and end a quarter-century of civil war.
people
melamine,
started lining up at 5 a.m. Wednesday to see doctors
at least 6,200
6,200
local organizations working on vital environmental, health, and humanitarian issues
Gujarat, Maharashtra, Goa, Karnataka, Tamil Nadu, Andhra Pradesh, Orissa, West Bengal,
We For Change Foundation
India
We For Change Foundation
local organizations working on vital environmental, health, and humanitarian issues
fire dancers, jugglers, aerialists, clowns and musicians
PR firms set up front groups, again using your premium dollars and mine, to scare people away from
Clinton reform plan.
head of communications for one of the nation's largest health insurers, CIGNA Corporation.
negotiations
an off-duty
about 8:30 p.m.,
tried to light curtains
a Slovakian citizen,
A drunk passenger
More than 400
187 women and children
"It's a terrible situation for me. It's a very serious battle -- something I have not seen in my life,"
A ruling
The Justice Department
flights.
cancel flights.
more than 39 inches (99 centimeters)
another 39 to 47 inches
recently drought-stricken
The Canadian soldier was killed
several major recent offensives, claimed
Kandahar
A Nigerian man
was briefed on the incident during a secure phone call with aides, and instructed in a subsequent discussion with security advisers "that all appropriate measures be taken to increase security for air travel,"
FBI
He did not undergo secondary security screening in Amsterdam, an administration official said.
struck down a rule that prohibited U.S. money from funding international family-planning clinics that promote abortion or provide counseling or referrals about abortion services.
CNN's
funding international family-planning clinics
Guantanamo Bay,
Jenson Button and Lewis Hamilton
his fourth
Kimi Raikkonen
Jenson Button
a bomb affixed to his neck exploded.
"incredibly bizarre"
a pizza deliveryman died
a pizza deliveryman
a bomb affixed to his neck exploded.
involved in planning the robbery but balked when he realized that the bomb he
"incredibly bizarre"
involved in planning the robbery attempt
many villages are located within Lore Lindu National Park. "That threatens them,"
1921.
Lore Lindu
Pet Fashion Week New York
dog in haute couture
the dog in haute couture
one-of-kind
canines
glamorous pooches
the dog
couture clothing, jewelry and other accessories for the well-dressed doggie
glamorous pooches
8 p.m.
May 2000
how do you get along when you're fighting for a million dollars."
severe flooding
Bangkok
Tarin Kowt
One Australian soldier, three civilians and Taliban militants were
One
to clear an identified Taliban bomb making facility in Uruzgan province,
Four Australian troops
conflict
Friday
operation to clear an identified Taliban bomb making facility in Uruzgan province,
One Australian soldier, three civilians
Taliban
small arms fire,"
several
team made up of U.S. Embassy security officials and FBI officials met with the men Thursday,
An FBI special agent and two other U.S. government officials from the U.S. Embassy
Matt Ember,
"Get Smart"
in 1965,
"Get Smart"
earned
overthrow Peru's Congress.
his daughter applied for the conditional liberty,
Janet Jenkins
Virginia
visitation rights.
Afghan President Hamid Karzai
U.S. airstrikes
"moral issues,"
leadership.
may be surprised after Election Day.
everybody
may be surprised after Election Day.
"moral issues,"
The captain of a ship
A top prosecutor in Madrid
last spring
the 3 million euro
Friday
opposition Patriotic Front and a major critic of China's investment in the nation.
suspended them without pay pending a department investigation,
co-workers to call 911,
collapsed while working at an Au Bon Pain restaurant in Brooklyn on December 9 and died
suspended them without pay
1979
my recent 12-day trip to Iran to film a public-television show.
European travel guidebooks
Valerie Jarrett
the president has brought about "enormous change."
Leader Mitch McConnell,
a few weeks ago.
is he dead? That one I can't answer because we don't know,"
26,
pro-government Basij militiamen perched on a rooftop.
on amateur video
Within hours,
Eyewitnesses say
innocent victim of the gangs.
the boom in the drug trade between the United States and Canada,
30 miles
Vancouver
America,
they face a less bureaucratic justice system and longer stretches in jail.
Vancouver,
drug trade
natural resources to other investment opportunities and one
support Qatar's growing economy and to co-ordinate the country's real estate development priorities.
to support Qatar's growing economy and to co-ordinate the country's real estate development priorities.
invest in the poorer countries
state-owned
$1 billion
support Qatar's growing economy
support Qatar's growing economy and to co-ordinate the country's real estate development priorities.
co-ordinate the country's real estate development
investing a lot in real estate, not just in Qatar but worldwide.
support Qatar's growing economy
co-ordinate the country's real estate development priorities.
guaranteed gay and lesbian couples the "basic civil right" to marry.
voter-approved ban on same-sex
California
November
"basic civil right"
the Irrawaddy
deep in the waterlogged jungles of Bangladesh.
almost 6,000
are man-made. The construction of dams has reduced the flow of fresh water in many parts of Bangladesh. And the population is dwindling because the dolphins sometimes get caught in fishermen's nets.
one of the world's rarest species of freshwater dolphins,
jungles of Bangladesh.
The paper said the trip had caused fury among some in the military who saw it as a waste of time and money at a time when British forces are thinly-stretched, fighting in Iraq and Afghanistan.
the maneuver was part of a planned training exercise designed to help the prince learn to fly in combat situations.
the Wilsons' 21-year-old daughter Katie
travel to Haiti
Thursday and Friday.
organizing relief efforts.
Haiti
Vietnam and Cambodia.
in Vietnam and Cambodia.
Sea of Japan,
getting trapped in them, tearing holes and ruining catches.
ruining catches.
6 feet (1.83 meters) in diameter
swarms of giant jellyfish
Nomura's
22 million
the Obama administration,
Citizens for Responsibility and Ethics in Washington and the National Security Archive
White House
ability to produce hundreds of thousands of gallons of drinkable water
Port-au-Prince
the Damazin airstrip.
an investigation into the bombing Thursday of the Yida refugee camp in South Sudan's
four new helicopter landing pads, three helicopter gunships and an Antonov,
Latino voters
Latino voters
the administration's deportation policies,
disapproved of the administration's handling of
2-to-1.
a firekeeper
prayer and purification rituals
"sweatbox"
non-Natives should be allowed to adapt traditional ceremonies.
The technique of releasing the heat is done with great care so that no one is injured by the steam,
963 million
40 million people
40 million
of 40 million
us transporting material back and forth,"
"They start firing before they climb, with AK-47,"
He said he and the ship's chief engineer took one of the pirates hostage.
Crew members of the Maersk Alabama,
The United States
Executive Order 13382
freezes
in a Philadelphia facility,
a great dad he was."
Two months later,
time for kids to play together and pay homage to their loved ones' sacrifices.
"I try not to think about the bad stuff,"
killed in action in Balad, Iraq.
the pope has the support of those who work in schools, hospitals and care centers, including 400,000 priests.
checked himself into a VA facility
guilty for 40-something years."
Bob Konrardy
to hand out the 95 pounds of goods and kick back with the soldiers at base camp, collecting their stories and gathering video to give to their families back home.
11
Iraq.
Bob Konrardy
Drs. Dean Lorich, Soumitra Eachempati and David L. Helfet.
13-member team of surgeons, anesthesiologists and operating room nurses, with a massive amount of orthopedic operating room equipment,
we found about 750 patients lying on the floor.
Haiti
massive amount of orthopedic operating room equipment, ready to be flown directly to Port-au-Prince on a private
a massive amount of orthopedic operating room equipment,
hospital in the Port-au-Prince area
"Obama '08" logo
Obama logo, the word "hope,"
Washington's tattoo parlors
very inspired
an orbital ring with a blue bead
Obama logo,
$70.
the chemicals
have not been decontaminated and continue to threaten residents' health.
around Abidjan, Ivory Coast,
that the chemicals did not harm anyone.
three-month-old standoff between the government and farmers.
she lamented "the reaction of some who refuse to contribute in the redistribution" to "those who have least." She apologized, however, at the close of her speech for offending anyone.
"It is impossible to attack the problem of the poor without distribution of revenue and without touching extraordinary profits,"
public works
repeal of an export tax.
top female vocalist
Trick Pony.
stop being so nice.
being taken seriously as an artist
Heidi Newfield
five
$54 million
"We are very happy with the result and thank everyone for supporting us,"
sued a dry cleaners for $54 million over a missing pair of pants.
rejected an appeal filed by a former administrative law
filed by a former administrative law judge
U.S. Supreme
Marseille
in 2003/04.
cash-strapped Primera Liga side Valencia
has returned to French football after
cash-strapped Primera Liga side Valencia
we are at war with extremists
Al Qaeda militants
Yemen's capital, Sanaa,
Mumbai, India.
"America was just fantastic,"
"The food
"Slumdog Millionaire."
Azharuddin Ismail
6,000
on June 8 and 9
overlooked by pharmaceutical companies
American
tornado
out of service because of storm damage.
Catholic and Protestant
Former college basketball player,
online through bebo.com
Catholic and Protestant men
young Catholic and Protestant men
online through bebo.com
online through bebo.com
Former college basketball player, Michael Evans, 26, in partnership with another basketball player, Dave Cullen, created the
online through bebo.com
FIFA
"football" or "soccer"
Football or soccer?
Football or soccer?
Football or soccer?
"Guiding Light"
Among the actors
NBC radio
CBS network
soap opera
A stone circle
the color of the 25 Welsh stones
part of a funeral route.
giant blue
A stone circle discovered near
12.
"shoot targets."
Darfur.
Darfur
Victor Fasolino
John Coonrod,
atop a house they helped build
Pikesville, Kentucky.
a love of volunteer work
10
"It's really hard to pin down a best memory,"
August 1969.
"It took you 10 years to realize you were part of history,"
payment history
you'll have less of a payment history
Oprah.com:
Jenny
Gov. Mark Sanford,
extramarital
Wall Street executive before she married Mark
Indonesian arm of the al Qaeda
Americans with ties to the Indonesian Chamber of Commerce and Industries, known as Kadin.
group claiming to be the Indonesian arm of the al Qaeda terrorist network
Americans with ties to the Indonesian Chamber of Commerce and Industries, known as Kadin.
Americans with ties to the Indonesian Chamber of Commerce and Industries, known as Kadin.
for lederhosen, weisswurst and its beer festival,
no other state in Germany boasts its own "national museum."
don't have to kill them to do it,"
to do all the research that you need to do and understand everything that you need to
Hidenobu Sobashima
The move toward legal action
Japanese
injuring two firefighters,
a cut of 40 percent in carbon emissions by 2020 is vital to avoid severe repercussions,
carbon emissions
leaders of developed nations
Three people
school in Pakistan
Islamic religious
school in Pakistan
last
only child. She was one of five NIU students killed on Valentine's Day last year by Steven Kazmierczak,
Steven Kazmierczak, a former NIU student
Steven Kazmierczak,
Steven Kazmierczak, a former NIU student
front row
urged the leaders of Madagascar to resolve their differences
more than two dozen
Andry Rajoelina, the mayor of Antananarivo,
an ongoing dispute over who is in charge of the government.
turned violent and left more than two dozen people dead.
more than 300.
restraint on all sides."
airport in Nuevo Leon
Cessna 550 airplane, two cars, a large quantity of drugs and cash, firearms and a hand grenade.
airport in Nuevo Leon
a large quantity of
Ryan's
GOP Holy Grail.
"The Ryan road map
House of Blues
Lana Clarkson
mouth.
in the mouth.
Lana Clarkson
not testify at his five-month murder trial.
marks the 60th anniversary of the U.N.'s Genocide Convention,
nations of the world pledged to prevent and punish future attempts to eliminate ethnic,
Canadian Lt. Gen. Romeo Dallaire,
to win heavily at Shamrock
out of the Europa League
June 17
first four
Whitney Houston
400 million dollar
Los Angeles and the industry
box office revenues
or an outfit can be worth $1m in publicity for a jeweler or fashion house.
a new injection of cash with a boost in DVD sales and renewed interest at the box office.
but a whole hinterland of ancillary trades
400 million dollar
Kashmir.
there is no incident from our side of any kind,"
six
cease-fire breach in Kashmir.
10 mph (17 kph)
winds near 155 mph (250 kph),
southern Baja California peninsula
the inauguration
cold
little millinery
There's a love affair going on with the country and Barack.
Tiger Woods
19-15
"trades appointments to commissions for checks for $50,000"
Chicago Alderman Richard Mell,
Rod Blagojevich's fundraising chief, Christopher Kelly,
the 1970s Khmer Rouge regime,
Another work, Leang's "Prison Guard," tells the life of Duch, a former teacher who ran S-21 and goes on trial Tuesday before a U.N.-backed tribunal on charges that include crimes against humanity.
a former teacher
14
PASOK and the conservatives join in a longer-term grand coalition, or unity, government.
bargain harder with Europe on any deal.
referendum on the latest bailout
Papandreou's
A confidence vote in his government
a video message threatening attacks in the country.
vowing attacks if the elections do not come out the way it wants.
German Chancellor Angela Merkel
keep a low profile
those who espouse King's dream
to be reminded of the concerns of the African-American community,
"amazing"
African-Americans
"I said, 'I haven't changed.' They said, 'Yes, you have. You're in charge,'
"march now more than ever before."
3.4 percent
prompt Asian countries to expand their economic base and not be as dependent on exports,
Asian countries to expand their economic base
economic growth in developing Asia will slip to 3.4 percent
economic growth
3.4 percent in
ambassador
tensions between the two countries over a June 28 military-led coup in which Honduran President Jose Manuel Zelaya was replaced by congressional leader Roberto Micheletti.
Ortez
Honduran President Manuel Zelaya
during movies.
only text in the bathroom.
Brad Pitt offers etiquette for the digital age.
"No, you can't talk on the phone!"
"How to Behave: New Rules for Highly Evolved Humans"
big-fight debut on American soil,
the Toyoda loom works in Kariya, Japan; When it turned to car production, the Toyoda family changed the 'd' to a 't' to make it simpler and more elegant in Japanese script.
Chevrolet
construction
Italy.
claim last month's presidential election was rigged.
protesters claim last month's presidential election was rigged.
March 20,
burned the vehicle,
Freedom Square
Levon Ter-Petrosian
The protesters claim last month's presidential election was rigged.
Opposition presidential candidate Levon Ter-Petrosian lost to Prime Minister Serzh Sarkisian,
"huge chaos"
bled to death
heart attack,
2000.
break from campaigning
Biden,
turn out for Obama on Election Day.
take a break from campaigning
are profoundly grateful for the support, love and prayers of everyone,
Canada.
food bank.
it sent two tons of cereal with his face on it to a food bank.
about 3,000 boxes
two tons of cereal
don't care or worry
to ignore the brand name and really go with
make sure you're in a good financial position.
career or a job path.
"tests" of President Obama that Joe Biden warned about during the campaign.
environmental and political events.
women voters
349-163
Obama's
women voters
African-American voters
11 counts of corruption.
13
Friday
Louisiana
11 counts of corruption.
pending appeal.
$400 million
January,
Loaves and Fishes
January,
gambling debt
Law enforcement authorities
basketball players drew guns
Gilbert Arenas and Javaris Crittenton
a three-time NBA all-star,
A series of bomb attacks
325-member parliament and select Iraq's next government.
series of bomb attacks
Angeles-area man has been charged with murder in the death of his wife while on a cruise
Robert McGill,
murder in the death of his wife
55,
the justices rejected the appeal of Kathryn Nurre,
declined to intervene
3-2 victory.
Premier League Fulham
reconnect with loved ones.
to allow the former captives some space.
the media to allow the former captives some space.
"Let us go home and be family
Keith Stansell, Marc Gonsalves and Thomas Howes
South American country.
family members
CNN's
"They're just not good for our health,
healthy school lunches, elimination of trans fats, the need for healthier food in urban communities and the importance of supporting community-based efforts
altogether
solutions to America's obesity crisis.
Gupta
Fit Nation Summit.
help educate people about the importance of a healthy diet and exercising together.
Obesity is the No. 1 health crisis in the United States, and the nation could be
Shannon Stone,
fell over a railing
blunt-force trauma,
"The statue, which is tentatively to be named Rangers Fans, is expected to be in place for the 2012 season,"
sent 310 documents to the tech site,
Twitter administrator's personal e-mail account
310 documents
Twitter employee's personal e-mail
ending eight years of Socialist rule.
"I was a young woman in the public eye, on the receiving end of a lot of attention, and I was trying to protect myself from men who were using their power in ways I was too young to know how to handle."
"Disappointment, sadness
Alanis
"Disappointment, sadness and pain
she's no longer starving herself and has begun to look at eating as "a sort of spiritual practice."
anorexic and bulimic,"
died last month
Lt. Col. Lee A. Archer,
Archer Asset Management,
the Distinguished Flying Cross.
Sri Lankans
Mohammed Sultan Nafeek's teenage daughter
the 2004 tsunami.
Saudi Arabia to work as a housemaid to support
4-month-old baby boy
killing a 4-month-old baby
the child died accidentally, choking on milk.
killing a 4-month-old baby boy in her care
Food and Drug Administration
albeit remote
2.5 million
Colombia, Ecuador
Ecuador
Colombia, Ecuador and Venezuela.
rebel camp in neighboring Ecuador
that the Colombians can take care of themselves,"
the Ecuadoran people."
thousands of feet above the city
kite,
several years, and they seem to be working on much shorter timelines.
Up near the jet stream above New York,
at least 13
at least 13
recent rumors about his health and about a comeback.
scheduled a news conference Thursday at London's O2 arena,
Michael Jackson
about his health and about a comeback.
London's O2 arena,
Ruben Rodriguez Dorado,
three
Michael Jackson Apodaca,
he would likely be killed,
his fellow cartel members
victim's cell phone
"When I heard that the crew members who had been shot were going to be fine I started to think like the businessman and the producer,"
the heat and the weight of the suit,"
Four
shooting political thriller "Kandahar Break" in late 2008.
Charles Barkley
a breath
put myself in that situation.
"Payghambar-e Azam 4" or "The Great Prophet 4,"
medium-range
parts of Europe.
"Payghambar-e Azam 4"
landing
40 years
brace ourselves and probably brace ourselves pretty hard.
Chesley B. "Sully" Sullenberger,
on a paper on error and aviation,
since 1980.
New York Mayor Michael Bloomberg
78 people
to abandon the death penalty.
have the same surname,
hoping for entry into the Guinness World
all their players have the same surname,
all their players have the same surname,
grown to more than 50 locations nationwide
2005,
Nominations are open at CNN.com/Heroes
he helps wounded soldiers through fly-fishing
Nicholson's program has grown to more than 50 locations nationwide
data recorder and cockpit voice recorder
dozens
Denver International Airport
Boeing 737
the flight data recorder and cockpit voice recorder
Thirty-eight people were taken to hospitals
200 yards from the runway,
data recorder and cockpit voice recorder
Bangladesh military
in Ciudad Victoria, the capital of Tamaulipas state in northeastern Mexico,
in Ciudad Victoria,
Televisa
near the TV station's office in the city of Monterrey
Marxist rebels with the Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia, known as FARC,
an undetermined number
Colombia,
Guerrillas in Colombia
The guerrillas tortured and killed 17 Awas, including at least two minors,
2003
southern
camp in the northern part of the war-torn area,
security
Sudanese government forces,
a brutal counter-insurgency against militias for the past six years,
the Sudanese government.
camp in the northern part of the war-torn area,
The area, which borders Texas,
Five presumed drug gang members and one soldier were
Fossett
walked 30 miles to get help after making a forced landing.
600 square miles.
design his Dallas home,
"sleeping porches" that required his client to sleep outdoors year-round.
sleep outdoors year-round.
she ranked herself as the philosophical equal of Aristotle and Thomas Aquinas.
"spitting in your own face."
Salvador Dalí
outdoors
Everybody Else.
The story of his father's transformation
Steven
Now, though, I am very proud of my dad.
at 8 and 11 p.m. ET Saturday on CNN.
In 1990, Thomas
seven counts of knowingly transferring the HIV virus,
possible life in prison
knowingly transferring the HIV virus,
faces possible life in prison
possible life in
$15 billion
virus found in healthy Australian honey bees
bee colonies
Australian honey bees
virus
Colony collapse
$15 billion
Australia.
virus found in healthy Australian honey bees
virus
$15 billion
IAPV is acting alone,"
new tour.
at a Grateful Dead concert when he literally bumped into
at a Grateful Dead concert
Diane.
Grateful Dead.
more than 125
more than 200
more than 200
who now makes moccasins for a living,
does the Grateful Dead mean to you?
has found nearly 200 new species of frogs in Madagascar.
the unstable political situation in Madagascar
80 percent
between 129 and 221
unstable political situation in Madagascar
Rust's boyfriend, Joshua Steven Durcho,
Joshua Steven Durcho,
the service at Redlands Community College
Redlands Community College
Military forces from various countries, including the United States,
allowing military forces to chase pirates onto land in cases of "hot pursuit."
"the increasing problem that this is. The pirates are a threat to commerce, they are a threat to security and perhaps most importantly they are a threat to the principle of freedom of navigation on the seas."
"Flights by other countries' strategic aircraft continue and this creates certain problems for ensuring the security of the Russian Federation,"
"We have decided to restore flights by Russian strategic aviation on a permanent basis,"
14 strategic bombers had taken off simultaneously from airfields across Russia in the early hours of Friday on long-range missions.
other countries' strategic aircraft continue
security threats
security threats
security
President Vladimir Putin
regular basis.
regular patrols beyond its borders.
bomber aircraft on regular patrols beyond its borders.
"Militaries around the world engage in a variety of activities, so this is not entirely surprising,"
assertions by CNN's Christiane Amanpour that his policies have driven the nation once known as Africa's breadbasket to virtual economic collapse.
"unjustifiable."
Christiane Amanpour
Zimbabwe President Robert Mugabe,
"There was going to be no tomorrow."
the massive earthquake struck,
sitting on a low concrete wall.
a three-bedroom home
Jurassic-era
opalized green, blue, yellow and red ammonite fossil
the 150-million-year-old, 9-foot-long dryosaurus would sell for as much as $500,000,
skeleton of a teenage woolly mammoth
close to $50,000.
150-million-year-old, 9-foot-long dryosaurus
An 18,000-year-old, 7-foot-tall and 15-foot-long skeleton of a teenage woolly mammoth from Siberia
devastating earthquakes in Indonesia,
rubble
United Nations officials
Saturday.
30,000
30,000
"I feel as humbled as a mouse."
"Honor Flight"
"In another five to seven years, our efforts will be a moot point because they will be gone or too infirm to participate in a mission like this,"
more than 30,000 veterans
Roderick Anthony Burton II,
Beverly Center mall in Los Angeles,
Rap artist Dolla
murder of rapper Dolla
21-year-old
21-year-old
the busy parking lot of the upscale Beverly Center mall in Los Angeles, California,
an Alabama military base
9:20 a.m.
Sunday,
bus carrying members of a Marine Corps Reserve unit
members of a Marine Corps Reserve unit
A bus
members of a Marine Corps Reserve unit
23
Sunday,
passengers, members of E Company, Anti-Terrorism Battalion, 4th Marine Division, had
criminal activity while
conspiracy, bribery, fraud, money laundering and filing false income tax returns.
Langford is named in 60 counts of the superseding indictment;
talk
Larry Langford,
Jefferson County Commission
captive animals in two of China's major panda reserves were alive,
China's
believed to be safe
protein biscuits
after Monday's earthquake,
nearly 1,000 pounds.
30.
Faith,
nearly 1,000 pounds.
criminal charges,
Scott Kimball
Scott Kimball
discovered Monday in a remote Rocky Mountain pass near Vail, Colorado.
will the all the hoopla translate into tangible change for black models in the fashion industry?
"Black Issue"
models of color from the past and present,
be judged a resounding success.
a first gold medal in Saturday's final event.
5,000 meters speed skating
92 percent
rape
surveyed, 92 percent reported some kind of sexual violence, including rape.
8-year-old
valedictorian from New Kent County High School and
white male, who is 5 feet, 10 inches tall and weighs 160 pounds.
22-year-old Virginia Commonwealth
with a fellow VCU student and her friend in an apartment on 139th Street near Riverside Drive in Harlem,
the use of a government airplane
60th
government airplane
January 1991,
1991
Jacksonville, Florida,
Jacksonville, Florida,
U.S. Navy pilot Scott Speicher,
visually impaired
BEGIN program.
confidence.
for a celebration of what would have been
survivors and families.
tireless advocate for the families whose lives were forever changed on that September day."
became a tireless advocate for the families whose lives were forever changed on that September day."
September 11 victim
co-founded Voices of September 11,
Buffalo
skeptical
new energy economy that will build millions of jobs."
be economically competitive
keeping his daughter in a cellar for decades and
life in prison.
rape, incest, assault, and deprivation of liberty, Sedlacek's office said.
murder
about five days
David Shafter,
at the International Consumer Electronics Show,
30,
windpipe
stem cells
Saturday
unsafe U.S. beef.
South Koreans
government's policy on U.S. beef imports
United States
Celtic
Bayern Munich
risks presented to players in Pakistan
the International Cricket Council (ICC)
push ahead with a tour of India
tour Pakistan
South Africa
green roofs can help alleviate the problems caused by storm water
centuries:
can help alleviate the problems caused by storm water
centuries:
help alleviate the problems caused by storm water
10
alleviate the problems caused by storm water
Suicide bombers
Suicide bombers
Suicide bombers
Declaration of Independence,
Britain's
Britain's National Archives,
to the British government
Robert Baden-Powell
40,000
Scouting founder Robert Baden-Powell
Barack Obama
"I have never had a president who inspired me the way people tell me that my father inspired them," she wrote. "But for the first time, I believe I have found the man who could be that president -- not just for me, but for a new generation of Americans."
vacated by Secretary of State-designate Hillary Clinton.
media attention
served as junior senator from New York
ever intentionally losing a match or taking a bribe
accepted a $398,000 bribe to throw frames in future matches
the 34-year-old accepted a $398,000 bribe to throw frames in future matches
52
a torrent of water
Friday,
get into the houses, but the problem is, mud is getting in our way,"
water rushing out from the dam's lake,"
near Indonesia's capital
killed at least 52
up to five years
8-foot
$18 billion.
covering up "an epidemic of corruption" in Iraq.
Rep. Henry Waxman's
$18 billion.
Rep. Henry Waxman
Terminal C,
never located;
C,
A security breach at Newark Liberty International Airport
CNN's Alina Cho,
passengers who had already boarded outgoing flights had to get off planes to be rescreened.
when the child is due.
Keys' fiance, producer/DJ/rapper
election
Bob McDonnell
first openly gay mayor.
containing large volumes of Clinton administration records, including the names, phone numbers and Social Security numbers of White House staff
it contains "more than 100,000" Social Security numbers,
it contains "more than 100,000" Social Security numbers,
information leading to its return.
Condit
if he could be honest about that part of the story,
the first interview with Gary Condit,
had been having an affair
the California congressman at the center of the Chandra Levy media frenzy.
Connie Chung
The former Washington intern,
$700 billion
bank
U.S. President George W. Bush and Treasury chiefs,
Treasury
bolster the ailing U.S. financial system.
to buy troubled assets from banks,
a plan to buy troubled assets from banks,
"like a cat with 11 fingers"
floodlights of the
Saturday
Egyptian pyramids, Vatican, Niagara Falls, the Eiffel Tower, the Empire State Building, the Acropolis
45 nautical miles (83 km) southeast of Port Chiapas
that it rescued five Ecuadorians who had
five Ecuadorians
of the southern state of Chiapas.
he anticipates a hearing before a judge
has not spoken to
fourteenth suspicious fire in a month's time
Authorities in the city
fourteenth
British Airways
The 16-year-olds
customs officials at Accra
two teenage girls from Great Britain
Accra
cocaine
115 delegates
taken the county by 12 percentage points.
MADRID,
6.5 million euros ($8.5 million) in humanitarian aid to Gaza.
6.5 million euros
Spanish capital.
MADRID,
was not available and told Muhammad she could remove the niqab or have her case dismissed.
remove her hijab,
the technology might not be as far away as most people
5-foot-tall, 35-pound robot
technology might not be as far away as most people think.
"To me, it's not even a question of the technology. Technology always catches up,"
"Surrogates,"
promoting hatred or by causing more pain.
at the campus
"Volunteer at a school. Go help a neighbor. Be courageous in speaking the truth and in holding people accountable. Work toward changing the atmosphere in our schools and in this community
CNN
"Unless someone is a really good con man, those reactions are extremely helpful.
affect voters' subconscious thinking,
tap into a voter's subconscious.
Drew Westen
how brains react to messages.
economic cooperation.
worldwide economic cooperation.
hold his second prime-time news conference
sexually transmitted infections,
sexually transmitted infections
penile cancer,
not breathing,
was digging a tunnel with friends on a beach in Ocean City, Maryland, on Tuesday when part of it collapsed on top of him, authorities said.
to be wary of alienating teachers who can be his allies on education reform.
make education a high priority for his administration.
make education a high priority
the disappointment and hurt that my infidelity has caused to so many people, most of all my wife and children,"
Professional Golfers' Association Tour
organized crime,
Arizona's new law
Arizona's new
climate change and organized crime,
Arizona's new law
provides free tutoring, instruments and music instruction to more than 100 students.
work with tutors on schoolwork, practice their music and eat a hot meal before heading home.
His program, The Roots of Music,
Tabb's program provides free tutoring, instruments and music instruction to more than 100 students.
Derrick Tabb
masked man with an AK-47
the Grand Slam,
Popeye's?
the Grand Slam,
McDonald's and In-N-Out,
education, infrastructure, energy
$150 billion
Sen. Barack Obama
Sen. Barack Obama
$60 billion
McCain
Arlington National Cemetery's Section 60,
in Iraq and Afghanistan.
walk slowly between the rows and rows of headstones, looking for a familiar name.
final resting place
3 p.m. Monday
pause in stores nationwide
a minute on Memorial Day and honor those who have died in the cause of freedom.
reclaim Memorial Day as the sacred and noble holiday it was meant to be.
remember the fallen.
"The security environment in the country continues to be uncertain,"
The Islamic extremist group Harkat-ul-Jihad-al-Islami
crude bomb."
drawing of the Muslim prophet Mohammed with a turban shaped as a bomb,
ax-wielding Somali man
Kurt Westergaard's
Kurt Westergaard's
the attack
Danish political cartoonist
the Israeli partnership,
the Midwest without power,
A tree pulls on utility lines Wednesday in Louisville,
northwest Arkansas
Iraq's Anbar
Iraq
of Baghdad;
Iraq
Anbar province
Iraq invaded Kuwait in 1990.
That invasion resulted in the United States' launching
Mohammed Hussein Bahr Al-Ulum
"little flimsy houses"
four tropical storms damaged the transportation infrastructure and agricultural sector,
felony hearing,
to a felony hearing,
beheading his estranged wife
practice field collapsed during a heavy thunderstorm
About 70
About 70
Cowboys staff
Two or three suffered serious
joked that Booker's plan to improve citizens' health care
outlawing O'Brien from the entire state.
Conan O'Brien
poor weather in central Florida
Edwards Air Force Base in California's Mojave Desert
Friday
watch to see if extreme moisture and lightning threaten a safe landing.
Friday
Edwards Air Force Base in California's
at 7:23 p.m. ET;
in Florida
There are two chances to land Friday evening in California.
bargain stores
During rush-hour
Dean Richards
Dean Richards
his role as the orchestrator of the plan
a fake blood injury to one of his players.
disciplinary action after a hearing by an independent European Rugby Cup (ERC) panel found he had "organized the fabrication
more than a dozen insurgents
a key village
Tom Malinowski.
President Obama's
that no lobbyist can work for an agency he may have lobbied.
input from multiple sources -- outside of Washington.
Jade Goody
the newlyweds
Shilpa Shetty.
cancer
SAVANNAH, Georgia
Chris Tucker
Iraq,
"I think we are in too deep to pull out,"
to his back and both feet.
the judicial system
confessing
connection with the slayings of three relatives in January 2005.
Los Angeles,
no
matches,
October 22, 2007.
October 22, 2007.
an estimated 273,800
Sri Lanka and India
end to combat operations against Tamil Tiger rebels
a proposed cease-fire from the Tamil rebels,
"Two Sri Lanka air force fighter bombers continued to bomb civilian targets in Mu'l'li-vaaykkaal after the announcement by the Sri Lankan forces that it would not deploy heavy weapons or carry out air attacks,"
Sri Lanka
bomb civilians.
58
All 58 Senate Democrats
"There's no doubt that this vote will be a critical issue for Sen. Lincoln as she embarks on her uphill re-election bid,"
homemade device designed to spread fuel.
Bruce Jeffrey Pardo,
He suffered third-degree burns.
his former in-laws,
album cannot come quick enough.
11 million views
her cat, Pebbles.
cannot come quick enough.
Charles Cashmore, Charles Erlich, Michael McClinton and Walter Alexander
Charles Cashmore, Charles Erlich, Michael McClinton
suspended
Charles Cashmore, Charles Erlich, Michael McClinton
Disney's new film "Alice in Wonderland"
tough economic times and lower ads sales
Wednesday.
racially tense events in the town,
in juvenile court,
not
Ben Stiller
"Night at the Museum: Battle of the Smithsonian."
Funny man Stiller
public service messages.
global broadcast system
the Super Bowl
traditional American sports
about 1 million
A global broadcast system
about 1 million
four
the slayings and mutilation of four U.S. contractors in Falluja in 2004
U.S. Navy SEALs
four U.S. contractors
mutilation
is a frustratingly old-school, Hollywood-style,
of these talking points are aimed at today's teenage girls
stump speeches
is a frustratingly old-school, Hollywood-style, inspirational biopic
the Honda-owned Suzuka circuit
stop hosting the
have military escorts.
April 12
Amir and Asif
a first-ever annual net loss of $4.4 billion
led to the company's annual loss,
be further expanding it environmentally friendly line of automobiles.
100 yen per share,
$4.4 billion
$4.4 billion
September 11, 2008,
airport's Terminal 4, occurred between the rap star and Crawley
celebrity Web site
Kanye West
Rapper Kanye West and his business manager
rapper Kanye West.
Promise: "My administration has also begun to go line by line through the federal budget in order to eliminate wasteful and ineffective programs. As you can imagine, this is a process that will take some time, but we have already identified $2 trillion in savings over the next decade."
by the end of his first term.
Obama's
to power this farm and a dozen neighboring homes,
produce methane gas.
"The farm used to get a lot of complaints,"
drops into a 19,000-gallon tank. The slurry then moves into the digester, which is 16 feet deep and 70 feet in diameter. It's heated there for about 16 days while the bacteria break down the organic matter in order to produce methane gas. That gas is burned in two engine generators to make electricity.
digesters
"The farm used to get a lot of complaints,"
Behar and her co-hosts on "The View"
she's doing great.
joke
Joy Behar
I think she's doing great.
nine
Army Spc. Tyler Stafford
"They had 200-plus guys all shooting at us -- I mean, pure chaos,"
"pure
"significant crack"
last week
overnight
San Francisco-Oakland Bay
About 280,000
About 280,000
California
richer
user-edited map of cycling routes
cycling routes
OpenStreetMap.
OpenStreet Map, a community-driven maps database.
OSM
Belize, Brazil, China, Chile, Spain, Canada, Israel, Iceland, Ireland,
Jolie-Pitt Foundation,
would provide $10 million for relief efforts. Belize, Brazil, China, Chile, Spain, Canada, Israel, Iceland, Ireland, the United States and Morocco were among the many other countries offering aid.
always wanted to come back to the historic attacks at the end of the book,"
I'm a history nerd,"
Ibraim Roberson:
mortgage-free home.
when they're recovering.
24/7 roadside assistance
Certified Pre-Owned
From two to eight percent
new-car dealer who also operates a Certified Pre-Owned (CPO) used car program.
Certified Pre-Owned
the September 18 killing of six African immigrants in Castelvolturno,
Castelvolturno,
September
the September 18 killing of six African immigrants in Castelvolturno,
magazine
Southern Baptist Convention,
Christian Stores should be given hell for its actions against GospelToday.
placed behind the counter.
celebrities
Roland S. Martin
Lifeway's 100-plus stores nationwide
spokesman said one of his group's fighters carried out the
killed three teenage sisters and injured four other people
a rocket attack in Kabul
Zabiullah Mujahid,
in southeastern Afghanistan
14 of them
GED
San Quentin Prison
Protecting this infrastructure will be a national security priority.
President Obama
a model of sustainability.
Step onto the campus of a school that's a model of sustainability.
General Motors'
foreplay, sexual conquests and how he picks up women,
"Red Lines,"
his comments while Saudi authorities discuss whether he should be charged with a crime,
whether he should be charged with a crime,
his comments
two decades
the past two decades
six
the Masadiq Committee, made up of representatives from Iran's intelligence ministry, judiciary and others
created a Facebook page for his campaign that has more than 5,000 supporters on the site.
"Access to this site is not possible,"
a message in Farsi saying, "Access to this site is not possible,"
1974.
Novopushkinsky Park in central Moscow,
the valley's main city,
host of a conservative
lost untold billions in market value and have laid off thousands of employees.
troubles began with a wild craze for subprime mortages.
Glenn Beck
way too many Tickle Me Elmos
Lehman
The European Union, France and the United Kingdom
official results declaring President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad the winner.
Thousands
The European Union, France and the United Kingdom
1994,
but there are no plans to reintroduce it anytime soon,
Mexican President Felipe Calderon
Congress
have made English the only language used for government business
Nearly 57
Nearly 57 percent
exclude
to government services in any other language,"
English the only language used for government business
to government services in any other language,"
the worst prequel, remake, rip-off or sequel award.
Razzie
Michael Jackson,
Japan, Germany and Dubai
Japan, Germany and Dubai
intelligent toilets that can dispense medical advice,
"Finger Rehabilitation Glove,"
a missile defense program for Eastern Europe,
$1 billion worth of long-range missile
by noon on January 20,
HHS Secretary Michael Leavitt
Ghanaian Clottey
trainer Freddie Roach
Cowboys Stadium.
immigration reform, trade and
started on shaky ground,
at a high point and large-scale
immigration reform, trade
immigration reform, trade
titled "Ruins of the Second Gilded Age" to capture physical evidence of the real estate bust that took place across the United States.
aesthetic reasons,"
essay in its most recent Sunday Magazine
were digitally manipulated
the real estate bust that took place across the United States.
one of the pictures was digitally altered,
a disabled parking permit, mouthwash,
of the computer and others found in von Brunn's home.
35 rounds of live ammunition for a .22 caliber rifle.
an Annapolis, Maryland, apartment
an uncanny ear for human speech and the poetry to describe his characters' very unpoetic lives.
"Say You Are One of Them,"
an MFA program
Oprah
having a priest in my workshop,
Uwem Akpan
the Communist Party of India-Maoist,
The policy,
to be "present in the room" during searches,
be "present in the room" during searches,
the new policy
that border officials are needlessly perusing confidential information, downloading it and keeping devices and information indefinitely without any explanation.
how long U.S. border officials can hold computers
107 degrees,
heat-exhaustion-related
collapsed during a practice
with reckless homicide in the heat-exhaustion-related death of a player.
Max Gilpin, 15, who collapsed during a practice in August 2008 and
virtual tip jars
Make money from your hobbies:
eBay,
Craigslist and eBay,
From hobbies to bake sales to your own Web site, there are ways to make extra money in your spare time.
of the victims died from smoke inhalation or were trampled in a rush to get out of the club.
sparks,
At least 59
Amara
151,
women and children.
killing at least 27
the largely Shiite city of Amara
All vehicles were banned
fighting between rival Shiite factions.
Judge Sonia Sotomayor's
Judge Sonia Sotomayor
Sonia Sotomayor
controversial comments
two hot-button issues
Sonia Sotomayor's
four years
The man authorities said was their killer
that Judge Lefkow had dismissed his medical malpractice case and he sought revenge,
Lefkow had dismissed his medical malpractice case and he sought revenge,
The federal judge whose husband and mother were slain in their family home in Chicago,
The floods
Workers fear that without adequate food and shelter, the situation would worsen when
The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies
two
underneath a rural Texas trailer,
2008,
One of the mobile homes
happened to a young child
Turkey's
the 13-year old girl had willingly engaged in "consensual" sexual relations with the 26 men.
having sex with a 13-year old girl.
expresses good will,
has promised to give Nicaragua $50 million to replace money that the United States
"disrespectful."
$62
$50 million
President Barack Obama
Mandy Hughes
Lyme disease.
Mandy Hughes
the existence of chronic Lyme disease
the resort of Nanji Island
39 to 47 inches (99 to 119 centimeters)
more than 39 inches (99 centimeters)
More than 900
that the drug cartels are feeling the pinch.
Institutional Revolutionary Party, or PRI, made a convincing
the pinch.
President Felipe Calderon's war on drugs remains a noble battle for the soul of Mexico.
Ruben Navarrette Jr.
President Felipe Calderon's
Edwin van der Sar
secondhand smoke
cars,
for a ban on all smoking in cars,
is down 25 percent.
guitars
Denver
UPS
Three bomb blasts
the southern Thai border city of Sungai Kolok,
a narcotics crackdown by authorities last week.
popular tourist destination
"drug gangs"
not prove beyond a reasonable doubt that he is guilty
February 2003.
slumped in a chair in the foyer of Spector's Alhambra, California, mansion
murder six years ago of actress Lana Clarkson.
Alhambra, California,
Quincy Jones
"Off The Wall," "Bad" and "Thriller"
produced Michael Jackson's multi-platinum albums "Off The Wall," "Bad" and "Thriller"
musician, composer, record producer, arranger, conductor and media company executive.
"disagreements" with the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey,
"disagreements" with the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey,
the holdup on "disagreements" with the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey,
Located underground in the former World Trade Center's "archaeological heart,"
the National September 11 Memorial Museum
under a bridge
drug
after the U.S. intervention in Somalia's humanitarian crisis in 1992.
more than 200,000 people
Lubbock, Texas, airport,
Tuesday
Two
FedEx ATR-42
a small fire on the plane,
Lasantha Wickrematunga.
no journalist or media institution had cause to fear any threats or attacks by the government,
no journalist or media institution
Lasantha Wickrematunga,
civil war
Lasantha Wickrematunga.
knew he would be killed
more than 65,000
capital murder and three counts of attempted
he regrets describing her as "wacko."
environmental technology
the system works but it's not immune to bad decision-making.
a philosophical standpoint.
Friedman
in Hong Kong
Galveston
late Friday or early Saturday.
Cuba
residents
Cuba
Ike
called Kari Sorenson of Danbury, Connecticut, for help in talking
the pilot
Doug White
Wayne Rooney
Anfield,
Romania,
in three years,
denied
denied
football-sized hole in one of the jets
roughly 200
Charleston's Yeager
a football-sized hole in one of the jets
An annual family fishing trip
annual family fishing
there needs to be a national law.
insurance companies to cover prosthetics at the same rate they do surgery.
$350,000
"America's Most Wanted"
murdered a police detective
Rockefeller Center, Grand Central Terminal, the World Financial Center
Faisal Shahzad,
Faisal Shahzad,
CIA Director Leon Panetta and National Security Adviser James Jones
Shiite-led government.
are treated after being taken into custody on suspicion of involvement in the insurgency.
at Camp Cropper near Baghdad.
reviews a detainee's case
taken into custody on suspicion of involvement in the insurgency.
Sunnis
83 percent
83 percent
U.S. detention centers
is credible.
the U.S.-led coalition launched Operation Lion's Paw
mostly Sunnis
Thomas the Tank Engine
recognize different emotions.
"Thomas and Friends,"
difficult time distinguishing different facial expressions.
reinforce the EU's position as a natural gas customer.
In the capital city of Zagreb, businesses are losing money due to the
WBO welterweight
welterweight
face masks.
a way to reduce the amount they cough and sneeze onto others,
high-filtering face piece respirator,
"evidence is not very strong" for masks' value outside of health care settings,
have been found, state television reported late Wednesday.
in northwestern Iran.
168 passengers
case of a northern California couple accused of
abducting Jaycee Dugard and holding her captive
a northern California couple
matter about witnesses in the case.
denied a request by the Garridos to be able to see each other while they remain jailed.
abducting Jaycee Dugard and holding her captive for more than 18 years in a ramshackle backyard compound.
people gathered along the banks of the River Thames to hear Big Ben strike midnight and watch
blasting horns and fireworks shot from the Sky Tower
the passing of another
Paul McCartney and Ringo Starr
in 5.1
Beatles
Paul McCartney, Yoko Ono Lennon, Olivia Harrison and Ringo Starr
Yoko Ono Lennon and Olivia Harrison, the
Larry King,
John Lennon and George Harrison,
But actually, a lot of kids know the music,"
Paul McCartney and Ringo Starr
"Now I really know that John would be very happy with this,"
sneakers and almost matching black suits and joked frequently
Paul McCartney, Yoko Ono Lennon, Olivia Harrison and Ringo Starr
of John Lennon
"We thought we'd be really big in Liverpool."
on CNN's "Larry King Live."
George Harrison,
Yoko Ono Lennon and Olivia Harrison, the widows of John Lennon and George Harrison,
"We feel so strongly about our husbands that sometimes it's hard for us, isn't it?"
racial prejudices
2.5
racial prejudice
number of people who will vote based on race.
her group,
daughter Novena and her group, BabyStone.
not showing up for concerts and interviews.
actually arrives for
four
Military officials
four
people look at the content of the speech, not just the delivery.
Barack Obama:
Larry King
great leader for conservatives.
look at the content of the speech, not just the delivery.
Lousiana
Michael Toller,
Guy Heinze Jr.
a man identified as Guy Heinze Jr.
stop recruiting about 3,000 new soldiers
accept his dismissal,
Rookmangud Katawal
that Palin will seek the 2012 Republican presidential nomination
announced Friday that she will step down this month.
Palin was declaring herself a quitter.
George Will
Palin will seek the 2012 Republican presidential nomination and that her resignation is intended to free her to prepare.
Medhine's death.
that the judicial system is "fair and just."
is "fair and just."
for being an accessory to murder in the killings of her uncle, aunt and cousin
being an accessory to murder in the killings of her uncle, aunt and cousin
dumped her in front of her house and disappeared.
"They kept beating me,
it is working with Shubin and Seth Kreimer,
The alleged rape
he was expecting other people
Several
between $40,000 and $80,000 a year,
close at 2 a.m.
Colorado
between $40,000 and $80,000 a
90
redistributing white-owned farms to landless blacks.
Zimbabwe
McCain
the legacy of the previous eight years of a Republican president who became highly unpopular
hasty vetting
John McCain's
being accused of improperly helping fraudster savings and loan chief Charles Keating in the 1980s;
revelations about hasty vetting raised questions in
an ancient Persian artifact.
auction in Dorchester, southern England,
stashed under a bed
ancient Persian
signed a bill
the United States
serves as a U.S. supply route for troops and supplies into Afghanistan.
Tajikistan and Uzbekistan,
Tajikistan and Uzbekistan
a meeting of the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank.
Taksim Square
Olafur Grimsson
"the most fundamental question of the 21st century": energy and whether there will ever be enough alternative sources of power to satisfy global demand
aid to help poorer countries --like the ones in Africa -- find alternatives to fossil fuels.
The U.S. Navy issued a
pirates
"I can tell you, there are definitely going to be more ships in that area in the next 24 or 48 hours, because there are two more sailing to it right now,"
On Thursday, the Maersk Alabama resumed its journey to Mombasa, Kenya, with an 18-person
the Maersk Alabama
FBI
The U.S. Navy,
Internet shopping,
Jason Wu
Jason Wu
Natalia Vodianova's
Mexico
Leaders of Latin American countries
30 Latin American and Caribbean nations
to take the Rio Group to a new level by creating the organization.
Brazil, Argentina, Mexico, Colombia and Venezuela.
others.
two $1,000 scholarships
Nivens' mother was killed when he was 4 years old, and his father was imprisoned for her murder.
Douglas Nivens II
Carson's autobiography, "Gifted Hands,"
Johns Hopkins Children's Center.
pediatric neurosurgery at Johns Hopkins Children's Center.
adversity
300-horsepower clean diesel engine, flashing lights visible from all angles, an ergonomic cockpit, an onboard computer with voice command and instant license plate recognition, integrated shotgun mounts, and more.
Carbon Motors Corp.'s
dogs
therapy dog,
a dog isn't so scary.
blood pressure drops and the heart rate slows
registered therapy
But reading to a dog isn't so scary.
stress.
The Korean-flagged Cosco Busan rammed into
Prosecutors said the plea included factual admissions by Cota, including an acknowledgment his negligence "was a proximate cause of the [oil] discharge."
$60 million.
on November 7, 2007.
a massive oil spill,
San Francisco's Bay Bridge
Sen. Hillary Clinton.
Michigan's economy.
The struggling auto industry
The primary
struggling auto industry
Pentagon
participated in attacks,
closing of Guantanamo Bay detention facility.
Obama
information released by the Pentagon, saying 61 former detainees from Gitmo may have returned to terrorist activities.
Bob Dylan
"Like a Rolling Stone"
the survival lessons they learned, and
best, worst in human nature
Kip Scheidler
heavy moving equipment,
WASHINGTON
August 1969,
Enrique Valdez's
a personal tragedy sets him on his path towards addressing the
those who are wealthy live, while those who are poor die.
from Chinese drywall,
would not be
face foreclosure or the prospect of paying both their mortgage and rent on alternate housing as
foreclosure or the prospect of paying both their mortgage and rent
two bookable offences
Wayne Rooney
the Premier League visit of Aston Villa to Old Trafford on April 5.
Dr. Richard Besser
Dr. Richard Besser
the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
seafood.
chef John Besh
John Besh
Somer Thompson,
know that I will not sleep until this person is found. I hope they get you, and I hope they make you pay for a long, long time. You don't take from somebody. You didn't just take her from me. You took her from my family; you took her from all these people. And you don't do this
"I want you to know that I will not sleep until this person is found. I hope they get you, and I hope they make you pay for a long, long time. You don't take from somebody. You didn't just take her from me. You took her from my family; you took her from all these people. And you don't do this to a little baby and put my baby in the trash like she's nothing. That's not OK, this is not OK."
a fight with another girl
Japan's Meteorological
10 kilometers (6.2 miles)
advisory announced shortly after a 7.0-magnitude earthquake struck Japan's Ryukyu
safety
sixth Top 10 country single
in the $20-40 range].
tried to make it more affordable for people
former British Prime Minister Winston Churchill.
tracing the lineage of the candidates.
former British Prime Minister Winston Churchill.
beatnik author Jack Kerouac, Canadian Prime Minster Pierre Trudeau
New England Historic Genealogical Society
President George W. Bush
the New England Historic
Hip hop
"Doble Filo"
how people are living,"
Cuba.
50.
Tackett
losing 140 pounds
50.
went skydiving
50.
140 pounds
went skydiving two weeks before turning 50.
more than 4 million
"Our Bodies, Ourselves"
sex, birth control, childbirth, lesbianism
the Boston Women's Health
fewer than 10%
one of the best nonfiction
began.
boasting the nation's only ski resort
Swat Valley?
have now taken control of a neighboring district.
unleashed a wave of violence
neighboring Buner district,
new law, which expands the
Wednesday,
290-135
expands the State Children's Health Insurance Program (SCHIP) by roughly $35
administration Wednesday, signing a bill to provide federally funded health care to an estimated 4 million children.
bill to provide federally funded health care to an estimated 4 million children.
$35 billion
a 17-year-old high school junior in Belton, Missouri,
increasing resources, improving leadership and changing bureaucratic cultures.
establishing a domestic intelligence agency.
create an "agency within an agency"
September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks
increased domestic intelligence
the FBI.
about 40
"eat to live"
diet and exercise.
two marathons
220 pounds
about 40 miles a
220 pounds at her heaviest. She lost 95 pounds through diet and exercise.
She started gaining as a teenager and by the time she graduated from high school, she was carrying 215 pounds on her 5' 2" frame.
Kelly Pless
two marathons
"peregruzka"
the United States,
'overcharged.'"
"Most Stunts By A Living Actor."
butt-kicking, karate-chopping, kung fu superstar
He's the butt-kicking, karate-chopping, kung fu superstar
The Obama administration is working on a substantial sanctions package against
international coalition
Iranian people
"comprehensive" plan
is not responding
Kingston Mayor Troy Beets
Suzanne Solomon,
been found in the sludge,
Plainview, Texas,
said Friday's declaration shows that Congress needs to strengthen the Food and Drug Administration and hike the penalties it can impose.
salmonella
a national salmonella outbreak,
Bacteria found in the company's Blakely, Georgia, peanut processing plant
Peanut Corp. of America
murder, conspiracy
will receive a bad-conduct discharge.
entry-level private
kidnapping and conspiracy to commit several offenses
kidnapping and conspiracy to commit several offenses
Cpl. Trent D. Thomas
kidnapping and conspiracy to commit several offenses
Cpl. Trent D. Thomas
found guilty Wednesday of kidnapping and conspiracy to commit several offenses
Marine
Hashim Ibrahim Awad,
many diverse cultures.
South African musician
Hugh Masekela
access to healthy foods, local cuisine and packages of snacks sent by friends and family trumped military base fast food as
all of whom have served in combat in Iraq or Afghanistan -- access to the familiar hometown mall fare isn't as important to
Afghanistan,
cancel all
Reagan National
More than 300,000
"shoot students in the school and then himself"
juvenile law in Montgomery County excludes crimes committed with a deadly weapon,
Richard Yanis
in adult court
deadly weapon,
"shoot students in the school and then himself"
Ireland,
gas and insurance,
monthly car payments, taxes, insurance and upkeep,
Zipcar car sharing
costs $75 to startup
30 states offer direct deposit cards to the unemployed.
U.S. Department of Labor
unemployment debit cards
210 percent.
Michael Jackson
275
Prices are expected to grow
probably will at least double
Michael Vick
Vick is ready to "get back in the community in a positive light" and demonstrate
company in Newport News, Virginia,
Michael Vick
Chapter 11 bankruptcy.
Joel Segal
drugs and unsafe food additives,"
nitrofuran, malachite green, gentian violet and fluoroquinolones.
until their importers can prove they are not contaminated.
Larry Craig
Larry Craig,
an appeal
Sen. Larry Craig
Liv
The hypocrisy.
10 things U.S.-born Hispanics find distasteful about the immigration debate.
no contradiction in being both a Christian minister and a Muslim.
decision to convert to Islam
leave either her new Muslim faith or the ministry.
defrocked.
Ann
The Episcopal Church
September 2008
Volvo Ocean Race.
Volvo Ocean Race.
10,000 pieces inspired by humanity's adventures in space.
toy ray gun
500,000 Haitians
with not enough electricity, some
featured a photo of a bare-chested woman apparently engaged in masturbation.
the site has been unable to block every solicitation
prostitution ads.
Tuesday
She called it an "unfortunate situation,"
During their first visit, some children said they heard club members asking why African-American children were there. One youngster told a Philadelphia television station a woman there said she feared the children "might do something" to her child.
the club president
make a decision of how it will proceed.
shed light on the physical and psychological effects of the long isolation that future Mars astronauts
520 days
more than CHF 430 billion ($390 billion)
more than CHF 430 billion ($390 billion)
CHF 430 billion ($390 billion) in
Pictet & Cie
Pictet & Cie
"pursuing very careful engagement on a range of issues that affect our interests and the interests of the world
Washington "has no right to suggest how other nations should live."
talks
Washington,
woman based on George Hamilton's mother
her looks
the Russian turbo-prop Tupolev-95 planes
February.
Alaska
air exclusion zone off the coast of Alaska,
February.
meet the bombers and escorted them out of the area without incident,
Justice Stephen Breyer and three liberal colleagues
Justice Stephen Breyer and three liberal colleagues
Stephen Breyer and three liberal colleagues
allow video of the trial
$89
Duesseldorf, Germany are now patrolling the pavement in protective shoes that their police-officer handlers strap onto their paws.
Too many glass shards left by beer drinkers in the city center,
Too many glass shards left by beer drinkers in the city center,
Piers Morgan
Susan Boyle
Celine Dion's
has no plans to get a makeover or alter her wardrobe
"Larry King Live,"
he expected Susan Boyle's audition to be a joke before she began singing.
after ongoing peace negotiations with rogue members of the Moro Islamic Liberation Front (MILF)
a faction of a Muslim separatist group in the Philippines'
after ongoing peace negotiations with rogue members of the Moro Islamic
seeking refuge in MILF-controlled towns,
Filipino soldiers
overnight
Moro Islamic Liberation Front
on the river bottom.
saying, "We're gonna be in the Hudson."
be catastrophic consequences
US Airways Flight 1549
plane hit the water
on the river bottom.
The collision on Tuesday produced two large debris clouds,
Al-Libi's
called on Muslims worldwide to support the Uyghurs.
long-simmering resentment
Al-Libi
Muslims in western China's Xinjiang province.
Abu Yahia Al-Libi
a federal prison in central Florida
zoos, aquariums and botanical gardens will lose crucial state funding
this very difficult problem of firing the animals,
Oxfam tweeted:
cronyism; age, gender and racial discrimination; and attempts
padding numbers.
make the agency appear more efficient than it is by padding numbers.
new offensive until the group surrenders,
said Friday that a wave of "fresh displacement" has now exceeded 100,000 individuals.
Kennedy,
Massachusetts
"Ted" Kennedy
No Child Left Behind Act.
his true calling
1962
shoes
giving back.
sex tape allegedly showing former Sen. John Edwards
sex tape allegedly showing former Sen. John Edwards
Winfrey:
our kids to be safe and to grow up with some resources
4:30
our shared values.
Chicago
drive car buyers away from
allowed to keep operating
It is the only way,
millions of average Americans.
Hannover, Germany,
depression
Robert Enke,
wish to have all his friends and fans of her deceased husband bid farewell to him in the AWD Arena,"
Hannover, Germany, stadium
implacable American isolationism
all about Clint Eastwood.
Clint Eastwood.
Wandsworth, on the south bank of the River Thames.
2016 or 2017,
blast walls
in 2016 or 2017,
If a retailer has not gotten involved with fight over this bill, he "should be shot,"
Marcus
to negotiate union representation.
about 18 inches wide and about 10 inches high.
in the Nutty Putty Cave,
John Edward Jones,
James Marsden
high school?
was bombed, killing 12.
Jemaah Islamiyah
has made strides in addressing terrorist groups.
presidential spokesman Dino Patti Djalal
Indonesia has made strides in addressing terrorist groups.
2002,
Gabriela Vazquez
allows police officers to check the legal status of people when suspicions exists, detain them and turn them over to federal authorities.
allows police officers to check the legal status of people when suspicions exists, detain them and turn them over to federal authorities.
Montgomery, Alabama
controversy at the Miss USA pageant in April when, in response to a question from a judge, she declared her opposition to same-sex marriage.
opposition to same-sex marriage.
Miss California USA
stripped of her Miss California USA title
the Muslim world.
one in five
lightning
in California, Texas and Florida,
California, Texas and Florida,
Lightning strikes
Craigslist
prostitution
prostitution
confirmed for CNET that she successfully posted an ad for her services to the adult section late last week.
from their credit card companies.
it is shutting down its passenger flights
Skybus Airlines
ATA and Aloha Airlines,
More than 4 million
JetBlue
that the flooding has caused an estimated $250 million in losses.
$250 million in losses.
nine,
hundreds of people were still in shelters, with more than 250 people in the Cobb County Civic Center,
nine people
former President George H.W.
was biopsied and is benign,
a perforated ulcer,
The ulcer
change.
opportunity for change.
it will no longer be as it used to be,"
the tug-of-war between
Saturday
a message about Harrington's disappearance on their Web site under the heading "One of our fans is missing."
black Pantera T-shirt, black mini skirt, black tights and black boots.
disappeared at a Metallica concert
cars
women,
shows the world that you love the environment and hate using fuel,"
older than the industry average,
a $23,148,855,308,184,500 charge on their statements.
Visa said the rogue charges affected "fewer than 13,000 prepaid transactions" and resulted from a "temporary programming error at Visa Debit Processing Services
17-digit charge on his bill.
"temporary programming error at Visa Debit Processing Services
$23,148,855,308,184,500
"temporary programming error at Visa
a ninth
eight counts of first-degree murder
his ex-wife and seven other people
"A world that is greatly out of balance in matters of health is neither stable nor secure,"
Director-General Margaret Chan insists the dilemma is not just a matter of haves versus have-nots.
Iran and Cuba.
Cuba,
the lessons of September 11, 2001: that to protect America, we must stay on the offense, stop attacks before they happen, and not wait to be hit again.
commitment to principle in our nation's capital. John is a steadfast opponent of wasteful spending. As president, he will stand
a president who understands the lessons of September 11, 2001: that to protect America,
to protect America, we must stay on the offense, stop attacks before they happen, and not wait to be hit again.
September 11, 2001:
John McCain.
a president who understands the lessons of September 11, 2001:
is "ready to lead" the United States.
is "ready to lead" the United States.
he will stand up to the high-tax crowd in Congress and make the tax relief permanent. He will invest in the energy technologies of tomorrow and lift the ban on drilling for America's offshore oil today.
The XShot
the XShot, a telescopic stainless-steel rod that allows you to take pictures and videos while keeping yourself in the frame.
telescopic stainless-steel rod
a telescopic stainless-steel rod that allows you to take pictures and videos while keeping yourself in the frame.
allows you to take pictures and videos while keeping yourself in the frame.
Bush
Virginia
Clinton
President Bush
called Clinton after the speech and thanked her for her support and said she could not have done a better job.
former Virginia Gov.
as a single party with a single purpose.
Winds that gusted as much as 101 mph on Sunday dropped to about 30 mph Wednesday evening.
$70,000
increasing the humidity and easing the burden on almost 8,900 firefighters in the area.
$1 billion
Santiago
San Bernardino County
burned more than 19,000 acres.
fanned the flames, changed direction and began blowing inland from the Pacific Ocean, increasing the humidity and easing the burden on almost 8,900 firefighters in the area.
suspected arson.
It'll speed federal dollars to people whose property losses aren't covered by insurance and will help local and state agencies pay for the emergency response.
to bring in technology
games being blighted by incorrect decisions over goals.
Further details
which occurred near a school in Peru's Ayacucho province,
Further details
148
four
just another flu.
over the summer months,
people younger than 65.
my second home,"
tags, which use satellite-based technology
Cape Cod, Massachusetts.
off Cape Cod, Massachusetts.
The first tagging Saturday marked the first time a great white
record where a shark travels, allow scientists to better understand migratory patterns,"
great white sharks
slave labor camp soldiers were liberated by advancing U.S. troops.
"Nazi Party members digging up American bodies at Berga."
most of the slave labor camp soldiers were liberated
when most of the slave labor camp soldiers were liberated by advancing U.S. troops.
in at least seven graves,
A fifth hostage, a policeman, was found alive,
southern region of Caqueta,
A fifth hostage, a policeman,
in the southern region of Caqueta,
Three of the hostages were shot in the head, while the fourth was shot in the back,
Ricardo Izecson dos Santos Leite,
pool accident
2007
Ricardo Izecson dos Santos Leite, or "Kaka"
pool accident in 2000.
2000.
Chris Christie
Gov. Jon Corzine,
New York
their leeches. Sometimes the patient gets better, sometimes the patient dies. Is it the leeches? Is it something else? We don't know."
wipe out poverty,
a frog or toad,
Fred DeNegri's
a can of Diet Pepsi,
She's very, very weak,"
kept at opposite ends of the same North Korean detention facility,
Journalists
more than 40
physicists,
a modern classic.
Lou Gehrig's Disease (Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis, or ALS),
30
promised help.
50 people.
declared a nationwide state of emergency
European Union allies,
the invasion.
Samantha Schroeder
"Having [my husband] gone is the worst kind of pain.
"He doesn't care if you do or don't understand his choice;
"Having [my husband] gone is the worst kind of
John, asked her permission to enlist in the
how the Iraq war has affected them
the invasion.
740,000
water,
More than 40
35.5
"A quarter of the women interviewed
"A quarter of the women interviewed
Karl Bishop,
Karl Bishop, 22,
"Harry Potter"
the murder of teenage
is a political hot topic due
About 125,000 customers in New York, New Jersey and Connecticut
Red
doesn't always get it right,
Africa
governments.
Wangari Maathai
Nobel Peace
Nobel Peace Laureate Wangari Maathai
Bill Clinton and George W. Bush
former Presidents Bill Clinton and George W. Bush
transporting concrete-breaking equipment, medical supplies and water.
4,200 U.S. military personnel
about 2,500
a partial, three-year freeze on discretionary spending
spending freeze
spending freeze
Hurricane Gustav
"exacerbate the threat of heavy rains and inland flooding."
8 a.m. CT.
Hurricane Gustav
110 mph,
Jim Johnson
to choose a running mate.
she would be willing to sign up on a joint
she would be willing to sign up on a joint ticket.
District of Columbia,
District of Columbia,
Richard Thomas and his wife, Sandra,
Richard Thomas and his wife, Sandra,
professional hockey and baseball players in the District of Columbia,
professional hockey and baseball players in the District of Columbia,
anabolic steroid possession
the exact amount
said his uncle indicated to family members two years ago that he had saved up more than a half-million dollars
over $600,000
to a local hospital,
his uncle indicated to family members two years ago that he had saved up more than a half-million dollars over the years.
"lipstick on a pig"
remarks were offensive
"lies" and "swift boat politics."
John McCain
"lipstick
"lipstick on a pig"
if, during that time, he heeded the call to prayer coming from the hills above Yemen's capital,
Fernando Verdasco book his spot at the ATP World Tour Finals
Fernando Verdasco
Novak Djokovic
of tainting the country's image by questioning the Holocaust and by wielding a reckless leadership style.
verbal jousting between Ahmadinejad and
Mir Hossein Mousavi
Mahmoud Ahmadinejad,
Wednesday evening.
20th
tapeworms
liquor
died after falling from his horse
tapeworms
dietary aid
tapeworms
a liquid
arid climes.
Somalia
sometimes issue false distress calls
pirates
off the Somali coast
She is, however, reduced to the lowest enlisted rank, private, and subject to losing other military benefits
deploying to Afghanistan
chose taking care of her infant over deploying to Afghanistan
has always maintained his innocence
has always maintained his innocence
Mark MacPhail.
delayed a decision on whether to accept an
claims that brainwashing explains why so few blacks support conservative Republicans
If you don't have a job and you're not rich,
the 9-9-9 tax reform proposal
claims that brainwashing explains why so few blacks support conservative Republicans
1,900
5.4 million
three African countries
since January.
about 12 miles off the coast of Tripoli.
A visit to the Eiffel Tower, the Statue of Liberty and the Pyramids is
The Treasury at Petra, Jordan;
Petra in Jordan
criminal
Model Secondary School for the Deaf
criminal
result in criminal charges with "enhanced penalties for a hate crime,"
radio talk-show host
an apology from Britain's
talk-show host
wants an apology from Britain's
Michael Savage
about 21 minutes
Dr. Murray was a heart surgeon,
to determine who planted the bomb,
a 15-year-old girl and a 30-year-old
not allowed
family
27,
a teenager.
Debra Lafave
Lafave's probation,
a teenager.
family problems, friends, high school, personal life, boyfriend issues
"I'm having the time of my life."
community college in Dearborn,
via e-mail and cell phone,
people were shot and killed
Chinese President Hu Jintao
71 percent of Americans consider China an economic threat to the United States,
military threat, with 47 percent disagreeing.
billions of dollars in Chinese products each year,
51 percent of the U.S. public consider China
"his bizarre life-style and personal notoriety eclipsed his talent and his numerous achievements."
age of 11,
iReport
iReport
They dug into their photo albums to share memories
Hurricane Ida
4-0.
slipping sand and dirt
sand and dirt
coffee.
coffee
some crooked contractors
he was arrested in early December
Stateville Correctional Center
be moved from a state prison
Jennifer Hudson,
killing singer and actress Jennifer Hudson's
sing the national anthem Sunday at the Super Bowl.
The New York Assembly passed legislation allowing same-sex marriages earlier this month,
allowing same-sex marriages
Christine Quinn, speaker of the New York City Council, and her partner, Kim Catullo,
Gallagher,
When shots rang out
his dad was "my hero."
security
James von Brunn
The Sixth Floor Museum at Dealey Plaza.
November 22, 1963,
8mm
90.24
constitutional term limits.
his mother,"
faces of her fellow survivors were painted with "a thousand-yard stare,"
Pakistani President Pervez Musharraf
they had orders to take the station's equipment, including a van that the station uses to broadcast live coverage,
"The media could not lend a helping hand to improve the situation,"
all unofficial visits to air traffic control operational areas during its investigation into the incident.
review air traffic control policies and procedures related to facility visitors.
allegedly allowed his two young children to speak with pilots on an air traffic control frequency,
"Unauthorized and unprofessional"
air traffic controller,
After their initial reaction to the news, people will find different ways to cope,
Web
Sereth Hosty's
Michael Jackson does not have skin cancer,
beginning July 8.
July 8.
skin
"one of the largest seen star-birth regions in the galaxy,"
"El Clasico"
Barca
Lionel Messi
Real Madrid
"went into the ground" and caught a tree on fire.
17 people
all of the nine men arrested on Thursday October 6 as part of an investigation into suspicious betting activity have now been released on police bail pending further inquiries.
Wayne Rooney
Wayne Rooney
the captain of the Maersk Alabama
Horn of Africa
means addressing the anarchy ashore which allows the pirates to operate.
addressing the anarchy ashore which allows the pirates to operate.
prevent future attacks. We have
a tourist
six
capsized during a heavy storm Sunday night,
dilapidated
had told residents living in the old building to leave it because of structural concerns.
orders to vacate the structure,
26
chief minister of Maharashtra state, Vilasrao Deshmukh,
Montague
wrote six of the 11 songs that appear on
Martina McBride's
Martina McBride:
Blagojevich
African-American attorney general
accompishments
Illinois Gov. Rod Blagojevich
Burris has erected a mausoleum listing his accompishments in Chicago's Oak Woods Cemetery.
Under the seal of the state of Illinois and the words "Trail Blazer," Burris, 71, has listed his many firsts in granite, including being the state's first African-American attorney general and the state's first African-American comptroller.
Gov. Rod Blagojevich
mausoleum
12 times more mercury than blue fin tuna
it's a tradition hundreds of years old.
it's a tradition hundreds of years old.
Residents in Taiji,
more than 60 "artfully concealed" illegal or prohibited items
the machines,
drugs or suspected drugs
Inaki Urdangarin, the Duke of Palma de Mallorca,
Jack Daniel
blood poisoning. Then came gangrene, then amputation,
Linda
"took the high road"
The pro wrestling legend said Wednesday that he "took the high road" and "didn't do the O.J. Simpson thing" despite the pain of his bitter divorce fight with wife Linda.
bitter
between 60 and 70 years old.
10 banks in San Diego County and one in Riverside County.
11th
the attacks of September 11, 2001,
1978 to 1980
a ragtag group of survivors
2.5 million
Thousands
annual demonstrations
Several dozen cities braced for protests
a peephole
interstate stalking,
Barrett will have his first court appearance in Chicago at 10 a.m. (11 a.m. ET) Saturday,
stopped as a storm approached
a storm approached
Nine people
Seven
another Liberty pilot
To communicate to as many people as possible
Masters dissertation on populations displaced because of human influenced climate change,
Donald Trump's
Aberdeen
backlog of flights
demonstrate against plans for expansion.
Climate
Donald Trump's
backlog of flights
Scotland's northeast coast, just north of Aberdeen,
English-language books
Italy and the United States of America."
members of the Italy USA Foundation,
an Italian lawmaker
The Club America striker was shot in the head in Mexico City
shot in the head
to lie to authorities as well as the media regarding this hoax,"
couple
the giant helium balloon was specifically created for a hoax
they believed their child had flown away on the balloon, and when the balloon landed without him, they expressed concern that he may have fallen out of the device.
The couple
knew that their 6-year-old son Falcon was hiding at their Fort Collins home the entire time,
had flown away on the balloon,
depicted Israeli intelligence agents as baby-snatchers.
popular Turkish soap opera, "Valley of the Wolves: Ambush,"
the Israeli intelligence service Mossad spying inside Turkey and kidnapping Turkish babies. The program also showed Mossad attacking the Turkish embassy in Tel Aviv and taking the ambassador and his family hostage.
the Turkish ambassador
a Turkish television series that it said depicted Israeli intelligence agents as baby-snatchers.
inside the Clam
Diego-based ways to
The Catamaran Resort Hotel and Spa
respond promptly to business e-mails
Learn how to be plugged in without being impolite.
remove both
The sooner
U.S. Sen. David Vitter
U.S. Sen. David Vitter
rebuild that trust,"
alleged prostitution ring
Senate
apologized privately to his fellow Republican senators
Strasbourg, France.
away from my family all the time."
"That's a good question,"
if he ever regretted having run for president.
before heading over to the bowling alley to bowl, play pool or use the gaming arcade. They will also be able to access music and video.
Facebook, Second Life and the prettiest
PlayStation 3
interact, communicate and share gaming experiences
a kind of PlayStation clubhouse
PlayStation Home,
providing governance that can sustain progress and serve the needs of its people.
diversity, pointing out that women in uniform are playing "indispensable role in our national defense."
Speaking at the U.S. Military Academy commencement in New York,
West Point
academy's two top awards were earned by female cadets.
U.S. Vice President Dick Cheney
"mentally deranged person steeped in the inveterate enmity towards the system"
"mentally deranged person
would no longer represent people
Councillor Darren Scully
people of black African origin.
Edwards Air Force
Rainy weather
Rainy weather
8:39 a.m.
Space shuttle Atlantis
life for Carmen Reed,
Carmen Reed's family lived in a former funeral home.
health officials as the death toll of a day care center fire there grew
HERMOSILLO, Mexico
the nation's attorney general
the death toll of a day care center fire there grew to 38 children.
foul temper"
Sir Gus O'Donnell
father threatened to kill her because she converted to
Muslim teenager from Ohio
opium
6,000
Maiwand district of Kandahar province
southern Afghanistan -- in the Maiwand district of Kandahar province
processed opium,
Sea Shepherd Conservation Society,
anti-whaling group
Australia
Yushin Maru No. 2
the Japanese government
Australian Foreign Minister Stephen Smith
racism
Eric Holder's "nation of cowards" comment struck the wrong tone.
wallow in resentment:
Eric Holder.
of cowards.
offered more hate veiled in subtle anger.
President Obama's
having sex on a public beach in
jail
shortly after midnight on July 5.
The United Arab Emirates,
for having sex on a public beach in
sex on a public beach
certain Islamic rules.
a hurricane
At least seven possible tornadoes
most successful ever grand champion,
using recreational drugs
sumo wrestling
But the 330-lbs Mongolian, sumo's most successful ever grand champion, has not been able to rise above the scandals and tragedies that have beset Japan's national sport in recent years.
Asashoryu
to the killing of the policeman.
Troy Davis
"It was prophesied by [the Rev. Martin Luther] King that we would have a day when everyone would come together. This is that day. I am excited. I am joyful. It brings tears to my eyes."
"This is America happening,"
eatery
a day when everyone would come together.
Canadians
"an international moment."
Christian militia
law enforcement
At least seven people
Southeast Michigan
insufficient
injuries sustained in a one-car accident
in his luxury neighborhood near Windermere, Florida,
Woods faces a $164 fine and four points on his license,
$164
a fire hydrant and a tree
people under age 20 were more than five times as likely to develop brain cancer.
cell phone use.
that long-term cell phone use may be associated with brain cancer,
"I cannot tell this committee that cell phones are definitely dangerous. But, I certainly cannot tell you that they are safe,"
Ellen Marks of Lafayette, California,
have indicated that long-term cell phone use may be associated with brain cancer,
Numerous wildfires
Numerous wildfires
wildfires
are finding plenty of easy fuel because of dry conditions throughout the Southwest.
Numerous wildfires were roaring
15th birthday
a coming-of-age ritual in Latin culture, marking a young girl's entrance into womanhood.
girls
3
"Our insatiable demand for illegal
not yet
using the Bible of his political
visited the museum
about a half-hour
the Lincoln Memorial
half-hour
the world's green pioneers.
looking into the world's green pioneers.
McConnell
"President Bush
PBS documentary called "Triumph of the Nerds."
Apple
taped in 1995 for a PBS documentary called "Triumph of the Nerds."
humanitarian and economic crisis,
Zimbabwe
they cannot agree on who should control key ministries.
because they cannot agree on who should control key ministries.
step down,
Its inflation rate
to scale back its use of oil dispersants
its use of oil dispersants in the Gulf
to scale back its use of oil dispersants
The Navy
a helicopter
the Safmarine Asia.
the detention facility,
the closure of the detention facility,
Members of the National Economic Council
that his client is a threat to no one and that his medications
Jim Fratto
Andrew Busskohl plotted to kill a neighbor but was stopped before it got to that point.
counts relating to a break-in attempt.
Andrew Busskohl
I'm so proud of her right now. There is such a pride that she has turned this corner. She is an amazing mother. I want the world to know where she is.
With the support of my family,
Lionel Richie
he's very animated. He smiles like this all the time,
more than 800 deaths
Palma de Mallorca.
two
the VoIP calling service Skype
videophone in our living rooms.
south of Mendocino in Little River,
River in Arizona's White
Big Island, Hawaii
Big Island, Hawaii
hide out.
Sunday morning,
in the Old City
deliberate provocation by hardliners
Chester French, Max Drummey,
pop
Beach Boys.
Wallach and Max Drummey
resignations from three key posts,
the timing of resignations from three key posts,
a controversy over taped comments
officials, most notably
had been involved for weeks in a controversy over taped comments revealed last month
controversy over taped comments
again struggled as an unprecedented 16 records
outlawed from January 1.
wearing high-tech outfits
Michael Phelps
Rev. Brendan Smyth.
the investigation into the Rev. Brendan Smyth.
Rev. Brendan Smyth.
Your friends say they've never known you to be so quiet. That's because this man
types of men
The OverTalker:
men
FEMA
CNN
nonprofit agencies for distribution,
nonprofit agencies
FEMA gave away the supplies as government surplus,
Velupillai Prabhakaran
an independent state
"Sri Lanka stands on the brink,"
since 1983.
Sri Lanka
Tamil Tiger rebels,
light a dozen foot-high candles.
"Holy Death" statue offerings including cigarettes and cocaine,
elaborate two- and three-story constructions, some perhaps 25 feet high, made of
Dutch club Ajax
Real Madrid CF
"UEFA's Appeals Body today upheld the decision taken by the
Spanish club's
UEFA's appeals body
denying them the right to register
Klaas Jan Huntelaar and Lassana Diarra
Nine
over a five-year period of sporadic battles
since 2004.
six
Houthi Shiite rebels
laid out ceasefire terms
about 1,590
in a four-story building at the Taipei city zoo,
The panda goodwill
the 1949 revolution
1949 revolution
military,'"
Ad Council,
Smokey Bear, the
employs the same top-flight talent that creates ads for Budweiser,
posters and Smokey TV spots,
U.S. Department of Health and Human
Israeli Prime Minister Ehud Olmert,
the funeral company's
Presley. Marilyn Monroe. Jim Morrison.
Steve Goldstein,
Officials won't say
Officials won't say
Officials at Forest Lawn
is facing mudslides, crop destruction and waterborne diseases as a result of heavy downpour triggered by El Nino weather patterns.
Mount Kilimanjaro in northern Tanzania,
heavy downpour
officials failed to take action
"Father Jeyapaul's priestly life be monitored so that he does not constitute a risk to minors and does not create a scandal among the faithful."
al-Awlaki
terrorist group al Qaeda in the Arabian Peninsula
The AQAP
ways you can help
Memorial Day,
to volunteer at a veterans cemetery.
Wednesday's Glasgow derby between Celtic and Rangers
Wednesday's Glasgow derby between Celtic and Rangers
Glasgow derby between Celtic and Rangers has been postponed as a mark
Celtic and Rangers
Glasgow derby between Celtic and Rangers
death of Motherwell captain Phil O'Donnell,
Motherwell captain Phil O'Donnell,
postponed
Motherwell's
Motherwell captain Phil O'Donnell,
wily coyote
then taken to the Wildlife Conservation Society at the Bronx Zoo,
a double take and scampering to get out of its way
in Manhattan are rare, but not unheard of.
alarmed residents
the coyote
the Army
his mother
"The man that came home was not my son,"
His civilian lawyer, Dan Conway,
to travel to New York in April.
Continental Airlines
APJ Abdul Kalam
Ronaldinho
move on,
Barcelona
Rijkaard
Officials
they do not know
December 12,
of inmates rioted
2,080 inmates
Reeves County Detention Center
Tarantino
Nazi
August 21.
Quentin Tarantino's
Pakistan's
Pakistan's
members of Pakistan's spy service provided support
there is a "strong suspicion" the Taliban was behind the attack, and that some unspecified aid came from Pakistan's Directorate of Inter-Services
58
some members of Pakistan's spy service
the allegation
some members of Pakistan's spy service
"The ISI is a very disciplined organization, manned by military officials. It has played the most crucial role in the war on terror and apprehended members of al Qaeda, the Taliban, and those linked to the attack on mainland America on 9/11,"
two $500-million-dollar banking deals
carry 15 million tons of crude oil annually from
Wen Jiabao
bilateral economic and trade deals worth $4 billion,
China-Russia
in May.
Anil Ambani, chairman of India's Reliance BIG Entertainment,
$875 million,
was a big country music fan,"
Rissi
U.S. citizenship.
a unit of the military made up entirely of the foreign-born -- including illegal immigrants
military service
unit of the military made up entirely of the foreign-born
raping a 5-year-old girl and threatening her parents.
in excess of $30 million,
extensive jewelry collection,
12
expanding two border crossings that are rarely used.
The Department of Homeland Security
won the sport's biggest prize for the first time,
after arrest of Arnoldo Rueda Medina,
"Leyzaola
Arnoldo Rueda Medina,
problem of domestic violence.
on television and in movie theaters,
the problem of domestic violence.
"Isn't it time someone called cut?"
two women are killed by a current or former partner in the United Kingdom in an average week.
apparent refusal to come on as a substitute during a European Champions League match with Bayern Munich.
Theodor "Dr. Seuss" Geisel
Heath Ledger,
Elvis Presley
Elvis Presley
"Peanuts"
The U.S. 10th Circuit Court of Appeals in Denver, Colorado,
erect a monument
meditations and a modern form of mummification,
the 225km fourth stage of the Tour of Spain.
Wednesday
Video taken by a bystander showed Mehserle pulling his gun and fatally shooting Oscar Grant III, 22, in the back as another
Johannes Mehserle
Johannes Mehserle
Video shows Johannes Mehserle shoot Oscar Grant III in the back as another officer knelt on
Bangkok hotel room
he would not sign any reworked EU treaty
EU treaty
Van Rompuy's proposals,
agreed in Paris on a
Council meeting
that the European Commission could perhaps be given the right to strip voting rights within the European Union from some countries
the audit
$45,000
about $45,000
The FBI promptly responded to the report, acknowledging the overtime policy was designed to encourage FBI employees to volunteer for Iraq duty,
about $45,000
agents routinely submitted the overtime with the blessing of their managers from 2003 through 2007.
FBI
met and hugged and cried,"
"The four of them met and hugged and cried,"
embraced
New Life campus
Assam
"The four of them met and hugged and cried,"
hugged
At least 27
fired mortars
for disabled veterans,
nine people were killed
best solo offerings
Muslim leaders
Fort Hood massacre,
the Fort Hood massacre,
fight crime, including terrorism,
thwart the emergence of homegrown Islamic terrorists.
Sen. Barack Obama
Sen. John McCain, the presumptive Republican nominee for president,
Barack Obama
a hotel
Japan and many other Asian countries
expectations of a tip.
we are seeing from the governor is a very understandable level of gratitude. After all, it was John who gave her entrée to the national stage. We all understand gratitude. That is fine,"
Tea Party
that Tea Party movement,"
McCain
criticism for being too moderate on a variety of issues, including immigration.
350
Six white-washed little shacks are all that remain
important segment of an American family's journey from the humiliation of slavery to the very top of the nation's ruling class.
a little white shack
Friendfield Plantation,
Shiza Shahid,
Swat Valley.
safer surroundings.
Lotus Renault
Robert Kubica
Robert Kubica
will not be fit
Robert Kubica
"Words spoken by Nicolas Anelka to the national coach, Raymond Domenech, are completely unacceptable to the FFF, French football and the values they defend,"
World Cup
after being substituted
Sarah Palin,
presidential
Republican
Palin
the kingmaker of conservative politics.
opium
12,000
12,000
Afghanistan
kills 100,000 people every year worldwide
dropped to 5 percent.
city of Mina,
businesses are feeling the pinch
leaking and flooding, giving rise to fears of disease,
are participating in the ancient rituals this year,
40 percent
live-in nanny job
put an end to Mezyk's annual paid weeklong vacations.
the economy was forcing them to work more hours
the economy
no underwater oil plumes have formed because of the Gulf of Mexico spill.
CEO Tony Hayward
no underwater oil plumes have formed
the House Energy and Environment
to Chicago, Illinois,
"this really is a nonissue," calling a lot of the outrage "politically motivated."
Karin and Chris Kubacki
his laptop computer bag tested positive for explosives,
They are still trying to find the
grabbed his things and left the
a group of teenagers.
Denver Jarvis
Ozzy Osbourne
three
"We focus strictly on Michael and his recovery.
Ozzy Osbourne
"Viva La Vida."
Coldplay
Worm compost:
McDonald's
Around 32
being put to use in Sydney to treat its sewage.
their own body weight in organic waste
McDonald's
30
"We can provide a shot in the arm" to the economy,
low and middle
Democratic and Republican lawmakers,
freely around the farm's 50 acres.
overnight fire
two dozen Americans
did not appear for trial and are not in custody, but the ruling
two dozen Americans
Osama Mustafa Hassan Nasr, or Abu Omar.
Abu Omar.
charges
prosecutors will decide whether to file charges against him
In court
a theory that chronic exposure to low-level radiation may help protect DNA against the ravages of aging.
40 years
stomach
In 1970,
cancer and only
stomach cancer
Paraguay,
fourth
6-1
La Paz's high-altitude Hernando Siles' stadium.
fourth
World War II veteran and a grandson of slaves.
beaten in the cotton fields.
84-year-old
Words can't express his excitement
Taresh Moore
in nuclear devices and ground fighting
homemade bombs,
Military hardware that can be used in nuclear devices and ground fighting
Military hardware that can be used in nuclear
racial-historical correction, showboat atrocity, murder mystery, love story,
"Miracle at St. Anna,"
African-American soldiers who fought in the U.S. armed forces during World War II
30-minute
is responsible for resurrecting and flying this B-17,
nationwide
Atlanta.
to remind Americans of the sacrifices
flying museum, to teach younger people the history
the Federal Flight Deck Officer program.
San Francisco International
a commercial pilot who had posted videos online
pilot
Haiti cannot put
absolutely needs
endangered peace efforts and singled out Ahmed over his attempt to sack Hassan.
resigned amid a power struggle with the African nation's
an Islamist revolt, a refugee crisis and rampant lawlessness that has fueled a wave of piracy off the Horn of Africa.
devastating earthquake,
covered
planes carrying supplies and ferrying search-and-rescue squads
wing
rugby
rugby
after treatment,
past 15 years,
unstable political situation in Madagascar has also been cited as hampering
one of the world's biodiversity
on foreign policy
make tough choices,
this president has faced tougher circumstances than perhaps at any time since the end of World War II, and he has delivered
U.S. State Department and the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
Madonna
off helping those families by building schools and supporting them
adopt a second child
those that don't, have a wider family that can look after them. And we believe that children in poverty should be best looked after by their own people in their own environment. And that people like Madonna and organizations like Save the Children are best off helping those families by building schools and supporting them to look after these so-called orphans and not transporting them to live across the world in mansions, in pop stars' mansions, that sort of thing.
not adopt and that the child would be better off in her own country.
supporting that child in its own environment.
urged Madonna to rethink her adoption of a girl
The Vatican
"New Moon" has also easily beaten its own predecessor, "Twilight,"
"Harry Potter,"
"New Moon"
"New Moon" has also easily beaten
An unnamed U.S. soldier
Sgt. Wesley Durbin,
non-combat related causes,"
"Had I been there, I would have helped;
is trying to solve a so-called "volunteer's dilemma." If everyone responds, the cost could be high and the volunteers might get in each others' way. It would be best if only one
the public relations department for insurance giant Cigna.
"purging,"
Potter described how underwriters at his former company would drive small businesses with expensive insurance claims to dump their Cigna policies. Industry executives refer to the practice as "purging,"
will get people upset,"
"I know from personal experience that members of Congress and the public have good reason to question the honesty and trustworthiness of the insurance industry."
the industry is playing "dirty tricks" in an effort to manipulate public opinion.
since she ran away in the fall of 2010.
a fake name.
searching for
United States,
Air France flight 447.
found in the Atlantic Ocean.
216
61 people from France, 58 Brazilians, 26 Germans and people from 29 other countries,
England
the Southwest Pacific region.
villages in Samoa and American Samoa,
full-body scanning machines to 11 airports across
450
overhaul its property management policy,
restrooms, vehicles and other public places,
took steps to implement its recommendations and overhaul its property management policy,
179
130
40
least 130 people
40
yelling, "Stay away from the window!" and pleading, "Please come immediately
Santa suit
Santa
California
Los Angeles
Shia militia group Hezbollah to power.
Next month,
Shia militia group Hezbollah
June 7
four decades.
it involved the whole generation."
last week's earthquake in Haiti,
children from Haiti to enter the United States on a temporary basis.
children from Haiti to enter the United States on a temporary basis.
getting the children aid and reuniting them with their families,
said Wednesday he does not regret expelling the
U.S. Ambassador Philip Goldberg
Wednesday he does not regret expelling the
Evo Morales
two tickets to Italy
Expedia.
spelled Crista instead of Christa.
a new ticket with your wife's name spelled correctly.
Agnieszka Radwanska
lively Chinatown
begin with breakfast or brunch New York style: eggs (however you'd like) and some good strong coffee to charge you
anything accessible at any hour.
neck-wrenching skyscrapers.
terror attacks in Mumbai,
Two Pakistani men accused of providing logistical support for last year's deadly
terror attacks in Mumbai, India,
Mark Fields,
Mark Fields:
three
win new customers with the great set of products
Ford
tar heroin
proved not to be a narcotic,
marijuana,
marijuana,
they created a space for the heart.
surgeons
displace organs including the lungs
the chest and the abdomen,
Chris Goodman.
drug addiction.
bad
on Sunday,
Goodman did not disclose
Croatia
Croatians
Croatia's
bid to join the European Union,
a trial run for the Olympics,
that Rio de Janeiro will host the 31st Olympiad in 2016
women need to learn how to text their way to love.
girly.
how to text their way to love.
with the emergency equipment
company provides FAA-approved ground training
three months ago.
National Transportation Safety Board
attending this week's National Transportation Safety Board hearing
a transcript of the cockpit voice recording from moments before the crash.
a multibillionaire media tycoon
following violent clashes between anti-government
universal healthcare
a revolution,"
Miley Cyrus
Stewart
"Hannah Montana: The Movie."
Easter
Masters golf tournament.
late 60s.
first lady
late 60s.
1972
her husband
latest collection, a brightly-colored clothing range
cartoon
Vital Voices, a non-governmental organization that aspires to empower women in developing countries, to address human trafficking and to train future leaders.
Vital Voices,
Diana Prince, aka Wonder Woman,
to Vital Voices, a non-governmental organization that aspires to empower women in developing countries, to address human trafficking and to train future leaders.
a brightly-colored clothing range
refused but immediately turned on the public address system so that other customers could hear
foiled a robbery
was still at large.
the man fled.
downtown Chicago.
still at large.
"brain hacking"
"Neural devices are innovating at an extremely rapid rate and hold tremendous promise for the future," said computer
Scientists
to salvage
"We've survived. It's a blessing,"
Coraline
Neil Gaiman's novella
James Cameron's
"Coraline"
malnutrition
risen by almost two-thirds in the past year,
The blast follows another huge attack on Sunday,
33
Sunday's
At least 33 people
faces more than a dozen charges, including murder, conspiracy to wage a war against the nation and terrorism.
Mohammed Ajmal Kasab,
December.
posters
Yeboah,
a male gorilla
La Boissiere Du Dore Zoo, Pays de la Loire, northwest France
slave labor
Samuel Fahrer and Sidney Lipson
Samuel Fahrer and Sidney Lipson
honored by the
"These soldiers endured extreme hardships of forced labor, beatings, poor living conditions, and ultimately a forced march of over 250 kilometers [about 155 miles] prior to liberation by advancing U.S. Armed Forces,"
Samuel Fahrer and Sidney Lipson
the fight
Military scenarios, violent police actions and straight-from-the-big-screen massive firefights
But things don't really get interesting until the action moves to
Kazakhstan and Brazil.
But things don't really get interesting until the action moves to Russia and the player is embedded in a squad of terrorists.
have resigned because they could not support a policy or an administration,
Matthew Hoh,
should not be committed.
Is he a viable partner?
he needs to answer
protest over the Afghan war.
Matthew Hoh,
impair lung function in people who are susceptible.
2,000
chronic beryllium disease,
Switzerland
Switzerland, along with Belgium, Luxembourg and the Netherlands, are the only European countries
Belgium, Luxembourg
one
Patrons at the cafe
a quarrel
of Rotterdam
38-foot yacht.
approximately 200 nautical miles from the Somali coast,
checkpoint-friendly bags.
able to leave laptops in bags that meet TSA screening requirements.
metal zippers, clips and buckles
Beginning Saturday,
"A month ago, maybe five weeks ago, I had the same procedure at Cedar-Sinai Hospital in Los Angeles that Bill Clinton had today,"
Larry King
"A month ago, maybe five weeks ago,
I feel very good.
Russia's Kamchatka Peninsula.
two
marauding bears
leaving out trash
bears are blamed for the deaths
the search for food
Russia's Kamchatka Peninsula.
photographs of the ferries -- including restricted areas -- and studying an emergency evacuation poster.
two
Seattle
FBI
The FBI
SEATTLE, Washington
California
Lance Armstrong
Lance Armstrong's
on his Twitter account
a team truck in California
46
James Young
about 8,000
three civil rights
Philadelphia,
"Breaking the Silence" -- which includes former Israeli soldiers -- has been dismissed by the Israeli military as slanderous.
dead according to officials in Gaza, while Israel put that death toll closer to 1,100,
"There are no factual details, no places, no names of incidents in specific houses on a specific date,"
horticulture
peppers.
The money goes back into an inmate fund that pays for things like the greenhouse
The inmates learn about growing plants, ornamentals, trees, herbs and vegetables -- including more than 1,200 varieties of peppers.
House Fire Hot Sauce, cooked up by inmates at the Hillsborough County
Michael Jackson
Madame Tussauds
"as a tribute to one of the greatest musicians of all time and to celebrate his amazing 40-year career."
Frank Buckles,
I.
Pentagon
U.S.
request was rejected.
consider a terrorist organization.
rejected.
criticized him
through using heroin and sharing dirty needles
She was a surgical technician
She had hepatitis C, which she
a third
school communities
metal detectors and security cameras,
metal detectors and security cameras, banned backpacks, required students to carry IDs and posted police in the hallways
Allocations for the Department of Education's Safe and Drug-Free Schools program were cut by a third between 1999 and 2008,
Columbine shootings,
changes the airline wants to make to cabin crew pay and work practices.
half of British Airways flights
was able to get three out of four planes to their destination
take death off the table
the murder of King, the murder of Amber Dubois, and assault with intent to commit rape of a third person.
pleaded guilty Friday to the murder of King, the murder of Amber Dubois, and assault with intent to commit rape of a third person.
he supported a deal to take death off the table for his daughter's killer in order to bring closure to the community.
Chelsea
punishment in California an "empty promise,"
is to be sentenced to two consecutive terms of life without the possibility of parole. He also waived his right to appeals, ensuring that he will die in prison,
Abu Qaswarah, also known as Abu Sara,
"Coalition forces returned fire in self-defense, leading to the death of five terrorists. It was later determined that one of the five was positively identified as
leadership.
Sara, was killed during an operation in Mosul on October 5,
AQI's senior leader in northern Iraq
military veteran.
a homeless shelter
the 9/11 attacks on the Pentagon.
Henry Louis Gates
White House,
he likes police Sgt. James Crowley.
the White House
21
Greek
Washington Times
Iranian-American freelance journalist named Roxana Saberi,
Tehran.
"I am grateful that y'all came out
M&Ms.
Midland,
"A good man took the oath of office today, and we offer him our prayers for success,"
boxes of M&Ms.
We're back in Texas, and we're here to stay,"
boxes of M&Ms.
Midland, Texas,
stunning and treacherous waters
Arctic Circle
"This group of American universities has no authority to decide whether, when or how authors forfeit their copyright protection. These aren't orphaned books, they're abducted books."
to block both digital lending and an orphaned works project.
many libraries at US universities
that the digital works are derived from an unauthorized scan,
libraries at US universities
is rare in such cases,
The charge carries a maximum of 180 days in jail and a $2,000 fine, although a first offender can usually expect a year or less probation,
Many defendants get "deferred adjudication," under which they are not technically convicted and it is removed from their criminal record if they successfully complete probation,
wresting control from drug traffickers.
the so-called "Shock of Peace" operation was a "historic chapter."
eliminate crime and arrest drug traffickers
"These are people who need to be able to raise their children in peace."
125 mph to 120 mph
from Punta Abreojos on the peninsula's west coast to Mulege on its east coast,
Jimena
most of the southern half of the Baja peninsula
most of the southern half of the Baja peninsula
east of the northern Leeward Islands,
lake town north of Moscow.
ABBA
ABBA
eight
pink ribbons
taping ESPN sports reporter Erin Andrews in the nude
the higher prices of the bigger bras was unfair.
Marks & Spencer
the surcharge on its larger lingerie.
1,739
local airports.
Tuesday
"That 72-hour window [in which most rescues are attempted] is not some casual number,"
apologize
"helped to contribute to ratcheting"
meet with Sgt. Crowley
Gates
"The Audacity to Win,"
a "dream ticket,"
picking Clinton as his running mate
members of Mexican drug cartels
drug cartels.
U.S. authorities are
Scandinavia.
Lilla Torg,
Kulturbolaget (Bergsgatan 18),
live acts,
Malmo,
Lilla Torg,
Malmo,
"I was upstairs when I spotted the camera car driving down the lane,"
blocked the search engine's camera car from photographing their homes.
Google
photographing their homes.
Broughton, north of London,
"We know that some people are uncomfortable with images of their houses or cars being included in the product, which is why we provide an easy way to request removal of imagery. Most imagery requests are processed within hours."
overcompetitive parent
accusations that they worked for the British
1.6 meters (5 feet, 3 inches),
okapi
Javier Zanetti
fifth place
fifth
Captain Javier Zanetti
Inter Milan's
once
Monday from the White House,
President Obama
stimulus plans and regulation of the financial industry,
Pittsburgh,
are at the heart of Pittsburgh's transformation,
Bolivia
the indigenous people
The wide-ranging constitution would give the government a greater role in the economy and more control over natural resources, broaden nationalization of private industries and increase the rights of indigenous
President Evo Morales
William "Bill" Garrett's
Schizophrenia
schizophrenia
improving, but remains in serious
"I was looking for some action -- something happening,"
get out of bed at 4:30 in the morning
4:30 a.m.
shortly after 4:30 a.m.
Friday morning.
Proclamation
Americans pay tribute to everyone who has served in the U.S. military.
because aftershocks were still being felt.
Wednesday
was not immediately known.
went outside and refused to go back
Dozens
The military decided
not releasing his
had not been charged.
on the outskirts of Split, Croatia,
at least six
at least six
Zagreb,
45,
meet with the
Hu Jintao.
five
Tottenham Hotspur humiliated
humiliated Wigan
sheep were mutating and dying
CNN.com
all of their sheep were mutating and dying due to the high levels of dioxin in the pastures where they grazed.
Megan Joy Corkrey
Megan Joy
Cowell
opened new doors to her future.
Simon Cowell
Megan Joy,
for you to provide them more data about your life,
a few weeks.
target marketing.
"real-time sharing"
the plans call for working hours to be extended and crew levels to be cut, changes that it has said will damage customer service and the BA brand.
call for working hours to be extended and crew levels to be cut,
Cairo University
Muslim women
women will not be allowed to wear the niqab in university areas
A recent declaration by a leading Egyptian cleric that women will not be allowed to wear the niqab in university areas frequented only by women
niqab wearers.
new rules preventing admission to niqab wearers.
"niqab"
tropical storm
Hanna
headed for the Bahamas
weakened from a hurricane
Bahamas
include the U.S. Atlantic coast from Miami, Florida, to Massachusetts, according to the hurricane center's long-range forecast map.
Charleston, South Carolina,
Valentino Rossi
the race in pole position.
Valentino Rossi
Abkhazia,
South Ossetia
South Ossetia,
Russia's Black Sea Fleet is currently based in the port of Sevastopol
Sevastopol
Pope Benedict XVI
Muslims believe that the Dome of the Rock is
grand mufti of Jerusalem,
the Prophet
3-0
Cameroon
Victor Obinna
the father's identity,
sect to let them take DNA from her infant so they can determine
brother-in-law, Jang Song Thaek,
an heir,
second congressional district,
difficulty breathing,
the state's second congressional district,
"The Korda photograph
around the world.
Ernesto "Che" Guevara stares pensively at the horizon, his steely eyes shielded behind a thick beard and his trademark beret.
"Che" Guevara
Michael Casey
March 5, 1960
three-week suspension
Brian Lima's
Brian Lima's
for glamour and hedonism came with a side order of carjackings and gangland shootouts.
The food, music,
much of its unwanted baggage from the 80s
the village will revert back to times of old, unspoilt and wonderfully English.
Linkenholt.
In a 121-page report, the doctors' group said that it uncovered medical evidence of torture, including beatings, electric shock, sleep deprivation, sexual humiliation, sodomy and scores of other abuses.
The Massachusetts-based Physicians for Human Rights
to detainees subject to torture and ill treatment by
detainees
detainees
medical evidence of torture,
issue a formal apology
least 14
on organized crime
millionaires, gangsters,
millionaires, gangsters, and even police officers. Known as "dahei" (combat triads), the campaign has put the spotlight on organized crime and how it has infested local bureaucracy and businesses through bribery, extortion, blackmail and violence.
organized crime and how it has infested local bureaucracy and businesses through bribery, extortion, blackmail and violence.
way of handling the war in Iraq.
way of handling the war in Iraq.
Obama's
Iraq
Tuesday night
George Bush
follow George Bush into a misguided war in Iraq."
her brother's
We tried intervention several times.
Chrysler and General Motors
through its term, regardless of where you bought your vehicle. In
by June 9,
Chrysler and General Motors
is not blending well in the diverse countryside.
pattern is best
two new camouflage color schemes and patterns
by the end of January 2010
diverse countryside.
is best by the end of January 2010 and the fielding of the
she will probably be confirmed,"
Hatch
Sen. Pat Roberts,
2003,
Jay Z's "Black Album"
a little known DJ operating under the name of Danger Mouse,
Brian Burton,
crocodile, giraffe
Apartheid Museum
understand the city's troubled past.
car-hire
an intriguing selection of big game dishes, including crocodile, giraffe and ostrich.
Apartheid
car-hire
The Lion Park,
Justice
of the opinion's impact over the years. Written by Clifford
established that idea of separation, something no other branch of government
baseball bats, Molotov cocktail bombs
provoked controversy
nearby towns of Longjumeau and Grigby
Longjumeau and Grigby
detective skills
bombs, drugs, missing people and corpses
35,000
Kaden, bomb-sniffing dog in training.
as a town hall meeting,
health care system.
John McCain and Barack Obama
as a town hall meeting,
President Bush's "failed" policies,
CNN/Opinion Research Corporation survey
CNN/Opinion
play a part in their country's future
Miley Cyrus, Demi Lovato, Bow Wow, the Jonas Brothers and others
"Are we fired up in here?"
Miley Cyrus, Demi Lovato, Bow Wow, the Jonas Brothers and others performed.
Lars von Trier.
Charlotte Gainsbourg and Willem Dafoe
(CNN)
frustrations
Italian international striker
13
Thomas J. Dart
Illinois,
expected to exceed 43,000.
expected to exceed 43,000.
a building that he said "should be condemned."
"This is embarrassing. It's disgusting. It makes me mad as hell,"
the building, which appears to be falling apart and filled with mold and rust.
"This is embarrassing. It's disgusting. It makes me mad as hell,"
Tehran.
Fatemeh Kiadarbandsari,
"full Islamic dress,"
"As soon as the image came up, I saw
El Paso, Texas.
boss,
violence generated by the war of the drug
6,000 killings.
tortured
people
"reveals a world riven by inequality,
81
Human rights and freedom of the press in China, the detention of terrorist
Darfur, Zimbabwe, Gaza, Iraq and Myanmar
Price-fixing schemes
Whitacre
the 1997 conviction of ADM
Sunni fighters.
U.S.
pays local sheiks to provide security
al Qaeda extremists
India and Pakistan
migrant workers
some workers paid up to $4,000 to recruiters in pursuit of good wages and low living expenses, taking on significant debts just to get the jobs.
Arnold Schwarzenegger,
Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger,
raise taxes on employment
California Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger,
Idaho, Alaska, Texas, South Carolina and Louisiana
Grand Isle,
26-year
intimidation
intimidation during the country's first peacetime presidential election
President Mahinda Rajapaksa
Sri Lanka's
constant guard of uniformed officers with billy clubs
juvenile justice solution
the program focuses on therapy, comfortable living conditions and an emphasis on job training and education.
therapy, comfortable living conditions and an emphasis on job training and education.
resigned from the top party
"I'm sorry if I sound like a desperate woman," she said on the tape. "I am desperate. The British people may be my last hope."
murder
murder of Joana Rodriguez,
Melissa Huckaby.
Sandra Cantu.
a speeding ticket.
The bodies of 152
Qavzin
168
plotting a rocket attack on U.S. military forces and Afghan civilians at Jalalabad Airfield.
"You were convicted 99 percent by your own words,"
convicted and sentenced in the United States under a 2006 law that increased the penalty for a defendant found to be involved
Khan Mohammed,
the court
surface-to-air missiles, armor-piercing rocket launchers, "ultralight" airplanes, unmanned aerial vehicles, and other weapons,
has long been considered by the international community as one of the world's most prolific arms traffickers,"
Viktor Bout
conspiracy
substantially change our state of mind
architect Robert Adam
Alain de Botton
Alain de Botton
The ECB has thus become the "central counterparty" to most north-south lending in Europe.
Europe's regional split of savings habits.
the Norwegian Nobel Committee's
"for his extraordinary efforts to strengthen international diplomacy and co-operation between peoples"
Europeans,
the peace prize is being awarded to Obama "for his extraordinary efforts to strengthen international diplomacy and co-operation between peoples"
"The Longest Yard,"
"Big Daddy," "The Waterboy"
"Funny People,"
Judd Apatow.
inquiring into the accident when Sebastian Vettel crashed into Mark Webber in Fuji.
would suffer no penalty
FIA
Sebastien Vettel
allegations of erratic driving
Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia,
Sigifredo Lopez
Eleven of the congressmen
more samples,
industrial-scale livestock
the nation had developed a strong nuclear deterrence capability,
2007.
I have to do my part
Iraq
CNN
describes
killed in a bomb blast in
the hardships faced by Iraqi women.
1 per cent
less than 1
Teratomas
on the eve of the All-Star Game in New Orleans this weekend.
formation of a European division with five new teams in major markets.
contests this season in London and Rome.
European franchises
England
David Stern
American basketball is planning to create up to five new European franchises
Numerology deals with the influence of numbers on personal characteristics and human affairs.
the number
the singer's soul
the star will have an opportunity at success and fame again.
appearing in
connection with terror
Daood Gilani,
of helping plan terror attacks against a Danish newspaper that ran cartoons of the Prophet Mohammed,
Syed Saleem
Monday.
Lawyers for Salinger filed suit in federal court this week to stop the publication, sale and advertisement of "60 Years Later: Coming Through the Rye," a novel written by an author calling himself J.D. California and published by a Swedish company that advertises joke books and a "sexual dictionary" on its Web site.
"There's no more to Holden Caulfield. Read the book again. It's all there,"
in New York.
Salinger's copyright rights in both his novel and the character Holden Caulfield,
copyright rights in both his novel and the character Holden Caulfield, who is the narrator and essence of that novel,"
Dancy-Power Automotive in Harlem, New York.
Jackson sitting in Renaissance-era clothes and holding a book.
"The Book"
Reagan is in good spirits, especially comforted to be receiving care
suffering a broken pelvis,
fractured pelvis and sacrum
President Ronald Reagan,
flat-faced frogfish, bug-eating slug and carnivorous sea sponge
carnivorous sea sponge
the birth of Carolus Linnaeus, who initiated the modern system of classifying plants and animals.
researchers from the United Nations Environment Program
that the world is not doing enough to protect vulnerable eco-systems.
The conflict in Georgia began late last week, when Tbilisi launched a military incursion into South Ossetia in an effort to rout separatist rebels.
Poti.
when Tbilisi launched a military incursion into South Ossetia in an effort to rout separatist rebels.
two key Georgian cities
Tbilisi launched a military incursion into South Ossetia in an effort to rout separatist rebels.
more than 100
It is a sport littered with odd words and phrases and MainSail has put together a
nautical terminology.
sailing.
of 10 of the weirdest below.
odd words
"futtock"
The U.S.
five propaganda videos
Place a custom-built cap to fit over the "lower marine riser package,"
most of the oil" that has fed
BP
Place a custom-built cap to fit over the "lower marine riser package,"
religion and clan
set Lebanon back 20 years.
I
the struggle where religion and clan play the main roles
the country's brief renaissance
Mandela's life
Queen, Amy Winehouse and Jerry Dammers
Queen, Amy Winehouse and Jerry Dammers
Hollywood star Will Smith led a crowd of 46,664 in a chorus of "Happy Birthday"
Hollywood star Will Smith led a crowd of 46,664 in a chorus of "Happy
admitted his role in the Khmer Rouge's genocidal reign.
just outside the Cambodian capital, Phnom Penh.
Communist Party members
a basic introduction of himself.
"Where is the common sense when they know the ice is broken?"
more than 150
more than 150
Lake Erie
"This just cost the taxpayers a ton of money,"
ice floes could break away from the main ice area in the western section of the lake.
winter
ice fishermen who had to be rescued Saturday after high
11 years of marriage.
Sarkozy told L'Est Republicain on Friday that the couple's relationship had not been able to survive the glare of the media spotlight following a highly public separation in 2005.
five
"I am someone who likes the shadows, serenity, tranquility. I had a husband who was a public man, I always knew that, I accompanied him for 20 years. But me, I think that is not my place. It is no longer my place,"
habitat destruction.
"They have to learn that their whole environment is completely different from the cage,"
"They have to learn that their whole environment is completely different from the cage,"
sanctuary
the world would forget about political developments in Iran.
WILL MISS YOU! WE LOVE YOU MICHAEL!!!"
commented, pondered, and paid tribute
Rany Freeman, an Egyptian living in Canada, said in a video submission. "Regardless to his strange behaviors or questionable events that happened to his life, let's remember him as the great entertainer he was."
"Any of the baby boomer generation or, you know, people from my age or our time, I mean they have grown up on his music. Literally, people have been inspired by his dance movements, by his music.
talked of an impromptu memorial for the late singer at the "Stone Circle,"
survival of brain remains where no other soft tissues are preserved is extremely
a skull
brain
"Hand of God
northern Idaho
definitely a symbol of the
in a motel,
the death of a pregnant soldier
Spc. Megan Lynn Touma,
Spc. Megan Lynn Touma,
the death of a pregnant soldier
Spc. Megan Lynn Touma,
Former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney
Mitt Romney
groups will take a more aggressive stance
interest groups
nearly twice as much
Former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney
unions and corporations to buy TV time
buy TV time
to the airwaves to reach voters.
political television advertising.
TV
in the jungle,
Thirty
found in the jungle,
"We stand by and await his release and his next masterwork,"
Peers of Roman Polanski have praised
Roman Polanski
Switzerland,
Swiss filmmaker Otto Weisser,
Peers
Streets in London
A massive fire
clouds of white smoke
were cordoned off
over the city skyline,
Streets in London
euthanize abandoned horses
Lifesavers Wild
in your leaders
spreading them out among all taxpayers.
trust in government declined
we've just invented the time-fax machine.
spreading them out among all taxpayers.
the decisions Washington makes today could have fateful consequences for the future.
to control the symptoms of morning sickness.
1958 to 1962
466
a £20 million ($32.5 million) fund
$2 billion
State's decommissioned Hanford nuclear site,
"Hanford is getting more money than many states in stimulus funds
four Shiite mosques,
PMOI
Baghdad
are in need of food
Five million Zimbabweans
The jailer, Arthur Redelfs, and his wife, Lesley Ann Enriquez,
An American jailer was the target in the shooting deaths of three people
Arthur Redelfs, and his wife, Lesley Ann Enriquez,
Ricardo Valles de la Rosa,
Somali pirates,
e-mail
Thursday.
couple
Tuesday evening
Secret Service
two Secret Service agents
Tareq and Michaele Salahi
starting at 7 p.m.
7 p.m. PT (10 p.m. ET)
a homicide.
Jackson's death
Sammy Davis Jr., Humphrey Bogart
Sammy Davis Jr., Humphrey Bogart and Jean Harlow
is unrelentingly secretive about who, exactly, is entombed in its parks.
Spain's northern Basque region,
Arrigorriaga
A car bomb
A car
Spanish national police officer
Spain's northern Basque region,
police officer
A car bomb exploded Friday morning in Spain's northern Basque region, killing
by the end of the week.
U.S. Food and Drug Administration
FDA
pistachios
12:01
would drive many loyal troops out of the military.
allowing gays and lesbians to serve would drive many loyal troops out of the military.
at 12:01 a.m.,
New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg
Arkansas Attorney General Dustin McDaniel testified on Sotomayor's behalf,
reverse discrimination
Frank Ricci
Frank Ricci,
New Haven, Connecticut, firefighter
firefighter Frank Ricci,
Rodgers
Supplies
diseases, like cholera and tuberculosis,
$50,000
Barbara Dainton-West,
9-week-old
Barbara Dainton-West,
lifted from the lifeboat onto Carpathia, the rescue ship, in a mail sack,"
$50,000 for her, is set
3.2-inch QVGA touch screen display, navigational buttons and a trackball.
Vodafone's
latest salvo in the cellphone wars
Android-capable handset,
the department does not intend to open an investigation unless the alleged victim comes forward
filed a civil complaint against Roethlisberger
former child star
Glenn Mulcaire,
the possibility that the Daily Mirror found out though phone hacking
5,800
face
write out the alphabet
this
attending an American school
Matador Joselito Ortega
the words "Gay Up,"
name of the energy drink.
South Korea
Lahore's historic red light
conservative establishment: painter and restaurant owner
Pakistan's most vocal defender of prostitutes.
Iqbal Hussain.
a popular restaurant for tourists and wealthy Pakistanis. On one side
human beings,"
oxygen,
build their own operating room.
infection or rhabdomyolysis, a kidney disease that follows injuries where muscles are crushed.
to drive to Baytown, Texas,"
Conroe, 40 minutes north of Houston,
Arcade Comeaux Jr.,
293
India
Mahendra Dhoni
20
develop an incentive program
one of the highest tax credits in the United States:
Georgia
fake his own death by crashing his private plane into a Florida swamp.
securities violations
Marcus Schrenker
is "an accomplished pilot" who owns "a couple of airplanes" and flies regularly.
Schrenker
asks whether Obama's cool, calm demeanor will be a plus in negotiating with world leaders.
cool, calm demeanor
John McCain
Obama.
to send out for ice.
Edwin
his brother, Edwin,
police might have found Edwin locked in a dank Philadelphia basement with three other people.
the nation's capital
stopping in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania; Wilmington, Delaware; and then making a stop for an event in Baltimore, Maryland,
January 20.
armed with pipe bombs, a chainsaw and a 2-foot-long sword.
about 8 a.m. Monday.
2-foot-long
"a potentially very drastic event"
two
"It had the potential to be a catastrophic incident,"
held by Colombian FARC rebels as a hostage for more than
12 years,
FARC
carbon dioxide
protect remaining tropical forests.
United Nations
special climate change summit,
Global climate change
Freedom and Justice Party
Freedom and Justice Party (FJP)
Egypt's parliamentary
Egyptian people," he said.
it's the will of the people,
problem you have, there's a purpose behind it.
A lot of people are really hurting because of the economy and because of the fears about
our president.
purpose behind it.
God
Inter Milan
must avoid defeat which could see them make a sensational exit
defending champions
Champions League group showdown with Inter Milan
Camp Nou.
Paul McCartney
Heather Mills presented "less than candid" testimony
£24.3 million ($48.6 million)
was a "less than impressive witness"
Heather Mills
four-year marriage.
Judge Hugh Bennett
and think of all the money I'll save from not having to text in my vote."
think of all the money I'll save from not having to text in my vote."
judges' panel on "American Idol"
Darrin Tuck,
a jury
images of the small girl being sexually assaulted.
at the age of 16
16
16
2007 when he became only the third player to pass 11,000 runs in Test cricket.
50
African-American scholars
King's exact words
inscription marking the new
the wounds in their hearts that will never quite heal:
kin of Columbine
Mark van Bommel
the professor,
Professor Barbara Carroll,
Zinkhan's daughter
by a relative Friday,
was claimed by a relative
'troubled past'
there's growing support
A Day Without Gays
nationwide
there's
began in 1990,
Americans
gay
A Day Without Gays
he was traveling east on Interstate 8 outside of the San Diego area when he attempted to pass a slower vehicle.
Chewang Norphel,
Nigerian civil engineer,
Paolo Guerrero
further disciplinary action
no
Jacksonville, Florida.
an explosion
Fourteen
Wednesday
an explosion
hellish inferno.
explosion
Shands Hospital in Jacksonville,
Firefighters were still battling hot spots, and the effort will be going on for "quite some time,"
the effort will be going on for "quite some time,"
"Literally, it's a hellish inferno. There is no other way to describe it," said
still battling hot spots,
legal
the young Somali captive
detained Somali youth
at least 18 years of
27,
Relaxation, meditation and breathing skills
10
the introduction of austerity measures,
to
The European Central Bank,
about the ECB becoming more active.
at her house northwest of Los Angeles.
Thursday night
Columbia Farms or
58 of those arrested
Greenville, South Carolina,
Sandra, flowers and stuffed animals
Melissa Huckaby,
video that showcased some of the family's favorite photos.
of sunbathers apparently enjoying a day at the beach just meters from where the bodies of two drowned
sunbathers in bikinis and swimming trunks sitting close to where the girls' feet can be seen poking out from under the towels concealing their bodies.
the beach just meters from where the bodies of two drowned Roma girls were laid out on the sand.
the bodies of two drowned
Torregaveta,
ANSA
the separatists.
"there is no doubt" that Georgia provoked the clash.
the United States is jeopardizing its fragile relationship with Russia by backing Georgia.
jeopardizing its fragile relationship with Russia
lengthy government approval
Haiti
should urgently accept Haitian orphans on humanitarian grounds
Pando, Beni, Santa Cruz, Tarija and Chuquisaca provinces.
opposition groups have blockaded major roads and threaten to disrupt the nation's natural gas shipments, particularly to Brazil and Argentina.
lent support
government.
projects that Architecture for Humanity is overseeing.
debate on Design for Good:
Architecture for Humanity
from 1 to 5 years old,
day-care center
1 to 5
warehouse
to investigate the fire.
Rivershore Drive
his home
but it took 30,000 sand bags.
daughter Cora,
is a lovable, sometimes outrageous and always off-the-wall senior citizen who has stolen every scene
Mann's
over-pressurization of the driver's
a recall notice in the mail
receive a recall notice in the mail
the Under-20 World Cup in Egypt
qualify for South Africa 2010 World Cup.
The daily soap
Acteal village
Zapatista Army of National Liberation,
Chiapas.
Zapatista Army of National Liberation,
The Mexican Supreme Court
cue in line to receive aid in L'Aqulia
"I'm always sleepy,"
topple Serena
Barclays Dubai Tennis Championships.
"I'm literally taking a nap during the first set and the match before me,
Jews.
not speaking out against the Nazi persecution of Jews.
denying that the Nazis systematically set out to murder Jews in the Holocaust.
detractors of not speaking out against the Nazi persecution of Jews.
declare Pius XII a saint.
"I have learned the lesson that in the future in the Holy See we will have to pay greater attention to that source of news."
Benedict XVI
Gulab Mangal,
disable the bombs,
Gulab Mangal,
Two coalition U.S. soldiers
southern Afghanistan
Gulab Mangal,
administration's release of four documents last week that had authorized waterboarding
Eric Holder was decidedly noncommittal
more secret documents related to alleged torture,
lawmakers complained about the administration's release of
Pulitzer Prize winners
Monday,
14
Writer Jon Meacham won a Pulitzer
Pulitzer
"It's an overdue acknowledgement that some of the best journalism in the world and in America is being created not for print publication but for places that live entirely on the Web,"
Pulitzer
polar bears
ice is disappearing
possible conflict with India
India
high
manufactured between 1997 and 2003,
possibility of engine fires
GM's
Owners and dealers affected by the recall
faulty gasket on the engine rocker cover.
a potential for oil to leak on the exhaust manifold during hard braking.
every January
from 18 to 85,
alumni of the two famous academic institutions.
Ted Dexter,
going forward in spite of the weather,"
"President's Putter" event takes place every January at Rye Golf Club between alumni of the two famous academic institutions.
second
President Barack Obama's
but said they don't change his view of the United States as an imperialist nation.
fracturing her elbow.
working from home Thursday
Clinton fell Wednesday afternoon
Rinko Kikuchi
Rinko Kikuchi
the traditional demure image of the Japanese woman
Rinko Kikuchi
Channel.
recall notice
airbag inflators
driver-side airbags
127
San Simeon, California,
Museum-worthy pieces
to stop recruiting about 3,000 new soldiers to fill vacant positions when it has yet to take in former Maoist rebels, as a 2006 peace deal required.
country's army chief of staff
country's army chief of staff to stay in office after they had fired him,
government's order
1967
Harlem's Apollo Theater
Fans of Michael Jackson
lay flowers and other mementos
abducting each other for ransoms or retribution.
357 in 2007
police
supporting the separatists
Indian military
has long accused Pakistan of supporting the separatists
Line of Control that separates Kashmir between India and Pakistan.
replacement of a part on A330 planes
US Airways,
replace devices that could be giving false airspeed indications.
The Federal Aviation Administration ordered U.S. airlines Thursday to replace a part
install the Goodrich pitot tubes
the replacement of a part on A330 planes
56
Eighty percent of officers believe it is unreasonable to expect the
"Sixty percent said the U.S. military is weaker than it was five years ago,"
at least four
that the Republican Guard was bombarding the headquarters of the 1st Armored Division,
The women called for sanctions against President Ali Abdullah
Barcelona Open
Spaniard David Ferrer a third successive final appearance at
Twelve hundred athletes from 79 nations
the west coast of Australia
Both were long-shot underdogs for their party's nomination.
Obama represents validation of Lincoln's hope of equal opportunity for all.
today,
Portugal and Manchester United star Cristiano Ronaldo
Cristiano Ronaldo
ceremony in Zurich
New York
New York's John F. Kennedy International airport
Paris,
Air France A380
Air France A380
lawyers
Elston
Justice Department officials
larger investigation of Justice Department politics
people with Democratic Party ties
Trinity Church's gravestones
weekday lunches (noon to 1:30 p.m.) and as work winds down (after 4 p.m.).
the new 9/11 Memorial.
eaten her two offspring.
Nuremberg City Zoo,
"We were 100 percent sure that the baby was going to die if we didn't take it away from her,"
upset and confused, taking her baby in and out of the animals'
Vera seems to miss her cub,
the zoo said keepers decided to take the cub away
get a loophole into a proposed tax law
Lord Taylor of Blackburn
get a loophole into a proposed tax law in exchange for cash,
a lord
Peruvian President Alan Garcia
More than 50
more than 30
Peruvian President
since Friday.
House Republicans
overhaul the U.S. health care system
package put together by moderate Republicans in the House of Representatives would be far cheaper than a plan being drawn up in the Senate.
that they can be viable in the long term.
Executive Rick Wagoner will resign as part of the federal government's bailout strategy
giving General Motors 60 days worth of financing
$6 billion and 30 days to complete an agreement with Italian automaker Fiat,
"new leadership"
only result in their doing more of the same, for example. Meanwhile, there are a host of disruptive training organizations that are providing comparable educators at lower cost, such as Teach for America, the American Board for Certification of Teacher Excellence, and New Leaders for New
new learning models and innovations,
the sudden and massive amount of funding -- nearly $100 billion -- that the federal government is throwing at the nation's schools.
ignoring the laws of innovation,
bolster new learning models and innovations,
bolster new learning models and innovations,
43 chains with more than 75 locations
Uno's Chicago Grill
restaurant choices
restaurant choices
world of sit-down restaurants,
restaurants
advisory panel
43 chains with more than 75 locations across the country
the U.N.
to get aid to Haiti right away to save lives.
food, water, medicine, security and information people need."
officials
travel to Haiti
trapped
a mother and baby elephant
South Luangwa Conservation Society (SLCS) and the local wildlife authority,
Staff and tourists at Kapani Safari Lodge
twitches, glares and growls
young New Zealander Sofia Walker facing off with a large lion
viewing platform while visiting the Wellington Zoo
More than 2,000
2,000
ranging from a cooking fire at a drug trafficking operation to a bird flying into a power line.
fighting the blaze,
bird flying into a power line.
a bird flying into a power line.
"It really goes to show you that it doesn't take much with these dry conditions to start a fire,"
CalFire
run out of fuel.
frisky golden Labrador retriever adopted by Florida newspaper writers
(Owen Wilson and Jennifer Aniston),
Owen Wilson,
the human-canine connection
"Marley & Me,"
over excessive CEO pay and perks.
pay at $500,000
all aspects of CEO pay and perks
something real, something big, something important about the price of gasoline,"
Senate
speculation in oil futures
crack down on oil
amendments
28 amendments
two
November 21,
capital of Somalia
capital of Somalia
2009.
have not yet begun to withdraw
"This was a brutal homicide against an entire family and we are determined
"This was a brutal homicide against an entire family and we are determined to identify and arrest those responsible,"
a 3-year-old girl,
One survivor, a 3-year-old girl,
Beason, Illinois,
their Beason, Illinois, home,
ALS
Stephen Hawking
ALS, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.
350,000
350,000
ALS,
instructions sent to him by text message.
Congo field hospital
removing the collar bone and shoulder blade.
Jena, Louisiana,
"It's not a done deal until it's a done deal," he said.
six African-American teenagers
six
about 3,000
case
Jim Bittermann.
two
Napoleon Bonaparte
alternative
130,000
1,600
CNG
David Bird,
the route that suspect Derrick Bird,
David Bird,
fiscal irresponsibility into policy proposals
Manchester United.
heavily in their side
Germany
1-0
kidnapping
they have not eliminated Phillip
Phillip Garrido as a
Phillip and Nancy Garrido
the Garrido
July 9.
July 9.
Iraqis survey the damage
in Nineveh province,
Hillary Clinton
Monday night debate
President Clinton
South Carolina,
Atlanta, Georgia's
David Bohrman,
"I thought it was a good
criticized a report Gupta did on CNN Monday on "Sicko."
"I thought it was a good
America's health care system,
documentary
Gupta did on CNN Monday on "Sicko."
Michael Moore
Moore's film "Sicko"
on CNN Monday on "Sicko."
CNN
Paint sealant
exclusions in the plan,"
paint sealant, fabric protection/leather care, extended warranties, extended 'one price' service contracts, rust/underbody coatings and anti-theft systems,
and the plan excludes burn holes from cigarette ashes, and you're not diligent about making sure your ash is always short, that might not be a good purchase because of that exclusion.
transferable policies,
bodies of two drowned Roma girls
on a beach
beach towels
dead Roma girls
they carry on swimming, sunbathing, sipping soft drinks and chatting."
to beg and sell trinkets.
sunbathers in bikinis and swimming trunks sitting close to where the girls' feet can be seen poking out from under the towels concealing their bodies.
archbishop and civil liberties campaigners
the company roughly $5 million,
shoulder
"Due to injuries Steven Tyler sustained last week when he fell from the stage during a concert in Sturgis, South Dakota, doctors have advised the lead singer to take the time to properly recuperate from the accident that resulted in a broken shoulder and stitches to his head,"
health care workers to refuse to provide certain reproductive services,
federal
organization of Christian physicians
New York's Hudson
bird
a flock of birds.
slightly
New York's Hudson River,
Congressional Medal of Honor Society
John Finn,
Chicago,
The company did not disclose
helicopter
more than $1 million
$1 million
group of heavily-armed thieves
President Kurmanbek Bakiyev
A Russian-led bloc of post-Soviet nations
Khatami
Mir Hossein Moussavi
72 percent
65.7
the Preservation Trust wants to prevent a trash-processing facility with a 350-foot smokestack from being built nearby.
350-foot smokestack
Wal-Mart Supercenter
Par-3
Children aged eight to 16
televised,
police
U.S. Army officials
front lawn of a Jersey City, New Jersey, home,
"is no longer operable and not considered to be a hazard to public safety,"
front lawn of a Jersey City, New Jersey, home,
U.S. Army officials
"is no longer operable
The launcher has been turned
has been turned over
they could not determine if the launcher had been fired, but indicated they should know once they find out where it came from.
20-year-old AT4 anti-tank rocket launcher tube,
anti-tank rocket launcher tube, a one-time-use device,
The launcher has been turned over to U.S. Army officials at the 754th Ordnance Company,
U.S. Army officials at the 754th Ordnance Company,
20-year-old AT4 anti-tank rocket launcher tube,
U.S. Army officials at the 754th Ordnance Company,
the Stars" judges
social networking
fans of Woz
1998.
Discworld
Terry Pratchett
Order of the British Empire "for services to literature"
Pratchett
Pratchett's Discworld
"a very rare form of early onset Alzheimer's."
"Leaders at the top have to walk their talk and really make
texting
texting while driving
"Absolutely.
"I'm not looking."
"I'm not looking."
used by President-elect Obama were improperly breached,
Records from a cell phone used by President-elect Obama were improperly breached,
the transition team was told
Lowell McAdam,
Verizon Wireless workers
presidential victory
Barack Obama's
At least 1,000
"It feels like hope won,"
At least 1,000 people
Democratic Rep. William Jefferson
Anh "Joseph" Cao
Democratic Rep. William Jefferson
push more young people to become politically active.
that many of our young people will consider being more politically active and being move involved in the community.
for protecting other
set up Web sites to support their husbands:
All three wives
Ted Kennedy,
31
68-31
Sonia Sotomayor,
remaining between 17 and 18
have mushroomed during the last 25 years,
cost airlines $275 million extra for fuel
Prime Minister Sheikh Hasina
inside the headquarters of the Bangladesh Rifles paramilitary in the capital, Dhaka,
army officers
amnesty.
army officers
over 80 million
SING
a criminal investigation
found dead
"The Ethiopian federal police
American diplomat
final three months,
Janet Jackson "will help open" its video music awards
Janet Jackson "will help open" its video music awards
will get their first peek during the MTV show at the behind-the-scenes documentary of the pop star's final three months,
Ohio
a grizzly bear, two monkeys and three leopards
The Humane Society of the United States
two wolves, six black bears, two grizzly bears, nine male lions, eight lionesses, one baboon, three mountain lions, and 18 Bengal tigers.
NATO send reinforcements to the volatile Kandahar province.
country's military
stem a rising tide of noncommunicable diseases,
from the diseases
"Three out of every five people on Earth die from the diseases that we gather here to address."
speedy trials and swift judgments for detained officials from Mubarak's regime.
killing pro-democracy protesters
57
the legality of the declaration,
talks
about 300,000
Justice and Equality Movement (JEM)
agreement
two weeks after Tuesday's signing,
government and the Justice and Equality Movement
one-time awards of 250 or 500 bonus miles for donations.
overcrowded.
we have to project that not just for our own interests but
acknowledged the scrutiny focused on U.S. response.
ramp space -- where aircraft are parked, unloaded, loaded, refueled or boarded -- was overcrowded.
Russian Foreign Ministry spokesman Andrei Nesterenko
Russia
Venezuela
Russia's invasion
conflict in the Caucasus
Russia
"We exercise
Venezuela
Russia
Olympics kick off on August 8
Chinese government
rush of people wishing to marry when
bracing itself for a rush of people wishing to marry
"eight"
8 p.m. on 8/8/08.
August 19 to 23.
197 inches (5 meters).
India's financial capital of Mumbai
are expected to
5 meters Friday, 4.9 meters Saturday and 4.7 meters Sunday,
5 meters Friday, 4.9 meters Saturday and 4.7 meters Sunday,
for peaceful power generation.
an arrest warrant
has issued an arrest warrant for U.S. cyclist Floyd Landis
Floyd Landis
shooting death of Johanna Justin-Jinich.
Morgan's sister
Jerry Robinson
rare original artwork and comics,
1930s,
More than 70 years ago,
"Superman started in 1938.
"It was never our intention to offend anyone," said John
The Valley Swim Club
"It was never our intention to offend anyone,"
the club's board
debate
former Sen. John Edwards.
Sen. John Edwards.
duel
suspended his presidential run
Thursday
8 p.m. ET Thursday on CNN and CNN.com.
at 8 p.m. ET Thursday
duel for Super Tuesday
duel for Super Tuesday
8 p.m. ET Thursday
Hillary Clinton and Barack Obama
Van Nuys Division station
Coolio's
Paul Burrell's
United States or South Africa.
United States or South Africa.
was planning to buy property to live in part of the time and that the location may have been in the United States or South Africa.
contained a "secret," which he claimed he could not remember.
Bilal Ahmed's
Karachi, Pakistan
Lyari, one of the poorest, toughest and most dangerous neighborhoods in the sprawling southern port city of Karachi.
this weekend,
with White House officials
in Jerusalem National Park.
"one well-known type."
a hoard of gold coins
Archaeologists
in Jerusalem National Park.
the other women who couldn't or wouldn't."
"still in denial"
came forward Monday "for the other women who couldn't or wouldn't."
predict that logging on to a luxury lifestyle could be attainable for all of us
use of virtual worlds
"Youth raised in such conditions might live increasingly Spartan lives in the physical world,
Jafar Ardabili's matchmaking
More than 2,000
matchmaking service provides one option for Iranian
CharityNavigator.com
GlobalGoodsPartners.org, BuildaNest.com
Walter E. Ellis,
nine
The homicides occurred between 1986 and 2007,
1986.
over 21 years,
Walter E. Ellis,
doomsday
some see as the dawn of a new era, and others as an expiration
John Major Jenkins,
developed by the Maya,
very little
45
Cancún
a retired Mexican general
45 days
Cancún Mayor Gregorio Sanchez Martinez
Gen. Mauro Enrique Tello Quinonez's
the fact that the teens were charged as adults.
the fact that the teens were charged as adults.
over 65 percent of his body.
asking that their clients be allowed to post
over 65 percent of
attempted murder,
Three
dispatched men with whips to the streets around Bakara market and they are flogging any woman
Somalia's
not wearing headscarves
sharia,
terror trials
Families of September 11 victims
restart terror trials there.
restart terror trials
"It's not something you want to see,"
animal rights
"These animals are beaten to death, they're skinned alive, their throats are slashed while they're still alive,"
Jennifer Garner and Ben Affleck
declined to
declined to
cancer drugs,
larger trials
they were targeting the nation's financial sector and "trying to destroy the jobs of working people"
Occupy Wall Street
hundreds of
depend on salaries that "come from the taxes paid by the people they're trying to vilify."
$10,000 held in two sealed Caesars Palace envelopes
Ignacio Marquez,
messages
12 years old at the time.
4-year-old
"What I was worried about is, is he still alive? Because his head just dropped, and he wasn't helping himself or helping me,"
despite a sharp division in the Jackson family over the matter, Prince, 12, Paris, 11, and Blanket, 7, would be included in the show.
it was "entirely possible" that "other members of the Jackson family" could appear on the show, but it is too soon to know.
"The Jacksons: A Family Dynasty,"
sister, Rebbie, "feels Michael would spin in his grave if he knew his kids would be on this show."
June 25
third and fourth
Beer pong,
Beer Pong.
wife of ousted Prime Minister Thaksin Shinawatra
ousted Prime Minister
Pojamarn Shinawatra
Prime Minister Thaksin Shinawatra
at the Hotel De Vrouwe Van Stavoren
in the Netherlands
Cape
Cape Town, South Africa's sleek Grand Daddy hotel
enormous casks on the grounds of the Hotel De Vrouwe Van Stavoren in the Netherlands
unsafe U.S. beef.
Tens of thousands of South Koreans
mad cow disease
South Koreans
mad cow disease
ghosts,
Grant Wilson,
spawned imitators across the United States and affiliates in 12 countries.
ain't afraid of no
he ain't afraid of no
the al-Rumeila oil field, one of the largest in the world.
the al-Rumeila
increase production at the oil field by 50 percent,
BP and China National Petroleum Corporation
"disrespectful" to place different faiths in competition with each other and accused Kanal T of using religion to boost ratings.
atheists
"disrespectful" to place different faiths in competition with each other
TV show offers converts to Islam the chance to visit Mecca.
a Muslim imam, a Catholic priest, a Jewish rabbi and a Buddhist monk
Turkish television
a Muslim imam, a Catholic priest, a Jewish rabbi and a Buddhist monk attempting to persuade 10 atheists of the merits of their religion,
atheists
death of his ex-wife,
Fiore
Saturday stuffed into a suitcase in California.
about the death of his ex-wife, model Jasmine Fiore.
Blaine Marina
seen driving a boat in Blaine Marina
37.8 million
38.4 million
died in March
hunger, illness
Capt. Richard Phillips
pirates had targeted an American ship.
is being held by pirates
ships they have already hijacked and larger ships from which they are launching skiffs,
lifeboat off Somalia.
"The Hughleys"
acting and his standup performances.
acting and his standup performances.
Hughley's humorous take
Munich
a 54-year-old farmer
world's first double-arm
40
lost both his arms in an accident,
six years ago,
aimed at resolving the ongoing dispute between Ukraine and Russia
Ukrainian Prime Minister Yulia Tymoshenko
the Social Page Evaluator
help marketers get a better understanding of a Facebook page's value.
Prime Minister Stephen Harper
carrying out a no-confidence vote in Parliament
Conservative Party
to undergo a gender transition and then want to reverse it,
one advocate estimates that 0.25 to 0.5
"For us, our wish is that it's a policy to be taken by the whole GCC, to either basket or revalue our currency. I cannot see a decision. Even in Qatar, we have no decision up to now."
The U.S. Federal
The ritual stoning of three pillars,
pushed the insurance giant too hard on the bonuses,
push too hard on executive bonuses.
push too hard on executive bonuses.
Michel Bezuijen,
flight data and voice recorders
crash of an airplane
field near Amsterdam's main airport,
L'Hydroptere
L'Hydroptere
to pass the 100km per hour mark (54 knots) after reaching a peak of 53.69 knots in training last month.
Port Saint-Louis du Rhone near Marseille in the south of France.
pass the 100km per hour mark (54 knots)
bad
113,000 Americans
demonstrate that it is possible to build cars in America and make money.
bailout would subsidize
bailout would subsidize bad management
Obama's election
breaking its addiction to segregation.
the transformative effect of Dr. King's struggle, leadership and legacy in dismantling segregation and institutional racism in the United States.
speechwriter for Dr. King.
earlier this month.
United Arab Emirates
luxury yacht industry
super-yachts.
one of the world's greatest super-yacht hubs.
two jock straps
1300s.
Lisa Lindahl
sports bra
November,
At least 330,000
330,000
Fresno County,
Fresno County,
the possibility of an insurgency that could have sapped the new government's time and energy,
Figuring out how to create a sense of national reconciliation
the country's new government,
ruled by a military council, and fierce political struggles dominate.
the primary unifying force that held the rebels together is gone,
insurgency that could have sapped the new government's time and energy,
myriad divisions within the country,
Figuring out how to create a sense of national reconciliation
filler TV
"True Blood," "Torchwood Children of Earth"
Summer
a wasteland,
anti-illegal immigration rally
calling for workers' rights and a path to citizenship for the country's nearly 12 million undocumented immigrants.
Boston, Massachusetts; Detroit, Michigan; Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania; San Diego, Los Angeles
the country's nearly 12 million undocumented immigrants.
illegal,
"The situation is just unfolding,"
house arrest
Pervez Musharraf
Condoleezza Rice
Javed Hashmi,
take a television station's equipment and put a popular opposition leader under house arrest.
Francesco Totti
Winger Pedro Rodriguez,
number of girls being raped has increased sharply since fighting intensified in the Democratic
a humanitarian
"downed" cattle,
37 million pounds
workers kicking cows, jabbing them
workers
"mad cow" disease.
mistreating cows
37 million
school lunch programs and other federal nutrition programs
more than £150,000 ($240,000)
Gary Orr
67
1933.
1933.
Dolores Hope,
Barack Obama
energy independence
Barack Obama
experience to tackle government reform and energy independence
North Carolina
Obama
North Carolina
Democratic vice presidential nominee Sen. Joe Biden's comment
Gov. Sarah Palin
CNN's
Zerok
explosives,
42
Operation Panther's Claw
Nine
meant to clear the Taliban from parts of Afghanistan
At least 20 British
16
Stopping the dogs from reproducing might
animal-loving couple last weekend
Two dogs from the pack that killed two people
Stopping the dogs from reproducing might have
pack of dogs
happening right now, it's fascinating because in the United States and in developed Europe we're having a liquidity crunch -- someone might argue a liquidity crisis. And in fact, we are awash with liquidity in the Middle East and in Asia as well, so there's really a bifurcation that's occurring in the world.
Sallie Krawcheck
2007,
Sallie Krawcheck
spent some time as Chief Financial Officer
Juventus
Juventus
4-1
February 11,
election victory of Massachusetts Sen.-elect Scott Brown
midterm
Thursday,
As possible evidence for the husband's motive, Glascow pointed to a statement by the woman's father that Watson asked her to maximize her life insurance and make him the beneficiary shortly before the wedding.
Coroner David Glascow
failed in his dreams
his life,
"His dream was to become a Marine, and later a police officer. Both those dreams were unfulfilled."
Michael McLendon,
Alabama
Lisa Brown
Sen. Jeff Klein
being evicted
Sen. Jeff Klein
"to give my kids a better environment."
Lisa Brown
18.4
children of color
one-fifth
one-fifth of American 4-year-olds are obese,
racial/ethnic group
hard to pinpoint,
the Caribbean island of St. Maarten,
the 20-year-old mother,
onboard a Carnival cruise ship,
over alleged sexual harassment
The Supreme Court has given a girl's
Massachusetts
just didn't take things as seriously as they should,"
four consecutive Iditarods.
71
in memory of the students
The suspects were identified as Kawin Brockton, 19; Kelsey Perry, 19; Mario Toney, 20 and Brandon Wade, 20.
university's student government
in memory of the students
a prayer vigil
suspects
University of Central Arkansas
"in view of growing sacrilegious contents on it,"
an online group
protest,"
Carhart
Anti-abortion protesters
Friday
"I really feel like an old friend is dying."
20 to 25
Monday morning
admitted to conspiracy to murder
U.S. citizen
Pakistan-based terrorist group
Lashkar-e-Tayyiba.
honest mistakes,
the politically powerful
CNN's Anderson Cooper.
"I think I screwed up,"
The president also spoke about the struggling economy, the use of the label "war on terror," and lighter topics, including the family dog and his efforts to stop smoking.
"I think I screwed up,"
Tom Daschle
getting tough on executives
was traveling in South America
TOMS:
It gives a free
free pair of
track to
provide shoes for disadvantaged children in a sustainable way.
about 30 hours after
unhurt,
Austin,
Sunday.
University of Texas
taking a white woman across state lines for "immoral" purposes.
transporting a white woman across state lines for "immoral purposes."
John McCain
the chicks of the albatross and bunting
Baby albatross
not
albatross
effects of the inflammatory and negative aspect of
first-degree murder
Baez cited a number of reasons in his request to the judge to move the case to south Florida, where he says it has been covered far less and there
from Orlando to Miami, Florida.
the Sons of Dixie,
local law enforcement authorities
local law enforcement authorities
FBI
Cynthia Lynch
Klan group,
Shaheen Jafargholi's
12-year-old Welsh boy
Susan Boyle.
Got Talent,"
"I hope... that out of this crisis a new readiness will grow up in Britain to submit the past twelve years to a reappraisal.
cocaine production
Coca cultivation
"The increases for Bolivia and Peru show a trend in the wrong direction,"
climate change
waterborne diseases; reduced summer runoff,
The nearly 200-page document on global climate change
water resources,
water
Kate and Jon Gosselin
Kate and Jon Gosselin
she believes many viewers can relate to the Gosselins' divorce drama.
contentious divorce.
attorneys, accountants or anyone that is trying
the State Highway Administration
control plant growth in the area.
to control plant growth in the area.
Vail, Colorado,
mass "moonwalk"
Michael Jackson
"moonwalk"
Friday
sending messages via Twitter and Facebook.
around 2 million to neighboring states, mostly Syria and Jordan, and another 2.2 million displaced inside Iraq.
"There doesn't seem to be a real coherent plan to help them,"
draw attention to the problem and has called for governments to bolster their support of the U.N.H.C.R.
be a real coherent plan
real coherent plan to help them,"
as lagging efforts to deal with the problems of 2 million "very very vulnerable" internally displaced people in the wartorn country.
More than 4.2 million
goodwill ambassador
U.S. troops
civil affairs operations in seven East African countries
conduct civil affairs operations in seven East African countries
U.S.
Trump:
Donald Trump
Bernard Madoff
Bernard Madoff
Donald Trump
Donald Trump
Aborigines
The government
12:53 p.m. ET Saturday
New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport
possibly froze to death and suffered a shortage of oxygen at high altitude,
New York Cosmos
1998 African
Jomo Sono.
South Africa
football
South Africa's exclusion from world football.
is conducting DNA testing,
claims he is the missing child whose name was Steven Damman.
1955.
kidnapping
outside a Long Island bakery.
the 25th
Presidential historian Doug Brinkley
in 1981,
the opportunity to get "advice, good counsel and fellowship" from the group.
Barack Obama
all of the surviving past presidents
Nuffield Hospitals.
UK,
Spain, Australia, Ireland, Hong Kong, Thailand, Malta and Saudi Arabia.
the elderly, the mentally ill,
Huntington's diseases.
to preserve freedom of choice in health care.
on three continents
young people with physical or learning disabilities and people with conditions such as Parkinson's and Huntington's diseases.
UK,
offer specialist care to residents
National Health Service
in the UK,
1947
six
percentage of any profits
Justin Barker,
Hollywood
the Cultural Revolution,
Chen Kaige
"Farewell My Concubine."
Nehushtan and Maj. Gen. Avi Zamir,
canceled until further notice.
died aboard the space shuttle Columbia
died in the crash near the Israeli community of P'nei Chever in the southern Hebron Hills,
2006
Arsenal striker Robin van Persie
misses the trip to Spain with a groin injury,
Robert Pires
2006 Champions League
as the better presidential candidate to handle terrorism
Columbia University in New York.
Thursday night
62 percent, believe that the Republican presidential nominee would be the better candidate to handle the issue of terrorism,
terrorist attacks.
attacks of September 11, 2001,
the better presidential candidate to handle terrorism
September 21,
spreading propaganda supporting Tamil rebels.
has until September 21 to
being "processed for separation"
A U.S. Marine
while on patrol in Iraq
1st Battalion, 3rd Marine Regiment,
Fidel Castro's revolution.
Peter Pan.
14,000
the airlift saved children who might have died
Richard Strandlof
Richard Strandlof
the 9/11 attacks on the Pentagon.
his crime is up to one year incarceration and a $100,000 fine,"
The medical examiner
"They have all been made aware of the manner of death,"
suicides.
encouraging openness
town of South Hadley
a reporter
producing and selling fake or substandard products,
294,000 infants suffered from urinary problems, such as kidney stones.
for producing and selling fake or substandard products,
Tian Wenhua,
urinary problems, such as kidney stones.
three
alcoholism
alcohol consumption.
60 years.
infectious disease, including tuberculosis and HIV/AIDS,
Florida Department of Law Enforcement
former U.S. Rep. Mark Foley
Mr. Foley
U.S. Rep. Mark Foley
probation for Lohan
Los Angeles
repeated
7 a.m. PT
unsubstantiated and damaging accusations against a crucial national security agency.
push from Pelosi.
the Democratic speaker of the House of Representatives,
Nancy Pelosi
She is Nancy Pelosi, the Democratic speaker of the House
members of the environmental group Greenpeace
he now wonders whether he should have tried to get Saddam Hussein to leave office at the end of the first Gulf War in 1991.
share freely
said he now wonders whether he should have tried to get Saddam Hussein to leave office at the end of the first Gulf War in 1991.
matador Joselito Ortega
the words "Gay Up,"
six or seven times
energy drink.
underemployed Spanish matador
great Pacific garbage patch that stretches
consuming plastic waste
drinks cans and plastic waste from the Pacific
consuming plastic waste
the impact of humans and increasing consumer waste from thousands of miles away continues
Midway
deadly Washington Metro subway crash
remains a mystery,
Nine people
the NTSB
he had just put down his newspaper and closed his eyes to relax when he heard a screeching sound, someone yelling and "one of the loudest bangs I've ever heard in my life."
he had just put down his newspaper and closed his eyes to relax when he heard a screeching sound, someone yelling and "one of the loudest bangs I've ever heard in my life."
sports commentary, analysis and trivia
unique brand of sports commentary, analysis and trivia
prolific writer, director, producer and actor
Hattie Lemon
gay-rights campaigners
Baron Cohen's approach courts
Sacha Baron Cohen,
Davis Love III
Tiger Woods
50th in golf's world rankings,
the White House.
a puppy.
first pets
dog
Bush
new puppy
opponent in the 2000 presidential race, had won the award.
Climate Change
"warning and educating us about the dangers of climate change for decades.
the 2007 Nobel Peace Prize
won't take on the political machine assembled by Sen. Hillary Clinton,
2008
sustained serious injuries in the fight, which included punches, kicks and the drawing of guns.
A fight between Ugandan and Libyan presidential guards
Gadhafi National Mosque
(CNN)
Gadhafi National Mosque
about a dozen presidential guards
the Libyans.
opening of a massive Gadhafi National Mosque
in 25 meters of water off the coast of Nagasaki, Japan.
Kublai Khan's lost fleet
More than 4,000 artifacts,
the Yuan Dynasty invasion fleet.
the remains of a ship from the second fleet in 1281
"intelligence suggests that a pedophile ring in Belgium made an order
Madeleine McCann
a previously undisclosed sighting of Madeleine
a pedophile ring
volunteer
1942
And he said that he doesn't like kisses."
Galezkij said it wasn't until reforms in the late 1980s, followed by the Soviet collapse, that he started making progress in finding his sister.
A frail Irene Famulak clutched her brother on the airport tarmac, her arm
German labor camp
Nazis took her to a labor camp.
Nazis
more than 20 years,
Higgs boson,
electrical failure
Judge
"He was mentoring them. He was trying to get them to do right, to be productive citizens."
former Judge Herman Thomas
former Judge Herman Thomas was found not guilty on several charges and the judge in the case granted a directed verdict of acquittal on all the other counts.
productive
former Alabama judge
kidnapping and murder in the death of 8-year-old Sandra Cantu.
Melissa Huckaby
of killing an 8-year-old
was charged with kidnapping and murder in the death of 8-year-old Sandra Cantu.
Kongsberg Satellite Services (KSAT)
satellite-based snow melt maps
snow melt
satellite-based snow melt maps
help the ICR to monitor the different forms of land-use change over time.
reindeer
The number of Australian cases of the virus, commonly known as swine flu, has reached more than 1,200,
more than 1,200,
"unwise."
violating the constitution,
as president and commander in chief,
U.S. Assistant Secretary of State Philip Crowley
President Jose Manuel Zelaya
more than 150,000
plant 100 trees
Jude Ndambuki's Help Kenya
Kenya
Jude Ndambuki's Help Kenya Project
focal point of the celebrations.
firework displays
River Thames, London
top 10 places to countdown to 2012.
Marine Cpl. John Wimunc
Authorities
the missing soldier, Army 2nd Lt. Holley Wimunc, 24,
Marion Cotillard, Daniel Day-Lewis, Javier Bardem and Tilda Swinton.
host
"No Country," the Coen brothers' brutal tale of a man pursued by death and the law across the bleak moonscapes of West Texas,
best picture at the 80th Academy
Jon Stewart
Diablo Cody
Europeans: Marion Cotillard, Daniel Day-Lewis, Javier Bardem and Tilda Swinton.
four people,
emergency police headquarters in central Baquba
parked car bomb
a parked car bomb
Baghdad and Baquba
detonated near the Buratha Shiite mosque in northwestern Baghdad.
mistaken statement by the first lady's communications director,
Burr Oak Cemetery
First lady Michelle Obama's father
about 300 graves had been disturbed as part of the scheme, but that number is expected to rise.
"Whether it is humanitarian aid or transitional support, it adds up to the relief that Zimbabwe is seeking,"
he is grateful for the generosity.
Mugabe
Zimbabwe."
stopping militant rocket fire into Israel.
both sides
just over a year ago.
conduct independent inquiries
48 hours
Mark Sullivan,
Armando Astorga,
Duguid
of meddling
explosion that sent flames
a highway overpass
three
collision involving two big-rigs and a car
two big-rigs and a car
two big-rigs and a car
Potito Starace and Daniele Bracciali
six weeks
betting on matches.
Potito Starace has been
Potito Starace and Daniele Bracciali have been
Italian
54,000
flooding
86 dead,
Santa Catarina state,
'Maybe we'll get married when it's legal
Angelina Jolie.
Brad Pitt
a Burberry Children's wear store
the world recession,
"We think about the world recession,
the heart of London
London
homemade rocket
Port-au-Prince
"The first line of law and order
standing by to provide security
Ticketmaster and Live Nation
Bruce Springsteen
Spanish flu
the troops at Camp Forrest:
Andre, a new neighbor of Phil Dunphy who happens to be a physician.
Hart and his Hartbeat Productions
Rozita Swinton,
"person of interest"
Eldorado, Texas,
evidence that possibly links her to phone calls made about the ranch,
a search of Swinton's home in Colorado uncovered
phone calls
telephone calls placed to a crisis center hot line
pursued as a "person of interest"
comedy angels
Pamela Stephenson
on the set of a comedy show in 1979.
best-selling biography, "Billy."
the set of a comedy show in 1979.
information from satellites,
Antarctica, the East Antarctic Ice Sheet, has been getting colder while the rest of the world has warmed.
University of Washington
warmer.
a courtyard, ripping beds to shreds and tearing bathroom sinks from walls,
California
1,150 inmates
1,150
racial tensions.
the California Institution for Men in Chino from a riot that authorities said was ignited by racial tensions.
their clients that they can change their sexual orientation through therapy or any other methods.
heterosexual are effective.
crashes.
may crack after being in use for about six months,
Johnstown, Ohio-based
the crew of the Svend Maersk
CNN
A 10 percent drop is expected
"I feel lucky, of course, that I am on a ship that is still working."
A 10 percent
sailed
the anti-government protesters,
restore peace and order
dozens
aimed at toppling his administration.
a conversation between a regional Taliban commander, Maulana Fazlullah, and some of his lieutenants.
not cracking down on militants along its border with Afghanistan.
the Dir district
along its border with Afghanistan.
not cracking down on militants along its border with Afghanistan.
Taliban leaders discuss how to stage an announced retreat from Buner
"Those who will remain there will stay apart, so that the world gets to know that Taliban have left Buner," one of the commanders
The airstrikes killed between 70 and 75 militants in the Dir district and flushed out many more,
sea levels
low-lying
150 million
water is getting closer; slowly but surely, as global warming bites and sea levels rise, the islands are being swallowed up, leaving the few hundred inhabitants pondering an uncertain future.
human rights?"
"blatant unfair play" could land him in hot water.
Sepp Blatter
Sepp Blatter
Burnt Corn, Alabama,
great-great-grandmother,
were crying out to me because they were lost for so many years, and here, their great-great-grandson is going on the journey to find who they were."
punished, because the
governor's firing of the state's public safety commissioner, Walter Monegan.
the governor's firing of the state's public safety commissioner,
in the trunk of her mother's car
charged with killing her 2-year-old daughter,
"We do not report conclusions about
self-fulfilling
he became someone else's boyfriend, and remained so, for much
self-fulfilling prophecy.
sex offender suspected of luring a 15-year-old girl
luring a 15-year-old girl online.
Myspace.com,
Flying J Truck Stop" just outside of Winchester, Virginia,
being offered half the jobs involved in one of the latest subcontracts
protest the hiring of hundreds of foreign workers
the hiring of hundreds of foreign workers for a construction project at the Lindsey oil refinery in eastern England.
Representatives of all four plants
worked on side projects and watched their families grow.
a home for disabled veterans,
mortars
Michael Jackson.
a list of dates for the singer's European tour,
Michael Jackson's death
"People get a little ticked off when they think they're paying $20 for a ticket and as they progress along the various pages of the electronic transaction they see more fees added along the way,"
Concertgoers
see some service fees were charged.
A law allowing same-sex weddings
60 Civil Registry judges
120
120
state of Palestine,"
produce a state of Palestine,"
a successor assumes power
Israeli Foreign Minister Tzipi Livni,
gave up efforts to form a new coalition government
more than 1,000 people
would prosecute those most responsible, and other perpetrators would be subject to "national accountability proceedings as defined by the Kenyan Parliament, such as a Special Tribunal."
about 20 feet above flood stage.
a debate over who cares more for special needs children.
GOP advocates for children with birth defects should support stem cell research.
"Laura and I are deeply saddened by this tragedy and continue to pray for the families of these men."
six
prayers of the dedicated professionals at MSHA are with the families."
August 6,
Crandall Canyon mine.
permanently close
exhausted all known options in our attempt to reach the six miners,"
of the miners
"Laura and I are deeply saddened by this
six men trapped for almost a month in
this tragedy
Mine Safety and Health Administration
"Laura and
ordered Smadi bound over for future hearings.
Hosam Smadi
he was serious
the year's worst film offerings.
"Citizen Kane,"
and instead the academy hand the award to Vincente Minnelli,
Razzie Awards
Sly and the family Stallone
Alfred Hitchcock's
Razzie
Razzie
professional nude model
The festival is opening with "Up," the latest animated work from Pixar.
"Up,"
"Inglourious Basterds,"
AIG.
to a crumbling AIG.
AIA
CEO of LG Electronics
LG Electronics
Yong Nam
hopes this gadget will boost market share,
January.
punctured a natural gas line, igniting the blaze,
Thursday,
a life sentence without parole.
convicted of burglary and rape
Internally Displaced People camps,
Paul Polansky,
lead
on toxic wasteland.
"I want to inform the Pakistani people that the drone attacks that take place in the tribal areas endanger the politics, well-being and sovereignty of Pakistan," the
an injury to Mehsud
seven
Pakistani rulers want to spill the blood of the innocent [tribesmen] in exchange for dollars."
30,000
proper portions, great flavor-and we use fresh, local ingredients as much as possible,"
Healthfulness on the menu
cooking with less saturated fat
Many national chains
August 29
the idea that we all have our passions,
Stu Preissler (Steve Martin), Brad Harris (Jack Black) and Kenny Bostick (Owen Wilson)
Hong Kong
Lantau Island west of Hong Kong.
put users in a dazed stupor for about two hours,
with a 3-1 victory
the final two matches of the
Manchester
a first XI of the less attractive venues.
stadiums
practice of caning criminals
traffickers of illegal immigrants in addition to drug-traffickers and violent
a prison-yard caning session
expedition to raise money for charity.
UK
Bear Grylls
is the host of Discovery's "Man vs. Wild"
Antarctica
Jong Il took over the reigns of power following his father's death in 1994,
Kim Jong Un,
Charles Armstrong.
Kim Jong Il
make a living
at the start of the uprising
Khaled AlKhamissi's
Businesses have been destroyed and looted and supply routes disrupted
its first day of New Year trading Wednesday,
Nairobi Stock Exchange
Shillings ($29.5 million) a day
Kenya's
Businesses have been destroyed and looted and supply routes disrupted
British Federation of Tour Operators
($29.5 million) a
government was losing around 2 billion
Struggling to make ends meet, trying to dig themselves out of debt,
Omaha,
A large debris field has been located, and pieces have been collected,
nine people
Coast Guard C-130 plane and a Marine AH-1 Cobra helicopter collided Thursday night.
"Thank you so much for hiring local, 'cause I haven't had a check in three weeks." And we realized as the recession was heading into place, that one of the things we could do to benefit these communities is hire local, and not just bring in our own crews and just extract money form the locals and then leave, but we could also leave a small stimulus of our own.
to benefit these communities is hire
partnered with Keep America Beautiful,
reduced their carbon footprint by 132 tons.
hire local,
This tour may not last forever. Maybe just until the recession is over. But definitely, we want to do our part to give back.
[so] that incidents like this go off without a hitch or as safely as possible,"
Constantly,"
a cradle
even if we pulled out one person, that was one more person we saved,"
move in to rescue them.
move in to rescue them.
"We do not want to create an environment of terror in the classroom,"
police marksmen
20 children, aged 4 to 6,
Lower interest rates and loan forgiveness
the remainder of their federal loans
graduate with college
George W. Bush.
Barack Obama.
the economy
economic downturn
Emory University,
started with three strikes against him.
Islamist gunmen
criminals and warlords
Somali media
the role of Somalia's media with the infamous Rwandan radio station
treaty
British Airways
Paris, Frankfurt, Brussels and Milan.
for free movement of flights between European and U.S. cities.
Open Skies agreement.
television series
kiss
Tennessee
"directed assignments"
U.S. Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice
"a potential death sentence"
have direct assignments
"everything that we can
The new directives
if enough qualified foreign service officers don't step forward to fill open positions
considering the dangers of a war zone, lack of security and regular rocket attacks on U.S. personnel.
U.S. Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice
responding to foreign service officers' objections to the possibility of "directed assignments" in Iraq.
U.S. Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice
the order to serve in Iraq
U.S. Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice
volunteer for Iraq service
"a potential death sentence"
Potapov,
the Russian state circus company troupe
MOSCOW, Russia
attacked two people during rehearsals at a circus in Bishkek,
ice skating,
it may affect the child's overall personality,"
"It may not cause any physical harm to the baby, but it may affect the child's overall personality,"
weakens the sun god temporarily because of an encounter with dragon Rahu and leaves some cascading results everywhere.
Hindu-majority
pregnant women
expectant mothers
couldn't help but think something like 'they don't let people like me make movies,'" he says, laughing.
cinematographer Stephen Goldblatt,
awarded the coveted Palm D'Or
cinematographer Stephen Goldblatt,
the inevitable disapproval: "Then Terry Gilliam comes in and goes 'Oh, your scene. Just great!'" recalls the director.
"acceleration period,"
Swine flu
Swine flu
get timely medical care,
Monday
go home on
Mohamed Omar Habeb Mohamed Dhere,
southern Mogadishu
Islamic Courts Union
lawyer and head of the Bangladesh Environmental Lawyers Association,
United Nation's International Maritime Organization (IMO)
Hong Kong
near the Afghanistan border
a hotel at Pakistan's only ski resort
300km (186 miles)
at Pakistan's only ski resort Thursday, as
He wants $80 million
allegedly tortured a business associate on videotape.
United Arab Emirates
the administration is holding off sending a nuclear deal with the United Arab Emirates to Congress for ratification
allegedly tortured a business associate
Registered nurses and doctors
caution against using injectable vitamin supplements because the quantities are not regulated.
vitamin supplement
straddled Interstate 95 from Maine to the Carolinas, and they also were
winter storm warning
National Weather Service
Boston,
for failure to stop at a red light,
was transported
Stephenie Meyer.
her mother
her mother
nine rejections,
nine
both hands
The 57-year-old Augusta, Georgia, resident
first double hand transplant
Kepner
shows no signs of
"very stable, awake and alert, and he's talking with us,"
the first double hand transplant in the United States
a police station,
escaped with a minor injury in an
Islamabad market, next to a police station,
working on a research project
Evin Prison
Tehran's notorious Evin Prison
a research project
sentenced to death again.
to death
April 4, 1997
in a small mountain shack, a far cry from the large camps al Qaeda had run in Taliban-era Afghanistan,
how to handle rockets, explosives and bombs.
say they received training in how to handle rockets, explosives and bombs.
killing in Europe and the United States.
Instruction in the actual construction of bombs,
training in how to handle rockets, explosives and bombs.
used a Quran
"severest of punishments" for the action.
maximum possible punishment on this
"Mona Lisa"
when acid was thrown at it.
The woman, a tourist,
the Louvre gallery.
mug
attacked
"Mona Lisa"
keep quiet about a growing international election scandal.
Guido Alejandro Antonini Wilson,
campaign of Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner,
the campaign of Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner,
Grupo de Santander
Venezuelan banker.
The banker
complete the deal,
nationalization of the Banco de Venezuela
Straight No Chaser
Straight No Chaser
college a cappella pastime
on YouTube
Straight No Chaser
May 1994
May 1994
short
the inevitable,
Lisa Marie Presley
the walls were unsightly, and the walls caused the road in front of the building to be closed to traffic.
London embassy
Qatari Diar Real Estate
London
the walls were unsightly, and the walls caused the road in front of the building to be closed to traffic.
Casablanca bombings in May 2003
Freedom Radio
formally turned off their microphones after eight years.
Armed Forces Radio
midnight Friday,
Mehsud is alive but ill
the tomb of Marc Antony and Cleopatra
luxury
1998 Porsche 911
used-luxury market
2005 & 2006 Acura MDX
Ahmadinejad
has been no evidence found that would undermine the election results and he criticized Western nations for interfering in Iran's internal affairs before and after the election.
June 12 presidential election,
$500,000
$500,000
large
the limit on executive salaries at companies receiving tax dollars,
"our work is just beginning."
greatest hope
people living with HIV by increasing their life span
Finally, a preventive HIV vaccine
black leather gladiator sandal stilettos,
"Sex and the City" actress
"I can't decide, impossible to choose!"
Jazz
brass-funk rock
Midnite.
Midnite Disturbers
Bonerama
Saturday afternoon.
it has "some concern" about the safety of BPA, and supports efforts by industry to remove BPA from infant bottles and feeding cups.
remove BPA from infant bottles and feeding cups.
infant bottles and feeding cups.
remove BPA from infant bottles and feeding cups.
the safety of
infant bottles and feeding cups.
it has "some concern"
in the Kilimanjaro region
Mount Kilimanjaro
in the Kilimanjaro region near the mountain
Three professors and a former professor at Columbia University's Teachers College
The NYPD
Swiss-mediated
Armenia and Turkey
1993.
bribery
former executives
to secure a bid to create a national identity card system in Argentina.
they paid or promised Argentine officials $100 million to land a contract worth 10 times as much,
rocket propulsion system
nuclear weapons,
a rocket propulsion system
suitable equipment
a very public debate is taking place in Israel
set up roadblocks
set up roadblocks
Tharcisse Renzaho
Renzaho
crimes against humanity and war crimes.
over $3 million
first player to be banned by the PGA Tour
Doug Barron
the east coast of the Yucatan Peninsula from
a travel alert,
National Hurricane Center.
supermarkets and gas stations
text messages and e-mails that encourage
authorities will observe and control text messages and e-mails that encourage
the semi-official Mehr News Agency.
Abdo Ibssa's
a doctor at the hospital had placed an electronic chip inside him
he was being tracked
Everglades,
Everglades.
Joe Wasilewski
eating basically everything in sight.
holds a Burmese python he found in the Florida Everglades.
travelers,
South Africa-Zimbabwe border
1,937
1,937
Deaths in Zimbabwe
Bill Clinton
Laura Ling and Euna Lee
journalists Laura Ling and Euna Lee.
North Korean
U.S.
May
six
fate of the Beatles song catalog,
e-mail,
approved a line of official merchandise
Apollo
"Go! Go! Go! Let's do it."
Forty years
became the voice of the Apollo 11 launch. "It was quite a thrilling time," he
"You have demonstrated extremely important leadership,"
United Nations Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon
United Nations Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon
before Saturday's local derby
Barcelona
Champions League semifinals against Italian champions Inter Milan
Sevilla's
Texas
C-17 transport
called off a search
major nor'easter
rain and near-hurricane-force wind
Trader Dick's bar
Hell's Angels and Vagos
Mariela Castro Espin
Raul Castro's daughter
the swine flu virus,
pregnant women
infant girl delivered prematurely from her mother,
14 weeks
had no regrets
a women's clinic in Wichita
gunning down a Kansas abortion provider in church
green-clad revelers.
New York's
wear a costume
St Patrick's Day Parade
being a celebrity
the October
October issue of InStyle,
her relationship with her mom
a permission signed by Haiti's prime minister
Wednesday.
three American women
Six Haitian orphans, seized by national authorities last week as they
that a key document the women were carrying
general travel warning for the area,
it plans to fly its passengers over the
246
Robbie Levine Foundation,
an off-duty officer
About 200
a snowball fight
a D.C. neighborhood
Puerto Rico,
reason to believe are in the U.S. in violation of law.
throwing him in jail
he was considering taking legal action against the government on behalf of Caraballo.
working life
reorient the focus of your working life
to reorient the focus of your working life
chief executive of
Focus
the Diaoyutai State Guest House,
Prime Minister Wen Jiabao
President Barack Obama
China and the United States,
"China and the United States share extensive common interests and broad prospects for cooperation on a series of major issues important to mankind's peace and stability and development,"
prison inmates.
rapidly growing
prison inmates,
Terrye Cheathem
geared toward prison inmates.
company Royal Dutch Shell
the family of executed Nigerian environmental activist Ken Saro-Wiwa and other dissidents,
Roughly half of the settlement
into a trust fund to help the people of Nigeria's Ogoni region,
allowed to pollute its land without consequences.
Obama
President-elect Barack Obama.
Common
Common
father of four,
on Lebanese Broadcasting Corporation,
(this information) could be used to the advantage of a foreign nation."
"wrongfully concealing and storing two firearms
classified information and tangible items"
"I told my classes that I was incredibly sad to begin with and incredibly angry,"
Kandahar province
July,
signed petitions
third presidential term for him.
Colombian President
a constitutional referendum that would grant Uribe the chance to run again.
Alvaro Uribe
a constitutional referendum that would grant Uribe the chance to run again.
to make a holiday port call for sailors at the end of December.
refused nine U.S. Navy ships and one Air Force jet entry to Hong Kong
U.S. Navy ships and one Air Force jet entry to Hong Kong
make a holiday port call for sailors at the end of December.
Bollywood films
"Slumdog Millionaire"
"International cinema comes in cycles in the United States," said Frank Lovece, a film critic
"Slumdog Millionaire,"
"quite stupid and foolish"
worst economic and humanitarian crisis since independence from Great Britain 28 years ago.
Taiwan's high court
Shui-bian, who is facing
has not been set
about $18 million.
computers
Investigators
Hawkins
Robert Hawkins
Investigators probing
the Westroads Mall."
Robert Hawkins
the Westroads Mall."
flow of narcotics and weapons
intelligence, cooperation among law enforcement agencies and enhanced technology.
House unveiled a strategy to combat rising drug crimes along the border Friday, vowing
Rising drug violence in the United States is one of the administration's
"calls for tougher inspections, more enforcement personnel and close coordination with our partners in Mexico as we work across federal, state and local governments.
"You have to adopt a healthy diet and you have to exercise,"
almost half
the bad cholesterol, with a little help from some other substances in your body, join together and form a united front (that is, a hard deposit inside your arteries) that could block the flow of blood to the
low-fat diet
Dalai Lama
several hours,
abdominal discomfort.
Tibetan
the Dalai Lama
the Dalai Lama
in New Delhi
explosively formed penetrators
the U.S. military
Iranian agents, particularly the Quds Force of Iran's Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps
in recent months that the number of EFP attacks had gone down.
as explosively formed penetrators (EFPs)
and members of the mosque
E-mails were never sent from the account, but people would leave messages in the draft sections of the e-mail account and delete them after reading them,
to the African-American Civil War Memorial
Arlington's Confederate Memorial,
the 141st annual Memorial Day wreath-laying ceremony
killing of a 15-year-old boy
Thessaloniki and Athens,
34
Louis Vuitton
allowing copies of its goods to be sold on the Web auction site.
pay $63 million damages
eBay
landing of the airplane by pilot Chesley Sullenberger
Airbus A320,
William Langewiesche
there was no miracle.
Greg Behrendt
women who obsess and worry about relationships,
The book is based on a popular episode of "Sex and the City," in which Carrie's boyfriend (played by Ron Livingston) offers the line to Miranda as she puzzles over a date.
Greg Behrendt
ska band called the Reigning Monarchs,"
complications.
uninsured pregnant woman
Clinton spokesman Mo Elleithee
"There is no indication that she was ever denied medical care at any time, for any reason. We clearly reject any perception that we ever denied any care to this woman."
a woman
a uninsured pregnant
the Malecon.
Chucho Valdes
May Day (May 1)
international stars
a modified version of Google's Android,
a modified version of Google's Android,
HTC
12 to 18 months
Sen. David Vitter had an angry altercation with an airline worker
has refused to answer reporters' questions
had an angry altercation
information
eight
blow up planes
plotted to use bombs disguised in drinks containers to blow up planes
between August and October 2006.
plotted to use bombs disguised in drinks containers to blow up planes
4,000
cholera outbreak in Africa in 15 years has killed more than 4,000 Zimbabweans, and
to worsen when the rainy season hits,
U.N. Children's Fund
finished second
he spun out onto the gravel to end his chances with 25 laps to go.
spun out
Chinese Grand Prix
clinch the crown
Ferrari's
second
Fernando Alonso
fifth
McLaren
Championship leader
McLaren team-mate Fernando Alonso
Lewis Hamilton
spinning into the gravel trap
Georgia,
fatally stabbing his parents, Kathryn and Gary DeYoung, and his 14-year-old sister, Sarah.
approve the rare
"The road ahead will be long. Our climb will be steep. We may not get there in one year or even one term, but America -- I have never been more hopeful than I am tonight that we will get there. I
America is a place where all things are possible.
America is a place where all things are possible.
legions of volunteers and voters
"Team America: World Police,"
Jong Il
is making old, new again in Japan.
in early 2008,
2008,
No 4,
I have a lot of reservations. We're trying to put some safeguards in it.
of the Hillsborough disaster
at Sheffield Wednesday's stadium,
the removal of perimeter fencing and the creation of all-seater stadia.
20th
about 250 nautical miles (463 kilometers) off Somalia's coast,
BCR Somme
five
Anwar al-Awlaki's
authorized the killing of an
This cannot be right -- and is counterproductive to defeating terrorism in the long term because it
the tipping point toward violence came with their prison experiences.
terrorism.
cable operators' decision to drop five television channels,
failure to follow broadcast laws
two semi-automatic handguns, a .45-caliber and a 9 mm,
13
upstate New York immigration services center
he had bought methamphetamine
National Association of Evangelicals chief
airborne radiological contamination alarm
airborne radiological contamination alarm
An airborne radiological contamination
continue to publish, writing five times a week for wowOwow.com,
sent to Smith that the newspaper would not renew her contract,
"Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince,"
2001
Sean Parker
Sean Parker
stepped on the Toes of The First Amendment Freedom of Speech,
Hank Williams Jr.
"Arbeit Macht Frei"
that this was a planned
an overall decline in attacks worldwide and fewer attacks in Iraq.
extremist supporters
top-dollar prostitution ring,
Eliot Spitzer
Dina Matos,
10
Wednesday.
eight
Hines
he was killed because of his sexual orientation and his race.
that recognizes the challenges and the stress that we're under right now,"
Campbell Island in New Zealand,
overcome sea sickness
overcome sea sickness
Africa pace bowler
2-0
career-best 7-51
Po Toi O
Po Toi O
Clear Water Bay in the New Territories, Hong Kong.
the retro-chic China Club on the 13th floor of the Old Bank of China building on Bank Street.
CNN
the country of her birth
Saturday's fatal shootings of three people linked to the U.S. consulate
More than 200
to find who was responsible for Saturday's fatal shootings of three people
Thailand's Golden Triangle.
beach in Mauritius.
tents
almost a year ago
Cardinals
almost a year ago
announced that he was leaving his band, The Cardinals,
Ryan Adams
Mandy Moore and rocker Ryan Adams
a California toll
a domestic dispute,
at the toll plaza,
appeared to stem from a domestic dispute,
evening rush hour
fire
drought conditions are expected to persist
ongoing severe
news, entertainment, sports
Dubai
"Dubai is a media city which seemed to be a haven and a sanctuary."
The government has made numerous demands of the network, although none of them official,
GEO President Imran Aslan
Dubai in United Arab
albums sold worldwide...
Michael Jackson
performing.
art.
he would not be renewing his contract
Eric Gerets
Deschamps
he would not be renewing his contract
a school in Kansas
40-mile chain of pennies
free after-school care for students at more than 200 elementary
go to the nonprofit program that provides free after-school care
to use a biological weapon
Sen. Bob Graham
and terrorism."
from within the Federally Administered Tribal Areas" in Pakistan.
Carey Mulligan
a bright 16-year-old schoolgirl
"An Education" is the vivid story of how one girl became a woman -- and how Olde England morphed into the youthquake center of '60s yeah yeah yeah. None of which would be quite so vivid without the beguiling performance of newcomer Mulligan. She's very much an It Girl, with her natural elegance in a brunet upsweep à la Audrey Hepburn. And she's protectively partnered by Sarsgaard in the tricky job of playing sweet yet suspect, a balance he sustains with nonchalance.
23-year-old woman suffocated her son
suffocated her son and then buried his body beneath the sand of a playground,
an Albuquerque playground.
"Baby Justice" and "Baby Angel"
Tiffany Toribio, 23, was arrested and charged with killing her son.
beneath the sand of a playground,
23-year-old woman suffocated her son and then buried his body beneath the sand of a playground,
20
listeners
more than 2,000
4,000.
Ludacris,
may be eligible as charity tax write-offs.
next week
The press announcement for the Android phone
they would postpone the event,
The press announcement for the Android phone
"positive
ignoring a red signal along the tracks
Massachusetts Bay
doxylamine,
the MBTA had not installed systems on its Green Line to prevent two trains from occupying the same stretch of track,
conclusion that Edmonds fell asleep
from viewing platforms and through telescopes at an overlook near the new visitors center,
Caprock Canyons
hiking, mountain biking, on horseback, or by car
hiking, mountain biking, on horseback, or by car on a 5-mile loop.
100 miles southeast of Amarillo.
the high temperature and humidity,
an uninhabited house.
Ammunition stored there
Annapolis, Maryland, service academy
graduate from the Annapolis, Maryland, service academy
John and Cindy McCain
Annapolis, Maryland, service academy
repeated calls for months to city officials to get help with their medical claims
the city
the city is not honoring workers' compensation claims for cops whose careers ended when they were seriously injured on the job.
Frank-Walter Steinmeier and the SPD
smaller government.
Carlos Oliva Castillo,
"the principal manager"
No. 3 man in the criminal
Zetas'
the Vietnam Veterans Memorial
National Park Service
traveling collections
the ultimate escapism."
U.S. retail
$2.91
"Gears of War 2,"
"Call Of Duty:
they've seen their lot only go from bad to worse.
Tuesday's
state in an ever smaller, ever more economically unviable territory, and go
Palestinians
1.1 percent
by 4.2 percent
the economy would contract between 2 and 5 percent this year.
except for construction, business services and information and communications,
envisioning how long-term developments in scientific and technical knowledge could be transformed into new technologies.
Paul Israel.
consumers came to dominate the economy, a transformation that was only beginning during the later years of Edison's life. Steve Jobs was a master at understanding how to create transformative consumer technologies.
using the media to promote
"There's clearly a social problem when we're interacting more with digital interfaces than our fellow human beings,"
monsoon, season.
autonomy
high-stakes talks
Four of nine
this weekend
President Evo Morales,
disorderly conduct and contributing to the delinquency of minors
"Jimmie's death
President Lyndon Johnson
the marchers' third attempt,
Montgomery.
She died of diabetic ketoacidosis,
natural causes related to diabetes,
"He doesn't feel safe going back to the neighborhood,"
a group of youths he knew
are hopeful Brewer will not require any more skin grafts,
15-year-old
"a long road ahead of him,"
suffered burns over 65 percent of his body in October
Being out
U.S. Home Box Office (HBO) network.
Floyd Mayweather Jr.,
Manny Pacquiao's
Las Vegas
$2 million dollars per minute.
traveling to Europe and back
$1.3 million
tuberculosis bacteria
diseased portion of one of his lungs.
Jaycee Lee Dugard had been
donations to help Dugard,
Jaycee Lee Dugard
raping a 14-year-old in 1972,
I'm not against it at all.
"I'm sorry I'm late, it's that I just woke up!"
so he could see the look on
Friday,
Friday,
Gulf Coast bridge
close to 5,000 percent,
South Africa.
"Average"
fled Zimbabwe
Paris.
Treat yourself to a glass of champagne
stop, breathe, appreciate and indulge.
Ladurée
Montmartre,
Adam Scott,
Steve Williams
I sincerely apologize to Tiger
a racially-tinged remark
Lakes Golf Club in Sydney,
"I wanted to shove it up that black a--."
Cristina
Buenos Aires' Plaza de Mayo
52.7% of the vote.
the undisputed front-runner
Wednesday
Murphy,
Barcelona, Spain
Anna Kournikova:
Rafael Nadal
across the country
Max Baucus, D-Montana,
identity theft
the IRS an average of about a year "to sort out who is the real taxpayer."
legendary special effects supervisor,
real robots when possible, instead of CGI (computer generated images),
very expensive and very explosive
eruption is imminent.
possible within days,"
authorities were attempting to evacuate about 50,000 people
posted Twitter updates about giving birth to her child,
Twitter CEO Evan Williams,
"Epidural, yes please."
Jonathan Sexton's
Ronan O'Gara
if the cases will be prosecuted,
Ulises Rios
cited for vandalism
"A Shot at Love with Tila Tequila"
that Nguyen was "extremely intoxicated and inebriated" and that the player tried to make arrangements for her to leave the house.
denied the allegations, saying more than a dozen other people were at
MTV reality shows "A Shot at Love with Tila Tequila"
San Diego, California,
The archbishops of Canterbury and York
the chalice.
sharing the chalice at communion
Exhilarating for some, but frustrating for others,
it never occurs in the J.K. Rowling novel.
it never occurs in the J.K. Rowling novel.
Potter is confronted by Death Eater
this particular scene from the franchise's sixth installment is a cinematic creation, as it never occurs in the J.K. Rowling novel.
"What people are buying is the mystique.
images and data are transferred from person to person with the tap of a key,
our digital
400 meter hurdles
winning a medal for her country at the 2012 Olympic Games in London.
18th
Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg
September 1999.
Justice
September 1999.
February 23,
15
loaded handgun and shotgun
carrying a loaded firearm in a vehicle
Robert Michael O'Ryan
30 to 35
90
blankets and quilts covering bodies inside a building.
90
weapons cache
"several children
There were "several children who appear to be pulled from the rubble,"
"blunt head trauma."
a new prototype car for the IZOD IndyCar
track offered "nowhere to get away from anybody."
a fiery 15-car wreck
opposite the Palace of Culture and Science and close to one of the city's few synagogues
spirit of 21st century Poland.
Medecins Sans Frontieres (Doctors Without Borders)
mounds of garbage. Lack of sanitation and clean water
Medecins Sans Frontieres (Doctors Without Borders)
cholera outbreak
that the epidemic shows no signs of slowing.
Lack of sanitation and clean water
Zimbabwean government
killed in a beach house fire
short ceremony
ministers and counselors
of South Carolina.
six
ministers and counselors
COLUMBIA, South Carolina
in her Santa Monica apartment.
homicide,"
Juliana Redding
aspiring actress
(310) 458-8449.
to fight for the rights of disabled
tackle the issue where disabled gig-goers end up going home at 9pm,
the band headlined a concert in London for people with learning disabilities,
UK-based punk band
nurses
Your Life"
A long list of scientific and widely accepted studies point to the benefits a giver gets,
29
that giving, which extends beyond packages wrapped in ribbons, does a person good.
"29 Gifts: How a Month of Giving Can Change Your Life"
Police tightened security at airports across Pakistan Thursday after receiving
the city's Marriott Hotel
possible suicide attack
Indian Prime Minister Manmohan Singh
security, science and technology and education.
India
security, science and technology and education.
India's growing political and economic importance to the United States and the deepening partnership between Washington and New Delhi.
India's
security, science and technology and education.
Climate change
Ron Clark Academy students
Atlanta, Georgia's
ode to the political process,
"You Can Vote However You Like,"
school students of Atlanta, Georgia's Ron Clark Academy.
Ron Clark Academy students
the world's poorest children.
many things."
defended the work of the
oration
"We suffer at the memory of Meredith. But we look at the future of Amanda,"
Luciano Ghirga
made an impassioned plea
Chinese dairy products.
Indonesia, Taiwan, Japan, Singapore and Malaysia
Burundi, Gabon and Tanzania
a photograph of the swimmer smoking from a bong.
a drug test.
endorsement deals
Ryan Smith
of endorsement deals
money
endorsement deals
smoking from a bong.
The Taliban
near the Safi Landmark Hotel in the Shahr-E-Naw neighborhood of Kabul.
Shia militants in Iraq and terrorists in Iraq, Afghanistan, Lebanon and the Palestinian territories;
The United States
Iranian military groups and a number of Iranian banks and people
no U.S. citizen or private organization will be allowed to engage in financial transactions with these persons and entities,"
no U.S. citizen or private organization will be allowed to engage in financial transactions with these
al Qaeda
Al-Shabab
103
that it had successfully recruited more fighters.
Clashes between the rebels and the government in Mogadishu have left at least 103 people dead and 420 wounded,
Madison County, Kentucky,
Jorge Alberto Lopez Orozco
fugitive on the FBI's 10 Most Wanted
The charred remains of a woman and her sons, ages 2 and 4,
still working
President Obama,
the White House isn't getting actively involved in protecting New Orleans from flooding.
Hurricane Bill
the "overtopping" of its levees and floodwalls,
nuclear dispute with Iran
its human capital,
human capital,
human capital,
Iran
engine problems
A single-engine plane
Beechcraft Bonanza resting on the grass
The pilot reported engine problems shortly after leaving the city's Wiley Post Airport,
"Inglourious Basterds."
I had a mic wire at a screen test clipped
smart strategist.
the Lord's Resistance Army.
dark berry or true red for all skin tones.
sun-kissed cheeks
Makeup artists'
Exfoliate
Kiriakou illegally disclosed classified information when he talked
Justice Department
says he underwent waterboarding in training and cracked in a few seconds.
John Kiriakou
the Justice Department
Kiriakou
Kiriakou illegally disclosed classified information when he talked about the waterboarding of a terrorism suspect,
Ford Crown Victoria
0-60 mph in under six
a 2005 Ford Mustang Shelby GT500.
Ford Crown Victoria
Ford Crown Victoria
Aboubacar Sompare,
Lansana Conte
A 40-day period of national mourning
Conte's death.
Sweden
AT4 shoulder-fired rockets
members of the Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia, or FARC,
2008
snowstorm
snowstorm
Heathrow
Heathrow
a married man
"pregnant man" who gave birth to a
second
Five
kidnapped and later released.
Hamid Karzai
in order to settle his debts
marriage of a
Saturday
47-year-old man.
a 47-year-old man.
Manhattan Project
Manhattan Project
Woodward's conclusion that the "surge" of 30,000 U.S. troops into Iraq was not the primary reason for the decline in violent attacks.
Pulitzer Prize-winning journalist Bob Woodward.
National security adviser Stephen Hadley,
existence of secret operational capabilities developed by the military
a secret program
"The War Within:
accused of demanding kickbacks from companies seeking Illinois state business.
Illinois
federal jury
Up to 150 students were
violence after the country's disputed presidential elections.
The witnesses said riot police and militia attacked the dormitory Sunday night after a student protest the day before.
hurt and arrested so many people
of violence after the country's disputed presidential elections.
riot police and militia
the Bay County Sheriff's Office tip line at 850-747-4700.
A $20,000 reward is
trip to the Florida Panhandle.
a 52-year-old woman from Hueytown, Alabama,
a thrift store
thrift store
a used MP3 player
used MP3 player
U.S. military officials if they ask for it.
New Zealand
Mexico,
More than 16,000 people
murder of two resident
rebels from Sudan had crossed the border.
presidents of Sudan and Chad
cross-border hostilities
armed rebel
presidents of Sudan and Chad
Each country
late Thursday,
presidents of Sudan and Chad
rebels from Sudan had crossed the border.
halt cross-border hostilities between the two African nations.
15 years
France
She refrained from asking the death penalty for her son's attackers, but said she hoped the sentence would be much longer.
DUBAI
there was no desecration of the Quran in village 95 Gill near Gojra City, and the allegations were baseless.
the Muslims
20 injured
seven
Seven people were killed and 20 injured
throw a shadow on the Summer Olympic Games, being staged in Beijing in August.
The protests
Dharamsala
all 114 suras
Islam.
a project to paint all 114 suras
United States
banned pain relieving medication.
The fourth-placed Switzerland team of Steve Guerdat, Christina Liebherr, Niklaus Schurtenberger and Pius Schwizer
Beijing Games.
Robin Soderling
fourth
Robin Soderling
Four-time
Four-time defending champion
during medical trials.
Dr. David Jentsch
Dr. David Jentsch
endorsed
Senate
media attention
Sen. Hillary Clinton
women's
Obama's
former Sen. John Edwards
Sen. John Edwards
Clinton
a key part of its controversial Yongbyon nuclear reactor
a key part of its controversial Yongbyon nuclear reactor
denuclearizing the Korean peninsula
North Korea
a year
denuclearizing the Korean peninsula in exchange for loosening some restrictions on the highly secretive Communist country.
overdose of insulin,
no crime and
his former wife's passing,
Claus von Bulow,
Her husband, Claus,
of trying to kill her with an overdose of insulin,
Denver
two blizzards
to take care of all the new babies and moms
Denver
in bed."
Hospital staffers
Iraqi army checkpoint Baghdad,
five
killing the driver
the driver
al-Shaab neighborhood of northeastern Baghdad,
spokesman would neither confirm nor deny the option is being considered.
Nick Shapiro.
to charge their private insurance for service injuries.
President Barack Obama
veterans' private insurance is only charged when they receive health care from the VA for medical issues that are not related to service injuries,
private health care for veterans and their families
disability or injury
says she is "deeply concerned"
"It's a very difficult mental situation for me to understand
June 17.
Iran
pro-reformist Third Wave campaign
six
Ciudad Juarez, Mexico,
drug-related
agents
psychological exams, drug screenings
Customs
improve the Customs Department's image.
melamine
melamine
eat fewer
melamine
or raising money for the transition effort.
bar federal lobbyists from contributing to or raising money for the transition effort.
bar federal lobbyists from contributing to or raising money for the transition effort.
President-elect Obama's
nonprofits
nonprofit groups
Sunday
"Everyone wants to see Gilad Shalit safe and well and back home but I think there is a real failure to understand the price that is being paid, and the price is phenomenal,"
the names of the first group of Palestinian prisoners
release in two stages 1,027 Palestinians prisoners,
on assisted suicide,
Britain's
old Hollywood and his mother.
Hamilton's formative years
George Hamilton
a doctor.
it was mythological.
10 p.m.
World War II veteran
can overwhelm a relationship.
overwhelm a relationship.
"stressed and tired force"
"stressed and tired force"
Long troop deployments
for July Fourth
Iran's crackdown on protesters.
to invite Iranians to the celebrations at overseas posts
demonstrators.
"to rescind all invitations that have been extended to Iranian diplomats for July Fourth events.
Black Friday
Some had sleeping bags, blankets and winter wear.
Black Friday
two days
Fayetteville, Arkansas.
Best Buy store
he met Black Friday campers in Houston, Texas, who call themselves the "Best Buy family."
transitioning from a female to a male
male
an air-conditioning unit
for laxity in enforcing safety regulations,
Hermosillo,
all day care centers
Cape Sable seaside sparrow,
South Florida,
U.S. State Department spokesman Ian Kelly
hammered out last month with the help of the United Nations' nuclear watchdog agency aimed to reduce the amount of raw material Iran has to build a nuclear bomb.
Iran
and Iran has to give their response to the IAEA,
"Russia, France and the United States
partially enriched uranium
Nway
thin girl with caramel skin and a yellow silk blouse walks alone through a barren landscape
Cyclone Nargis
Nway -- like thousands of people in Myanmar -- is slowly recovering one year after Nargis demolished their country.
John Dillinger,
to live in exile,
Mario Benedetti
died
supporter
Jang Song Thaek,
added his brother-in-law to a military board
brother-in-law to a military board
paves the way for an heir,
7-year-old girl from the same mobile home park,
Melissa Huckaby,
Tracy, California.
in the glass industry
Sixty-four cases of measles have been diagnosed in the United States this
Sixty-four cases of measles have been diagnosed in the United States this
Sixty-four cases of measles have been diagnosed in the United States this
71 years.
a respiratory disease
TurboRacer
Sandusky, Ohio Near Toledo, Ohio
Splish Splash, Long Island, New York
A suspect
courtyard area of the school,
the victim
One student was killed following an argument
surrounds of a Swiss ski resort.
the Occupy movement and the Arab Spring,
Klaus Schwab,
2012
racial
authorities in Cambridge
The president
Harvard professor
The president
Gates, a top African-American scholar, was arrested July 16 for disorderly conduct outside his home after police responded to a report of a possible burglary.
to end the strike.
woman giving birth in a parking lot outside a hospital
to end the strike.
Kabwela
people who actually know
people
"Employers are more likely to check the informal, but tangible, behavioral reference sources like LinkedIn, Facebook, credit history [or] criminal history than the more subjective references provided by candidates,"
crafting a professional identity that serves the role of a 'reference'
job;
"Employers
Prepare your references about who
a law passed in late 2007
Pakistan's
kidney
Mohammed Iqbal
captain Daniel Jarque
heart stopped
his heart stopped following a training session
text messaging service
(radio-frequency identification) technology to tag baggage.
using RFID (radio-frequency identification) technology to tag baggage.
BAA
informed of where their bags are.
its scanning accuracy.
London's Heathrow airport.
antitrust exemption
inject competition into the health care industry while reducing consumer costs.
a repeal would help inject competition into the health care industry while reducing consumer costs.
406-19
impact of an exemption repeal is overblown.
antitrust exemption
in the southern Gaza city of Rafah,
Taher Nunu
in Gaza,
in the southern Gaza city of Rafah,
A radical Muslim sheikh called Friday for the creation of an Islamic emirate in Gaza,
go behind closed doors for deliberations
deliberations
murder
of second-degree murder.
the reopening of a landmark synagogue
violence in Iraq
Wednesday.
by the end of October,
by the end of October,
Iraq
discount airliner
temporarily grounded all Adam Air flights
grounded all Adam Air flights
grounded all Adam Air flights
102
Indonesia's Air Transport Directorate.
Adam Air Flight 574 crashed,
Indonesia's civil aviation chief, Budhi Muliawan Suyitno.
a fish
sailing news and more about the super-yacht industry,
Eldorado, Texas,
a polygamist sect's Texas ranch
Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints,
"Dana Anderson"
arrested this month on a charge of making a false report
Rozita Swinton,
a Colorado woman
HIV positive
restricted inbound travel for people with HIV.
travelers with HIV.
Louis Vuitton, Prada and Loveless
"Electric Town"
fantastic basement-level food hall
Akihabara.
"not be honoring the incorrect price."
"pricing error"
it would "not be honoring the incorrect price."
customers
a 52-inch TV for less than $10,
a "pricing error"
six straight
store opening such as this one is
1,200
$753.
Christoph Waltz
German
in his experience, that most interracial marriages don't last.
Tangipahoa Parish's 8th Ward Justice of the Peace Keith Bardwell
she heard from Tangipahoa Parish's 8th Ward Justice of the Peace Keith Bardwell
Tangipahoa Parish's 8th Ward Justice of the Peace Keith Bardwell
Louisiana justice of the peace
Topps Meat Co.
shut down until all the investigations are complete,
E. coli O157:H7,
global market turmoil,"
Fastest Time to Run 100 Meters On All Fours.
Most People Reading Simultaneously.
rather odd achievements
"The whole point is, if it's not contained to Swat, it's going to spill all over in Pakistan and the West also doesn't realize the seriousness of the situation,"
banning girls from school, forcing women inside and outlawing forms of entertainment.
banning girls from school, forcing women inside
Capitol Hill.
some U.S. senators
U.S. senators
"The Energy and Environmental Showcase,"
reforms to the country's social security system
Greece's Finance Minister George Papaconstantinou announced
put together to pull Greece out of debt.
Greece
government
to protest tough government austerity measures.
U.S. 93
Kingman Regional Medical Center,
near Hoover Dam,
Chinese
in body bags on the roadway near the bus,
White Hills, Arizona, near Hoover Dam.
U.S. 93
Chinese nationals.
said it was "a joint operation with Afghan and U.S. forces."
Nine people
Narang district of Kunar province.
International Criminal Court.
1,166 Palestinians
Palestinians
in the recent Gaza conflict were "terror operatives"
"Operation Cast Lead"
"Twenty years, that is a death sentence,"
Paul Faulkner, 83, and his son, Michael Smith,
a 20-year sentence
20-year
2,000
20-year
obesity, diabetes
good cholesterol and their blood triglyceride levels,"
younger, non-Latino blacks with low income,
younger, non-Latino blacks
of the American Medical Association,
the national championship trophy.
Subdivision
three Navy SEALs
orchestrating the 2004 killing and mutilation of four U.S. contractors in Falluja
orchestrating the 2004 killing and mutilation
the Taliban
"psychotic," "depressed," and in some cases, "psychopathic."
about a dozen boys.
the Taliban
The torch for the 2010
will be the longest domestic torch
February 12
a 106-day, 27,900-mile (45,000-kilometer)
The torch will be carried on an eight-day trip
carry a message of peace throughout the world,
Vancouver
an obsolete Cold War resolution suspending Cuba,"
U.S. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton
suspension from the
get those troops home from Iraq,
the next president must deal with poverty and the war in Iraq.
poverty
governor.
We've got to improve the public
Charles Barkley
Barack
the next president must deal with poverty and the war in Iraq.
Barack Obama
the next president must deal with poverty and the war in Iraq.
racism between players on the pitch could be settled with a handshake.
a handshake.
he has apologized enough
the accusations
apologized enough for remarks he made
United
Basel
Football
performed the swearing-in and placed the presidential sash on Martinelli,
Colombia to combat drug trafficking in the
Jose Manuel Zelaya,
Jose Manuel Zelaya,
that he may have accepted $450,000 a month in bribes
Noe Ramirez Mandujano
4,300
4,300 dead so far
country's former drug czar
the recession.
African-American
"Sponsors are harder to find. Teams want more money. So now instead of being unemployed, Marc is now self-employed, moving forward and racing
the recession.
(CNN)
Sen. Hillary
more than 530,000
Former Sen. John Edwards
55 percent to 27 percent,
governorate building, the other outside the Justice Ministry.
in a bus
U.S. President Barack Obama
to work closely with the country as it prepares for elections.
Iraqi Prime Minister Nuri al-Maliki,
Hurricane Ike,
natural disasters often spawn irrational behavior. The media can also compound fears,
a combination of fear, desire, distrust and protectionism,
Hurricane Ike,
Gulf Coast
Ike struck
that gas is limited
when a perception exists that gas is limited
perception exists that gas is limited
it has not included him in the decision-making process.
the vote was marred by "widespread fraud."
voting fraud during the presidential election.
Mustafa Barakzai,
in Karachi,
bus filled with Shiite religious observers,
twin blasts
a bus filled with Shiite religious observers,
Ireland,
Author
Lisa Marie Nowak's
assaulting a romantic rival
A former astronaut
Orange County Circuit
a year of probation.
donning a
900
Yara
Saturday
Benicio Del Toro
Granma, the official mouthpiece of the Cuban government,
a glowing review.
December 12.
game's release date and widespread reach
"landscape-changing event that doesn't come around very often,"
more than $400 million.
Andrew Reiner,
abuse of a corpse, kidnapping and tampering
Michael Cera
Zed,
increased by about 0.8 degrees Celsius (1.5
by about 0.8 degrees Celsius
Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie's newborn twins
July 12.
Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie's
Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie's newborn twins
making it more affordable and easier for
toilet
Irish airline
for using the toilet
overpriced drinks
may start charging passengers for using the toilet on board its flights.
close friends and celebrity acquaintances
he is a frail and sickly man who has faced extreme humiliation and would essentially be given a death
accelerate his deterioration from cardiac and neurologic disease
Perry Farrell,
that she is angry
"absolutely untrue."
50 charges
sexual assaults
test mission
Wednesday
F-22A fighter
Mellow Yellow, Deep Purple Love
as low as $36,
about $36
lighting
it plans to lease aircraft and provide replacement workers,
60 percent
President Obama and Congress
special celebration,
on Capitol Hill next to the U.S. Supreme Court
our 16th president's
chief exorcist
chief exorcist of the Roman Catholic Church,
are not possessed by the devil, they are tempted by the devil,"
Bill Owens
Hoffman
referendum
unconventional take on art.
painting of the British House of Commons
his first major exhibition in years.
form with his usual unconventional take on art.
more surgeries stretched out over time.
Baghdad
when he was burned
Baghdad
Youssif
organ donation.
to know that four individuals have received the gift of life because of our selfless and beloved John.
four lives,
and those who were with him will be tried fairly.
Libya has an obligation to surrender Saif al-Islam to the
put Saif al-Islam on trial.
a request to judges and show its legal system is capable of properly handling such a proceeding.
"Taken,"
Tyler Perry's "Madea Goes to Jail,"
of photographer Henry F. Warren
the seal of photographer Henry F. Warren appeared
Morgan, a renowned collector and scholar of Lincoln and Gen. Grant photographs,
coalition forces in Afghanistan
The updated version, which is yet to be published, will include "more clarity" for troops on how to operate in "escalation of force" incidents, such as when a vehicle approaches a checkpoint in a potentially threatening manner and troops must decide whether, and when, to fire at it. The official declined to offer further details but said the aim is to make sure even the most junior troops have full understanding of
coalition forces in Afghanistan
reduce tension between its military forces
his great-uncle, Charles Payne, had a "very difficult time re-adjusting to civilian life" after helping his Army division liberate the Ohrdruf forced labor camp, a subdivision of Buchenwald
German Chancellor Angela Merkel; Holocaust survivor and Nobel Peace Prize laureate Elie Wiesel, and survivor Bertrand Herz.
German Chancellor Angela Merkel; Holocaust survivor and Nobel
American and Muslim relations.
helped liberate prisoners from the camp during World War II.
Friday,
Saudi Arabia on Wednesday,
golfer
Gillette
imposing their strict brand of Islamic law
Swat Valley
Bill Ross
The former accountant for Andrew Joseph "Joe" Stack III
widespread dissemination of video of the mass protests.
at least 20
numbers of casualties and arrests
the West
Ayatollah Ali Khamenei
1998
bombings of the U.S. embassies in Kenya
of the U.S. embassies in Kenya
used a helicopter
attorney Steven Bradbury.
a recommendation of investigators
a recommendation of investigators
Tuesday,
Rafaelle Sollecito.
Meredith Kercher's
Samantha Orobator
became pregnant in
death by firing squad
600
details in the coming weeks of how fans can receive a refund on their admission ticket.
second from the bottom
how fans can receive a refund on their admission ticket.
More than 600 Energie Cottbus
of men and women who have been accused of sorcery and
list of men and women who have been accused of sorcery
bound and gagged, tied to a log and set ablaze on a pile
victims
someone else's unexplained death,
Set a goal:
called himself "fat, unhappy and fed up."
seven-day fruit and vegetable juice cleanse (during which time I weaned myself off caffeine), followed by an entirely plant-based nutrition program
"That fatigue has contributed to controller errors,"
contributes to accidents.
pilot fatigue,
14-hour
pilot fatigue,
9:20 p.m.
9:20 p.m. ET Wednesday.
9:20 p.m. ET Wednesday.
The space shuttle Discovery,
9:20 p.m.
Discovery
Jay Cutler,
"This time its official,"
iReport.com:
massacre was one of the deadliest
profound effect on students and teachers across the country.
iReport.com:
Jennifer Muzquiz,
physical harm,
"don't exactly agree" with the findings.
to get this rig completed in that April 19th-April 20th time period,"
"When the culture of a company favors risk-taking and cutting corners above other concerns, systemic failures like this oil spill disaster result without direct decisions being made or tradeoffs being considered,"
clergy in the Irish capital.
Catholic Church authorities
child abuse
minority groups in the United States.
Darker-skinned
minority groups in the United States.
more than 68,000
68,000
fair-skinned people, a group 10 times more likely to develop melanoma.
aspirin, ibuprofen
acetaminophen,
Tylenol, aspirin and ibuprofen.
package labels and bottles must prominently state in highlighted text the drug's ingredients.
to love one another
xenophobia, racism, nationalism, misandry, misogyny, homophobia or
Pedro A. Moreno
have doled out more than $22 million to nearly 210,000 Afghans to build or repair 435 miles
opium and heroin
Afghan farmers
U.S. Agency for International Development
raising $12,000 toward the costly medical bills.
45-minute
De Vore and Kohan
St. Paul,
leukemia.
soft vegetables and fruit.
have discovered the remains of a rodent the size of a small car which used to forage
1-ton
new giant rodent
car
remains of a rodent the size of a small car
South American continent.
secretly detaining Rohingya refugees before towing them out to sea
hundreds of Rohingya refugees -- members of a Muslim minority group -- abuse and abandonment at sea were
refugees detained by Thai authorities on a beach near a tourist site, with the refugees prone on the sun-bleached sand while guards stood nearby.
Thai
their country in rickety boats for years, in search of a better life.
Thailand
show refugees being towed out to sea by the Thai
buried him neck-deep in sand
the main beach.
serious but stable
Workers at the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power station
Friday
Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power station
American sailor fatally shot two female sailors before shooting
fatally shot
Randy Starks
The Miami Herald
he struck an officer with a slow-moving Freightliner truck,
Miami Dolphins defensive end Randy Starks
the 8-year-old war.
Afghanistan
President Obama
why the United States is in Afghanistan,
contribute more troops
deploy 1,000
late December
murder
football player Taylor Bradford,
DaeShawn Tate,
"It was an attempted robbery, aggravated robbery," he said. "He [Bradford] was targeted because of some information that was out there and the fact that they believed he had some cash, or he had something that they wanted."
Bradford, 21, fatally wounded near the campus residence hall area.
drove a short distance
Billy Mays'
OxiClean pitchman
heart disease,
heart disease,
Brothers Deepak and Satish Kalpoe
Brothers Deepak and Satish Kalpoe
reviewing
in Aruba
Dr. Kay Scarpetta.
discussed the challenges of staying fresh, the need for happy endings and the merits of the History Channel and the movie "White Chicks."
"The Scarpetta Factor,"
64,437 customers were in the dark.
the nor'easter affecting the Eastern Seaboard,
more than 300,000 customers
Piazza Colonna,
a private tour guide
shopping, head down the Via Babuino towards the Spanish Steps.
The Queen and the royal family cost Britons a little bit more in the latest financial
66 pence ($1.32)
66 pence ($1.32)
family cost British taxpayers an average of 66 pence ($1.32)
to keep costs down,
school students of Atlanta, Georgia's Ron Clark Academy.
Ron Clark
Ron Clark
sleepy energy,"
offers advice to the president on energy, taxes, financial regulation and al Qaeda
a car fleeing police
theft of
a car fleeing police struck a home
"then hit the 1-year-old, [who] was in a stroller. The other individuals were on the front porch of their own home. He struck with such force that it knocked the
George Michael
suspicious toilet attendant,
a suspicious toilet attendant,
police
George Michael
"2001" or the 1953 novel "Childhood's End,"
Clarke
"2001: A Space Odyssey"
18
Michoacan
Arnoldo Rueda Medina,
1,300 total,
Michoacan state,
arrest Saturday of Arnoldo Rueda Medina,
loved one's operation.
Iranian-Americans,
"I kind of felt I was more there when I couldn't see the rest of the room,
"I kind of felt I was more there when I couldn't see the rest of the room, just the TV and the Facebook,"
Iran,
Atefeh Yazdi
Soltani and Yazdi
Rep. Cathy McMorris Rodgers
$825 billion stimulus package
Rep. Cathy McMorris Rodgers
The president is calling
Rep. Cathy McMorris Rodgers
Pell Grants for college students,
architectural firm
a superyacht.
Lord Foster
€1.875 million.
Lord
€1.875 million.
weight
87
260 pounds
260 pounds
more optimistic.
his brother to surrender.
at least 18 federal agents and two soldiers have been
federal officers' bodies
southwestern Mexico,
urban
urban farms like Will Allen's becoming half-million dollar enterprises
one of many urban
your own food security network,"
recovers
Saturday
two to three
attacked Saturday with a knife
night's sleep has done him some good as he recovers from being attacked Saturday with a knife in a confessional at his church.
a lot of difficult questions.
said he will vote for Barack Obama in November.
3,200
poor management and inadequate precautions
blamed poor management and inadequate precautions
New Acropolis Museum,
writes European travel guidebooks and hosts travel shows on public television and public radio.
a probe into his sect's Yearning for Zion Ranch
12
grand jury
Utah,
Tuesday at the Staples Center,
Michael Jackson
John Lennon
Elvis Presley
the Jackson memorial could have an audience in the hundreds of millions.
Melissa Huckaby,
any other alleged victims of a Sunday school teacher accused of raping
8-year-old girl from Tracy, California.
are searching for any other alleged victims of a Sunday school teacher accused of raping
Nov. 1
David Blaine and three Maasai tribesmen.
is a benefit for the Maasai Wilderness Conservation Trust, an organization working to promote sustainable development while protecting the east African grasslands that the Maasai tribe calls home.
the Maasai Wilderness Conservation Trust,
"I was impressed at the way he was really genuinely working with the community to create value out of being good stewards of the land,"
15 miles twice
Gary Babineau
Minneapolis
Minneapolis
landed on top of her car,
die,"
"The whole bridge from one side of the Mississippi to the other just completely gave way, fell all the way down,"
"I probably had a 30-, 35-foot free fall. And there's cars in the water, there's cars on fire. The
"The whole bridge from one side of the Mississippi to the other just completely gave way, fell all the way down,"
the other just completely gave way, fell all the way down,"
"The whole bridge from one side of the Mississippi to the other just completely gave way, fell all the way down,"
airport screeners, the people responsible for inspecting people and luggage at airport
May 8.
2007.
lewdness with a child, sexual assault with a minor, attempted sexual assault with a minor and other related
246-183
a wake for his mother
Three
60-38.
passed
246-183
$787 billion
"disrespectful"
a Muslim imam, a Catholic priest, a Jewish rabbi and a Buddhist monk
Turkish
Turkish television show
Gulf of Mexico.
sea turtles
the area's recovery,
seeing recovery
in the surface habitats of the Gulf of Mexico,"
turtles
convicted of murder
Chonburi province
demand Abhisit's resignation.
Thousands of "red shirt" protesters, named for the color of their attire, have rallied for days to demand Abhisit's resignation.
demand Abhisit's resignation.
former Prime Minister Thaksin Shinawatra,
â‚¬80 million (U.S. $101 million) in jewels,
more than $100M
near the famed Avenue des Champs-Elysees, around the corner from a police station.
an estimated â‚¬80 million (U.S. $101 million) in jewels,
swiped an estimated â‚¬80 million (U.S. $101 million) in jewels,
â‚¬80 million (U.S. $101 million) in jewels,
Witnesses describe scene
man in
CIA officers
Two of those killed were contractors with private security firm Xe, formerly known as Blackwater,
"There are no words that can ease the ache in your hearts,"
President Obama
Two
used helicopters to counter-attack the
Russian and British ships
a crew from the Cumberland had boarded a small boat on Tuesday that "they
repelled a pirate attack
big-screen smoking leads teens to pick up the tobacco habit,
American Medical Association Alliance
R
like a child, and a very sweet and gentle child,
four-day
reducing your electricity consumption doesn't have to be difficult.
switching off all non-essential electrical equipment to promote energy saving.
here are still poor and illiterate;
poor and illiterate;
healthcare in some places;
The Sale Sharks forward will face a disciplinary
'World Cup semi-final England vs
match at the Parc des Princes.
dangerous tackle on England's Simon
a dangerous tackle on England's Simon
a dangerous tackle
Friday's third and fourth-place play-off match
South Korea
(CNN)
--The Israel Defense Forces have set up a field hospital with 220 workers, including doctors and nurses, at a soccer field in Port-au-Prince, according to the IDF's Haiti
iReport.com
region's biggest budget airline
region's biggest budget airline
Leaders of the Common Cause Partnership,
more than 100,000 Anglican Christians in North America,
about 100,000
about 100,000 members
floods that have engulfed
further heavy rain over the weekend combined with the spring high tides
firing of her public safety commissioner.
firing of her public safety commissioner.
Legislative Council
denounced the probe as a "kangaroo court"
increase the flow of water passing through its network of dams.
has plunged to record low levels,
competition
officially cleared of lying about their ages.
China's Olympic gold medal gymnasts
The inquiry
16
died while giving birth last summer.
has raised the Goldman case with the Brazilian government.
told David she wanted a divorce
Bruna
the death of Rolling Stones founder Brian Jones,
documents
documents
dead in a swimming pool.
the death of Rolling Stones founder Brian Jones,
Twitter, Facebook, MySpace
immediately.
all U.S. bases to provide access to Facebook.
A buildup of toxic gases
rose to 104
proof that you're a professional,
yourself
presentation matters
nearly 39 million
presentation
Former Illinois Gov. George Ryan
remain in prison
refused last fall to grant bail
racketeering and fraud
Angeles Galaxy
Itani
two ruling-party lawmakers assassinated in recent months.
Lebanon
exhibits. New York's 76 zoos,
Bronx
severe cuts
many zoos, aquariums and botanical gardens
63
63 pounds
about 8,500 years ago.
KBR's
KBR's work in Iraq and Afghanistan has come under extensive criticism from members of Congress.
Houston, Texas-based
KBR's work in Iraq and Afghanistan
Sgt. Christopher Everett
Christopher Everett
Tom Hanks
Rome.
how complicated it is to shoot in a place of Rome.
take money from hardworking taxpayers
a malinvestment of resources into sectors of the economy that were unsustainable without easy
roomy trunk
70-liter tank is insufficient for long journeys.
four-seater
New York
Sarah Jessica Parker
Matthew [Broderick]
seven years
Fans of the grill
Leroy and Judy McMillin
Hasidic Jews.
Brooklyn's Crown Heights
American and Latin
American and Latin
Hasidic
pirates.
Somalia
Southern armed gangs and pirates."
a remote safari lodge near to the Somali border
remote corner of the lawless country,
a remote safari lodge near to the Somali border
80 miles
Pensacola Naval Air Station
in a north Georgia forest
that they suspect a drug reaction or toxins killed 21 horses
Officials in the state Agriculture and Consumer Services Department
Wellington, Florida.
Anabolic steroids
for some tennis fans the issue is far from resolved.
The writer -- a woman
equal prize money in women's tennis.
Wimbledon and the French Open
Hosni Mubarak,
deaths of protesters,
military facility in Cairo.
Mubarak had been transferred to a
United States
Friday
for developing countries
he would leave Thursday evening.
Cairo,
Egyptian military pummel the veiled woman,
has not been identified.
Hamas, the Palestinian militant group that rules Gaza.
the Iranian government
"We have stretched our hand in peace many times to the Palestinian people. We have nothing against the people of Gaza,"
Israel
Each side
"all-out war"
Hamas government compound
foreign ministry building,
Danish
six
Islamabad
Danish Embassy in Pakistan
Islamabad
The infection soon became the blood poisoning that killed the whiskey mogul.
Jim Beam,
Cuban coast
Charles Tanqueray's
Captain Morgan
strongbox.
dead
Colts
conspiracy to commit a crime, robbery, assault
Las Vegas
12 charges including conspiracy to commit a crime, robbery, assault and kidnapping with a deadly weapon
O.J. Simpson
the market
consider switching to a less known cell provider to save money and avoid signing contracts
The typical person clocks in at 790 minutes and pays an average monthly contract bill of $67,
smaller players in the market
start by assessing how much you talk, text and surf the Web
your own research
$67,
California
music and narrated matter-of-factly by the
Douglas Oliver Kelly,
She had prepared the video, describing how her daughter had been adopted from Canada and was a Blackfoot Indian.
had befriended Kelly at a Burbank gym.
Samuel Zamudio,
Samuel Zamudio,
forensic
found dead in their home Friday.
Hudson
CHICAGO, Illinois
William Balfour, was detained
Iraq
"I flipped," Gen. Jack Keane, then the Army's deputy chief of staff, told the historians of his reaction to a June 2003 decision to transfer control of all coalition troops away from the land forces command that had been preparing for the mission.
decision to transfer control of all coalition troops away from the land forces command
Iraq war shows military chiefs made mistake after mistake
Frank opinions from officers serving in the 18 months from the start of war to Iraqi elections in January 2005 reveal there were concerns at the time, not just about assumptions made by planners but at decisions taken once U.S.-led coalition forces had control of Iraq.
military chiefs
U.S.
muscled his way through for a late winner to put Chelsea into the FA Cup final
United
Banni
Misrata
Tripoli
control of Zawiya,
Rich Behm,
a broken back
three Cowboys staffers
Dallas Cowboys scouting assistant
U.S. Holocaust Memorial Museum,
opening the door for the man who shot him,
veteran of the museum's security staff,
Security officer Stephen Johns reportedly opened the door for the man police say was
Washington Redskins fan and loved to travel,
loved to travel,
Stephen Tyrone Johns
first visit to China
Americans
Americans
in the Netherlands
Aruban investigators,
Marco Rubio
I call a scandal.
May 1956.
are responsible for his country's economic and political turmoil,
President of Zimbabwe, Robert Mugabe.
an exclusive live interview
Amanpour
if the power-sharing agreement in Zimbabwe is really working, if international sanctions are responsible
rose-cut
18th-century Versailles,
18th-century Versailles,
the round diamond
from 18th-century Versailles,
emerald cut
covered with
Felix Brinkmann
Guido Felix Brinkmann
The defense
Amanda Knox
Eight jurors
leaders of 20 countries representing 90 percent of the world's economic output
focusing
significant numbers of legislators from one party joining forces with the other.
bipartisan agreement.
two
At least 38 people
cause of the blast was unknown,
two bodies out of the plant,
that the United States must end its energy-based vulnerability.
national security,
ending the country's "vulnerability to possible pressures and blackmail."
ending the country's "vulnerability to possible pressures and blackmail."
dramatically tighten emissions controls while reshaping America's environmental standards.
broad-reaching energy legislation
Ivicia Olic
Athens,
bit of music history
the alternative rock music scene
Allman Brothers
Juicy Campus web
lies are
is a Web site,
promiscuous, "ugly," "overrated," "racist."
Ivan
Jason Reitman,
Ivan Reitman and Jason Reitman,
death or life in prison without the possibility of parole.
U.S. District Court in Kentucky
Yusufiya,
of raping and killing a 14-year-old Iraqi girl.
convicted of raping and killing a 14-year-old Iraqi girl.
paid during World War II.
by the Soviets,
a high-ranking Polish general
the conflict
the Swiss flag aloft after becoming the youngest skier to win a women's World Cup race.
the super-G at St Moritz.
felony
"sexting"
exchanged sexual messages
quarterfinals of the Davis Cup on Sunday.
Serbia's
quarterfinals of the Davis
killing of innocent people and damage to their property
Taliban
Taliban military "code of conduct"
"Mujahideen must be well behaved, and treat the people properly, in order to get closer to the hearts of civilian Muslims,"
new code of conduct
A Pakistani looks at a bus set on fire by Taliban militants in northwest Pakistan in June.
his graying beard and his legendary swastika tattooed into his forehead.
Charles Manson
showing the balding and graying 74-year-old, complete with his iconic forehead swastika.
August 1969.
Brazilian Felipe Massa,
new car, the F10,
have unveiled their new car, the F10,
one of the world's biggest casinos
Macau
a man synonymous with the creation of Macau as the world's biggest gambling destination.
build up his own business empire.
Global warming
increase flooding in coastal areas,
produce larger farming yields,
increase flooding in coastal areas,
could destabilize
poverty, social tensions, environmental degradation, ineffectual leadership
prompting mass migrations and creating breeding grounds for terrorists, the chairman of the National Intelligence Council told Congress on Wednesday.
African, Asian, Central American and Central Asian countries."
the racially charged attempted murder of a white classmate
Alan Howard,
Jena
Bedford, New York,
Jessie, 17.
talent pipeline in Europe
be opportunistic when it comes
corporate culture, perpetuation of gender-based stereotypes, exclusion of women from informal networks and a lack of role models as
promotion,
discrepancy."
volatile
Atlanta's location,
Atlanta's location, proximity to other major cities and access to major highways.
$30 million
$30 million
cells from live animals.
could lead researchers to one day resurrect long-extinct species, such as the mammoth.
stuck to with remarkably little internal drama. He won it with unparalleled fundraising and an overwhelming ground game. And he won it after facing various challenges and turning them to
faced challenges, but he always seemed to take the path that would make him stronger.
Obama's
invigorated others who embrace hate and who might wish to exact violence against others.
combating Holocaust denial
deliver her speech
denial," he has invigorated others who embrace hate and who might wish to exact violence against others.
denial," he has invigorated others who embrace hate and who might wish to exact violence against others.
died of a stab wound
The incident happened at 12:33 a.m. Howard and the other victim were taken to a local hospital. Howard was then airlifted by helicopter to St. Francis Hospital in Hartford, where he later died,
Increased fighting in Afghanistan has caused
Durcho came to her apartment Monday afternoon and told her he had "choked" Summer Rust to death and that he was leaving Oklahoma, according to the
He is suspected of killing Summer Rust, 25; her son Teagin, 4; and daughters Evynn, 3, and Autumn and Kirsten, both
Joshua Steven Durcho was
Joshua Steven Durcho was arrested Tuesday after a car chase with police.
death, but said the children were not present
Muntazer al-Zaidi,
Muntadhir Al-Zaidi
Iraq
Muntadhir Al-Zaidi
at least two weeks
25 years
"Spider-Man," "Star Trek, "Indiana Jones and the Kingdom of the Crystal Skull"
both of his arms, legs, knees, feet, ankles, several of his ribs, his back and his pelvis.
Monte Perlin
at 60 mph from a ramp into an open car of a train traveling at 45 mph, all with a woman on the seat next to him...sounds
"almost everything." Everything, according to
estimated 1,000
A mix of peaceful protest and direct action
1,000 protestors gathered in the surrounding woods and scrubland
"The Great Climate Swoop".
human rights and fundamental freedoms."
"authoritarian" Chinese government
China
dialogue with the United States,
a day earlier that characterized China's human rights record
the surviving young animal
zoo
a polar bear
polar
eat
Millions of
Only an autopsy will be able to determine the exactly cause of death.
Dutch Embassy in Harare
President
large, pale, blistered patch on his back,
decision to pull out of the race.
pull out of the race.
no major injuries."
All 18
RAF's aeronautical rescue
Super Puma helicopter
operate freely on their own.
a largely user-generated virtual world,
virtual world.
worry that he might be easily separated from his new-found money,
$232 million
Neal Wanless,
public television and public radio.
European
American worker has been sold out by backers of
They say it enables us to buy cheaper goods made with cheap foreign labor and this, in turn, raises our standard of living.
industrial might
sold out by backers of
America's industrial might
backers of free trade.
tried to blackmail him,
John Beyrle, "supports" Hatcher,
Russia."
"Clearly, the video we saw was a montage of lot of different clips, some of them which are clearly fabricated."
$100m
"spygate" scandal
breach of Article 151c of the FIA International Sporting Code
the deadly fever in Congo since November 27.
Thirteen
close its border with that country,
the South Pacific island nation of Palau,
no returned Uyghurs would be mistreated
Michael Ian Black,
Seychelles islands on October 21 bound
guns
it won't pay.
triathlons.
training for triathlons.
"stay clean and use other things -- fitness, instead of drugs."
Nearly 3 million gallons of sewage spilled into San Francisco Bay
partially
3 million gallons of sewage
Thursday night.
A pump
three attacks in Queens
New York City,
Queens
three
Sunday night.
exotic animals
Ohio
escaped lion
the last administration left us in a weaker posture than we've been any time since World War II: less regarded in the world, stretched more thinly than we ever have been in the past, two wars under way, virtually no respect in entire parts of the world.
Gloria Borger
Tuesday
former vice president was "dead wrong."
a tougher response from Moscow and Beijing.
"I don't think [Cheney] is out of line, but he is dead wrong,"
"I don't think [Cheney] is out of line, but he is dead wrong,"
new immigration law
lead to racial profiling,
supporters deny that and say it is needed
"Death to America!"
anniversary
Charging for Content?
Victory Day
a team of astronauts
Victory Day
a maintenance mission
The NYPD,
NEW YORK
in concentrated areas
a one-shot victory in the Bob Hope Classic
one-shot victory in the Bob Hope Classic on the final hole
Tim Clark, Matt Kuchar
one-shot
An amateur astronomer in Australia
An amateur astronomer in Australia
large impact near Jupiter's southern
amateur astronomer in Australia
new scar
An amateur astronomer in Australia noticed the new mark
block of ice from somewhere in Jupiter's neighborhood, or a wandering comet that was too faint for astronomers to have detected before impact.
buoyant soccer fans
qualifying for the World Cup.
At least 29 people
marketplace in the Diyala province
At least 29 people
Twenty
UK troops wearing bearskin hats.
use of bearskin
Three
said the leak was caused by an overflow from a tank.
no
was not immediately clear
a chemical
the Airbus A330-200 encountered heavy turbulence about 02:15 a.m. local time Monday
lightning strike
Fiorentina
Kaka
Maggie Sorrells
440 pounds
Diet: Weigh Down Workshop, a
a "universal symbol of peace and tolerance, a shepherd to the faithful and a keeper of the flame for his people,"
represents U.S. acquiescence to the Dalai Lama's calls for Tibetan autonomy.
"If they were to sit down with the Dalai Lama, they would find him to be a man of peace and reconciliation,"
my hidden agenda is a separation and restoration [of] Tibet's old social political system.
separation and restoration [of] Tibet's old social political system.
John King
debate over national health care reform,
all he could to help area residents and businesses clean up the mess and recover financially.
Tuesday's special election in Massachusetts for the U.S. Senate seat formerly held by liberal Democrat Ted Kennedy.
won Tuesday's special election in Massachusetts for the U.S. Senate seat formerly held by liberal Democrat Ted Kennedy.
working with him on the urgent economic challenges
needed all 60
low bottom-line selling prices
Internet
the Internet
the public.
free
to extend Russia's military presence in the former Soviet Republic,
Thousands of opposition demonstrators
30 percent cut in the price of natural gas
be in control
Maurice White,
Okfuskee County
a Creek Nation ambulance for a traffic-stop violation.
Trooper Daniel Martin pulling over a Creek Nation ambulance for a traffic-stop violation.
The Apple Inc.
the original Macintosh,
"really has changed the world,"
Cleaning," an agreeable, midrange independent film, makes light work of heavy burdens.
"Sunshine Cleaning."
"Sunshine Cleaning."
"Miracle on the Hudson."
Islamic Jihad, the Fatah Al Aqsa Martyrs Brigade and the Nasser Salah A din Brigades
"One of the targets was a terror tunnel, used for the infiltration of terrorists into Israel, while the other was used for smuggling of weapons. Direct hits were identified,"
inside their Chicago home.
family inside their Chicago home.
pianist and composer
President Obama
Shark fins
ancient Chinese
ancient Chinese
Shark fin
"foot soldiers"
a massive recruiting effort by the al Qaeda-linked Somali insurgent group al-Shabaab
Somalia
a massive recruiting effort by the al Qaeda-linked Somali insurgent group al-Shabaab in immigrant communities in the United States.
Somali
reports of alleged child sexual abuse are made to government authorities,
to make sure reports of alleged child sexual abuse are made to government authorities,
Singapore, China
to realize this future is clear:
Japan."
have just six points from their first six matches and are 13 points behind Real.
losing their fourth league game in a row
Real Madrid.
Barcelona
losing their fourth league game in a row with a goal from Riki handing Deportivo La Coruna a surprise 1-0 win.
Real Madrid.
Atletico
sixth
losing their fourth league game
scored for the sixth game
Sevilla,
be sacked
Atletico Madrid
vowed that justice will be done
Defense Secretary Robert Gates, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and more than a dozen members of Congress were among
justice will be done
"no words can fill the void that has been left,"
Fort Hood
"Grieve with us. Don't grieve for us."
rescue shelter
flood-swollen Mississippi River
flood-swollen
China
entertainment venue
voiced their worries about a new crackdown aimed at "cleaning up" the country ahead of the Summer Games in August.
"cleaning up" the country
it remains a taboo topic
Four babies
China
Malaysia and Brunei, have
Indonesia, Taiwan, Japan, Singapore and Malaysia
the scandal, which has seen the arrest of at least 18 people.
banning Chinese dairy products.
Four babies have died
Republicans warned that the hearing ultimately could contribute to diminished national security.
Vice President Dick Cheney,
thought Biden did the best job,
Republican Gov. Sarah Palin
Sen. Joe Biden
Gov. Sarah Palin
Bike Week,
$650 million
$650 million
Kenny Smith
tools like Facebook and Twitter
baseball commentators and reporters are using
Lance Armstrong
Freeze-dried food, artificial limbs, cordless vacuum cleaners and edible toothpaste
Freeze-dried food, artificial limbs, cordless vacuum cleaners
astronaut tasting experiments,"
40 years
NASA magazine
you won't find on the list is the bright orange powered drink, Tang,
sought as a suspect,
Madison.
Chester Arthur Stiles,
girl who was shown on a videotape
three-week
three-point
A 75th minute strike by striker Graziano
Italian
Sunday
Watergate complex
Sen. Hillary Clinton,
a better distribution of the country's oil wealth.
nine Filipinos and five Nigerians
18 hostages
concerns of excessive amount of lead paint.
six months.
in a parking lot at the Freedom Worship Baptist Church in Blanchester, Ohio.
of armed forces personnel killed on operations or as a result of terrorism
a sterling silver emblem in the shape of a cross over a wreath. In the center is the queen's monogram, EIIR, which stands for Elizabeth
a federal judge in Mississippi
"Star Wars In Concert"
"Star Wars In Concert,"
John Williams
Mexico City's
the busy Iztapalapa neighborhood
Iztapalapa
stretching from the Gulf of Mexico to the Pacific Ocean and encompassing much of modern-day central Mexico.
ruins of an Aztec
ruins of an Aztec
now infamous for violent crime and drug dealing, has grown into a sprawling, poor district of the capital,
amazing,
Christina Perez, of Colorado Springs, Colorado, and her friends
"It was amazing, there were no words for it, it was so good, it was probably the best
Christina Perez, of Colorado Springs, Colorado, and her friends
her friends went
"The Dark Knight."
David Beckham
affects people's airways
asthmatic
Friday
reconciliation between the peoples of the region
the first papal visit to some of Christianity's most holy places since Pope John Paul
Holy Land
three presidential candidates will never be "regular folks."
Sen. John McCain
they are "just like us" are really pathetic.
he felt mistreated when the airline refused to book the family for a later flight.
he was "impressed with the professionalism" of the
said federal authorities removed eight members of his extended family and a friend
A Muslim family
federal authorities removed eight members of
Voronin's ruling Communist Party manipulated Sunday's election results
Facebook and Twitter,
social networking tools, particularly Twitter.
$1.97,
March 2005,
Gas
33 cents
the mercury-based preservative thimerosal
mercury-based preservative thimerosal
California
in 1999,
continued to rise
autism rates
mercury-based preservative thimerosal
ocean currents disperse debris
jet's speed indicator was faulty.
just before it crashed
the plane's systems were providing contradictory information about its airspeed,
Anislav Varbanov,
stunt performer died Monday night after suffering an injury during a rehearsal,
the Indiana Jones Epic Stunt Spectacular at Hollywood Studios.
Hollywood Studios, part of the Orlando, Florida, theme park.
Silk and Soya, a Thai-themed restaurant in Madrid, Spain,
Kitchen staff at Silk and Soya restaurant in Spain
A restaurateur has gone to great lengths to tackle the spread of the H1N1 virus
measures to prevent the spread of the H1N1 virus,
taking staff's temperatures before they start work
Seung-Hui Cho
Virginia Tech mental health records
Seung-Hui Cho
all the interactions
kill himself
justice and the mentally ill.
Miami-Dade pretrial detention facility
sometimes in the robes, sometimes naked, lying or sitting in their cells.
on the ninth floor.
never got treatment.
face drug charges or charges of assaulting an officer
Miami-Dade county jails
says about one-third of all people in Miami-Dade county jails are mentally ill.
We toured the jail
are usually "avoidable felonies."
ninth floor of the Miami-Dade pretrial detention facility
the "forgotten floor,"
inmates with the most severe mental illnesses
says the best part is that it's a win-win solution. The patients win, the families are relieved, and the state saves money by simply not cycling these prisoners through again and again.
Bristol Palin is an ideal choice to speak about teen abstinence.
teen abstinence.
to dig and throw fear into the heart of any person who may want to freely express their opinion in the United States of America.
radical leftists,
author of the new book, "The G-Free Diet,"
almost 100
the role of escorting United Nations World Food Program vessels carrying food and relief supplies to war-torn Somalia, an
protection of vulnerable vessels
EU naval force
United States, NATO member states, Russia and India
history
reading classics
the student organization Accion Puertorriquena
covered up the murder of a British teenage girl in Goa
Goa
Goa
said she also believed police were trying to cover up the truth behind her daughter's murder,
police were trying to cover up the truth
Fiona MacKeown
the murder of a British teenage girl in Goa last month to protect
April 16, 2007,
confronted by a strange man and a television crew.
15
total to 24,
the Atlantic
228
46 degrees Fahrenheit (7 Celsius)
vacation cottages
Outside Dingle, numerous vacation cottages are available to rent, including homes in the village of Dunquin. In
46 degrees Fahrenheit (7 Celsius)
who would deliver the eulogy or how many people have been invited.
the ranch could have
tier three sex offender,
The Morning Star Ranch,
Haylee Donathan
a tip from members of the ranch
Robin Barry Hughes and Matthew John Maguire,
Nigeria
more of the African nation's oil wealth to be pumped into the region
Robin Barry Hughes and Matthew John Maguire,
20 poorest in the world.
of former Miss Sinaloa, Laura Zúñiga,
new money-sharing measures.
Farmers stage a "tractorazo" in Esperanza, Argentina, on March 12 in protest against taxes on exports of soybeans.
export taxes on farm goods.
Guantanamo to Bermuda,
Salahidin Abdalahut and Kheleel Mamut
they had ever been terrorists
objects in a circular 5-kilometer (3-mile) area, including one object with a diameter of 7 meters (23 feet) and 10 other objects, some of which were metallic, Brazilian
Paris,
intense flash of white light,
suggested the pilots were perhaps flying at the "wrong speed" for the violent thunderstorm they flew into early on Monday before the Airbus A330's systems failed.
She's completed our family, and she means everything to my boys. We need her home.
asleep in her crib,
Lisa Irwin was last seen around 10:30 p.m. Monday, asleep in her crib,
Police
4.2 earthquake
about 2,000
none of
two miles east-northeast of Oakland,
about two miles east-northeast of Oakland, at a depth of 3.6 miles,
quake left about 2,000 customers without
about 2,000
"We had quite a spike in calls, mostly calls of inquiry, none of any injury, none of any damage that was reported," said Capt. Al Casciato of the San Francisco
about two miles east-northeast of Oakland,
shook the San Francisco area
centered about two miles east-northeast of Oakland, at a depth of 3.6 miles,
A magnitude 4.2 earthquake
about two miles east-northeast of Oakland,
Lance Cpl. Maria Lauterbach
Lauterbach],"
missing Marine
fire was not threatening
more than 100 miles from the fire.
calling on the British government to demand that full democracy be restored in Pakistan.
Up to 1,000 human rights campaigners
Up to 1,000
Imran Khan,
that full democracy be restored in Pakistan.
Up to 1,000 human rights campaigners
demand that full democracy be restored in Pakistan.
in support of the resignation of Pakistani President Pervez Musharraf,
LONDON,
Pakistani cricket star
Imran Khan,
official residence of British Prime Minister Gordon Brown,
ex-wife delivered a petition
Cocaine-abusing celebrities are glamorizing the use of narcotics and encouraging
Cocaine-abusing
Britain, along with Spain and Italy, have some of the highest rates of cocaine abuse in the world.
treating stars "leniently" by allowing them to get away with drug crimes undermines faith in the criminal justice system
Cocaine-abusing celebrities are glamorizing the use of narcotics and encouraging
have some of the highest rates of cocaine abuse in the world.
Cocaine-abusing celebrities are glamorizing the
treating stars "leniently"
those made last week
is the jailed leader of FLDS groups in Arizona, Utah,
Stan Kroenke
Stan Kroenke
the main way to maximize profit is to keep a club healthy, and deliver success on the pitch before selling it on down the line for a profit.
Hong Kong's
Hong Kong
surged 57 percent
Hong Kong's
ketamine,
ketamine,
the game after more than eight months.
position
to catch a glimpse of him
Tariq Aziz,
Tariq Aziz,
having a role in the execution of 42 Iraqi merchants in 1992.
42 Iraqi merchants
one of the best-known faces
execution of 42 Iraqi merchants
Crete
causing significant damage, especially in areas of poor construction.
There were no immediate reports of damage or injuries.
damage or injuries.
Greek island of Crete
that he resigned Monday after hearing that 300 unarmed civilians had been killed in Benghazi, Libya's second-largest city.
Abdul Fattah Younis al Abidi
Wednesday
"days or hours."
eight people
A witness
driver fatigue
severe head and back
Peru,
driver fatigue
The poor conditions of the road
crashed about 5:30 a.m. near the town of Espinar, Peru,
calling someone racist
is a speech she gave in Berkeley, California,
impartiality is always a work-in-progress
the context and substance of her remarks,
Don Imus
a Hamas leader
Four
The Iraqi Presidency Council
targeted a demonstration in Mosul
some of his belongings
Diego Fernandez de Cevallos Ramos.
traces of blood.
discarded glasses, pens
on the ranch of his home in Pedro Escobedo,
traces of blood.
9,500
DHL
9,500
$113
$113
barricade in front of it.
the New Orleans Police Department had the entire block closed off.
three tornadoes
A second tornado
tornadoes
into Norfolk,
showed roofs torn off homes, cars flipped over, trees snapped in two and a caved-in section of a newly constructed shopping center.
1986 through 1992.
reported UFO sightings
included hundreds of police reports taken from witnesses who described seeing lights or strange objects in the sky.
4,500
reported UFO sightings
in five years,
James, Paul Teutul, Senior and Paul Teutul Jr.
The plane went missing while flying from Merida to the international airport near Caracas, an
in the mountains
of Venezuela,
none of the 46 people aboard survived,
none of the 46 people aboard survived,
no word on the cause of the
Pakistani Taliban leader Hakimullah Mehsud
Hakimullah Mehsud
Newdow said he would appeal Thursday's decision but acknowledged his dim
group of atheist parents.
The 9th Circuit U.S. Court of Appeals,
Customs officials said that
Apple iPads
new Apple iPads
Colorado, Nevada, New Mexico and Arizona,
about €800,000, or $1.15 million,
Marseilles museum
Musee Cantini
were going through surveillance camera footage for
the Musee Cantini
eight tornadoes touching down
Oakland Park, Florida,
High Point,
public education.
placed barriers between thousands of eligible students and their dreams of higher education.
The opinions in this commentary
single-engine, single-prop plane
U.S. Navy T-34 training plane
human decomposition
the evidence does not link Casey Anthony to any criminal behavior.
first-degree murder and other charges in
could be human,
"the presence of the five key major compounds associated with human decomposition,"
indicated "the presence of the five key major compounds associated with human decomposition,"
three years ago
guilty plea
three years ago
Rihanna.
an Army colleague.
royal destiny
a soldier from Pakistan as "our little Paki friend."
"Prince Harry
pattern
from "a couple of pigs"
including teaching fitness classes at night and cleaning office buildings on the weekends.
changed everything
between 2007 and 2008,
12.6 percent
The Mexican-born population in the United States
Police Chief Michael Newsome is on paid administrative leave,
lead an investigation into six cases of alleged excessive use of force by police
two Oscars
Composer A. R. Rahman,
Best Sound Mixing.
A.R. Rahman
India."
Best Score and one for the song "Jai Ho" from the film.
hate crimes bill
Nelson
HRC
to raise awareness of LGBT issues.
raise awareness of LGBT issues.
"One Hundred Years of Solitude,"
"Its hero, an autistic 15-year-old, is one of the most poignant in contemporary literature."
"Whacked," by Jules Asner
as high as 50,000,
most couples to one child,
1979,
sassy, sometimes snide
An eruption
is on orange alert, meaning an eruption is probable within days or weeks, the Colombian Institute of Geology and Mining said last week.
Nevado del Huila volcano
Colombian emergency officials have begun evacuating
volcano
President George W. Bush
"A trusted and enduring public figure, Griffin's integrity, professionalism, and charm were greatly valued across party lines and presidential administrations,"
Bell
attorney general in the Carter administration,
"A Streetcar Named Desire"
best supporting actor
who pleaded not
at the Rancho Bernardo Community Park,
Thousands of
Houston and Galveston.
1.5 million customers.
500,000 pounds of food a day
cell and developmental biology with a minor in medical anthropology.
Annie Le,
in the wall of a Yale University laboratory building
academic situations.
"most likely to be the next Einstein,"
U.S. Marine Cpl. Cesar Laurean
Cesar Laurean
of raping her,
first-degree murder
U.S. Marine Cpl. Cesar Laurean
McLaren Formula One team,
Kimi Raikkonen
Princess Diana
Princess Diana
her boyfriend,
her boyfriend, Dodi Fayed, and their driver, Henri Paul.
Diana,
progressive politics
an impressive biography isn't a qualification for the Supreme Court.
associate justice on the Supreme Court.
George Lakoff
author of "Voting Rights
if they keep their hands off the merchandise.
feel a sense of ownership and you're more likely
the Journal of Consumer Research
"Look, but don't touch..."
encourage you to play
was revised in October to highlight a boxed warning about the risks of life-threatening infections, including PML.
Raptiva's product labeling
no new prescriptions for Raptiva
taking the psoriasis drug Raptiva
October
politicos from the White House and
Trial by Berry
Round Robin Bar and Scotch Bar
a mint julep or sample a single malt whiskey in the
politicos from the White House and the nearby World Bank.
Willard InterContinental
three to 15 years in
he was going through intense heroin withdrawal that night and he
Lillo Brancato
alongside Robert De Niro in
New York City
TOKYO,
Japan's GDP fell 4 percent last quarter,
15.4 percent
cuts in domestic spending with job cuts, factory closings and less capital spending as a result of spiraling sales abroad.
Foreign Minister Katsuya Okada
when Japan ruled over Korea,
Koreans when they were deprived of their nation and their identity,"
forcing about 200,000 women, mainly from Korea and China, to serve as sex slaves.
chewing gum
£150 million ($222 million)
six weeks.
six weeks.
week of the world's first biodegradable chewing gum,
"The Dalai Lama
Obama,
the United States for not fully addressing the economic divide between its poorest and richest citizens.
accepting a human rights prize from a U.S. foundation
Washington
the police academy in Montgomery
10 people
of 200
his mother
Michael McLendon,
200
June
new plus-one in the mix for "Jon & Kate Plus 8."
a new plus-one in the mix
Jon Gosselin,
inside a van exploded in northeastern Madrid
At least 30 vehicles
Madrid
At least 30 vehicles parked in the street
greed and the legacy of racism.
We don't
blues
seven generations, and if a generation
somber
his proposal to give some homeowners a 10 percent tax credit,
taken on a more somber
give some homeowners a 10 percent tax credit,
more somber
fixing the economy
more somber
The Dalai Lama's fellow laureate, Archbishop Desmond Tutu,
2010 World Cup
South Africa
JOHANNESBURG, South Africa
Protesters
Steve Loucks,
"If the company is actively using social media
Twitter and Facebook
Southwest Airlines
Andrew Morris,
three
Japan, Turkey, Mali, Germany, France and, increasingly, in the Arab world.
Starbucks at Landmark
an outlet to spend petro-dollars
shopping
5-4 penalty
Beckham is due to return to AC Milan in January
Mike Magee
for turf along the border.
additional $700 million
"The Swiss eat a lot of
"I'm an unhappy person, so it's kind of
Journalist Eric Weiner
Eric Weiner,
St. Joseph's Catholic Church
said she had not yet read it.
Dana Perino,
between the then-Iraqi leader and Osama bin Laden's group,
contacts between Saddam Hussein and al Qaeda.
Saddam Hussein and al Qaeda.
American people
"You don't have to rebel. You have the freedom to choose, and with that choice comes a responsibility."
in July.
"The political system, the democratic system, is tested to the utmost."
Jarreth Merz,
volatile winds
ATR-72 turboprop
68
injured
68
an airport at a resort island in Thailand,
the chance to curse former boyfriends, girlfriends or spouses
London Dungeon,
bring a picture of their ex
range of curses
Passanger Doug White
Passanger Doug White
disengage the autopilot,
do I just kill the throttle or what?"
Everett Fire Chief David Butler
he saw at least 15 cars burning.
whether the driver was speeding,
Officials are investigating whether the driver was speeding,
$3 billion,
on the project,
structured to hold
Two United Arab Emirates based companies
four months
four
Christine Beatty,
pleaded guilty
serve four months in jail,
four months in jail,
Helmand province
15 British
an outcry in the United Kingdom
Helmand
Britain's deadliest month
almost 500 pints (284 liters) annually.
named their cows Betsy or Gertrude or Daisy
name or interacting with
almost 500 pints (284 liters) annually.
to produce more milk, get to know them
a court battle over custody.
court battle over custody.
a dad,"
working as a nursing assistant in the Beverly Hills office of Jackson's dermatologist, Dr. Arnold Klein.
a free repair kit
fingers amputated after they were caught in the hinges.
a free repair kit
one million
a fingertip amputation and laceration hazard to the child when the consumer is unfolding,"
the Navigon app.
Google.
$99
a turn-by-turn application in beta for its Android 2 operating system.
mount that keeps it in constant view of the sky
says the street you should turn on and not just "turn left."
the device adds power, a bigger speaker and a better GPS chip.
the capture of 25 drug suspects in a nearby town.
local drug lords,
two U.S. citizens in northern Mexico,
Mormon church leader
LeBaron
their home in Galeana
killers
captain of England's national team
accusations of his marital infidelity,
he would contact the English Football Association about the matter,
Adam Walsh
John
1981,
John Walsh's
abduction and murder
olds playing Runescape
experience huge benefits from participating in multi player online role playing games".
imaginations stimulated,
Lewis issued a statement that said: "Mr. LiMandri obviously has never watched 'The Apprentice' if he believes that Mr. Trump could be so easily fooled. Facts are facts, and we stand by them."
Carrie Prejean's lawyer
final warning to retract statements made about the former beauty queen or face a defamation lawsuit.
would not allow Christian clergy to be prosecuted for outspoken opposition to homosexuality.
attorney general
there has been a noticeable increase in the number
hate
Ted Williams
Bob Greene
discussion of ballplayer Ted Williams' corpse
superstar.
Ted Williams
ballplayer
At least 50 people have died in a school collapse in
Haitian capital of Port-au-Prince,
50
At least 50 people
were
reached 258-5
and Sachin Tendulkar scored centuries
for Easter weekend.
Easter
"A good vegan cupcake has the power to transform everything for the better,"
More than 120
covert operations officer specializing in nuclear counter proliferation
to get involved,
was the most urgent threat we face. Nor did I lose my passion for working, albeit in a new way, to address that threat. I am working on this issue now as part of the international Global Zero movement, in which political, military and faith leaders, experts and activists strive for the worldwide elimination of all nuclear weapons.
that we were granted amnesty by the government of North Korea,
spending "some quiet, private time" with their families.
showed up in Pyongyang, North Korea, to help secure the two journalists' release.
she never gave up hope that she would see her
journalists
Euna Lee
Friday
his father
hypertension, heart disease, and mood and memory problems.
more than 18 million American adults
hypertension, heart disease, and mood and memory problems.
Specific lifestyle changes
Specific lifestyle changes
more than 18 million American adults
breathing
Gaza.
a year
1,300 Palestinians
more than $1.9 billion.
aerial hunting of wolves,
Alaska's wolf population,
wolves,"
Ashley Judd
"championing the slaughter of wildlife."
is "championing the slaughter of wildlife."
"hundreds" of scientists
lead miners
miners too far from home to migrate would dig themselves sheltering caves in the hills
woodpecker
Conecuh Ridge Alabama Fine Whiskey
an Italian man whom
it was unclear
"A lot of people buy their tickets in Africa with
"lapses"
that the suspect purchased the airline ticket with cash in Ghana
Female Force
Female Force
Darren Davis, president of Bluewater Productions.
a series of comic books featuring Secretary of State Hillary Clinton and Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin
Democrats
has proven to be
professor of history and public affairs at Princeton University's
"all that money" to charity
to help repatriate stolen funds from failing states may help return the Duvalier money to Haiti,
Jean-Claude "Baby Doc" Duvalier's
a Swiss law enacted specifically to help repatriate stolen
would not only remain a free man but he could decide to return to politics.
arrived at the Port-au-Prince airport, then named for his father.
UK-based
The cities of Basel and Lausanne
the nationalist Swiss People's Party
construction of minarets on mosques
public spaces
took the stand and denied all charges in the racially charged case.
plead guilty
disturbing the peace and resisting arrest.
disturbing the peace
actions and [hopes] that everyone else involved in the case will take responsibility for theirs."
Ellis
Myrtle Beach,
on a bus Wednesday morning
last week
17-year-old girl
Myrtle Beach, South Carolina,
Genevieve Shaw Brown, senior editor at Travelocity.
embarrassed about spending a lot of money on travel right now.
"Anxiety is contagious."
"Anxiety is contagious."
Molitor urged people to be mindful of
spending a lot of money on travel right now.
a getaway
layoffs, plunging home prices and shrinking portfolios.
Two people were killed
a truck carrying
investigate on Saturday,
Michael Chopra
12, 13 and 14
spearheaded by Chelsea FC, has been launched in the UK
in Missouri
Jamaleldine
"You can go from rags to riches
U.S. Army scout
Why he's more American than a German,
In 1994,
London's Heathrow
(CNN)
£1.2 billion ($1.7 billion),
Heathrow
£1.2 billion ($1.7 billion),
London's Heathrow
snowstorm
£1.2 billion ($1.7 billion),
because the college feared they made have been exposed to the H1N1 flu outbreak in Mexico.
making changes to graduation ceremonies
Godshall and 21 other students
Alamo
$1,116 for her car rental.
additional $1,116
refunded the $1,116
So I contacted Alamo for you. It promptly refunded the $1,116 it should have never charged you in the first place.
flight
Dutch brewer
drowned in preparation for the program,
Heineken's local unit
Heineken's
Ogadje, 25,
Shere Hills Lake
the program,
had gone to Shere Hills Lake in Nigeria's hilly Plateau State to prepare for the "Gulder Ultimate Search,"
Nigerian Breweries
Dutch brewer Heineken's
determined that he "had sent and received text messages on the day of the accident,
were not applied before
were not applied before the collision
California Public Utilities Commission
were not applied before
not
1,200 houses, at least,
1,200
1,200
Wednesday night
50 construction
50 construction workers.
"Dungeons & Dragons,"
"Dungeons & Dragons,"
the Screaming Devils of Warren County, defeated the Mighty Bulldogs
October 14,
trash talking
trash talking run amok
Guatemalan
army stole at least 333 children and sold them for adoption in other countries
We owe it to our troops to see that every dollar allocated to the military is spent where they need it,
Joint Strike Fighter
members of both parties
and Texas to repair secondary border fence,
help prevent the illegal flow of weapons and cash
transnational organized crime
1,200 more
a quarter century.
Authorities
bureaucratic measures
government-funded public health insurance option
it was futile to continue to "chase that rabbit"
"The fact of the matter is there are not the votes in the United States Senate for a public option. There never have been,"
health care reform
unemployment and trying to save the city while he can barely afford to keep a roof over his head,"
real-world problems,
unemployment and trying to save the city
Dr. [George] Tiller
a close friend and
LeRoy Carhart's
over a year ago
Edwin Salau
foreigners adopting in the southern African country.
recently divorced singer
she had "a gripping temptation" to approve it, but decided doing so would open doors to child trafficking,
using her fame to circumvent a residency law for foreigners adopting in the southern African country.
Malawi
accused of serving illegal whale meat.
eight-week
designated as a terrorist organization
Somali capital of Mogadishu
is having a devastating
more than 1.2 million
1991,"
9,000-ton
M/V Bow-Asir
9,000-ton
a manned lunar landing.
Russia and the United States
"The award of the Nobel Prize recognizes the discovery of a fundamental mechanism in the cell, a discovery that has stimulated the development of new therapeutic strategies,"
telomeres
discovering how chromosomes are protected against degradation
15 hostages in Colombia.
Red Cross emblem
Defense Minister Juan Manuel Santos
as "an act of disloyalty, possibly corruption or even treason," although he defended the right of the media to publish the material once it had been
to use their experience and influence to lobby the government in exchange for thousands of pounds (dollars) in pay.
four members of Parliament
launched an investigation of Geoff Hoon, Patricia Hewitt, Stephen Byers and Margaret Moran and suspended all four from the Parliamentary Labour Party.
Tuesday night
Red lentil soup with fresh cheese followed, and then a choice of entrees -- roasted potato dumplings with tomato chutney, chick peas and okra for vegetarians, or green curry prawns, caramelized salsify and smoked collard greens.
the White House beehive
ANC leader
election
cracking down.
are cracking down.
The government
Supreme religious Leader, Ayatollah Ali Khamenei,
Ayatollah Ali Khamenei,
68 percent decline.
Health Care Freedom Act
written to block them.
President Obama's health care proposal.
north-central and northeast Iowa
Forecasters
one
Forecasters
storms
Francesca Schiavone,
Madrid
About 57,000
smoking ban, higher taxes and cheap supermarket alochol
A combination of factors including the smoking ban, higher taxes and cheap supermarket alochol
smoking ban, higher taxes and cheap supermarket alochol
pubs
in Britain,
"We have to get rid of certainties, habits, paradigms, common assumptions,"
won the first transatlantic balloon race and commanded the first balloon flight around the world,
solar-powered
I came up with idea of a solar airplane flying around the world with no fuel
spoke about his new venture
Friday
Strong winds and rain from the powerful storm
Pennsylvania, Delaware and New Jersey.
in sections of Virginia, Delaware and New Jersey
155,000
of a killing team run by the powerful Casalesi clan
Caserta
Giuseppe Setola,
Neapolitan mafia
Giuseppe Setola,
a sewer
by crawling through sewer pipes,
Casalesi
Giuseppe Setola,
to the sewer system in Caserta.
Alexander Stanhope St. George
Thames near the Tower Bridge
rummaging through great-grandpa Alexander's personal effects a few years ago,
Londoners and New Yorkers
the Telectroscope
the pressure on the children
a role
Luci Baines Johnson
Boca Juniors teammate
his former Boca Juniors teammate and national coach Diego Maradona,
shot in the head
Fernando Caceres
Argentine league
Diego Maradona,
Argentina in the 1994 World Cup,
an urgent threat to the United States,
Barack Obama
15
16 hours on the road,
Hurricane
more than 1.9 million
Hurricane Gustav's
his restaurant,
Ascencio
more than 1.9 million
more than 1.9 million
Maxime Janvier, told CNN that he never gave up hope that she'd be found.
Haiti's national cathedral
two other
nearby clinic,
Melissa Huckaby
death penalty
any abuse that occurred in his diocese.
Helmand province
6th
6th Battalion The Rifles,
A British soldier
the hard-knock life,
The conversation freed you in ways that you hadn't been free before?
his father
in karma:
Jay-Z
medical-grade antibacterial
that is made by bees pollinating the flowers of the Manuka bush,
has powerful antibacterial
Manuka honey
Medi Bioactive Honey
Manuka
Singapore Airlines
Singapore
"experienced some form of failure"
suicide bombing
Taliban
Taliban
a suicide bombing
NATO-led
six people
a component
National Transportation
a component on some Boeing 777 aircraft engines
a build-up of ice on a fuel/oil heat exchanger
negotiations with Iran
Warren Christopher, Kissinger, Madeleine Albright, James Baker and Colin Powell.
meet with Iran,
there could be secretary and lower-level meetings."
Iran."
death penalty,
31-50.
4-liter V8
BMW estimates that M3 buyers will be predominantly male and aged 31-50.
Mondeo
prosthetics outfitted with Bluetooth.
prosthetics
Joshua Bleill,
pulled underwater
Wilmington, Ohio.
the design plans for that infamous location are on display
In the past year, more three million people have lost their jobs, yet the Democratic Congress continues deficit spending, adding to the bureaucracy, and increasing the national debt on our children and grandchildren. The amount of this debt is on pace to double in five years and triple in ten. The federal debt is already over $100,000 per household. This is simply unsustainable. The President's partial freeze announced tonight on discretionary spending is a laudable step, but a small one.
State of the Union
exhibit about the Holocaust;
ALS,
Thomas Cuddy
run live on the cable network Sunday at 8 p.m.
Sunday
Michael Jackson
Michael Jackson
Mr. Smith is our primary focus,"
"This is a sad day, really, but
as a suspect is "huge."
economic growth
unemployment
45,000
45,000
26 billion-euro
At least 350
350 people
the water
"Grey's Anatomy" star,
a boy
"She and her husband, Peter Lanfer, are in love with him!"
over anything anymore,
combination of the governor's name and the word "salamander,"
an American lexicon
combination of the governor's name and the word "salamander,"
six counts of first-degree murder.
were premeditated.
Michzach, 9; Marven, 6; Maven, 5; Megan, 3; and Morgan, 11 months,
keep kicking in money to grab them.
people who go to the gym at least eight times a month
Exercise
you're paying for is the amount it would cost to rebuild your home and replace your belongings.
Jean Chatzky
Giving to others
keep kicking in money
boost your policy's deductible.
poster
biographical information
Umar Farouk AbdulMutallab,
of attempting to detonate an explosive on an international flight
describe myself as very ambitious and determined,
Farouk1986
mentally retarded
Sunday, September 4, 2005,
Ronald Madison,
"He just fell like he was collapsing,"
Sunday, September 4, 2005,
the shooting of Ronald Madison,
days after Hurricane Katrina
NBC News/Wall Street Journal poll,
Campaign finance
the flaws of the political process
diminishing citizens' trust in government, the flaws of the political process
An American aid worker
near his home in Peshawar
Iranian consulate,
outside the Iranian consulate
is the capital of Pakistan's North West Frontier Province,
home in Peshawar
Only 1 in 3 children in Medicaid received any dental care over a year time span, according to a new report.
about 6.5 million children
Deamonte Driver,
an untreated infected tooth led to a brain infection.
Selma Blair
Selma Blair
1,600-calorie-a-day diet
295 pounds
by keeping track of her daily calorie intake in a food diary
was denied help paying for electricity,
The Public Utility Commission of Texas
failed to meet the criteria.
CenterPoint Energy's Critical Care Program
about $1.2 billion a year,
withdrew from its planned buyout in late November,
announced plans to cut 14,000 jobs
cost $400 million in severance packages,
12 years,"
Mullaittivu
Liberation Tigers of
an independent homeland
of the northern town of Elephant Pass,
in its campaign to recapture rebel strongholds.
Elephant Pass,
Mullaittivu
Elephant Pass,
Boy Scouts
Aaron Eilerts,
Little Sioux Scout Ranch outside Omaha, Nebraska.
passion for Scouting.
Sam Thomsen, 13; Josh Fennen, 13; Aaron Eilerts, 14; and Ben Petrzilka, 14.
Douglas County.
Dog River.
Dog River Reservoir,
September 20.
a female body
Manhattan's district attorney.
Manhattan
($1.01 million)
helicopter
several millions of U.S. dollars,
explosives
Frozen
an overpressure scenario," caused by ice inside the pipe.
50 boys
"It wasn't just sexual abuse, it was spiritual abuse, and I want you to know that."
Joseph Birmingham,
"He seemed to intrinsically
priest
"Five members."
five immediate family members
Touqan, the education minister.
roughly 20 percent
violence
all Iraqi children
Iraq
roughly 20
Jordan
will be incorporated and integrated within our mainstream line of education," says Touqan,
Iraqi children
a batch of the smelly cookies
The number of potentially stinky boxes totals 636,000,
oils
American life,
attempted recruitment of young Somali-American men by al-Shabaab,
significant
"a number of factors that come together when a dynamic, influential and extremist leader gains access to a despondent and disenfranchised group of young men,"
27-year-old Somali-American who had been radicalized by al-Shabaab in his adopted home state of Minnesota
of Shirwa Ahmed,
Five
the outer security barrier of Iraqi National Police headquarters in southern Mosul,
U.S. forces to stay in Mosul."
It is the deadliest attack on U.S. forces since March 10, 2008,
northern Iraqi
suicide bombing
Iraqi National Police headquarters in southern Mosul,
former Ukrainian prime minister
saliva
saliva
was quadriplegic and used a feeding tube.
in mothballs
public storage facility.
Shylea Thomas,
public storage facility
six
disputed June 12 presidential vote, which re-elected hardline President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad over main opposition candidate Mir Hossein Moussavi.
Five
Moharebe, or waging war against God
five
security forces
an empty magazine and used rounds
fought off a pirate attack
MV Andinet,
sand dunes climbing hundreds of feet above miles-long beaches
Timber Cove Inn
twin sisters Grace Lorenzen (the innkeeper) and Carla Wingett (groundskeeper),
grandfather clock
country's annual Queen's Day
Queen's Day
man suspected of trying to attack the Dutch royal family by crashing his car near their
Five people, as well as the driver, were killed and 12 were wounded in the incident,
the Dutch royal family
during the country's annual Queen's Day celebration,
Apeldoorn.
approximately 68 percent of the combined company,
better-than-expected
$10.50 in cash
Both drug-makers
Merck
68
World Wildlife Fund
1,068 species found between 1997 and 2007, according to a
scientists
Han Park
Wednesday,
be watching the ceremonies for clues as to where leading figures stand in the new hierarchy, comparing the event to the 1994
leader Kim Jong Il
president of Feehery Group,
John Feehery.
Americans that they couldn't drive faster than 55 mph.
the moment candidly and manfully.
Herman Cain
Herman Cain
Herman Cain
the public
WPP's Ogilvy & Mather
"It is about global action for a global climate treaty and a better
Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum in Washington.
Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum
U.S. shuttles
Discovery already has been offered to the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum in Washington.
one of the U.S. shuttles
Thursday over allegations they beat a 17-year-old wrestler to death, the case sent shockwaves across a country that links its national identity to the sport.
allegations they beat a 17-year-old wrestler to death,
TOKYO,
three sumo wrestlers and their stable master
possible attacks on the United States.
President Bush demanded Congress expand his surveillance authority
President Bush
The Democratic-led Congress
power to conduct electronic surveillance without a court order in tracking foreign suspects.
two different sources of sustainable energy
23-year-old
can run on wind
gets you places faster, reduces your carbon footprint, lowers noise, makes you fit and lowers your stress level
put on the big
the pound
Iceland
in a bid to lure travelers.
deal out there for you.
300
Suspected Maoist rebels in eastern India
a dense forest.
1 billion-plus
Maoist rebels
The drugs were in a liquid form hidden in fruit tins, officials said.
a street value of around $350,000
found cocaine hidden in luggage
cocaine
reporter and photographer from the National Enquirer
Brooke Shields moved her
within 40 days,"
the Green Zone,
within 40 days,"
"The minute I took the first picture I was completely relaxed."
West Virginia
Some 400 to 500
Lehman Brothers,
London office
more than 10 years
three
Micheletti
111 lawmakers voted in favor of a motion not to return
The "person" appears to be wearing an old-style greenish ruff around the neck.
in permanent collections of various design museums around the world, including the Museum of Modern Art in New York (MOMA), the Design Museum in London and the Vitra Design Museum Weil Am Rhein, Basel, Switzerland.
permanent collections of various design museums around the world,
of Modern Art in New York
Omar Abdullah,
43,000
"full confidence" in his innocence.
Omar Abdullah
that he had "full confidence" in
the Serie A club should have paid the taxes.
the Serie A club
Diego Maradona
legend Diego Maradona had his earrings seized by Italian authorities
€31 million
the Serie A club
at a clinic in northern Italy
Josipovic
five to six
"I heard five to six shots and hit the floor,"
pronounced dead late Wednesday, Fort Lewis
a civilian
the introduction of MySpace Music,
Sony BMG, Universal
your comments
are falling,
on the future of the music industry.
at least 12 months.
the new policy will improve safety by bringing to the surface pilots who either ignore signs of depression or lie about their use of medication for fear of losing their licenses to fly.
mild to moderate depression
Ramsey's journey,
the lead driver in a re-enactment last summer of Ramsey's journey,
first of many breakdowns.
captured world titles at super featherweight and junior welterweight during his 16-year-professional career and also fought and lost to legends Oscar De La Hoya and Floyd Mayweather Jr. in big money matches.
Italian-born Canadian
The Italian-born Canadian
16-year-professional
Gatti,
stop immediately,
Czech Republic's practice of surgically castrating convicted sex offenders is "invasive,
"The committee's delegation came across three cases in which sex offenders had committed serious sex-related crimes, including serial rape and attempted murder, after they had been surgically castrated,"
Republic's practice of surgically castrating convicted sex offenders is "invasive,
Egypt
Egypt.
Egypt.
a restaurant
suburban Rochester home,
in upstate New York
shot and killed four people
The school called off
Ten
67,100
1864
by John
single shop on Oxford Street in London,
detainees at Guantanamo Bay from being transferred to the United States for now.
a measure that would prevent detainees at Guantanamo Bay from being transferred to the United States for now.
U.S. Senate
90-6
ripped abortion rights opponents
anti-abortion
Republican Rep. Sandy Adams
Icehotel
shower and bathroom
in the one nearest the hotel
the Icehotel
Michelle Obama
national and international issues
President Bush and Laura Bush
good, constructive, relaxed and friendly,"
a tour of the residence.
national and international issues
"had a broad discussion about the importance of working together throughout the transition of government in light of the nation's many critical economic
Academy Award nominee
Burt Reynolds checked
"Deliverance," "Smokey and the Bandit" and "Cannonball Run."
his life" after becoming addicting to painkillers
date of the funeral for pop legend Michael Jackson
Jackson
at Glendale Forest Lawn Memorial Park on Thursday, September 3.
Thursday, September 3.
never smelled alcohol on Woods' breath.
she heard "a faint, continuous knocking sound for about 10 or 15 minutes."
Kimberly Harris said she was awake in her bedroom when she heard "a faint, continuous knocking sound for about 10 or 15 minutes."
struck a fire hydrant and a tree with his 2009 Cadillac SUV
Russell Jones, better known as Ol' Dirty Bastard or ODB.
had been jailed or Method Man killed,
2004,
RZA
Method Man's death
Jane Velez-Mitchell says tougher penalties are needed to keep
host of the HLN show, "Issues with
the root causes,
on the eve of the summit.
global crisis.
degree of close U.S.-China cooperation in the process of coping with the
U.S. and Western markets
"reaffirms its commitment to peace and stability in the peninsula and hopes the North Korean regime will evolve in a positive way. ... Our thoughts go to North Korean people who have been suffering for years from misery and lack of human rights. ...
won't affect friendly ties
We must make thorough preparations to maintain peace and stability and continue to work closely with
of fraud,
confession from our mam are true,
family home
suspicion of fraud,
suspicion of fraud,
have died after the remains of a canoe he paddled into the North Sea, off northeastern England, washed up on shore.
court Friday ruled against letting a 14-year-old girl sail solo around the world, saying
address the U.N. General Assembly
Queen Elizabeth II
"potentially lethal electrical weapons"
police officers
Amnesty International UK
stun
The decision to introduce Tasers across England and Wales follows
Austin, Texas,
shows a meteor-like object in the sky
a week ago.
fireball
the candidate is misusing two of his popular songs.
Don Henley
the candidate is misusing two of his popular songs.
saw the singer stripping down to a bikini top,
Graham's wife
music video
tourism,
whether the cost of hosting the game would come at the expense of projects more vital to residents
host the 2016 Games.
London's Waterloo
Gene Simmons:
teaching
Stephen King:
had to vomit backstage before he could bring himself to congratulate the winners.
"You've done something that will never be repeated, son."
of his dogs.
for most consecutive wins,
Kenya, Somalia, Tanzania and Uganda
Kenya, Somalia, Tanzania and Uganda
Heavy rains triggered by El Nino weather patterns
Kenya, Somalia, Tanzania
Scientology
privilege
Scientology
of truth."
"Every country has to see its way out of this, but only after a consultation with the GCC,"
"studying all options"
High levels of government spending; growing demand for housing,
we would finally be introduced to this elusive mother.
elusive mother.
cast for a recurring role on the show.
is too obvious a choice,
that in episode 100,
Sherwood Baptist Church
theatrical films.
Sherwood Baptist Church in Albany, Georgia.
very
a disputed presidential election.
Tehran, Iran
key anniversaries
Moussavi and Karrubi
Islamic students stormed the U.S. Embassy.
presidential election.
Moussavi and Karrubi were prevented from attending Wednesday's rallies,
"subjected to an aggressive CIA detention and interrogation program notable for its elaborate planning and ruthless application of torture,"
requested that a judge bar the agency from destroying evidence of the alleged torture.
claims
psychological trauma from which he
was tortured while
the cost of ownership across the 300 models in their database.
fuel costs,
300 models in their database.
$6,500
"Depreciation
a comparison of the 300 models
Consumer Reports'
Jose Manuel Zelaya,
would not accept Zelaya's return as president,
William J. Bennett.
to order a full withdrawal of U.S. troops from Iraq by the end of the year
went missing
his fourth wife,
on murder charges relating to his third wife, Kathleen Savio.
Kathleen Savio.
dry bathtub of her home.
"I understand anyone that might feel that they don't want to expose themselves to something more than protest," Perry said.
protesters
One of the San Francisco torchbearers
the Chinese consulate,
San Francisco
outside the Chinese consulate in San Francisco
his new U.N. role
disabled rights.
never
U.S.-flagged Maersk Alabama has been charged
hijacking of the U.S.-flagged Maersk Alabama
canceled
said the center will give the Valley Club's offer "due consideration" once it is received and looks forward to sitting down with the parties.
Philadelphia swim
$1 "good pickle" to the $95 porterhouse
The buzz of the city
Jeremy Jarvis
University of Miami's Jackson Memorial
15,
Iraq
Iraq and Afghanistan
her child getting wounded on American soil.
their skills
Robert Gibbs
Hillary Clinton's
Robert Gibbs
Robert Gibbs
New York Federal Reserve President Timothy Geithner
Sen. Edward M. Kennedy
Arlington National Cemetery
homes that were then set on fire
Serb Milan Lukic
burning alive more than 100 Muslims.
burned alive more than 100 Muslims
Milan Lukic and Sredoje Lukic
two Serb cousins
"We should not be paying for Iraqi projects while Iraqi oil revenues continue to pile up in the bank, including outrageous profits from $4-a-gallon gas prices in the U.S.," said Sen. Carl Levin, the chairman of the Senate Armed Services Committee. "We should require that U.S. taxpayers be reimbursed for the cost of large projects."
up to $80 billion,
Oil accounted for 94 percent of the Iraq's revenue from 2005 to 2007,
up to $80 billion,
up to $80 billion,
paying for Iraqi projects
taxpayers
Iraq's
rainfall
sending residents scrambling for safety
the hurricane was downgraded to Category 1,
folding table
Fort Hood, Texas,
Army's Brooke Army Medical Center
Fort Hood, Texas,
the accused shooter,
Twelve soldiers and one civilian
the site of the Preah Vihear temple,
Thailand
Thailand
Portuguese island of Madeira,
The Portuguese military
Rahm Emanuel
the lawmaker's direct style
President-elect Obama
Rep. Rahm Emanuel
Blue smoke:
White
Excessive gas:
engine oil is being burned in the combustion chamber.
tailpipe
(1) Water condensation from a blown and leaking head gasket:
bad valve seals, worn valve guides, pressurized
On Tuesday,
MDC
MDC
MDC
that another stimulus package might be needed
stimulus package
another stimulus package
House Appropriations Committee Chairman David Obey of Wisconsin
rebuild the America
in Haiti.
a "pact to the devil" brought on the devastating earthquake in Haiti.
something that "happened a long time ago in Haiti, and people might not want to talk about it."
Twitter
having a healthy ego,
having a healthy ego,
acceptance
booed."
a paralegal.
in public service or politics.
father, looks like
23,
Julian Lloyd Webber
El Sistema social program in Venezuela,
children as young as three will be taught to play classical instruments by trained musicians.
children from poor
in Venezuela
renowned cellist Julian Lloyd Webber
cellist
The three surviving children of civil rights leader Martin Luther King Jr.
money they have been fighting over.
protecting the British
March 30, 2007.
procedure among armed
a spread betting venture called "The Currency Club,"
India's defense minister
December 6,
"possible terror threats from air."
terrorists might be planning an air attack.
"possible terror threats from air."
New Delhi airport.
Dr. Jennifer Arnold and husband Bill Klein,
the challenges a pregnancy
"nationwide shopping sprees, staying at five-star hotels, renting luxury automobiles and private jets, and purchasing tens of thousands of dollars worth of high-end electronics and expensive handbags and jewelry with forged credit cards,"
"It's a long way to go to make a bust."
"Absolutely,"
to discuss North
recommended others for the job,
questioned whether Obama was the right candidate to handle a middle-of-the-night international crisis.
10.2 percent
10.2 percent
that economic conditions were better than they were a year ago, and a modest recovery was on the horizon.
risk of ischemic stroke,
have a stroke
depression
Todd Benjamin
Richard Branson
Richard Branson
350 different
the old-style racing suits
100m butterfly and 200m medley heats
"Don't touch my Internet" and "We don't need protection,"
Turkey already blocks more than 7,000 websites,
new filtering rules will be enforced beginning August 22,
Several thousand opponents
Timothy Murray,
four
wooded stretch in the Folsom area of St. Tammany Parish,
in a wooded stretch in the Folsom area of St. Tammany Parish,
"unjustified,"
First Secretary Mark Sullivan,
where they are hidden.
North Korea
suspected uranium enrichment program or
many weapons North Korea has or where they are hidden.
came out of my shell and became more social
James Marsden
became more social
Philip Markoff,
Brisman "put up a fight,"
April 10
Markoff,
A procedural not-guilty
robbery
September 12,
25
a friend
having a cell phone in the cab of the locomotive,
seen in the video was thought to have been an accomplice,
The video, shot May 11, shows a man wearing jeans,
they had been without any clues before
launching a criminal investigation into the hijacking and hostage-taking,
Pirates off the eastern coast of Africa
Capt.
an American captain
hidden in a small cedar box
her daughter,
her daughter,
Helmand province,
Four
Helmand
Afghanistan,
a message
rocky Middle Eastern landscape
planning to spray-paint an entire letter written by South African human rights
lets customers get a message on the wall. For the equivalent of $40, a Palestinian will spray paint the message and send three digital photos of it.
on a long, tall, concrete barrier in the midst of a rocky Middle Eastern landscape
wall
Kurdish.
TRT
pull the plug on the live
Ahmet Turk
Ahmet Turk
Turkey began a new Kurdish language state television channel, TRT6, on January 1.
the fact that the Kurdish language is not protected under Turkey's constitution.
TRT 6,
Kurdish
for the head of the Colombian armed forces,
Ecuadorian
Ecuadorian side of the border.
Then an Ecuadorian judge issued an arrest warrant this week for the head of the
Colombian Gen. Freddy Padilla,
Colombian Gen. Freddy Padilla,
with the 45-year-old war between Colombia and the FARC.
claimed to have enough plutonium for four or five warheads.
declining health of leader Kim Jong Il,
its nuclear
declining health of leader Kim Jong Il,
want the rest of the fuel aid that Japan has promised them.
the rest of the fuel aid that Japan has promised them.
the North and the United States and Japan,
the money.
The American Civil Liberties Union has taken up Bierfeldt's cause and is
Steve Bierfeldt
the sale of political merchandise like T-shirts and books.
Steve Bierfeldt
Secretary of Homeland Security Janet Napolitano,
the sale of political merchandise like T-shirts and books.
The American Civil Liberties Union
movement of large amounts of cash through a checkpoint
tranquilized and then fitted with a GPS collar.
must be able to travel to different locations throughout the state. They need to travel between different
Florida
where the bear is located.
where the bear is located.
swine flu.
a new vaccine to prevent
is 100 percent
preventing seasonal influenza,
this Thanksgiving is in flying.
the first decline in travelers
Americans are expected to travel for Thanksgiving
at least 50 miles from home
missiles, rockets and other weapons
new breed of organized crime leaders
a Colombian rebel group.
Colombian
Viktor Bout,
Vice President Joe Biden, Defense Secretary Robert Gates, Joint Chiefs of Staff Chairman Adm. Michael Mullen,
next week.
pushed for revisions in proposed plans for
the Hubble
Endeavour,
Endeavour Cmdr. Christopher Ferguson
Hubble
Hubble
Endeavour Cmdr. Christopher Ferguson
restrictions
Gloria Macapagal Arroyo
The former president
leukemia drugs
recalled
Femicide, the systematic and planned destruction of the female population,
Western
playwright of "The Vagina Monologues" and the founder of V-Day,
taking a terrible toll on women and girls.
Lynn Sprayberry,
be placed in a county-owned site,"
a small army of men and women
two
veterans receive a respectful service
gathered to pay their respects to the two
a small army of men and women
Journey
to suffer great harm, humiliation, and embarrassment."
nine people
nine
off the Southern California coast
"We're still in the search and rescue phase. We are not standing down from that at this point,"
Guard plane and a Marine helicopter
the boy targeted Monroe-Woodbury High School, although he was no longer a student there.
at his residence.
"I would remind you that extremism in the defense of liberty is no vice. And let me remind you also that moderation in the pursuit of justice is no virtue."
Republicans are facing the danger of being associated with extremism once again.
64-year-old
electrical charge broke the cable connecting the balloon to the gondola,
the highest jump and fastest, longest free fall by a man riding a balloon.
"I'm not about to give up,"
12,000 meters
Fred Armisen,
"SNL"
"Saturday Night Live."
recent sketch
has won all 41 of his professional fights
Victor Ortiz.
boxing world champion Floyd Mayweather
3-3
Schalke
Kevin Kuranyi
joint second
Kevin Kuranyi
Bayern Munich
joint second
Sunday
top tennis players
Venus Williams
taking a nap
postponed
a
in Jeddah and Riyadh after the interview aired
It's just sheer luck, really. I never sang with anybody before, you know
five Grammys.
album of the year
51st annual Grammy Awards.
in the hospital
Duke University Medical Center
radiation and chemotherapy.
undergo radiation
CNN,
setting Poland on the path to democracy.
Poland,
Wojciech Jaruzelski and Lech Walesa
Lech Walesa
Lech Walesa
BigDates.com
remember birthdays
flipped in the first-round race and caught fire,
the woman
local hospital,
the Gila River Indian reservation in Chandler, Arizona,
spectator
spectator died Sunday
caregivers provide approximately 80
give easy access
people taking care of elderly relatives,
$375 billion
least 44 million
Helmand province
Helmand
184,
dead in that conflict
Picher, Oklahoma,
Picher and the Tar Creek Superfund Site,
Oklahoma
now thinks about Nutan
car breaks down.
spending their days at the beach, swimming in a lagoon
"When things go wrong, travel gets more interesting,"
They are alive and well, and growing their hair long in peace.
Ryan Holness,
that his wife was killed by a carjacker early Friday morning
Ryan Holness, 28, was charged with first- and second-degree murder in the death of Serika Dunkley Holness, 26,
joyous community prayers, acts of charity, visits from far-flung relatives, gift-giving and elaborate feasts.
welcomed the end of a long month of fasting
Eid al-Fitr
greetings to American Muslims.
when the crescent of a new moon is sighted.
President Barack Obama and Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton
donate a small percentage of their possession or its equivalent to the poor and needy
inside three abandoned vehicles
Janelle Monae
Garth Trinidad,
Janelle Monae
Janelle Monae creates "cool, futuristic soul with a real '80s quality,"
a striking combination of voice, style, imagination and fearlessness that defies conventional description,
Janelle Monae
Vick
admitted buying pit bulls and the property used for training and fighting the dogs,
admitted to participating in a dogfighting ring
said Vick's admissions describe actions that are "incomprehensible and unacceptable."
indefinitely suspended
admitted buying pit bulls and the property used for training and fighting the dogs,
Falcons owner Arthur Blank
admitted
Monday.
indefinitely suspended
buying pit bulls and the property used for training and fighting the dogs,
he became only the fourth batsman to reach 10,000 runs in one-day matches
Sri Lankan
Sri Lanka
Nahlin,
1873
Liverpool's G.L. Watson & Co
Nahlin,
After being returned to British waters only in 1999, Collier said the vessel would have a complete overhaul based on the company's archives of the original design, and
General Motors
General Motors
General Motors
cautiously optimistic.
likely to stay in custody
The gated community of Bel Air
"It's a very euphoric, satisfying feeling that we got this person,"
Pacific Palisades Community Council Chairman Richard G. Cohen
breathing a sigh of relief.
Heidi Newfield
has further weakened the ability of the state to deliver."
unscrupulous outsiders and opportunistic Haitians
aid
Tuvalu and Tokelau
Tokelau,
desecration of the Quran,
a U.S. soldier
formal apology
desecration of the Quran,
"blatant assault on the sanctities of Muslims all over the world."
until we get a little better containment lines on the fire,
4,000
7,500
go back into the mandatory evacuated area,"
approximately 7,500 acres
about 4,000
approximately 7,500 acres with 20 percent containment,"
Jason Chaffetz
Jared Polis
Jared Polis
representing the 2nd District of Colorado.
"Freshman Year"
faulty stun grenades,
comment
CEO David J. Karlson, sales representative F. Brad Swann and production manager Daniel Ramone
About 28,000
Pakistani-Afghan border.
Badar, Barwand
About 28,000
Onyewu
Standard Liege defender Oguchi Onyewu
three-year
Standard Liege defender Oguchi Onyewu
Oguchi Onyewu
American
you do as a public relations specialist or director
John Lewis,
Philadelphia Police Officer Chuck Cassidy.
homeless shelter
shooting of Philadelphia Police Officer Chuck Cassidy.
fatal shooting of
Dunkin' Donuts.
John Lewis,
in the head
homeless shelter
John Lewis,
John Lewis,
Radcliffe
Emma Watson
Daniel Radcliffe, Emma Watson and Rupert Grint
"I don't know
to start college in the United States this fall.
Nadya
agreement
no publisher has been found to sell it, her
McLaren and Ferrari's pit stop crews,
The Fast Forward exhibiton
The Fast Forward exhibiton
structure at its heart.
late Friday or early Saturday.
from a Category 1 into a menacing Category 4 storm
Florida could begin seeing rainfall
Texas: San Bernard National Wildlife Refuge
the Cow Trap Trail,
Joran van der Sloot
Michael Phelps
Olympic gold medalist using a bong,
two tons
two tons of cereal
Justin Garner
eight people
North Carolina nursing home
a magistrate
Livingstone Chipadze
Zimbabwe police arrested
Livingstone Chipadze
We need to go back to the way our grandparents prepared food.
go into the store armed with a good attitude ...
Stock up on lean meats and proteins, on veggies that you know your family likes and turn yourself into your own frozen food factory.
Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport
lightning hit the control tower
Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport
affected all the airport's runway lights,
population of 3.8 million sprawling over a metropolis nearly 500 square miles
determine if the ball has crossed the goal line,
about using technology to help referees
Henry Mancilla,
Florida man was gunned down in his car.
the intended target,"
"One of those men
Detectives are executing search warrants today,
18 years
until she was a 29-year-old
Jaycee Dugard
backyard compound of sheds and tarps
Nobody else knew she was there except the couple who snatched her off the street in front of her house in South Lake Tahoe, California, in 1991, and took her straight to the soundproof shed, police said.
police determine the "post-mortem interval": the time between death and body discovery.
determine the "post-mortem interval": the time between death and body discovery.
a timeline for deaths.
Sowell's home.
His job is to identify the bugs found on bodies and determine their age,
transporting critically injured Haitians to the United States
11 a.m. Monday,
a network of nonprofits and U.S. hospitals,
Flights transporting critically injured Haitians
Wednesday
Jon Gosselin
Jon Gosselin
bitter break-up
just before 5 p.m.
north of downtown Washington,
north of downtown Washington,
two Metro
Argentina
Argentina
Juan Roman Riquelme scored twice
Ecuador coach Luis Fernando Suarez,
the presence of dioxins in animal feed and pork fat samples.
Preliminary evidence gathered by Ireland's Food Safety Authority indicated that the contamination likely started in September,
pork products
dioxins
"Good
sometime this season.
"Don't Trust The B----- in Apartment 23,"
Pope Benedict XVI,
with stops in Amman, Jerusalem, Bethlehem
Pope Benedict XVI
Israel's Holocaust museum
that is part of the site,
Critics have accused Pope Pius of doing too little to prevent the mass murder of European Jews by the Nazis under Adolf Hitler.
judge is on vacation
spying and entering Iran illegally,
a delegation of American Muslim and Christian leaders
maximum of 30 years in prison and fine of $2.5 million,
Colorado,
Douglas Perlitz,
St. Lucie County,
Tropical Storm Fay,
it could dump 30 inches of rain in some areas of the state.
Brevard County,"
the National Hurricane Center said it could dump 30 inches of rain in some areas of the state.
New York politicians
lower Manhattan.
illegal Internet pharmacies.
accidental overdose of drugs
that her husband had become an addict
her husband
Two sheriff's deputies
killed
individually printed by bookstores around the world.
about 4 minutes,
machine
Christus Spohn Hospital South
Los Angeles hospital.
Dennis Quaid
overdoses of the blood thinner heparin.
Cadillac XLR-V
a new car
Mercedes SL-Class, Porsche 911 Cabriolet
hatchback,
new car today
Islamic Jihad, the Fatah Al Aqsa Martyrs Brigade and the Nasser Salah al-Din Brigades
was closed.
Islamic Jihad, the Fatah Al Aqsa Martyrs Brigade and the Nasser Salah al-Din Brigades
jobs
A Colorado solar-energy company
Government loans to expand its factory, and more government assistance to help power
economic stimulus
A Colorado solar-energy company
Withings Wi-fi Body Scale,
with your iPhone, or other iOS or Android-capable phone.
small, lightweight band users wear on their heads during
Zeo
social fitness app
your iPhone, or other iOS or Android-capable phone.
Issa Hayatou
Togo Football Federation
pulling out ahead
deals with sports disputes,
pulling out ahead ahead of the start of the Angola edition
Miami-Dade police
more than 40 criminal counts, including multiple charges of felony animal cruelty and burglary.
Tyler Weinman laughed
Tyler Weinman
Tyler Weinman
help carry the heavy load down from the mountains.
can be found venturing into the high altitude of their northern Argentina mountains, trash bags in hand and llamas in tow.
Esperanza de Vida
Pete Sampras
series
Federer
three grand slams and last week's Masters Cup
in and out of the hospital for seven months.
see their dying son.
Pascual and Maria Gonzalez, Juan's parents.
workers, Gonzalez came to the United States last fall to provide some financial help for his family, who had fallen on hard times back in Guatemala.
Guatemala.
Sollecito and Rudy Guede
her roommate
proposal requires Congress to balance any
Medicare payments to doctors, the estate and gift tax, and tax cuts enacted in 2001 and 2002,
requires Congress to balance any increased spending by equal savings elsewhere,
"Perhaps that's why, here in Washington, it's been so elusive."
Medicare
for some time.
on Thursday,
Demi Moore and Ashton Kutcher announced their split
disabled
allocated funds to help people with disabilities,
help people with disabilities, such as increased Medicaid help, vocational rehabilitation, help with independent living and specialized education.
Bobby Dodd
West may have died from complications of cosmetic surgery,
"I think I'm taking up your air time,"
November 10
The marriage was the third
Katie Lee
site:blippy.com
that Blippy users who have authorized the site to access their debit or credit transactions take immediate action to revoke access.
Blippy users who have authorized the site to access their debit or credit transactions take immediate action to revoke access.
League final between Manchester United and Chelsea face spiraling costs and an anxious wait for visas amid a simmering diplomatic row between the UK and Russia.
Embassy in London
anxious wait for visas
evidence of an iron industry
her daughter already has
mother of a woman
Fans gathered near the gates of the Los Angeles home
candles, flowers, posters and balloons.
Gary, Indiana,
Michael Jackson
outside the UCLA Medical Center,
ESPN's "Outside the Lines" program
Both men
basketball coach
The statute of limitations,
sexually abused
President Obama
More than 150,000
last month
in a coffee shop near Lakewood
fled Iraq since the invasion
a Thanksgiving meal
disruptive protests
Florida,
Halperin
this is about. That's not the intent of most of these people. It's not the way the press is covering it,"
Sarah Palin
Sen. Claire McCaskill,
shouting matches
"solar farm"
Spain.
By 2013 it is hoped that additional towers will create a "solar farm"
a sea of giant mirrors is reflecting the sun's
plant in Sanlucar, Spain
the first of its kind.
very high.
the global economic
break into the little-known market and go home with a contract.
Havana's trade fair
break into the little-known market and go home with a contract.
"Cuba
1978 disappearance of five teenagers
the 1978 arson of an abandoned building in Newark was connected with the case,
the 1978 disappearance of five teenagers
boys getting into Evans' pickup truck.
1.2 million
Afghanistan's
chronic funding
HIV/AIDS epidemic.
a huge home grown drug addiction problem now on the brink of fueling an HIV/AIDS epidemic.
1.2 million
chronic funding shortfalls
identified the remains as Lysandra Turpin
that he watched his father kill 27-year-old Lysandra Marie Turpin in 1988 and that his dad forced him to help dispose of the body,
killer's son
on a lifeboat off Somalia.
holding Capt. Richard Phillips
the Maersk Alabama
FBI negotiators
U.S. Navy
provision in his economic stimulus plan had little effect so far on the multibillion-dollar trade partnership with
the United States remains Mexico's partner
had little effect so far on the multibillion-dollar trade partnership with
President Felipe Calderon
delay counter-narcotics aid because of alleged human rights violations by Mexican soldiers.
say that the United States has not been forceful enough in demanding the return of ousted Honduran President Jose Manuel Zelaya to power,
strong magnets
A neighborhood in east London
died of breast cancer,
Linda,
those numbers are extremely conservative because many sex workers and johns aren't caught.
United States.
to get prostitutes off the streets.
estimate 1 million to 2 million
prostitutes and pornography
Internet
was shot to death by another officer on
shot to death
commission a task force to investigate shootings between police officers statewide,
she is a victim of such a "fume event." She complains of debilitating migraine headaches, tremors, and blind spots in her field of vision.
off the engines, and then is pressurized and cooled before being sent into the cabin through vents.
that poisonous fumes enter the cabin.
she is a victim of such a "fume event."
which bleeds off the engines, and then is pressurized and cooled before being sent into the cabin through vents.
when Briant and his mother were reunited,
Briant Rodriguez
meeting
wandering the streets of Mexicali, Mexico,
nearly two weeks
Rajasthan,
10-thousand
rainwater
solve water issues in Rajasthan
more than 10-thousand
An 850-pound emerald
gemstone's owner
850-pound emerald
An 850-pound emerald
16 egg whites, one and a quarter-pound of meat, four cups of vegetables, potatoes and rice
Dinant has maintained his diet of 16 egg whites, one and a quarter-pound of meat, four cups of vegetables, potatoes and rice a
six-pack abs
"If you fall off the wagon for one day, the problem is it could lead to two days, three days, a week, then you fall off completely. Next thing you know, it leads to two weeks of binge eating."
one and a quarter-pound of
"It's more defined. The middle two are coming in. I need a tan. I'm so white it's hard to see."
Lisa Kogan
throwing a little party,"
Saturday
1970.
Los Angeles, California,
Sammy Davis Jr.,
widow of entertainer Sammy
a dancer and actress
Wednesday's 4-0 win over Stoke.
international central defender
international central defender
Liverpool
Greece
Sotirios Kyrgiakos
sheriff in Luna County, New Mexico,
in the United States,
the police chief
areas included Bayambang, Alcala and Basista,
Benguet
northern
Tom Lantos,
Rep. Tom Lantos,
plans to leave the House
"a true American hero"
Hungarian-born
Rep. Tom Lantos,
Condoleezza Rice
defensive
her bedroom,
Houston FBI Special Agent Richard Rennison is one of the lead investigators in the case,
she was abducted
the new austerity law
that Greece bring down its spending.
six protesters and 15 police officers
position of honor
abortion, marriage for same-sex couples, stem cell research, cloning and euthanasia
Rick Warren
selection upset activists who supported Barack Obama
Christian voters,
Pastor Rick Warren
the Muslim world
Egypt,
address to the Muslim world at Cairo University
Jane Harman
Rep. Jane Harman
interrogations of terrorist detainees, according to the newly declassified letter.
Donna Molnar
Donna Molnar
hypothermia
two
letter that Cambodia's permanent mission in New York submitted
its continuing standoff with Thailand over an ancient border temple on disputed land.
talk differently
soul is the ultimate G-spot
when you stimulate your core self
Someone who nurtures your
positive influence on your character development.
Michael Mazza,
Michael Mazza,
Michael Mazza,
The incident happened as Mazza was being taken to the second day of his trial in connection with the armed robbery of a Coral Springs bank,
truck driver who saw all or part of the altercation near Pompano Beach called 911.
arrested
including first-degree murder and escape,
extrovert, crazy
"progressive, quite tolerant, somewhat reserved and beautiful."
Stockholm
There are lots of extrovert, crazy
a journalist
Sweden
The fall of the Berlin Wall heralded the end of the communist regime in East Germany in
the grave of Tutankhamen,"
such as "Vita" Cola, "Marella" margarine, "Juwel" cigarettes and a bottle of "Kristall" vodka.
Leipzig
missile shield
decoy did not deploy.
balloons or other simple decoys that, they argue, could easily fool the interceptor.
Vandenberg Air Force Base
a long-range ballistic missile
reforms in response to the international financial crisis,
tax-evasion"
Birotte,
U.S. Justice Department
"This case is aimed at restoring California's sovereign and constitutional right to establish its own public health laws based on this country's federalist principles,"
Lance Inc., a Charlotte, North Carolina-based
$1,500 prepaid debit card.
a $1,500 prepaid debit card.
don't
because of pipelines that bring oil and gas
"is punished in all sectors of society,"
Columbian mammoth
Columbian mammoth fossil "Zed."
two complete, beautifully preserved tusks."
Columbian mammoth fossil "Zed."
a construction site in the heart of Los Angeles.
teeth and lower jaw of Columbian mammoth
the worldwide economic crisis
tens of thousands of marine life, mammals and birds every year.
funds to recover most of the nets that litter the unique Puget Sound ecosystem.
a football field,
the worldwide economic crisis
lost fishing nets.
Spanair MD-82 airliner
Wednesday's
showing the plane using up all the runway as it tried to take off but then never reaching adequate altitude,
Big Oil is not to blame for skyrocketing gas
Chevron Corp.
David O'Reilly
Sen. McCain
high demand and a short supply of crude oil
high energy prices,
prices to spike.
New York City and Los Angeles
New York
the United States.
Mexico
were diverting aircraft carrying medical supplies and other humanitarian aid. U.S. military flights were getting top priority,
diverting aircraft carrying medical supplies
Huub Stevens
Michael Laudrup
traveling "Body Works" exhibition,
human body and its function,
male body is lying on his back with a woman sitting astride him with her back towards his head.
1973
Uruguayan President Juan Maria Bordaberry
backed a military coup
he backed a military coup
"global factors"
"People smugglers
an explosion
nationalist parties changing their strategy.
makeup of Indonesia's 550-seat parliament,
renewable energy resources
House Speaker Nancy Pelosi
was released in August.
subsequent appeal by the grandparents
visitation
convicted of killing her minister husband,
shotgun
Patricia, Mary Alice and Brianna
revoke Mary Winkler's visitation rights
have been living with their grandparents
the children experienced "urination accidents, sleeping problems, graphic nightmares and sleepwalking."
convicted of killing her minister husband,
have been living with their grandparents
attraction
to pick up all manner of fresh local produce, as well as handmade crafts, jewelry, antiques and paintings.
fifth place
In Saturday's other match,
Ezequiel Lavezzi
Ezequiel Lavezzi scored twice
NAPLES,
Udinese
17
writer Doug Lansky.
Strange signs from around the world
as being calm, with a deliberate attempt to not attract attention to himself,"
October 16.
"Granddad Bandit,"
feet 4 inches tall and weighing between 220 and 250 pounds. He is described as stocky and bald, with short gray hair on the sides, and wears glasses.
Roanoke, Virginia; Little Rock, Arkansas; Dallas, Texas; Birmingham, Alabama; Syracuse, New York;
"Granddad Bandit,"
October 16.
nine bank robberies beginning in April in Houston, Texas,
some of these
he's hoping for a "V-shaped" recession.
economic growth
major financial institutions in order to get the U.S. economy back on track.
Former Treasury Secretary Paul O'Neill
U.S. embassies
The substance has proved to be harmless in 15 locations with results still pending for the final
white flour,
white flour,
5592
China
to begin mass inoculations,
5592
has developed a
China
Tel Aviv.
the WTA supremo
"very, very disappointed"
Afghanistan
dozens
woman here dies every 29 minutes due to childbirth complications,
At the Ibni Sina Balkhi Midwifery Training Center in Kabul,
trade cash for pics
that exist between the liberal base of the party,
President Obama
size of the deficit
that exist
June
June
any new dip in the economy,
prosecution for "lack of responsibility causing serious consequences,"
Luong Hoai Nam, faces prosecution for "lack of responsibility causing serious consequences,"
forced circumcision and female genital mutilation (FGM)
2002
London,
leading voice against forced circumcision and female genital mutilation (FGM)
court
bribing Nigerian government
Game Developers
former President Clinton
he has no plans to slow down.
heart procedure,
no plans to slow down.
Gulf of Aden.
Somali pirates
Middle Eastern investors
Mega-rich Middle Eastern
The Kharafis,
smashed the British transfer record
Mega-rich Middle Eastern investors
Premier League clubs
May 27,
rock 'n' roll residencies
36
The Joint,
Carlos Santana
441 people
441
441
the president to talk to them, walk them through his thinking -- why he makes the decisions he makes, what are the tradeoffs to those decisions -- and carry them through this process,"
the American people expect the president to talk to them, walk them through his thinking
reaching the semifinals of the Champions League
sixth-minute
20 No. 1
more than a dozen
Brooks & Dunn
November through January,
from November through January,
At least 12 unconfirmed
President Obama
Stephen Colbert
Stephen Colbert el dos rips the prize away from
state only one vote per e-mail address per day.
7-month-old puppy
Steven Colbert el dos
pulled a body from underneath the rubble of a collapsed apartment building
body
workers have pulled a body from underneath the rubble of a collapsed apartment building
"I think she made the wrong call. It's not her time,"
family situation would have a negative impact on her effectiveness as vice president.
its very challenging to balance work and caring for her 1-year-old child.
balance life and work
poor judgment.
politician and mother.
would cover about eight
United States and Libya
"resolve all outstanding claims in good faith" and offer "fair compensation" to victims and their families,
because he couldn't afford
all tuition and expenses for the neediest of Brown's admitted applicants.
late 1930s
gave $100 million
homicide
in El Salvador,
French filmmaker and photographer Christian Poveda
said authorities believe the officer told gang members Poveda was giving information on the group to police.
a documentary about a violent street gang,
in the town of Tonacatepeque,
Jennifer Hudson
mother, Darnell Donerson, and brother, Jason
performances on "American Idol" in 2004
almost 800 other women
talent, hard work and a close-knit family.
investigator into the deadliest terrorist attack in Argentine history that he was kidnapped and tortured by men who said they were national intelligence agents.
said they were national intelligence agents.
between the east African country of Tanzania and the
parties
13-year-old French girl,
Search parties
1866."
The silver pocket
won't be filled with a new pet anytime soon.
Wednesday,
declined to eat the last meal
"It is extremely inappropriate to give a person sentenced to death such a privilege. One which the perpetrator
not eaten
"Effective immediately, no such accommodations will be made.
Video game
"Six Days in Fallujah"
"Saving Captain Phillips,"
two-dimensional shooting
"Six Days in Fallujah"
avoid being "caught up in the hype"
African-American
rally against discrimination late next month,
managers
who look strong and healthy,
remote corner of the Amazonian rainforest.
jungle dwellers
outside thatched communal huts, necks craned upward,
President Obama
a military-style haircut in Iraq on Sunday.
solidarity with American troops
Comedy Central
would-be mothers and fathers around the United States
outright and present them as orphans.
foreign-born children
halted their programs.
halted their programs.
children
Laura Teresinski
United States
the PKK.
Turkish military
The PKK, or Kurdistan Workers' Party,
At least 15 Turkish soldiers were killed
in response to clashes
The central Iraqi government
15
illegal migrants
Male refugees
Rohingya
Ranong Provincial
has been converted into an eco-friendly vessel with three sails and solar panels.
successfully cross the perilous Arctic
the perilous Arctic
Monday.
he and co-counsel Shawn Chapman Holley intend to file a petition with Los Angeles Superior Court on Monday.
signed "an agreement in principle"
Scania,
500 trucks
500
Scania
Iskandariya factory south of Baghdad
"This is incident was not an accident,"
the president
Wednesday,
aerial bombardment by the Sudan Armed Forces of the town of Yida,"
Kiir
near the Yida refugee camp in South Sudan,
"We are very concerned that these bombs were dropped in an area where there are thousands of refugees who have gathered after fleeing the violence in Southern Kordofan and Blue Nile states,"
women's gymnastics
Chinese women's gymnastics
gymnasts were eligible
The car
$40,000
she'd be absent for a few days because of a death in the family.
a tree.
to protest the imprisonment of Sheikh Omar Abdul Rahman,
September 2006.
California,
American al Qaeda member Adam Yahiye Gadahn
American al Qaeda member Adam Yahiye Gadahn
self-proclaimed American jihadist,
perfect 10.
with three gold
Romanian
17 years,
Rev. Ed Hinds
Rev. Ed Hinds
Rev. Ed Hinds
Vietnam Veterans Memorial
establish an official collection.
100,000 objects that have been left
both in the United States and abroad,
Some four to five workers,
Roy George
Linden, New Jersey,
Chinese authorities cooperated
more than 530 pounds of raw materials and
China
56
in 27 states.
U.N. Nations humanitarian chief John Holmes
nearly 25 years.
the fighting between the Sri Lankan army and Tamil Tiger rebels as "inadequate."
the Sri Lankan government
official birthday of Queen Elizabeth II
has been reprimanded by her school after being caught
Britain's Princess Eugenie
among guests celebrating
Princess Eugenie
frolicking naked on college grounds,
$56 million
2002 season of the Oakland As, when general manager Billy Beane infuriated conventional wisdom by applying "sabermetrics" to squad selection.
sharp and smart,
"Moneyball"
his pet crocodile
Authorities
Cristofaro's home,
Authorities
Libya's legal liability in numerous lawsuits
Libya's legal liability in numerous lawsuits
exceed $1 billion.
Libya
Libya has paid 268
baboon-monitoring program
Music Awards,
www.thisisit-movie.com
2009 MTV Video Music
two weeks
October
encouraging people to drink alcohol running off someone's body parts,"
Fourteen
"'they're just letting off steam,'
he witnessed mistreatment among the guards
whistle-blower
whistle-blower
he called the "savage, murderous blockade" on Cuba,
"still smells of sulfur."
saying he is an "intelligent man" and comparing him to President John F. Kennedy.
Camp
Bucca in Iraq,
in Iraq,
Bucca in Iraq,
housing cell
their results on Tuesday,
700 tons
second child
tripolycyanamide,
tripolycyanamide,
Minnesota freeway,
Erickson and 21 passengers
serious
"One factor being considered is whether the driver suffered a medical episode while behind the wheel,"
seizures: genetics, stroke, brain tumor, lack of oxygen, low blood sugar, drugs,
Kawasaki disease,
Jett Travolta,
stroke, brain tumor, lack of oxygen, low blood sugar, drugs, even certain medications,"
"Literally dozens of different disorders
BACATMA
for the dowry, provide counseling and even employment within the
AIDS
"There are better methods to address the prevention of HIV and AIDS rather than encouraging that kind of union,"
the dowry, provide counseling and even employment within the
up to six months
Florida school administrators
a prayer at a school luncheon.
simple prayer."
Atlanta, Georgia
27 million square kilometers (10.4 million square miles),
ozone hole over Antarctica
cancer
2008 is larger
reached about 27 million square
27 million square kilometers (10.4 million square miles),
About 123,000
About 123,000
110,000
the economy.
financial system is in crisis,
This is a problem
that isn't going away.
Damon Elliott,
Tuesday
most emotional mornings and afternoons
At least six people were killed
35 miles (55 km) west-southwest of Bandar e-Abbas,
nearly 200
35 miles (55 km) west-southwest of Bandar e-Abbas, Iran
at least 16
committee with passports, showing that team members were of legal age,
athletes must be at least 16 in the year the games take place.
provided the Olympic committee with passports, showing that team members were of legal age,
The International Olympic Committee
at least 16
the death of a Japanese taxi driver.
The U.S. military presence in Japan
Olatunbosun Ogbogu, a 22-year-old Nigerian national.
The U.S. military presence in Japan has at times bred resentment among locals, who have long complained about crime, noise and accidents.
jailed for nine years
suspicion of robbery and murder
Thursday
stay of execution for Cecil Johnson Jr.
Nashville, Tennessee,
pyrotechnics
winning the Golden Lion prize.
fireworks
attention-grabbing installations
Chinese
next year
he was not going to stay after the end of the season following the Champions League tie against Liverpool on March 11,"
the dismissal of coach Roberto Mancini,
not going to stay after the end of the season
Roberto Mancini
Fighting
an oil-rich town
over an oil-rich town
more than 4 million
civil war
City of New York and its debris-removal contractors.
would provide a system to pay for the compensation of the
helps low-income workers get their own cars.
father
"My father beat me," Mark Obama Ndesandjo told reporters in China,
Mark Obama Ndesandjo
victim of urban violence.
cemetery in the sand with mannequins representing 9,000 people who Rio de Paz says have been slain and secretly buried since January 2007.
coconuts
victims of violence, homicides, dead police officers and those who have been shot in gunfights between authorities and gangs of narcotics traffickers.
"Shame" in Spanish, Portuguese, English and French.
victims of violence, homicides, dead police officers and those who have been shot in gunfights between authorities and gangs of narcotics traffickers.
he has a long-lost 23-year-old daughter
Wagner
vote in November on whether to ban same-sex marriages in the state.
filed a petition
Hundreds of marriage licenses have been issued to same-sex couples since mid-June, a month after the court overturned the state's laws against such unions.
to vote in November on whether to ban same-sex marriages in the state.
the justices sidestepped the issue of whether banning same-sex marriage was unconstitutional,
such unions.
North Fork
bring a picnic to go along with their wine,
more than 4,000
bring a picnic to go along with their wine,
more than 4,000
Italy
an independent review of the evidence,
will be found not guilty of killing her roommate.
to re-evaluate the evidence
Italy
a verdict will finally vindicate their daughter.
cousins and aunts and uncles
January 11,
there's several hundred of us in
missing
up to 30,000
Chile and Uruguay.
"Dirty War," which started in 1976
up to 30,000
18 years ago
Garrido's
rape
Phillip Garrido,
Friday
fight against
stressed the role of faith-based
2-2
Ajax
PSV Eindhoven
are now five points adrift of
2-2
Ajax
grandfather, Allen Parrish,
Robert West
a Pullman Porter
conduct weeks, months, sometimes years
30-something woman in America
Muslim women,
men are intimidated
An Al Qaeda-linked militant group waging war against Somalia's fragile government
Al-Shabab
it was taking steps to limit the
could potentially destabilize the region with dire consequences for global security,
9/11 attacks
"$1.5 billion
"situation is increasingly perilous"
hundreds of civilian
Cyber Monday.
jump in customers coming to their websites on Monday.
Robert "Joe" Halderman,
National Organization for Women
"The National Organization for Women
David Letterman's
The National Organization for Women
David Letterman
Lebanon
tight,
50,000
expected to be high
will be tight, with the Hezbollah-dominated "March 8 alliance" possibly winning a majority of seats in parliament.
Hezbollah
Mike Mullen,
Adm. Mike Mullen,
moved the guided-missile destroyer USS Cole and other ships to
The U.S.
"We are sending a clear message for the need for stability,"
The U.S. Navy has moved the guided-missile destroyer USS Cole and other ships to
not adequately helped refugees
250,000 refugees
not adequately helped refugees and
a victory parade marking the end of the decades-long civil war.
Rafael Nadal
Australian Open champion
Russian Nikolay Davydenko
magnitude of 6.6
U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon
Secretary-General
8.8
that he will talk to Chilean President Michelle Bachelet and President-elect Sebastian Pinera about how the United Nations can best help.
Alexei Pukach
Gen. Alexei Pukach
Tuesday
has been arrested in connection with the murder of a journalist
Tuesday's
control of the land.
Israel
Na'alin, on the
was shot in the head during a shooting rampage
no memory of the incident.
stallion named Hickstead.
South Koreans
served between 2003 and 2008,
committed suicide
Roh's hometown village of Bonghwa in Gimhae.
former President Roh Moo-Hyun,
poured into the streets to catch a glimpse of the black Cadillac
LinkedIn, Facebook, credit history
behavioral
importance of references
LinkedIn, Facebook, credit history [or] criminal history
who can speak to your role as a professional,
requested by an employer.
check references,
requested by an employer.
requested by an employer.
knee surgery.
"I saw the guy holding his head with the blood coming out,"
guy holding his head with the blood coming out,"
into custody
Raleigh-Durham International Airport in North Carolina
scuffle was between two brothers,
tweet on the social-networking Web site, Twitter.
California Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger
"a little adventure" on Twitter.
new president of Juventus
German Bundesliga strugglers Bochum
the end of the current season
position of chief executive
two women
Staunton ice cream store
The 29-year-old former Barcelona star
next month's friendly international against Ireland in London.
Ronaldinho
the AC Milan playmaker was not named in Brazil coach Carlos Dunga's 22-man squad for next month's friendly international against Ireland in London.
Ronaldinho's
World Cup finals
clunkers program
Ed Voyles Honda in Marietta, Georgia.
Ed Voyles Honda in Marietta,
Clunkers" program.
early in 2008
CoRoT-7b,
23 times
CoRoT-7b,
about five
five times
2008
She is a slight girl of 11,
crafts poems
be silent.
pain and suffering of children
32
interrupted their regular programming to provide 24-hour coverage of the disaster.
kept the information secret for a long time,
Graphic footage of death and destruction
kept the information secret
surgical anesthetic propofol
Jackson's mother, Katherine, sisters Janet and La Toya, and brother Randy Jackson
all of the production and rehearsal costs,
production and rehearsal
Jackson's mother, Katherine, sisters Janet
Mendes' decision
custody
Rio de Janeiro
honorary status,
Giza in Egypt.
"New 7 Wonders of the World"
www.new7wonders.com,
the Web site, www.new7wonders.com,
Lisbon, Portugal,
master of the ceremonies."
remarkable that so many people cared to reach out to us like this."
office space on the edge of campus
Erin Sheehan
an office space on the edge of campus
"I still have trouble sleeping some days,"
live-action video and virtual-reality technology to create simulators that become learning tools
live-action
cultural simulation program that is part video game, part blockbuster Hollywood movie.
cheaper
not just from thrifty tourists but also from business travelers in search of value.
UK budget
responding to the demand with ambitious expansion plans.
was three times that of the overall UK hotel market.
for inclusion in the 2016
at the 2012 Olympic Games in London,
struggle for women's rights against the backdrops of the Arab Spring and democratic progress
medals and $1.5 million in cash.
women's rights
"for their non-violent struggle for the safety of women and for women's rights to full participation in peace-building work,"
Jalal Talabani
Jalal Talabani
Jalal Talabani
maintaining the country's
death sentences were overturned.
10 percent of death sentences were
The death penalty will now be reserved for those who commit heinous crimes with "grave social consequences,"
spying, corruption and drug trafficking.
China National Association of International Studies.
"the barrier of fear"
Mubarak
The Golden Age"
George Clooney,
the nominations for the 80th annual Academy
George Clooney,
Marion Cotillard,
Mohler Sr. and his sons Burrell Edward Mohler Jr., 53; David A. Mohler, 52; Jared Leroy Mohler, 48; and Roland Neil Mohler, 47.
the five suspects,
bankrolling a dogfighting operation
Michael Vick,
a federal charge of bankrolling a dogfighting operation
the Association of Flight Attendants (AFA) Council 66.
US Airways flight attendant
Nazi war crimes
over two decades.
has seriously deteriorated,"
suffered from intracranial brain bleeding and was on life support
"conscious
life support
bin Laden."
"I think the reports we've seen are consistent with messages we've seen in the past from al Qaeda threatening the U.S. and other countries that are involved in counter-terrorism efforts,"
U.S. policy in Pakistan has generated "new seeds of hatred and revenge against America."
has generated "new seeds of hatred and revenge against America."
the reports we've seen are consistent with messages we've seen in the past from al Qaeda threatening the U.S. and other countries that are involved in counter-terrorism efforts,"
Roman Zaretsky and his sister Alexandra
Roman Zaretsky and his sister Alexandra
Roman Zaretsky and his sister Alexandra
those in need.
flooding would remain for weeks
Thailand
shows little sign of disappearing
almost a month,
The situation had worsened by Friday, the International Committee of the
"Our staff are witnessing an unimaginable humanitarian catastrophe,"
the end of the current military push, which is often referred to as a civilian rescue mission, is less than 48 hours away.
rebels in the country's north.
in 1992
one of the world's most wanted Nazi war criminals died almost 20 years ago in Egypt.
Heim
research it conducted with the New York Times showed that Heim died in Cairo in 1992 of intestinal cancer. Witness accounts and documents, including a passport, prove that Heim lived under the false name of Tarek Farid Hussein,
Tarek Farid Hussein,
Heim
Tarek Farid Hussein,
Aribert Heim,
almost 20 years ago
"Kim has been to rehab more than once before,"
The National Asset Management Agency,
takes 1,200 loans off the books of Irish Nationwide Building Society, EBS Building Society, Bank of Ireland, Allied Irish Banks and Anglo Irish Bank.
81 billion euros ($109 billion)
complete the purchase of the 81 billion euros in debt by February
two guards
A bicycle tour operator
been fired,
Two George Washington Bridge security guards
FJC Security,
Port Authority of New York and New Jersey.
A bicycle tour operator
organizing a naming ceremony and funeral for the stillborn,
son had been cremated
legal action against the hospital authorities in Hampshire,
who gave birth to a stillborn boy was left distraught after she discovered his body
stillborn boy
a stillborn boy
filming segments for a new show
"Deal or No Deal,"
irregular heartbeat
filming segments for a new show
Howie Mandel
an irregular heartbeat,
still yearns for a chance at freedom.
killed Degnan, Brown and Ross.
the longest-serving
deadly earthquake.
the center of Port-au-Prince
at the center of Port-au-Prince
President Obama
high-speed train systems
an hour,
1967 Cadillac.
L.A. is a melting pot of many different cultures and we have fabulous ingredients here. If you go to San Diego, San Francisco you can get the best vegetables, the best fruits, sea food
draft a stable of grapplers and then receive points for their performance in the ring and appearances on broadcasts.
Pick your breed of dog, then allocate your "funds"
a virtual simulation dog show league.
Marriott Hotel in Islamabad.
four
Searchers found seven bodies Monday and the eighth Tuesday.
the eighth
eight
Adams
two survivors,
The finance minister
The finance minister
The Ministry of Trade and Industry
between 2 and 5 percent
announcement from LaSalle Parish District Attorney Reed Walters, who said he would not appeal a higher court's decision moving Bell's
second-degree attempted murder and conspiracy.
Derek Mears
of daddy issues.
Derek Mears
Derek Mears
Sea World
unfortunate, random incident,"
"This is an unfortunate, random incident,"
Sea World
Sea World
Ayelet Zurer
Tom Hanks
the Catholic League.
Tom Hanks
"I have a strong objection to the genre of mixing fact with fiction,"
become our guardian.
my mother
Mike Fieseler.
Chinese Foreign Ministry and the Chinese Embassy
report on corruption allegations relating to the eldest son of President Hu Jintao."
not report on corruption allegations
"Media
the Chinese Foreign Ministry and the Chinese Embassy in Washington
three months ago,
The plane was towed to the gate, where everyone on board "deplaned normally,"
methods and techniques,"
15,
three National Police officers, including a commander,
Brig. Gen. Abdul
to chart a new course for an economic comeback.
in Afghanistan.
DOS
the contractor
economic reasons.
short-term
A northern Italian region has approved a measure to
the Lombardy Region,
of plotting to crash a plane into the country's airport.
was arrested
leader of the Islamist militant group Jemaah Islamiyah's Singapore arm,
being behind plans to attack the U.S. Embassy and a government building.
things that go bump in the night, and scary things that are fun,"
emphasizes psychological horror
"The Haunting in Connecticut"
"The Haunting in Connecticut"
47, is probably best known for her Oscar-nominated turn in "Sideways"
her Oscar-nominated turn in "Sideways" as Maya Randall,
250 million in India, about 25 percent
"untouchable" Dalit class,
543 elected members, of which 58 are women.
The attacker hid the explosive device inside his turban,
two suicide
Gen. John R. Allen, commander of ISAF,
"Inglourious Basterds"
Brad Pitt
Brad Pitt
fashion, music and design scenes
Oscar Niemeyer.
Brazil.
Paulistano
Look out for the beautiful sci-fi dome, Oca and the Grande Marquise an extraordinary white pavilion which houses MAM (Museu de Arte Moderna) and features expanses of covered concrete which attract many of the city's skateboarders.
São Paulo Museum of
"The search warrant authorized investigators to look for medical records relating to Michael Jackson and all of his reported aliases,"
anesthetic propofol
the anesthetic propofol
the Las Vegas home and office of Michael Jackson's
saying that officers from the DEA, Los Angeles police and "various local agencies" executed a search warrant at Murray's home and office beginning about 8 a.m. (11 a.m. ET) Tuesday.
a stream in Shark River Park
in a stream in Shark River Park in Monmouth County
partially submerged in a stream in Shark River Park in Monmouth County
a North Carolina group that authorities say plotted "violent jihad" overseas,
seven
Daniel Patrick Boyd,
a North Carolina resident,
name has been redacted from court documents,
Seven
genetics and environment
California
prevalence of autism cases
California.
California
autism
six
the beating of a white classmate,
Jena 6 incident. We were just fed up with it ... I have just as many black [friends]
at the university
was not intended to make fun of the six black
six black students arrested in the beating of a white classmate,
black
arctic ice melt and other changes in the Earth's climate are the result of an increase in the world's
natural variability,
current warming trend is the result of natural variability, where a
global warming
to be auctioned
fetched millions of dollars at auction.
prequel to her best-selling series
Harry Potter
"Laura and I are thrilled to be here to help commission an awesome
President Bush
Bush
aviator
President Bush
George H.W. Bush
"As you prepare to man this ship, I do know that you take with you the hopes and dreams of every American who cherishes freedom and peace, and you take with you the undying respect and admiration of the entire Bush family,"
But studies show staying warm before and during surgery can
Having surgery? Speak up!
Want to touch me? Wash your hands first.
99,000
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention,
Wash your hands first.
Claude Chabrol
Ludivine Sagnier
Claude Chabrol
Ludivine Sagnier
nearly an hour and a half.
former Secretary of State Henry Kissinger.
human food
acetaminophen
ibuprofen
Typical holiday staples such as grapes and raisins have been shown to cause renal failure when ingested by
ASPCA
(Mraz performed "I'm Yours" with contestants Anoop Desai and Alexis Grace.)
a songwriting award
29 felony counts in the kidnapping of Jaycee Dugard,
has been hearing [the] voices of angels for years,"
Jaycee Dugard,
1989 left hundreds dead.
days of the anti-government protests.
"China, keep moving"
a massive 7.9 magnitude earthquake leveled large sections of Sichuan province in southwestern China.
Sarah Khawad
allowing children to name a teddy bear "Mohammed".
flight for England.
Khartoum's Unity High
Sunday,
the ceremony at the Great Hall of the People,
the Hotel Montana
cut through layers of concrete, pull the trapped people out by their feet and squeeze
The head of a humanitarian aid group and a few of his colleagues
Two of his colleagues did not survive.
Taylor Bradford,
was shot
Bradford "may very well have been targeted."
southeast London,
O2 arena in southeast London,
Jackson's "This is It" shows
"I feel like I've lost a brother, a lover and a friend,"
in London
August 29,
on the night when he was supposed to be opening his 50-night residency in the city.
no one
in Hardeeville,
their car in Hardeeville,
Dalai Lama fled Tibet
raise its alert
swine flu is no more danerous than the regular flu virus.
no
a remedy to unemployment among veterans.
businesses hiring veterans
is facing felony
parents
teenagers
Phillip
Joan Rivers
God's Love We Deliver.
$250,000 for Rivers' charity: God's Love We Deliver.
it's 50-50"
Michael Chabon.
Federal District of Sitka, Alaska,
Pulitzer Prize-winning
a possible, but nonexistent, imaginary Yiddish-speaking place in the modern world,"
Franklin Roosevelt's Interior secretary,
attempted felony murder, sexual battery and false imprisonment.
sexually assaulted her and, after a brief altercation, threw her over the balcony,
knocked out power to nearly 240,000 homes and businesses in New York, New Jersey and Pennsylvania, slowed traffic and could prompt authorities to cancel up to 1,000 flights at airports serving New York and New Jersey.
airports serving New York and New Jersey.
roughly 1,000
Guantanamo
the court has done today,"
federal judiciary
Guantanamo Bay, Cuba,
"the laws and Constitution are designed to survive, and remain in force, in extraordinary times. Liberty and security can be reconciled; and in our system reconciled within the framework of the law."
the Guantanamo ruling
100
Ten days
30 times more
one day
19
making direct landfall in Asia.
the Western Pacific,
El Nino,
19 tropical storms
El Nino,
Western Pacific.
El Nino,
arsenic and
"Let it be the end, the end of you using a cell phone or sending a text message when you are behind the wheel of a moving vehicle.
Erica had been hit head-on by a 5,000-pound SUV.
two bus bombings
21 commuters
AMSTETTEN, Austria
in a cellar below his house,
she remained trapped in a cellar below his house,
a DIY "genius,"
cellar
"Need U Bad,"
Missy Elliott.
G. Thomas
"intentionally made material false statements and representations under penalty of perjury, engaged in a corrupt kickback scheme, solicited and accepted unlawful gifts, and intentionally misled the Senate during his confirmation proceedings,"
on charges of perjury before a federal grand jury.
U.S. Rep. Adam Schiff, D-California, chairman of the House Judiciary Committee Task Force on Judicial Impeachment.
impeached.
"Our investigation found that Judge Porteous participated in a pattern of corrupt conduct for years,"
Louisiana,
the country had hosted secret CIA prisons as part of the "war on terror."
the country had hosted secret CIA prisons as part of the "war on terror."
"There are neither facts nor information that secret CIA detention centers existed in Lithuania,"
country had hosted secret CIA prisons as part of the "war on terror."
the country had hosted secret CIA prisons as part of the "war on terror."
Amanda Knox and her Italian ex-boyfriend, Raffaele Sollecito,
the conviction is not final.
However, he said that in the face of the planned appeals, clearly the conviction is not final.
Red.
(between $7,500 and $10,000).
$50 billion buyout by Bank of America.
brokerage Merrill Lynch
Merrill Lynch
free clinic
free clinic
Bunnell, Florida,
kidney cancer
uninsured cancer patient
CNN Student
CNN
commercial-free, ten-minute broadcast of the
Patrick Knight and Clifford Gebara were wounded in the shooting,
suspect in the deaths
three
in a home in Jupiter,
a suspect in the deaths of Makayla and three others:
equine influenza.
1872,
he assuaged investors' fears by backing up the market with
Danny Boyle,
They found the word "slumdog" in the title insulting and complained that the movie romanticizes poverty in India.
"Slumdog Millionaire"
a Mumbai orphan seeking fame and love through the "Millionaire" game show,
a democracy activist,
in a cell in Damascus
number of people killed since protests began this year against the regime of Bashar al-Assad
an activist
In October she joined the Syrian National Council, an opposition coalition created
late next week or no later than November 3,
"Obama's personality
find heroes with empathy for the problems of the world.
"trying to find heroes with empathy for the problems of the world.
find heroes with empathy for the problems of the world.
Sadr City
Sadr City
Nicole Suveges,
the transition from an authoritarian regime to democracy and how it affects ordinary citizens,
Heathrow's
$8.6 billion
a man
battlefield detainees held without charges by the United States in Afghanistan are not entitled to constitutional rights to challenge their detention.
Obama administration
Supreme Court
the documentary "Trouble the Water,"
Tia Lessin and Carl Deal
"Trouble the Water,"
captured the horrors experienced in their community and among their neighbors.
"Trouble the Water,"
think about themselves and the impact they can have in the community and the world.
to conduct exercises to protect the country from enemy submarines outweighed concerns raised by environmental groups.
cause hearing loss and disorientation in the animals.
emergency waiver to allow the
5-4 ruling
federal
Jackson's "wardrobe malfunction"
Janet Jackson's
vinyl that is used in billboards.
2001-2002 economic crash,
Argentina
"It's important for women to have a strong shoe,"
"It's important for women to have a strong shoe,"
Green.
Metropolitan Correctional Center in Manhattan, as well as after he was transferred to a minimum-security jail in Lewisburg, Pennsylvania
20 years in prison, followed by three years of supervised release,
both at the Metropolitan Correctional Center in Manhattan, as well as after he was transferred to a minimum-security jail in Lewisburg, Pennsylvania
take years before death-penalty states would meet legal standards necessary to resume lethal injection.
Death Penalty Information Center (DPIC), a Washington-based group that opposes the practice.
The Supreme Court
Texas
62
Forty-two people
Forty-two people
If the high court finds the procedures unconstitutional,
But this movie,
movie,
men are only interested in one thing,
Mike's tired old sexist world view
--pain that was excruciating
Julie Myers,
ICE chief Julie Myers
3:05 p.m., shortly after the party
Julie Myers
employee wearing prison stripes, a wig with dreadlocks and face-darkening makeup.
Myers
prison stripes, a wig with dreadlocks and face-darkening makeup.
aiming to fuse its radio, television and Web
Roda Vivo TV show.
RadarCultura's
three-hour
Brazilian
study the sun "in greater detail than ever before."
the sun
an image of the
Avatar
between the lists
"Top 10 Most Pirated Movies"
died
It is unclear what caused the explosion.
Several neighboring homes were damaged,
A house exploded
John J. Smith,
Richard Leith,
a woman running with a little girl and screaming.
Several families who were displaced by the explosion were directed to Red Cross officials to make arrangements for shelter Wednesday night,
1:30 p.m.
"That house was leveled to the ground. There is nothing left."
The G-20 discussions
The world's 3 billion
G-20
Chappaquiddick Island,
Then-Edgartown Police Chief Jim Arena
he would handle it no differently today except
Ted Kennedy
at 9 p.m. ET Thursday (0200 GMT Friday).
Christina Aguilera
2005
frozen
Lebanese Prime Minister Saad
consumption
trended upwards
Halloween
wine
wine tasting
About 40,000 Internet viewers
care personnel who would be deemed to have the authority to administer the flu vaccine,"
health care professionals
H1N1 cases,
could never play football again.
Kanu Football Foundation
president's "unconstitutional" order.
stop recruiting about 3,000 new soldiers
order to stop recruiting about 3,000 new soldiers
Tucson Lt. Paul Sayre
Tucson, Arizona,
Cleveland, Ohio; Miami Metro Dade, Florida; Baltimore, Maryland;
actively playing something and shooting cells."
teenage cancer patients
Re-Mission
2012 at the earliest.
Lionel Messi
Lionel Messi and Thierry Henry,
Two
inside the governor's mansion
The pardons of convicted
inside the governor's mansion
The pardons of convicted
"How do you get a convicted murderer
112
hostile and nonhostile incidents.
Mickey Fine
Mickey Fine Pharmacy and Grill,
She and her husband,
his neighbor:
Mike Bowes says his job prepared
his job
The ruling Regions party eventually
The ruling Regions party
Russia
Samantha Garvey,
Samantha Garvey,
Samantha Garvey,
a few months before Manjhi was born,
money-making venture,
since 2002.
surrogacy as a money-making venture,
surrogacy as
Renato Campora
she had beachy [sandy] highlights,"
when the two get together,
felt like she had found a soul mate.
"In real life I'm very unpolished,"
of probes into political interference with agency operations,"
respond
"gag order."
"political interference in recent EPA decisions" and discuss "apparent contradictions between the sworn testimony" of Johnson and accounts given by other sworn witnesses.
efficiency, not secrecy.
Warren
Warren
prominent liberal groups
the man at the center of an inaugural firestorm
Joe Solmonese,
translate traditional evangelical messages for a wider audience.
turns 60 next month,
Jessica Lange
bruised ribs, a broken collarbone and a small cut on her forehead,
suffered bruised ribs, a broken collarbone and a small cut on
"She will be completely fine
suffered bruised ribs, a broken collarbone and a small cut on
inside a suitcase dumped inside a Buena Park apartment complex dumpster.
Jenkins was the one
Ryan Jenkins
Ryan Jenkins,
author of a new book on Twitter. He says the micro-blogging service changed his life.
the micro-blogging service changed his life.
of one's life, shared through tweets and status updates,
propofol, the generic name for Diprivan, diluted with the anesthetic lidocaine
said that Mohammad Ajmal Kasab is from Faridkot village in the Okara district of Pakistan's Punjab province and that the other nine attackers also are from Pakistan.
Mohammad Ajmal Kasab
India,
only surviving suspect in last month's attacks in Mumbai
Pakistan's
The new Navy assault ship USS New York
docked in the city through Veterans Day
wreckage of the World Trade Center.
seven and a half tons of steel recovered from the wreckage of the World Trade Center.
Barcelona
Barcelona
outside the capital city
100 bodies
Seven
Six of the victims -- three adults, a teen and two children -- were found in the townhome's
2-year-old boy
Philadelphia, Pennsylvania,
one door
A 2-year-old boy
three adults, a teen and two children
died
Hurriya in Nineveh province,
12-year-old girl
"Gladiator."
Afghanistan and Iraq.
pornography, violence and corporate amorality,
Gloria Macapagal-Arroyo
at least one warehouse and ranch
Water burst the banks of the coastal city's famed canals,
its worst flooding in 22 years,
almost a meter of
is under threat from rising sea levels caused by climate change.
flooding
move her arms and legs,
swallow some,"
nearly six
Democratic Party's presidential nomination
More than 75,000
More than 75,000
nearly six miles
Invesco
of big ideas,
big ideas,
politically correct
to stop the spread of government dependency and fight
straight talk to politically correct talk.
to rein in government spending, lower taxes, take a Weedwacker to excessive regulation and mandates, put a stop to tort windfalls, and to stand up to the Tyrannosaurus appetite of government unions.
Ronald Reagan
insurance program?
Campaign Finance
system and how to lower its costs.
over U.S. health care reform.
Haiti
Haiti
greatest fear coming true
Oakland Raiders linebacker Marquis Cooper and NFL free agent Corey Smith, who played for the Detroit Lions for the past three seasons, have not returned from a Saturday fishing trip
6:30 a.m. Saturday,
Two NFL players
asked anyone with information on the boaters to contact its St. Petersburg, Florida, office at 727-824-7506.
the extent of the Alaska governor's foreign travel.
of her foreign travel Saturday.
Kuwait.
not
to visit Alaskan troops stationed in Kuwait.
ABC's "The View,"
"The View,"
ABC's "The View,"
Explosives are set off in the Missouri River
volunteers had filled more than 1 million sandbags out of the needed 2 million.
entered the Amadeus club
Unidentified gunmen
the victims,
Juarez is considered off-limits
Staff Sgt. David Booher,
U.S. Air Force B-1 bomber
U.S. Air Force B-1 bomber
Tuesday morning
Tuesday afternoon,
The cause of death has not been determined,
Los Angeles hospital,
Yaakov Alperon
A car bomb killed one of Israel's most prominent crime bosses
national parks.
391
391
U.S. military
essential part of the overall plan to stabilize the country,
militants, drug labs and buildings connected to insurgents
militants, drug labs and buildings connected to insurgents with ties to drug lords
attacking the drug problem head on.
Sarah Palin
TV commentator.
finding her with
attempted murder and assault
God told her to go to war with Iraq!"
hasn't said she doesn't want condoms discussed in sex-ed,
Campaigns are ugly.
has run a business, town, and/or state
Palin
"I'm pro-contraception,
executive
Spaniard has died from the human form of mad cow disease, the fifth such death
no danger from eating meat in Spain.
2001.
works were probably transcribed by Mozart's father, as young Mozart played.
transcribed his son's early works
The two compositions -- a concerto in G and a prelude in G -- have long been in the files at the International Mozarteum Foundation in Salzburg, Austria,
anonymous works
files at
Seung-Hui Cho's
two
campus
Afghanistan
opium
UNODC report,
the Taliban
Afghanistan's
the Taliban
Afghanistan's opium production had dropped dramatically this year
New York,
USNS Walter S. Diehl,
on a jalapeño pepper imported from Mexico at a Texas food supplier,
Mexico
salmonella outbreak
bacteria on a jalapeño pepper
a counterterrorism strategy, which would focus on using special forces and technology to reduce the number of al Qaeda insurgents on the Afghanistan-Pakistan border.
call for as many as 40,000 additional troops in Afghanistan
review of
a counterterrorism strategy, which would focus on using special forces and technology to reduce the number of al Qaeda insurgents on the Afghanistan-Pakistan border.
using special forces and technology to reduce the number of al Qaeda insurgents
Leona Lewis
Leona Lewis
Waterstones bookstore in Piccadilly Circus
Leona
man
the first lady
make such a commitment.
the Obamas
the Obamas
respect the role of men as husbands and fathers
no-fault divorce laws
are an excellent example of how the fruits of marriage can be realized by those who are committed to reconciling their differences and "toughing it out."
Apple decided to purge its app store
this year's Pulitzer Prize,
Balloon Boy
outlining terror interrogation methods
Michael Hayden,
compromised national security.
Jay Bybee,
Michael Hayden
Sami al-Hajj
arrived home in the Sudanese capital of Khartoum
Pakistani intelligence officers
Al-Jazeera cameraman
"a legal union between one man and one woman as husband and wife" and a spouse as "a person of the opposite sex who is a husband or a wife."
denies same-sex couples essential rights and protections,
federal law that defines marriage as the union of a man and a woman.
federal law that defines marriage as the union of a man and a woman.
same-sex couples essential rights.
propofol
coroner's report
Monday
Monday
The Los Angeles County
propofol
a doctor who would give him the drug
7 years old,
diabetes.
diabetes.
I had diabetes.
7
assignment manager for the CNN Medical News unit.
urine for sugar
live to the age of 20 or 30,
urine sample
Ann Curley
I was 7 years old, my mom took me
fizzy
technology
Cuaron senior, del Toro
Luna and Bernal,
Gael Garcia Bernal and Diego Luna
"methods promoted in Mexican border clinics are not consistent with scientific understanding" of cancer and its treatment.
there is no scientific evidence that low doses of chemotherapy or large
vitamins and minerals
cancerous tumor
cancerous tumor
Danny Hauser's
2007
is bidding for an unprecedented eighth victory
eighth victory
Andreas Kloeden, Levi Leipheimer, Yaroslav Popovych and Haimar Zulbedia
Nujood is being victimized by her own family
this year
runway near-collisions this year
Fort Lauderdale-Hollywood International Airport in Florida
Federal Aviation Administration
National Transportation Safety Board
abandoned her duties to devote time to opposition to same-sex marriage.
Trump
keep her title
Carrie Prejean
Those photos of a topless Prejean do not
Trump,
All three pleaded not
set on fire,
burned over 65 percent of his body
"He focuses on Ozzy,
three
"It hurts my heart to see him in pain, but it enlightens at the same time to know my son is strong enough to make it through on a daily basis,"
change how insurers are required
Washington Trial Lawyers Association,
that could force insurers to pay up to triple damages and lawyer fees if they fail to pay a legitimate claim and then lose in court.
change how insurers are required to treat their customers.
companies
pay legitimate claims in a timely and fair fashion
"Whip It!"
roller derby competitor Babe Ruthless
roller derby competitor Babe Ruthless
"Whip It!"
South Carolina
education benefits for veterans
may be right, the president may be right. Emotionally, you are on the wrong side, you can never win an emotional battle in an intellectual argument,"
a bill that would expand education benefits for veterans
the bill that would expand education benefits for veterans,
would expand education benefits for veterans
GI
spray-painted anti-Muslim message
at the mosque,
in the investigation.
A written note disparaging Islam also was left at the mosque,
became the longest-serving member of Congress in history.
longest-serving member of Congress in history.
Memphis basketball
get to the championship game
South Korea.
Premier League and European
potential new sponsor.
AIG
"Bradley Cooper is the whole package.
15 protesters in Ryan Gosling masks showed up
Bradley Cooper
on November 5.
return to the Kremlin by Prime Minister Vladimir Putin,
is necessary to ensure the stability of future Russian governments.
The Kremlin
2012.
Vladimir Putin,
to ensure the stability of future Russian governments.
H1N1 flu
Pregnant women
in the first week of October.
turned violent when minor clashes erupted between Israeli military personnel and the protesters.
Nabi Saleh
An estimated 70,000 to 80,000
70,000 to 80,000
acknowledged the death of their leader Sunday,
Velupillai Prabhakaran
not expected to make
Bermuda.
Bermuda
forecasters
when business and government turn their collective back
residents left the town seeking work
or set of suspects,"
a website that accepts ads for escort services,
text-messaging sex scandal case
two counts of obstruction of justice,
$100,000
Nay Phone Latt
for anti-regime activities,
company's chairman admitted inflating profits with "fictitious" assets
inflating profits with "fictitious" assets and non-existent cash.
inflating profits with "fictitious" assets and non-existent cash.
marginal gap" between actual operating profit and one reflected in
against using injectable vitamin supplements
using injectable vitamin supplements
customers are lining up for vitamin injections that promise
intravenous vitamin "drips"
Tokyo customers are lining up for
11:59 p.m. CST Monday
$10 one-day fare sale
Dr. Jorge Mario Gonzales was found shot to death at his ranch in rural Texas
Charleen Gonzalez, 29, and the couple's 2-year-old son,
burglary or an intended home invasion,
Indian
"The Lord of The Rings"
music.
Rahman
Charlie Daniels
Republicans'
Creative Coalition
Twin
The Republican National Convention,
Denver,
rape in the first degree
University of Oklahoma professor has been suspended amid allegations of sexual abuse,
Kenya
Kenyan government will require strong support from donors
$230 million over the next six months to feed millions
JAKARTA, Indonesia
JAKARTA,
20,000 member
Occupy Wall Street
United Federation of Teachers,
fraudulently obtain prescriptions
Fifty-six government employees
a scam that used health insurance information to fraudulently obtain prescriptions
a group of people, most of them employees of local government,
knighted
Beijing
knighted in the United Kingdom New Year Honors list,
London 2012 as Sir Chris.
knighted in the United Kingdom New Years
triple-gold
Cyclist
triple-gold
Chris Hoy
every
cities across the United States
against Arizona's tough new immigration law
sidewalk outside the White House
physical complaints, emotional problems and academic underachievement."
real change in a child's personality or their normal routine,
30 percent of all children in grades six through 10
in places that aren't monitored by adults,
green infrastructure
high-efficiency LED bulbs,
help clean and filter toxic storm water pollution
pollution that drains into rivers, and eventually into Chesapeake Bay.
eco-friendly road construction,
clean and filter toxic storm water pollution that drains into rivers,
trap the polluted runoff water,
build a street that is completely environmentally sustainable,
"We agree that further policy enforcement is essential to ensure that the policy is followed and imprudent spending is no longer an issue,"
to drive down costs,
2009 fiscal
food
crab cakes, beef Wellington and scallops
Classical
Carnegie Hall,
YouTube
first symphony orchestra comprised of members who auditioned solely online
New York City
flight engineer,
1:36 a.m. ET
80 percent chance of
Forecasters gave the Cape an 80 percent
four
Italians, a Dane, a German, a Frenchman and a Brit
six
Italians, a Dane, a German, a Frenchman and a Brit
icy conditions, drifting snow, severe frosts and dangerous wind chill factors across the country
winter misery
5-0
five-year
Khalid Boulahrouz,
Chelsea
English Premier League side Chelsea.
Petr Cech
worst kind of
deny us the chance for even that scant solace.
"Fast & Furious"
humongous $72.5 million,
"Fast & Furious"
Deborah Johns
stopping the president's health care efforts
Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin
Tea Party Express
The Tea Party
at the U.S. Capitol in Washington
Four Christmases
$70.8 million
Box Office
Twilight
"At this point, we are working it as one case or one suspect or set of suspects,"
Steve Suskin,
in the trunk of a burning car.
Nick Cannon checked out of a Los Angeles hospital over the weekend after being
vacationing in Aspen
back on the air with his New York morning radio show
treated for "mild kidney failure"
in the 1920s
a morals charge in connection with a minor.
the record of a controversial
dogs, as well as cats, birds and sheep,
Labrador puppy
$155,000
whole zoo full of pets
U.S. Embassy in Yemen,
Japan, France, Spain and Germany.
Several other nations
U.S.
their embassies
in the crew room."
NTSB's
daughter and the pilot were "being used as a scapegoat."
Colgan Air Capt. Marvin Renslow
mother
Atlantic City, New Jersey,
OxiClean pitchman
Tampa, Florida.
Mays died
militants
by Wednesday,
Polls
an opportunity
fill vacant positions
Nepal's
Gen. Rookmangud Katawal
"W-A-T-E-R"
It's the moment when Keller realized meanings were hidden in the manual alphabet shapes Sullivan had taught her
trailblazer and an inspiration for those with disabilities.
National Women in the Arts Museum and the Warner Theater,
nearly $750 million
his fundraising efforts were handicapped by a Virginia law that prohibits officials from raising money during the state's legislative session.
100% of its byproducts
Dangjin plant,
100% of its byproducts
Obama
Israa Abdel Fattah,
the website founded by Julian Assange that facilitates the publication of classified information
Sheffield FC
FIFA chief Blatter
Sheffield FC
150th birthday celebrations
an honor previously awarded only to the nine-time European champions Real Madrid.
re-election.
sent two cables to Washington expressing reservations about troop increases amid uncertainty over Karzai's government.
Afghan President Hamid Karzai's office
site of the destroyed World Trade Center
He has questioned the existence of the Holocaust, the genocidal Nazi campaign against European Jews,
a state sponsor of terrorism,
sponsor of terrorism,
a week of programming examining the transformation of
nearly 20 years
nearly 20
a week of programming examining the transformation of
President Bush
federally funded, state-run health insurance
the bill "moves our country's health care system in the wrong direction."
about 6 million
Democratic leaders
the State Children's Health Insurance Program
bill
the bill "moves our country's health care system in the wrong direction."
said the bill is almost a duplicate of the
at least 4,000
at least 4,000
U.S. military bases in the Pacific Ocean territory of Guam
3,000 kilometers
Pyongyang and Seoul
U.S. military bases in the Pacific Ocean territory of Guam
a mandatory evacuation
mudslides,
a river of mud
January
destinations in the Caribbean
U.S. luxury yacht chef Sara Kuszak, of Savannah, Georgia,
English Harbor, Antigua.
Albanian. By citizenship, an Indian. By faith,
stuffers and swallowers, internal concealments,"
trucks
"The routes are many and varied, the concealments are many and varied, we see body [concealment], we see
ferries dock
A longtime friend of the three Kings
three surviving children
predicted peace
the DreamWorks project.
There have been more than 100 pirate attacks and at least 39 hijackings off the
22
Wednesday with 22
more than 100 pirate
north,"
protested
Cairo
Cairo
between Muslims and Copts in Egypt,
residences of registered sex offenders
parts of Arkansas, Texas and Illinois
on Saturday evening.
prohibits anyone under the age of 15 from donating organs
cardiomyopathy,
raised $1.7 million in donations.
cardiomyopathy,
few
Scott Roeder's
murdering George Tiller,
first-degree murder
Smoke is coming out of the tailpipe
Blue smoke:
engine oil is being burned in the combustion chamber.
Blue smoke:
Water condensation from a blown and leaking head gasket:
that engine oil is being burned in the combustion chamber.
About 100
a bomb
Saturday morning,
a 15-year-old girl and a 30-year-old woman.
Catholic church in Kathmandu
a collection of items associated with Abraham Lincoln,
patent model of a device he invented
Smithsonian Institution
"Why would somebody who is 6 foot 4 inches decide to wear a tall hat?"
museum's best Lincoln objects
"Abraham Lincoln:
"Abraham Lincoln:
Phillip Garrido,
Hinkle
life.
economics of the criminal justice system
South Carolina
Winfrey
more than 30,000 people packed into Columbia, South Carolina's Williams-Brice stadium to hear the talk-show queen explain why she believes Obama is the man with the "vision" for America.
Columbia, South Carolina's Williams-Brice stadium
more than 30,000 people packed into
General Henry Shrapnel
After her death, silk scarves called "St. Audrey laces" were sold in her honor at Ely's annual St. Audrey's Fair. Then the British tendency for dropping letters and syllables took over, and Audrey became "tawdry."
Be careful not to talk about a "buzzer beater" unless it's actually happened.
Be careful not to talk about a "buzzer beater" unless it's actually happened.
gang-related.
"Tuesday's operation produced an enormous amount of property and evidence. The 23 people arrested were detained and interviewed, producing leads,
New York City
priced
New York City company,
the young and thrifty,
lurched the vehicle forward toward the gate of a nearby
the glass on the door,"
Dominican Republic.
in a large plastic blue container on an uninhabited island in Galveston Bay.
a fisherman
penalty of two to 20 years in prison,
Kimberly Dawn Trenor
suspected link between Chinese drywall and toxic effects
drywall
homeowners complaining of a rotten-egg smell, sickness, failed appliances, and corroded wires and pipes.
toxic effects
a pleasure
adventurer Steve Fossett
"weeks, perhaps months
A small amount of human remains
that adventurer Steve Fossett was flying when he disappeared last year,
A small amount of human remains
he disappeared
e-mail
lets the criminals track your keystrokes from their own computers.
several hours.
coughs or sneezes and expels droplets of fluid.
at least one
on facial tissues for several minutes and for two to eight hours on stainless steel or plastic surfaces.
her own encyclopedia,
to publish her own encyclopedia,
Both sides in the dispute
Itawamba County
going forward on a damages claim
14 people
Mirinae
downtown,
bikini-clad women contestants as well as a plethora of Arnie Schwarzenegger wannabes all hoping to be crowned the golden couple of
after it takes over the title
break-in
PB Capital,
neither homogenous nor loyal to one party.
Hispanic
2008
citizenship drives, get-out-the-vote campaigns
possible swing states like Arizona, Nevada, New Mexico, Colorado and Florida
change in the electorate
U.S. electorate
Listeners
CBC Radio 2
President-elect Barack Obama's benefit.
classical
49
from old-school R&B to blues and classical.
1 in 300
June, a week before the qualifying round of the Olympics
Eric Shanteau,
Beijing
better consumer protection laws,
Too many houses were built.
hid the extent of systemic leverage and made the risks less transparent;
work on the economics of information
a Northeastern-style fishing village,
Broad Creek, a modest port just off the Cross Island Parkway,
Northeastern-style fishing village,
feels like a Northeastern-style fishing village,
Harbour Town
westward-facing Harbour Town
westward-facing Harbour Town
FBI spokesman Stephen Emmett
the holidays
Atlanta's
The heavy winds
strong, shifting winds
Texas town of Wheeler
love
always keep an open heart.
someone is always worse off than you.
rising fuel prices.
Mallya's stable of businesses
Kingfisher Airlines
Kingfisher Airlines
At least 330,000
at least 70
marijuana
number of local farmers' markets
primarily plant-based diet composed of grains, vegetables, and fruits, but they occasionally obtain protein from lean meat, fish, poultry, or dairy.
Functional foods
nutrients that may not be inherent to a given food.
"flexitarians"
magnesium
the number of local farmers' markets
a primarily plant-based diet composed of grains, vegetables, and fruits, but they occasionally obtain protein from lean meat, fish, poultry, or dairy.
Samui
68 people and four crew members
68 people and four crew members
Koh Samui airport,
of volatile winds before the plane landed, aviation officials said.
a major expansion of the number of U.S. soldiers in Afghanistan
that it could make it tougher to give troops promised time at home with their families between overseas tours.
a major expansion of the number of U.S. soldiers in Afghanistan
the Joint Chiefs of Staff and other top military advisers
additional forces
a $5.4 million fine from US Airways and a $3.8 million fine from United Airlines
Both airlines
US Airways
possible cracking of a landing gear part.
The Al Nisr Al
is near Garacad, Somalia,
Brian Nichols
"I will not bring dishonor to the decision to spare my life."
found Nichols guilty of 54 counts,
that the things that I've done caused a lot of pain, and I am sorry,"
dog
Rose
puppy
a puppy.
a puppy.
vice principal.
Citadel
child-related jobs
criminal sexual
giant Sequoias.
Marble Halls of Oregon."
South Carolina
South Carolina high
An altercation
southwest Sichuan province
how they will get their next meals.
after Monday's earthquake,
protein biscuits
giant pandas
bamboo.
"Artificial diets in the form of protein biscuits
Robert D. Champion suffered muscle damage commonly seen in such events as car accidents, prolonged seizures, child abuse and torture,
were beaten so badly that they were destroyed like you would see in a heart attack,"
Miami, Florida.
Miami, Florida.
Tommy the cat
$438,000 in cash,
Innocence Lost task forces
National Center for Missing and Exploited Children launched
as much as 3 inches of
Elizabethtown, Kentucky
western Kentucky
Tuesday,
Kentucky
human,
were human,
started in 1976
More than 10,000 charred bone fragments were found buried at the site
30,000 Argentines
human,
do not use contraception is that they are afraid their parents might find out.
graduating from college or university
graduating
Republic President Leonel Fernandez
Dominican
President Leonel Fernandez
narcotrafficking
taking thousands of dollars in bribes.
including five rabbis
corruption
New Jersey,
44 people
a new investigation into poor record keeping
who is buried in a grave marked "Unknown."
buried cremated remains at a grave site already in use.
As McHugh ordered the new investigation, the Army released results of a separate investigation of problems at the cemetery. That investigation focused on the discovery of the "Unknown" grave.
Army Secretary John McHugh
Henry Okah.
of treason, terrorism and kidnapping.
"a Los Angeles hospital."
Los Angeles hospital."
has been hospitalized in the latest stage of her battle
Area's rail system.
San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge
Monday,
two steel rods and a steel crossbeam
Bay Area's rail system.
France's famous Louvre
Egypt
The Louvre
an independent homeland
to "release" civilians,
70,000
urged Sri Lanka's Tamil rebels to "release" civilians,
trapped
territory in northern
seize control of Somalia and oust Ethiopian forces,
an official warning from Al-Shaabab about the airport's closure,
is we're monitoring the situation very closely," Leedham said. "We have employees down there, and so we're monitoring the situation."
Ethiopian
Howard Leedham
restaurants and boutiques,
"McDonald's
the Louvre.
Carrousel du Louvre,
McDonald's
the contributions of Hispanic Americans to U.S. culture,
contributions of Hispanic Americans to U.S. culture,
Students
contributions of
an absolute failure.
I think it's time to consider all options, and I think it's evident
federal agents
$30 billion a year industry just moving the drugs across the
Mexico
Cleveland, Ohio,
a 50-year-old convicted rapist and suspect in the killings
None of the bodies has been identified,
Individual tales
Visiting a military hospital
many dedicated professionals and volunteers
is always an inspiring, shocking, beautiful, complicated experience.
open and fair elections in increasingly democratic systems.
cell phones
mobile phone
mobile phones.
elections
internet."
communication technologies like cell phones
cellphones
cellphones are particularly important for Africa due to a lack of some other technologies.
cell phones
not motivated by racial bias.
condemned the verdict and sentences,
group of young athletes ganging up on one person.
"The evidence suggests that Mr. Ramirez was targeted, beaten and killed because he was Mexican,"
their roles in the beating death of 25-year-old Luis Ramirez.
Luis Ramirez.
more than two dozen civilians were killed in a NATO airstrike.
holographic television
three-dimensional, virtual-reality television,
three-dimensional displays.
This image is an impression of
this weapon exists, but you already have it. He calls it "the gift of
noticed a UPS delivery box where it shouldn't be.
Many preachers
Mitt Romney,
JFK wanted to particularly stress that he believed in the separation between church and state. He believed that no one needed to worry about a Catholic bishop or a cardinal dictating to him as a president, and that freedom of religion included freedom for those to go to any church or not to go to any church at all.
emphasized the role of religion in public life more strongly than JFK
totally his business
Theodore Sorensen
privacy of religion,
Sorensen:
faith in politics
can combine live video with data and information from the Internet.
MacIntyre
merge the physical world with information compiled about people and places on the Internet.
Google's Android, T-Mobile's G1
the CDC
47
The University of California
522
324:
tips for school administrators to follow.
the CDC
reopening his case.
Cyrus Vance Jr.
30 B.C.,
Other discoveries include an alabaster bust of Cleopatra, and 22 coins bearing her "beautiful" image,
30 B.C.,
Actium
suicide
Cleopatra and Mark Antony
in a parking lot
in Mount Airy, North Carolina,
Hispanic
arrest warrant charging four counts of murder was issued for a suspect he identified as Marcos
Virgin Racing
in due course."
GP are to be rebranded Virgin Racing
sexual life"
make them more delectable
more than 2,000
"Chicken without sexual life"
At least 139 people
Another earthquake struck
Samoan islands
in the Samoan islands
been downgraded to Category 1
Karachi, Pakistan,
Cyclone Phet weakened
downgraded
down and rejected her pleas for mercy, stabbing the pregnant woman 16 times.
Atkins is paralyzed on one side.
seven people
Sharon Tate,
testing
infection diagnosed early, and were able to live long, healthy and productive lives with HIV.
adequate health care
While the security situation in Haiti has improved during the last two years, the public health system remains in disarray,
While the security situation in Haiti has improved during the last two years, the public health system remains in disarray,
the explosives were packed in a bag
at an eatery in the western Indian city of Pune
in a bag
local law enforcement,
1.3 million women
domestic violence calls are among the most dangerous for police officers.
Karen Earl
Authorities
they said, they plan to return and rebuild.
Mumbai, India's, Garib Nagar,
the home and about 20 others around it were
storm
north Pacific waters,
the demise of Bobby, a silverback, in December.
London Zoo.
One female gorilla shrieked in delight, while another wedged the poster in a tree to stare at it.
posters of their prospective boyfriend
two
Stern, 40, and doctors Sandeep Kapoor, 40, and Khristine Eroshevich, 61,
Howard K. Stern and two doctors
conspiring to furnish drugs
an accidental overdose of prescription drugs.
Smith,
conspiring to furnish drugs
The law not only makes it illegal to manufacture lead-laced products, but it also makes it illegal to sell them no matter when the products were made -- and stores found breaking the law could face fines of up to $100,000 per violation.
new rules
ban lead content beyond minute levels of 600 parts per million in any product
"With the economy the way it is right now, we all are concerned about safety, but we don't want to unnecessarily be impacting jobs and businesses,"
lead content beyond minute levels of 600 parts per million in any product for children 12 and younger.
Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change
gaining girth,
Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change
4.8 billion
32 billion tons of
1.2 billion tons
32 billion
Africa,
absorbing nearly one-fifth of the CO2 released by burning
Two
Lufthansa
two dozen partner
over protracted contract negotiations centering around pay and job security.
is likely to bring millions of tourist dollars.
Wizarding World's
World of Harry Potter
Southern California
Wednesday.
Cape Town International Airport.
fell from a wing
"Everyone started panicking."
object had been sucked into the engine
able to fly long enough to dump fuel and make an emergency landing at Cape Town International Airport.
No one was injured.
Nationwide Airlines'
presidential biographies.
lives of U.S. presidents
That we should listen respectfully to others.
Clinton and Bush
upward mobility, a linchpin
Laura Zuniga and seven men
Laura Zuniga and seven men
Monday
an ancient border temple on disputed land.
continuing standoff with Thailand over an ancient border temple on disputed land.
6:13 p.m. Wednesday evening (1:13 a.m. Thursday ET),
six-year-old daughter's
in the front yard,
evolving security threats and unsustainable debt,
police the world.
Jon Huntsman.
protect America and her people
protect America and her people
eight women and 15 children.
at least 28
28
a drone
was wounded in a drone attack this month, and that he died and was buried last week.
late 2008
Muzaffar Hussain Beigh
being involved in a 2006 sex scandal,
chief minister of Indian-administered Kashmir
The chief minister of Indian-administered Kashmir
body
gunshot wound to the head,
Scott's family
every week on "Mad Men."
a 3-year-old boy
samples of the tape
3-year-old Briant Rodriguez's
May
samples of the tape
green Ford Bronco
a daughter of working-class Puerto Ricans raised in Bronx public housing projects, diagnosed with diabetes at 8, losing
force a full public debate about constitutional interpretation, probing Sotomayor's judicial philosophy and refusing to accept nonresponsive answers that mouth platitudes or avoid taking firm legal positions.
Fidel Castro,
changing the relationship with Cuba.
in particular, have voiced outrage over the easing of relations.
he is in favor of changing the relationship with
the Congressional Black Caucus
Heart attack.
Mitt Romney,
New York city officials
U.S.
no.
Sporting Lisbon
Timisoara
has no evidence that any
The White House
"Hundreds of military and government agency witnesses
extraterrestrial presence
scientists and mathematicians...
mosque in Rawalpindi
strong military offensives against Taliban insurgents in the Swat Valley and South Waziristan.
300 worshippers
Iran
uncertain and declining oil revenues and
women,
Promising greater individual freedoms to Iran's young people was instrumental
the neurochemical oxytocin makes people trustworthy.
directly causes people to be moral.
we tempt people with virtue and vice using money
it makes us happy.
of 100,000 CHF ($97,500).
12
100,000 CHF ($97,500).
October 22
apologizing for a "confluence of events"
we are truly sorry."
"Bill Clinton is one of the most intelligent, charismatic political leaders that we have seen in a generation, and he has got a lot of wisdom to impart,"
Unity,
universal health care, good jobs and good wages, clean energy, lower gas prices, the things that are really going to make an impact on people's lives,"
Shreve Stockton
the Daily Coyote.
into the trailer
gigs of the radio and television shows "House Party" and "People Are Funny,"
"Kids Say the Darndest Things,"
Safire,
He won his Pulitzer in 1978
New York Times,
Vice President Spiro Agnew's denunciation of journalists
Al-Mabhouh, a founding member of Hamas'
allegedly
Egyptian
Azza Fahmy.
Egyptian
a prohibition of the ownership of more than one residential home and one vacation home.
law that allows for the sale of real estate.
we have made a series of bad choices
I think personally he is a good man who loves his family and loves his country,"
$700 bailout bill that Bush and Congress authorized before the election.
Senate
"always thought [Bush] was a good guy."
"failed policies"
America
Two charter buses
expected to bring heavy snows in
up to a foot
10 new inches
Snohomish, King and Pierce Counties.
Two charter
seeking to preserve memories and the history of
computer celebrates its 25th birthday
boxy Mac desktop.
Cahan,
Mac desktop.
Macintosh computer
We've had 25,000
go to a disaster-stricken
an organization Parness created to honor the support that other cities provided after the 2001 terrorist attacks.
sleeping on a cot in his office,
saving money
go home
officials or police department can be trusted to act on their reports. Students also need to feel confident that they can report trouble without fear of retribution from their peers or being called a snitch.
Students
do, which phone numbers
"bystander effect":
the idea that the Richmond students did nothing because of the "bystander effect":
benign,
no food by mouth for about a week,
The ulcer was biopsied and is benign,
Playboy model
been a personal relationship" between Smith and the two
dosages were "dangerously high."
1990.
many states lack adequate resources to handle young inmates given long sentences, including a lack of proper jailhouse counseling. Few studies have been conducted on the psychological effects of young defendants facing
United States.
expulsion of international aid groups
Omar al-Bashir, now an indicted
1.1 million
13
Sudan,
"It's a challenge. Life is a challenge sometimes, but this is different. And I like to test myself.
Susan Boyle,
A clip of Boyle's performance on the talent show
health problems,
DES
an array of reproductive complications and other problems, including infertility.
has continued to rage between Russia and the western ally since Thursday, when Georgia launched an operation to crack down on separatists in South Ossetia territory.
"I expressed my grave concern
aggression against Georgia "must not go unanswered."
aggression against Georgia "must not go unanswered."
at the Masters tournament
April,
relatives, especially those
Sheriff Bill Blanton
South Carolina
Villahermosa,
80 percent of the
rising waters,
Tabasco
Heavy rains and flooding
homes flooded,
80 percent of the city flooded,
The Grijalva River
Villahermosa
eastern port city of Valencia.
Anatoli Karpov
Chess legends
48
144
"Jody was beside me in every decision I made as a candidate, governor, and president, and I could always depend on his advice and counsel being candid and direct."
personal loss
Monday.
More than 690
More than 690
Princess Diana's
Burrell
her mother,
Paul Burrell,
to listen in on a conversation in June 1997 with her mother,
Burrell
the dot-com bubble burst
Jane Fonda.
results of last week's election.
cricket players from Pakistan
value of the market
Salman Butt and Mohammad Asif
allegations,
between $40 billion to $50 billion dollars
child sexual assault charges.
three male members of Jeffs' Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ
leader and "prophet" of the estimated 10,000-member FLDS,
Transportation Security Administration.
"making mistakes" when a company he formed overbilled the
withdrawn his name from
has withdrawn his name from
Thursday.
admit a Palestinian state as a member of the international organization.
special cutting and sewing machines
football
older women
Vakhegula Vakhegula,
soccer
blood pressures...
the Nkowankowa township, 600 kilometers north of Johannesburg.
World Cup football
World Cup football
right-wing extremists
President Clinton
how it felt to help the journalists,
how it felt to help the journalists,
getting rid of racism,
racism
most Americans
Two-thirds of people polled
Fifty-six
Two-thirds of people polled
Obama
Democrats
survey released Tuesday said they favor the stimulus package that President-elect Barack Obama is proposing; 42 percent were opposed.
Fifty-six
64 percent in a CNN poll of polls in
more than six in 10 Americans
63 percent
63 percent
more than six in 10 Americans approve of the job he's doing as president.
John Singleton
February 12
February 12
said as the plane prepared for takeoff. "If the pressure's just too much, I, you know, I could always call in tomorrow."
co-pilot of a plane
runner-up for worst choice.
53 percent
discussed contraception.
Hispanic community
teens do not use contraception is that they are afraid their parents might find out.
the disparity and why Latinas now have the highest teen birth rate among all ethnic and racial groups in the United States.
support the decision, saying
Some
parents
this "highway" mentioned in Chapter
"highway" mentioned in Chapter 35 is actually Interstate 35 that runs through six U.S. states, from southern Texas to northern Minnesota? Some Christians have faith that is indeed the case.
Interstate 35.
six U.S. states, from southern Texas to northern Minnesota?
along the side of Interstate 35.
through six U.S. states, from southern Texas to northern Minnesota?
Minneapolis
Isaiah Chapter
of Holiness."
Isaiah Chapter
held prayer sessions
from southern Texas to northern Minnesota?
Iwo Jima
a P-51 fighter pilot
Yellin and several other veterans made the day-long trip to Iwo Jima from Guam on March 3 with the tour company, Military Tours. Each man had his own reason for going, but all left united through the shared experience of an event that only a few can understand,
of Iwo Jima
Japanese and American associations of Iwo Jima
Korean state-run media.
South Korean anti-submarine exercise
the sinking in March of a South Korean warship.
meet "confrontation with confrontation" and war with "all-out war,"
of the past decade
Malay Islamic party,
former prime minister Mahathir Mohamad's
was shortlisted for the Orange Fiction Prize in 2004.
"waste of money," an "abomination" and "depressing."
"waste of money," an "abomination" and "depressing."
sculpture of a giant white horse
giant white horse
posed as a "corrupt longshoreman's union official, stationed at Port Newark, who had the ability to clear imported cargo through the United States customs and border security measures without detection or seizure,"
held 'noodles,'
Chi On Wong, 36,
a "corrupt longshoreman's union official,
The estimated value of the genuine versions of the goods
Six men
Abdullah was one of 11 men charged Tuesday with conspiracy to commit federal crimes, including theft from interstate shipments,
The fatal shooting of an unarmed man in Oakland, California,
The Rapid Report System also lets users send
the online system
Cell phone footage
Monday
youngest person ever to reach the summit of Everest,
advance base camp on Mount Everest in Nepal.
Mount Everest
"a number of options and directions."
"a number of options and directions."
he described as the deficiencies and "partisan nonsense" of both major political parties, and injecting advocacy journalism into his coverage of topics ranging from free trade to immigration.
64,
64,
CNN President Jonathan Klein,
deliver a major speech
stressed the need for a two-state solution
the need for a two-state solution
Israeli President Shimon Peres
state governor N. N. Vohra.
had blocked a highway leading into India, preventing their crops from getting to market.
Hindu protesters
upset that Hindu protesters had blocked a highway leading into India, preventing their crops from getting to market.
"The most important job I have had
his successor
power struggle
Andry Rajoelina,
Rajoelina
Kraft's
fresh bid for suffered a double blow Tuesday as the improved
rejected
Warren Buffett
Ryan Kelly,
a community of Net-savvy users
his software
Internet proxies
funding,
Aaron E. Carroll.
is one of the cheapest insurance programs
More than one in five children in the United States is living in poverty.
Judge Qassim Aboodi,
the issue of elections
that the United States is pressuring
Kurdish leadership" to accept a compromise
U.S. proposals would favor the province's Arabs and Turkmen,
"highest levels of the Kurdish leadership"
a temporary injunction
filed the complaint against the Orange County Sheriff Office and District Nine Medical Examiner's Office,
a temporary injunction against release of the footage, which
help free people from debt.
Kevin Cross
frying pan, a toaster oven, a blender and a wooden sawhorse and an electric saw.
This money missionary helps people destroy those little plastic shovels, otherwise known as credit cards, that so many people have used to dig their way to financial ruin.
for his conversion from thief
charged with fraud and theft, and spent minimal time in jail.
he claimed sexually abused him as a teen,
Madeleine McCann,
Madeleine McCann,
a missing 4-year-old girl,
missing 4-year-old girl,
missing 4-year-old girl,
Rose Pizem,
police
his longtime girlfriend, Regina Lasko,
David Letterman
Regina Lasko,
a son, Harry.
David Letterman married his longtime girlfriend,
The Indian
the Oberoi
British authorities
hotel,
160 people
least 160
"The Mosquito"
young people
five pythons and two venomous tarantulas.
United States
officials in Sydney
the parcel,
five Americans
he regularly goes online to watch attacks on the U.S. military in Afghanistan and that he left comments praising the actions. That caught the attention of militants, and he eventually was contacted by a person named Saifullah,
4,000
President Robert Mugabe's policy of redistributing white-owned farms to landless blacks.
400 farmers
Democrats' proposals to overhaul health care.
Rep. Eric Cantor
it's important to make sure the bill is one with a "common-sense approach."
the House minority whip,
gubernatorial
Jenny Sanford
the wife of Gov. Mark
public exposure."
Jenny Sanford,
Arctic Sea
6,500-ton cargo of timber
Cape Verde,
Women
Women
Women
streets of Tehran.
on Friday,
by the end of June.
Bear Stearns
The firm's short-term creditors refused to lend the firm any more money and simultaneously demanded repayment of outstanding debt.
$30
Bear Stearns assets.
for being his "hero"
his "hero"
praised her for being his "hero" during the ordeal.
cuts in health care spending
Democrats' health care
our children will
their jobs.
about the possible Ticketmaster-Live Nation merger were really, really unhappy.
Kindle DX reader.
Apple
sexually abusing underage boys.
Vietnam and Cambodia.
images were capable of being restored,
images
Interpol)
sexually abusing underage boys.
the Internet
Vietnam and Cambodia.
digitally reconstructed photos taken from the Internet
showed him sexually abusing underage boys.
sexually abusing underage boys.
the Internet
unscramble the image.
of a South Dakota urology clinic
nearly 5,700
may have been exposed
he has been diagnosed with cancer,
later this month.
Mouseketeer on Disney's "The Mickey Mouse Club,"
"The Notebook"
Ryan Gosling
"investigating the circumstances"
number of local charges,
Author Garrison Keillor
Garrison Keillor
Keillor, who turned 67 last month, was admitted to St. Mary's Hospital
Garrison Keillor
"Fantasy Island"
Mr. Roarke on the hit drama "Fantasy Island"
"Star Trek II: The Wrath of Khan."
Wednesday
be an actor.
Ricardo Montalban
"The brakes showed no leaks, no locked brakes,"
the captain,
landing gear were inflated.
Denver, Colorado.
38 people,
Denver International Airport
aimed at improving a soldier's mind, body and spirit.
"Resiliency Campus"
soldiers
for a minor acute illness such as strep throat, upset stomach or headache.
retail medical
Atlanta Hartsfield
treated by a doctor or physician assistant for a minor acute illness such as strep throat, upset stomach or headache.
quick, inexpensive care to travelers
also offer preventive care including physical exams, routine vaccinations and
I believed he was the rightful heir to Ronald Reagan and that his conservative principles and ideas would continue to build on the foundation that President Reagan had established.
believed he was the rightful heir to Ronald Reagan and that his conservative principles and ideas would continue to build on the foundation that President Reagan had established.
Jack Kemp's
intellect and force of personality helped guide the Republican party.
the Republican
Ed Rollins
respect democratic norms,
Costa Rica,
Africa.
help nations trapped by hunger and extreme poverty, donating billions of dollars on health aid
Business interview with Bill Gates.
commemorative
Fifty
full refund
the O2 Arena in London,
the home
Savannah, Georgia,
Savannah, Georgia,
historically accurate
Italianate and Victorian homes she encountered in Savannah
fewer babies.
slipped a whopping 9%.
the number of babies ages 2 and under fell 3% last year while disposable diaper sales slipped a whopping 9%.
an average of $1,500 a year for
2.8%
uses his art to comment on important issues of the day widely reported in the worldwide media
cartoonist's illustration
who decry the Jewish state's treatment of Palestinians as oppressive and brutal.
government leaders to listen and then act on the issues most important to them.
We were encouraged to hear President Obama speak this evening
Bob McDonnell.
"Parents, clergy, coaches, teachers and other role models
New Year's Day 2009
1,980
parents, community leaders and all caring adults
10 a.m. ET Thursday at Washington National Cathedral.
quarterly results
its current level of $1.52 per
Under the terms of the agreement,
Wildland Firefighter Foundation
more than 500 families.
injured and fallen wildfire fighters and their families
along the New England coast and points north.
that everybody stay off the beach,"
Katherine Jackson
Debbie Rowe
Debbie Rowe,
Debbie Rowe
Mexico City
Mexico City
"And still they hadn't left; they were inside the car. And one man said to the other, 'Let's shoot him because he's becoming annoying.'
got in and drove off with Cruz inside.
about 60,000
60,000 vehicles were stolen in just over
Mexico City, Mexico,
Mexico City, Mexico,
is having a "procedure on her heart,"
"procedure on her heart,"
Oscar winner
Michael Jackson
tantrums
"developmental disorder that appears in the first three years of life, and affects the brain's normal development of social and communication skills."
about one out of every 150 babies born each year.
language issues, repetitive movements and difficulties connecting to others,
language issues, repetitive movements and difficulties connecting to others,
She's doing really well so far. I think she's going to shock a lot of people, and I think they will love her personality. She's really bright and bubbly.
Ballas:
Mark Ballas,
"Two Kids, One Hall."
"The Complete Sailor"
"The Lorax"
Wednesday
later in the day.
abandoned residence
masterminding a fake blood injury to one of his players.
in masterminding a fake blood injury to one of his players.
masterminding a fake blood injury to one of his players.
Diego Maradona, football
Dean Richards
Lance Cpl. Maria Lauterbach,
Cpl. Cesar Laurean's
beneath a barbecue pit
does not match that of the unborn child, who also died.
cannot
Radovan Karadzic's
two years and possibly three.
cannot
he had not had sufficient time to prepare his defense.
him to come
Radovan Karadzic's
political level of the Taliban probably isn't ready to think about reconciliation or any kind of accommodation
the Taliban
will only negotiate with the Afghanistan government when
"The political level of the Taliban probably isn't ready to think about reconciliation or any kind of accommodation at this point,"
"The political level of the Taliban probably isn't ready to think about reconciliation or any kind of accommodation at this point,"
All 155
got into both engines of US Airways Flight 1549
Germany
Germany
persuade Zeca Schall, a German citizen who came from Angola 21 years ago,
is a member of the Christian Democratic Union,
the Christian Democratic Union,
says his party may have enough votes to stall Democratic health care reform.
select a puppy
facing opposition from Republicans and fiscally conservative "Blue Dog" Democrats worried over the costs
the opportunity to home in on a key argument:
a ski lesson
visible sign of injury,
a donor cadaver.
of the entire back
Social reincorporation
woman
The woman
breathe through her nose, smell, eat solid foods and drink out of a cup,
Grateful Dead concert
Goldfarb traveled the West Coast in a Volkswagen
last show on the 2009
The Pentagon
Pyongyang
North Korea rocket
about 200
North Korea
opportunity to learn about the entertainment and sports industries.
underserved communities across the country
about the entertainment and sports industries.
Usher Raymond IV
more than a hundred teens from underserved communities
Rep. Chris Smith,
father, David, in the United States,
to Rio de Janeiro
from their home in New Jersey
44 meters long (145 ft),
luxury
bred a new strain of flood-tolerant rice
could withstand being submerged in water for 17 days.
half
Bangladesh and India.
after the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001,
"America a special gift" by re-opening the crown, Interior Secretary Ken Salazar said.
on July 4,
"This isn't just important for your own life and your own future.
"This isn't just important for your own life and your own future.
President Obama's back-to-school
that Obama's speech would disrupt an already-hectic first day of school for many students.
"I believe this is the greatest country on Earth,
students
fought to have her feeding tube removed,
17 years
doctors determined to be irreversible brain damage in a 1992 car crash,
Englaro's father, Beppino,
nearly $5 million
bind to the ribosomes, preventing them from making the proteins the bacteria need to survive.
Americans Venkatraman Ramakrishnan and Thomas Steitz and Israeli Ada Yonath
are an organism's protein factories.
Inside all animals, plants and bacteria
"arrogant powers" and "enemies" of Iran of interfering in his country's affairs, including the post-election situation.
"is the key to the success of a nation."
street demonstrations
success of a nation."
"the most free election anywhere in the world."
"arrogant powers" and "enemies" of Iran
a memorial to victims of United Airlines Flight 93
eminent domain
to take private property for public use without an owner's consent,
September 10, 2011,"
a field,
180 miles from Port Aransas, Texas,
crackers, bubble gum, beer
One day after the Coast Guard called off a weeklong search
kept their bodies alive with rationed crackers, bubble gum, beer and three gallons of
180 miles from Port Aransas, Texas,
off the coast of Somalia
container ship
25
security problems in the region.
Asif Ali Zardari
Hamid Karzai
Asif Ali Zardari
Taliban militants
Taliban
Afghan and Pakistani leaders
security problems in the region.
the milk industry
cheese.
variety of cheeses
more than 1,000
milk
book
these tensions to create a new kind of politics,"
the author
a group of PKK,
Iraq
PKK,
PKK,
is known for producing rock music with a country influence.
role as a bride in the 2007 movie "License to Wed"
singer-actress
Ryan Adams.
Jimmy Sturr
110
best Hawaiian music album, best traditional world music
best polka album
vivacious dance music
Yemenia Airways jet
228
early Tuesday,
as Ruxin's (Nick Kroll) father.
Jeff Goldblum
Japan
long silence
15 of the last 18 U.S. presidents
U.S. President Barack Obama and Vice President Joe Biden make use of the White House
As a golf enthusiast, and
tradition of golfing presidents
disrupted air traffic operations.
The activity on the 10,197-foot peak is "more energetic than that of the previous several days. However, it is still less vigorous than that observed last weekend,"
100 miles southwest of Anchorage,
sprouted below the Mason-Dixon Line.
No
"People
Waterboarding
Kiriakou said Zubaydah had been waterboarded for "about 30 seconds, 35 seconds" and agreed to cooperate with interrogators the following day.
sealed victory for the the 'Super Eagles'.
Austin, Texas,
meteor-like fireball
something burning and falling really fast,"
something burning and falling really fast,"
asteroid
returned to the United States
Bagram Air Base near Kabul
Bagram Air Base
Baghdad's Mustansiriya
status-of-forces
U.S. troops in Iraq
possibly renegotiating parts of the deal with Iraq
at Baghdad's Mustansiriya University.
to close their shops during daily prayers,
their bodies and heads
community activist and organizer
the green-jobs handyman.
Motivation and, more importantly, aligned goals, are absolutely
having better ideas than your competition:
Motivation and, more importantly, aligned goals, are absolutely
"nothing more or less than a new combination of old elements." It's
"nothing more or less than a new combination of old elements." It's
having better ideas than your competition:
outdoor festivities celebrating the crustacean
bike.
southern Sweden and eastern Denmark.
Copenhagen,
Malmo is located just 35 minutes by train from the Danish capital of Copenhagen,
by foot,
Sweden
Americans
To keep them in jail
five
evidence associated with the death of Marilyn Monroe, the 1963 "onion field" case
"Behind-The-Scenes: The LAPD Homicide Experience," at the Palms Casino Resort in Las Vegas, Nevada.
"a cheap bid for attention."
police in Los Angeles,
clothes
Felix Batista,
Kidnappings
a close look at the carrier,
the Iranian maritime patrol aircraft
Bush
"enemy combatant"
Peoria, Illinois,
You have to keep it together for your kids and for yourself too. I'm trying to learn from the things that have happened in my life, live more in the moment, and have more fun.
You have to keep it together for your kids and for yourself too.
about an hour,
The Insectarium, New Orleans, Louisiana
Pauline Frommer,
The Field Museum of Natural History
the pirates during an attack Wednesday on the U.S.-flagged container ship Maersk Alabama in the Indian Ocean.
The FBI is launching a criminal investigation into the
on a piece of "mission essential" equipment in the new wing: the toilet.
is working on a compromise in which it would slap the droll Colbert's name on a piece of "mission essential" equipment in the new wing: the toilet.
ANC
Kgalema Motlanthe,
Ten South African ministers and the deputy
African National Congress Deputy President Kgalema Motlanthe,
Ten South African ministers and the deputy president
Kgalema Motlanthe,
green
Scot Case,
green products often more expensive than ones that don't say they are green
should raise a red flag?"
if the company fails to provide proof of their environmental claims.
pilot and co-pilot
Atlanta, Georgia,
pilot and co-pilot of a small cargo jet were killed
pilot and co-pilot of a small cargo jet were
dinner table political discussions were part of his upbringing.
everybody
Luke Russert
Luke Russert,
Luke Russert
vote?
everybody
Florence,
Alan Dershowitz,
"Sunny" von Bulow
trying to kill her
Her husband, Claus,
nine
helps people make decisions.
Hunch
Caterina Fake,
Hunch, a site open to the
have reduced his sentence, possibly to time served, and
sprung him from prison months earlier.
will be more conservative, more alert and more appreciative of the blessings bestowed upon him,
sociology,
bombing attack
August of 2008
$16,000 per call,
the Federal Trade Commission.
telemarketing calls
Banks, telephone carriers and most charitable organizations are also excluded from the ban,
Banks, telephone carriers and most charitable organizations are
environmental sustainability
Prix Pictet
12
that the prime minister dissolve the parliament within 15 days.
anti-government protesters
demanding that the prime minister dissolve the parliament within 15 days.
The opposition group, also known as the "red shirts,"
Nonnie Dotson
Denver, Colorado,
a nurse in the U.S. Air Force,
Shakhtar Donetsk striker
Shakhtar Donetsk
Cristiano Lucarelli
Italy
scoring twice
Raffaele Palladino
Glasgow
Arkansas
killed one soldier and wounded another at a Little
off Maine's Acadia National Park
several thousand
of tourists
white tiger mauled a zookeeper
second keeper and other zoo staff
at the Zion Wildlife Gardens near Whangarei,
at the Zion Wildlife Gardens near Whangarei,
Joan Claybrook
adding an axle
Safety advocates
she felt a tremendous sense of responsibility to the
Betty Ross,
"The Incredible Hulk."
Bill Bixby and Lou Ferrigno.
report of flames,
The aircraft returned to Atlanta without incident,
flames,
that they had been airborne about 10 or 20 minutes when one of the engines appeared to catch on fire.
Cross,
the Mojave National Preserve,
cross
California desert,
first
accepted an investigator's
Joe Jackson
lack of a really effective vaccine,
many patients fail to finish the long course of treatment,
TB
tuberculosis
resources, drugs and diagnostics
a new class of TB drugs
Ripken's latest project is a business principles book called "Get in the Game: 8 Elements of Perseverance That Make the Difference,"
is a businessman, team owner, radio-show host and author.
The couple never counted on owning a home.
around $350,000
England
drugs
around $350,000
the 2008 season.
in luggage
50
22 sovereign Indian nations,
ancient cliff dwellings
holiday packages.
about 30 miles north of New York
"I've never seen her drunk since the day I met her,"
death of a Georgian competitor
death of a Georgian competitor
crash
1979,
no
New Year
Tehran
train the Afghan army
"an increased number of fighters" coming into Afghanistan from Pakistan's lawless tribal regions.
Pakistan's
Greensburg
more than 90
a biodiesel facility
a biodiesel facility as
Another
Aiming high is a good strategy,
President Obama
"Throw it with some force, don't lob it in there. Try to get a good downhill plane. Try to keep it in the strike zone,"
Cincinnati Mayor Mark Mallory
have increased
Gulf of Aden,
Rangers
2-1
who have three games in hand ahead of Sunday's trip to Aberdeen.
0-0
In Saturday's other game, second-bottom St Mirren drew 0-0 at home to fellow strugglers Kilmarnock to be left seven points ahead of Gretna.
Gordon Strachan's team head the table by three points
who have three games in hand
3-2
Gordon Strachan's team
Rangers,
crew of 46 and four passengers
Sweden and Finland
crew of 46 and four passengers
a jewelry store
a man in connection with a brazen daylight robbery
The league's owners
Wednesday and early Thursday morning.
blamed the Bush administration for failing to capture or kill Osama bin Laden
"Bin Laden
bin Laden's will,
Democratic staff of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee
Bush administration
sued the owners of this dry cleaning business for $54 million
lost a multimillion-dollar lawsuit
over a missing pair of pants.
Pearson was taken off the bench
salmonella called Typhimurium.
on I-10
minivan blew out a tire
Saturday
Thaksin Shinawatra,
The Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania and Duke University's Fuqua School of Business
an online community that seeks to match the brightest new grads with
"reaching for talent."
approximately 600,000
600,000 members.
Wharton
Hajj
at airports
it will set up quarantine centers at airports as another preventative measure.
more than 230
230 cases of the H1N1 virus
a 30-year-old man
could be trying to achieve survival through deceit,
Some signs show North Korean leader Kim Jong Il does intend to drop his nuclear weapon program,
has been instrumental in getting North Korea to cooperate.
desperate economic straits,
murder, torture and
The complex
Wednesday.
26 bodies buried in mass graves and a bloodstained "torture
Iraqi police,
Iraqi police,
"Evidence of murder, torture and
"torture complex"
intimidation
Montana and South Dakota
Her vote tally was 263,120; his was 121,458.
victory in Puerto Rico
15
Wednesday night,
15 inches possible on some areas.
24 hours.
punching businessman Marcus McGhee.
They accepted the Liverpool captain's version that he acted in self defense
businessman Marcus McGhee.
going-away party
Tuesday
T.I.
federal weapons charges.
performed to a packed crowd Sunday,
trip to Rio from CGED
Nine of those employees had
a training seminar and vacation,
four U.S. Marines urinating on three dead Taliban fighters
answers to the more than 100 questions filled out
prospective jurors may have said outside the courthouse and online about events surrounding the June 2009 death of pop star Michael Jackson.
their answers to the more than 100 questions filled out
involuntary manslaughter
jurors
the military
called Defender M
United States,
a type of rayon
'spaceports'.
Scissor Sisters
passage of Proposition 8,
May
May ruling by the California Supreme Court that struck down a 2000 ban on same-sex unions.
California
same-sex weddings that took place before Tuesday are still valid.
over the passage of Proposition 8,
Dalai Lama,
how one looks at one's self and not to be carried away with one's ego."
Dalai Lama,
Dalai Lama,
very aware of one's self and how one looks at one's self and not to be carried away with one's ego."
captured seven
Indian Ocean
"It's going to blow people away even with these high frigging expectations that everybody has."
Friday,
Grim Sleeper's
11
$500,000
9-1-1 tape
police say murdered from 1985 to 2007,
the Grim Sleeper's
"Grim Sleeper,"
"Grim Sleeper,"
January,
was arrested
Boston
suing the city
Harvard professor Henry Louis Gates, Jr.
Santa Cruz County,
Sierra Nevada and foothills
heavy rain
California
8 inches
Pecht,
Antony Anderson,
John Hanson, Toyota's spokesman
electronic problem in our electronic throttle control systems
conducted by Toyota are not adequate.
fun-loving, generous, down-to-earth,
Prince Harry
her public
"Who's cheating?"
"It's a testament to the writing by Doug Ellin, the creator of the show. It's just on the page,"
he's the kind of agent that I'd certainly like to have if you're that actor trying to go after that job.
Adam Davies on the HBO show "Entourage,"
Ari Gold.
Lloyd.
about $12,000 up front,
BOULDER, Colorado
Six weeks of paid time off.
Colorado
thousands of people perished in a massive quake
moderately strong
no immediate reports of injuries
Thousands
Kercher
the home
Knox
as a resentful American so angry with Kercher that she exacted revenge during a twisted sexual misadventure.
resentful American so angry with Kercher that she exacted revenge during a twisted sexual misadventure.
and two doctors were charged
hotel room at the Seminole Hard Rock Hotel and Casino near Hollywood, Florida.
accidental overdose of prescription drugs.
two doctors were charged this month in California with conspiring to furnish drugs to Smith before her fatal overdose.
Broward
overdose of prescription drugs.
king's
Saudi people,
not
Janet's perfect for that job.
Gov. Napolitano
no family.
Department, Arizona Gov. Janet Napolitano. Here is
Janet's perfect for that job.
owed the same consideration.
as 10 new
Michigan,
2010.
BMW
Barack and Michelle Obama
"fist bumps"
gesture used for meeting, greeting, and sealing a deal.
Barack and Michelle Obama
H1N1 swine
H1N1
security staff
man suffered a broken leg,
steward
"a badly bruised leg."
Powerful storms killed 22
Georgia Gov. Sonny Perdue
sales of the
$29.99
a public outcry
"I'm pretty excited that they agreed with me, they see that it was wrong for the school to do that,"
unreasonable but that individual school administrators could not be sued.
13
the search was unreasonable but that individual school administrators could not be sued.
online message threatening suicide.
custody
"Thanks everyone for reaching out to the San Jose PD i am told they are aware and no need to call anymore. I do not know this woman."
Police
Actress Demi Moore's
three times a week since September,
"Still Unforgettable."
130 kph (80 mph),
Nesat,
Nalgae,
52
one
currently third in the drivers' world championship
Sebastian Vettel
Sebastian Vettel
finish in the top four
north of Baghdad,
Emberton, England,
new vehicles that are more fuel efficient.
Sable
that started this month, Sable took a $4,500 federal credit this week to trade in the Jeep and buy a new, more fuel-efficient Chrysler PT Cruiser. And Chrysler, eager to sell vehicles, threw in its own $4,500 incentive.
Sheryl Crow, Eddie Vedder, Ben Harper, Moby, Bettye LaVette
Sheryl Crow, Eddie Vedder, Ben Harper, Moby, Bettye LaVette and Jim James.
will fund the David Lynch Foundation's program,
Paul, Ringo, and Paul Horn
Beatles Paul McCartney and Ringo Starr
teach transcendental meditation
that the box allowed him to communicate without speaking.
Garrido and his wife,
Garrido and his wife, Nancy,
communicate without speaking.
for my actions.
Ensign
"I violated the vows of marriage. It's absolutely the worst thing I've done in my life.
John Ensign of Nevada
2 pounds a week,
to lose more weight.
10 pounds
slows somewhat over time,
Michael Jackson died Thursday, and my family gathered by telephone from Florida, Texas, California and Georgia to mourn and remember.
He pained and puzzled us, but we still loved him.
The Due sisters
Michael Jackson
Michael Jackson
died at age 60.
1995
heroin,
heart attack,
6-1
pull him back
A number of federal and state agencies, including the FBI,
A number of federal and state agencies, including the FBI,
partly submerged in a stream in Shark River Park in Monmouth County
Multiple law-enforcement agencies
(8th)
The Democracy Index 2011,
25
about $7 million worth of gold,
hid gold in makeshift slits in her purse.
not enter a plea to charges of first-degree grand larceny and first-degree criminal possession of stolen property,
25
a jewelry company in Long Island City,
David Gergen
"very brave man,"
the opposition
"very brave man,"
"I would certainly find out if he (Moussavi) wants a conversation,"
A member of the royal family of Abu Dhabi
the administration has held off on the ratification process because it believes sensitivities over the story can hurt its passage.
A member of the royal family of Abu Dhabi
torture session is delaying the ratification of a civil
videotape
pay your debt down or pay it off entirely."
successful business owners and moderate to wealthy individuals.
Christine Levinson,
bid to exchange him for Iranians
March 2007.
Kish Island
"This was justice because the correct conclusion
Vince Weiguang
decapitated
the international space station.
final planned
two space
Good Samaritan
she was having trouble breathing
the pilot
automatic external
emergency room physicians and a service able to translate 140 languages
an American Airlines
Democratic
Obama
John McCain,
Democratic Congress.
Latinos, especially immigrants.
Latinos,
hate crimes
against ethnic Hutu, backed by Congo.
Democratic Republic of Congo
conflict in eastern Congo.
Rwanda
Rwandan genocide
"It wasn't long after my father married her that he started being sick,"
overseeing the killings of almost 8,000 Bosnian Muslim men and boys in the town of Srebrenica in July 1995.
Ratko Mladic,
federal prosecutor
leading a racketeering conspiracy that included a murder.
assistant U.S. attorney
14
Anthony Kennedy.
fired for insubordination and "regrettable" conduct toward church leaders.
Albert Pujols
that Albert Pujols is a pain in the rear.
Saturday
Mogadishu,
expressing its intent to send U.N. peacekeeping forces back to the unstable nation,
suicide attack
peacekeeping forces back to the unstable nation,
1991.
vacation
South Africa's Cape of Good Hope.
South Africa's Cape of Good Hope.
Jarrett Bellini
four U.S. service members
Air Force Chief of Staff Gen. Norton Schwartz
in a large blue plastic container on an uninhabited island in Galveston Bay, Texas,
two to 20 years in prison,
container on an uninhabited island in Galveston Bay, Texas,
to tampering with evidence in the case.
Galveston, Texas,
woman accused of killing her 2-year-old daughter
"Baby Grace."
on Okinawa.
Obama
authorization to work in the United States.
Yamato Engine Specialists in Bellingham Washington,
Law enforcement officers enforcing the law?"
with basic needs such as housing, food and education.
Seminole
more than 100
promote Native American-owned businesses and services.
is intended to help tribes with basic needs.
Sufi Mohammad
the government is not serious about implementing Islamic law, or sharia, in the region.
the Pakistani government and his son-in-law, Maulana Fazlullah,
Sufi Mohammad
Sufi Mohammad has announced he has pulled
saying the government is not
first African manned shuttle into space.
"The Dynacraft."
the Ugandan
has
second round of snow and ice,
Most winter weather advisories and warnings
Haiti,
El Estor
about 115
45 minutes after takeoff,
about 45 minutes after takeoff,
prepares clients for the difficult questions that will come their way during a job search.
Generation Y
Twitter
résumé writer
CareerBuilder.com,
first photograph
"The Taliban are concentrating forces in Mingora
Kabal, Kanju and Mingora
2 p.m. local
have been concentrating forces there -- digging trenches, laying mines, taking positions on rooftops,
the Taliban
relaxed until 2 p.m. local time Friday
some 1.5 million people
taking minors across state lines for sex,
Alamo, the 75-year-old founder and leader of Tony Alamo Christian Ministries,
Evangelist
Authorities
1994,
Israel has not demonstrated that it will conduct thorough and objective investigations,
Israel's investigation
committed war crimes during the conflict, which killed about 1,400 Palestinians and 13 Israelis.
about 1,400 Palestinians and 13
Israel has not demonstrated that it will conduct thorough and objective investigations,
40 militants and six Pakistan
Hundreds of militants, believed to be foreign fighters, launched attacks
40 militants and six Pakistan soldiers
Pakistan's border with Afghanistan
requested that his ashes be mixed into the ink used to print the first trade paperback anthology of Squadron Supreme,
her Maltese,
$80-million estate to her dog, Gunther.
2-1
North Korea
his take on a colorful career,
that the boss he's respected and admired for nearly three decades is "very transparent on the air
Shaffer responded that the boss he's respected and admired for nearly three decades is "very transparent on the air and you can
organize supply drives,
worst flooding the city has seen in decades.
Bangkok
Thailand's
"Our homes
first lady Barbara Bush will spend the night in a Houston, Texas, hospital Tuesday night
Houston, Texas,
all of the tests were negative.
Gates' credit, he realizes that
to get rid of racial profiling
Henry Louis "Skip" Gates Jr.
questioned by a person of color.
"Hillary: The Movie,"
it broke the law on campaign advertising.
"Hillary: The Movie,"
Hillary Clinton,
in a couple of months.
requires an on-screen notice of the groups financing such ads as well as public disclosure of all donors to the sponsoring organizations.
in a couple of months.
an eye condition that occurs when the central portion of the retina -- called the macula -- begins to deteriorate.
age
age-related macular degeneration,
Cold lasers are now used to freeze the abnormal blood vessels responsible for destroying the macula;
age
known as non-neovascular, and the wet
At least 15
destroyed four homes
An Indonesian military
An Indonesian military transport
At least 15
Peru,
a dozen soldiers and two civilians
"narco-terrorists"
a fierce government crackdown in the mountainous region of Peru.
The rebels
Mexico
criminal gangs and drug cartels."
Obama administration
Mexico isn't a failed state, but the fate of its drug war is important for US.
is the real deal, and so is the threat to both Mexico and the United
the second Canadian female soldier to die in Afghanistan.
A roadside bomb in southern Afghanistan
117th
Trooper Karine Blais, 21, is the second Canadian
the minister of the interior
Interior Minister Juan Camilo Mourino
United States,
13,
Mexico's interior minister
Al-Jaafari
non-binding
one of my best friends
sorry for you
Facebook
one of my best friends
one of my best friends had ditched me
"hate rhetoric"
are asking authorities to investigate whether the slaying was a hate crime because the victim, Jorge Steven Lopez Mercado, was
Puerto Rican authorities
three
Thailand
NASA's Terra
urbanization being done blindly,"
tried in a military court instead of a civilian one
a fair
he killed a young woman
affidavit,
kept a magazine photo of Levy in his prison cell,
2001,
Dorothee Burkhart,
Sunday.
resulted in a tsunami that toppled buildings,
Chile
8.8-magnitude
Matthew,
claimed the child as a tax dependent for several years
went on a shooting rampage in a Los Angeles suburb on Wednesday, police say.
a car
"She was standing in front of the hotel and said to him, 'You are so hot.'
Hunter,
assumed aliases and resided in various expensive homes in North Carolina and, more recently, in Santa Barbara, California.
New York,
terrorists
suspected 9/11 terrorists
gang leaders
Colombia and Mexico,
efforts to weed out corruption in the nation's prisons,
saying the attacks were in retaliation for the recent transfer of several gang leaders to high-security prisons.
sing the right kind of song for his voice,
12-year-old Welsh boy
not addressing working families.
understand" key issues the country is facing,
McCain
Sen. John McCain
John McCain
repeatedly said Obama "doesn't understand" key issues the country is facing,
Francesco Schettino
29
at least six
The captain of the cruise ship that wrecked off Italy's western coast
Somali children
nearly half
economy is bad, people don't ride cabs."
emigres like Hagi
nearly half of
humanitarian assistance,
relatives living in places like Somalia,
optimistic
complete overhaul of the country's economic foundation
said, knew that Americans "want clarity.
most critical event
Ronald Reagan's
some of Reagan's favorite rhetorical
Facebook
users
scammer
pop up warning
Websense,
scammers and hackers.
basketball
get everyone involved, until it was game point and
everyone
sharia, or Islamic
Mosa Khankhel
He had been shot three times and his killers had attempted
Swat Valley
$86,000
$86,000
send in their military forces
government troops
that the AU
called on Djibouti, Ethiopia, Kenya and Yemen to send in their military forces to help government troops stop hardline Islamist militants from taking over.
AU
Islamist militants
Djibouti, Ethiopia, Kenya
vaccine
be monitored two months for safety issues, followed by a four-month and six-month checkup.
animals,
the H1N1 virus
the H1N1 virus
Kaoru Yosano
exports
12.7
another settlement freeze
British Foreign Secretary William Hague
expressed disappointment.
the action proved that the government of Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu was not serious about making peace.
United States
an example of a child star who managed to avoid the pitfalls of fame and emerge with a successful career and a happy marriage.
rubbing suntan lotion all over her.
said fans are often very forgiving of stars for their bad behavior.
LeAnn Rimes
singer-actress
disagree strongly with and was offended by Professor Bloom's portrayal of Iowa and Iowans.
"Iowa is a throwback to yesteryear and, at the same time, a cautionary tale of
Iowa
depressed, crime-infested slum town"
disagree strongly with and was offended by Professor Bloom's portrayal of Iowa and Iowans.
in Standish, Michigan,
The Taliban
at least 17 people
Cameron Sinclair
listeria
123
the outbreak
Rocky Ford brand cantaloupes
their incestuous father
20 years
in a cellar
receive treatment at a local clinic near Amstetten
eastern Pakistan,
more than 250 people,
eastern Pakistan,
police officers.
shooting
U.S. Sen. Richard Shelby of Alabama
5.4 million
seized a major military camp
50 rangers
seized a major military camp and a spacious gorilla park
"Over 50
they would buy a motorhome and travel around the United States to NASCAR events.
wanted to volunteer in other countries, some wanted to find new hobbies, some just wanted to relax for a change.
they would do if they had all the money they needed.
more than 500
CNN Hero?
more than 500 mammograms to eligible women.
Vaclav Havel,
his public writings
the former Czech president, writer and dissident
fans
Spain
after the last World Cup.
Spain
might never see them again
"stand tall, stand firm."
I might never see them again and that I'll never be able to tell them I love them again. I'll never be able to hug them.
Pfc. Bowe Bergdahl
"stand tall, stand firm."
is scheduled for Tuesday,
New York
Barack Obama's
Princess Diana.
a snow-capped mountain and skier wearing red and yellow clothes coming down the mountain.
painted mural of a snow-capped mountain and skier wearing red and yellow clothes coming down the mountain.
Cherrie Mahan
the van
wallet, driver's license,
everything he had
nearly 30,000
are currently on different coasts
who recently returned to TV in "Two and a Half Men"
Panama's
"And I make a call to all our opposition -- to all the parties that opposed us -- that you all are all Panamanians. ... Tomorrow we have to start a new day."
An engine problem
An engine problem
"I am shaking ... People were screaming,"
American singer songwriter
Jack Kerouac
American singer songwriter Tom Waits'
Tom Waits'
Koko
Queen of the Blues
blues award show,
died Wednesday
"Doodle 4 Google,"
Google's main site
"out of the current crisis, discoveries will be found to help the Earth prosper once more."
this year's winner of "Doodle 4 Google,"
a yearly competition that asks K-12 students to dream up their own variation of the logo.
Christin
Courtney Larrell Lockhart
Courtney Larrell Lockhart's mother Catherine Williams
North College Street, a few miles north of campus.
1.3 million Americans have been the victim of a fake check scam,
checks and
five days.
-- If it seems suspicious, consult your state or local consumer protection agency,
the time needed to process checks
within one to five days.
doctors at another nation's hospital would not accept a truckload of food and water from her. Nor would they let her pick up patients to take back to the University of Miami field hospital,
increasing patient load
"I think if I had known that she was gay, I wouldn't have been brave enough to talk to her,"
"My gaydar was way off!"
coming elections in the Ivory Coast
Jackson's wife, Jacqueline,
Amon N'Douffou V, king of the Krindjabo kingdom,
Rev. Jesse Jackson
The coming elections in the Ivory Coast
Hong Kong International
grimy terminals, rude staff, confusing layout,
it's not known
it's not known
Debbie Rowe
Debbie Rowe and an unidentified woman
Vicente Carrillo Leyva,
blame drug cartels
in a park in a residential area of Mexico City,
in a park in a residential area of Mexico City,
He should have met with the family, given them comfort on the last hours of their son."
independent autopsy
"Please do not despair, because Michael will continue to live on in each and every one of you,"
"They (Jacksons) didn't know the doctor. ... He should have met with the family, given them comfort on the last hours of their son."
Carrie Prejean
The Web site that published the first picture published a second one Wednesday. It had already promised to "slowly roll out" more photos.
semi-nude photos
to "continue to support and defend marriage as the honorable institution it is,"
TheDirty.com
ripped roofs off several homes and left twisted metal and other debris scattered across the area.
Lone Grove,
Oklahoma.
a lingerie modeling photo published online this week is the only one
some semi-nude photos she appeared in.
semi-nude photos
Carrie Prejean
Shane Mosley
Intel's "Nehalem" processor.
new Mac Pro high-end desktop
the world's most energy efficient desktop computer."
the audience."
gay soldier
policy banning gays and lesbians from serving openly in the military
graduate school at the 1,500-student Urbana University.
financial
The gunmen also took hostage Lunsmann's 14-year-old son, Kevin, and her 19-year-old Filipino nephew, Romnick Jakaria,
Suba Kampong township
from an insurance company
accidentally strangled herself
insurance company
Phoenix's Sky Harbor airport
Carol Gotbaum,
memorial to service members who have died in Afghanistan.
paraded alongside his fellow British servicemen
paraded alongside his fellow British servicemen
around 200
The parade and memorial
the Academy for Learning, a Dolton high school for special-needs students.
not adhering to the school's dress code.
Dolton high
3 million people
India's northeastern state of Bihar,
almost 3 million people
3 million
DJ Grooverider,
the United Arab Emirates'
DJ Grooverider,
Buchenwald,
concentration camp Buchenwald,
cited various problems in
Stars and Stripes,
In a story on its Web site, the newspaper known as Stripes said the military violated a congressional mandate of editorial independence by rejecting a
the military violated a congressional mandate of editorial independence by rejecting a request to embed reporter Heath Druzin with the U.S. Army's 1st Cavalry Division,
units in Iraq remain committed to the media embed program and appreciate objective media reporting,"
ICE
shipping containers,
organized crime,"
$41
Apple-focused blogs
defend against marauding desert nomads
3,700-year-old wall
The wall is believed to have been built by the Canaanites,
CITÉ SOLEIL, Haiti
Cité Soleil
Cité Soleil
are important. The music is important. The season is important.
seasonal CD
Barack Obama
more than 900
no human remains amid the scorched wreckage,
more than 900
High winds
the semifinal showdown between Liverpool and Brian Clough's Nottingham Forest.
The disaster at Hillsborough football stadium in 1989
John Gates.
$19
rooms for $19
Rancho Bernardo,
John Gates.
$19 a night.
that Iran does not develop a weapon of mass destruction."
An Iranian regime armed with nuclear weapons
Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu
An Iranian regime armed with nuclear weapons
An Iranian regime armed with nuclear weapons "is a great danger to all of us, to Israel specifically and to the moderate Arab regimes, [and] to America,"
House Minority Leader John Boehner.
Facebook
that an estimated 60 percent of users are considering quitting Facebook over privacy issues.
there is a backlash and that they've got
anti-riot police
pro-reform activists
she has lost 10 kids from her class so far this year and is braced to lose more.
most foreclosures of any state
resilient.
resilient.
Modesto, California,
apocalyptic
in the U.S.
Democrat
Rep. Roy Blunt
Peru
state of emergency in a remote northern
'You don't have the right to be here.' No way. That is a huge error."
exploitation of their native lands
at dawn
Gingrich had vowed earlier to run a positive campaign.
GOP candidates
ascribed to many potential policy tools
ascribed to many potential policy tools render sensible options taboo,
to appear wishy-washy
Rudy Ruiz
willingness to change one's mind in the light of new evidence
Garrido,
are looking into whether Garrido was connected to the 1989 disappearance of Ilene Misheloff.
Police in Hayward,
Dugard, kidnapped
best modern electronic and sailing equipment.
CNN MainSail presenter Shirley Robertson
Pakistan's recent arrests of "significant players" in the Mumbai attacks.
top military officer in the U.S.
"significant players" in the Mumbai attacks.
Pakistan's recent arrests of "significant players"
politics of midterm congressional elections
oil spill in the Gulf of Mexico
came two weeks after Sens. John Kerry, D-Massachusetts, and Joe Lieberman, an independent from
expanded offshore oil drilling as part of a strategy to increase domestic production. However, provisions strengthening the ability of states to prevent more drilling off their coasts were added in the wake of the Gulf of Mexico oil spill.
caused a potential Republican co-sponsor, Sen. Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, to drop out of the talks
With the support of my family,
the support of my family,
It's the best fun in the world.
nothing but
I want them to take their time. I'm more interested in whether they like each other
Mehdi Kazemi
rejected an asylum plea
Spandau Ballet
October 13
the legitimacy of that race.
Arroyo and her husband were directly involved in an Internet broadband deal with a Chinese firm.
allegations of corruption.
to address
currency manipulation.
Tim Geithner
dozens of Internet videos of the violent demonstrations on Dec. 23-24
called "100 Million Facebook Members
Twitter:
serious injury and death
Israel Defense Forces
it ignites and burns on contact with oxygen and creates a smokescreen at night or during the day to mask the visual movement of troops.
over populated areas in Gaza.
Samuel Eto'o
45 million euros
45 million euros ($64m) plus Eto'o for Ibrahimovic
Thirty-six
Thirty-six
he had sexual relations with the
sexual relations
2004,
personal purchases.
financed a sex-and-drugs workplace with investors' money.
alleges Bernie Madoff financed a sex-and-drugs workplace with investors' money.
Aniston, Demi Moore and Alicia Keys
stories of different women coping with breast cancer
women coping with breast
tells stories of different women coping with breast cancer in five vignettes.
player to make the last eight of the Australian Open by beating Ukraine's Alona Bondarenko 7-6 6-4.
Serena Williams
Fort Knox,
President Warren Harding
Sarah Knox Taylor Davis
a couch in Harding's Senate office
President Obama
President Obama
a young athlete
dizziness, vomiting, headache and confusion
after a head injury,
dizziness, vomiting, headache
pass on information directly from the Confederate
espionage
the Confederate forces.
freed all her family's slaves. She also went so far as finding where her freed slaves' relatives were and purchased and freed them also.
warning Stonewall Jackson that the Union intended to blow up all the bridges around Martinsburg.
Belle Boyd
executed by a firing squad on October 15, 1917.
2,500-bed facility
in western Oklahoma,
North Fork Correctional Facility
a prison riot
piece of trim tab, an aerodynamic surface on the tail of the plane, separating from the plane at the time the pilot lost control.
the full schedule of races
conspiring to deprive and depriving Dahndra "Ervin" Moore of his right to engage in a federally protected activity
entering the convenience store
the Stop and Shop
the elder Blue
Thomas Blue Sr.,
the syndrome of 'me, too,'
the charge Tuesday against 19-year-old Ruben Jurado,
of shooting and paralyzing a U.S. Army soldier
involving premeditation and the use and discharge of a firearm causing great bodily injury,"
officers
airport appear to have properly followed procedures when they allegedly forced a woman to remove her nipple rings -- one with pliers -- but acknowledged the procedures should be changed.
officers
100 years after the sinking of the Titanic,
sail in April 2012,
This is no time for days off from
signed the Edward M. Kennedy Serve America Act, substantially bi-partisan legislation that included a provision formally establishing September 11 as a "National
September 11
11
to add some of the better suggestions from the Republicans addressing these issues
pay more and get less.
not to be the biggest or the richest."
focus and simplicity,"
Frederick Dominguez
California Highway Patrol
a culvert
heavy snow
Frederick Dominguez
Mexico
killed in a gunbattle with federal authorities,
Braulio Arellano Dominguez,
Braulio Arellano Dominguez,
1821
will create dangerous floods in a populated area in south Iceland,"
November,
More than 100
in the early 1980s.
Senate Minority Leader Mitch McConnell
The measure
was 51-43.
permitted lawsuits against the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, the oil-producing cartel, and suspended deposits into the Strategic Petroleum Reserve.
Democratic senators
President Obama,
the GOP
Molotov cocktails, rocks and glass.
"It all started when the military arrested one man, and then an hour later he emerged from building barely able to walk from the beating,"
"It all started when the military arrested one man, and then an hour later he emerged from building barely able to walk from the beating,"
intersex
discovered I was "intersex"
At the age of twenty-six,
Rafael Marquez, Dani Alves, Gerard Pique and midfielder Yaya Toure
Eric Abidal
to his left leg.
Gonzalo Higuain
relationship counseling.
couples go to the Eden Resort, which is offering a great package deal on relationship counseling.
great package deal on relationship counseling.
Vince Vaughn and Jon Favreau
Vince Vaughn and Jon Favreau
In the film, couples go to the Eden Resort, which is offering a great package deal on relationship counseling.
couples go to the Eden Resort, which is offering a great package deal on relationship counseling.
between June 20 and July 20,"
urging families to put safety first when celebrating with fireworks.
The Consumer Product Safety Commission
reported that the force will be used to fight military aggressors, conduct anti-terror operations, battle regional drug trafficking and respond to natural disasters. The force will be based in Russia under a single command, with member nations contributing military units.
military force to combat terrorists and respond to regional emergencies,
five
a Portland, Oregon, church group
Twenty-four people,
three
gas explosion
at a ski resort near Whistler, British Columbia.
the ice buildup that exerted 800 tons of pressure between the two parts that hold the tower together, causing them to
David Alvarez,
Post-it Notes.
David Alvarez,
Post-it Notes
more than 2,000
lowering the soaring health-care costs
the economy
$819 billion economic stimulus package
soaring health-care
have his own skin transplanted onto the burned areas of his back and buttocks,
murder in the second degree
15-year-old
October 12
will have his own skin transplanted onto the burned areas of his back and buttocks,
"To the western nations, soon, God willing,
March 20,
March 20,
"To the western nations, soon, God willing, A new speech by the Lion of Islam Sheikh Osama Bin laden, The reasons of the struggle in the 60th anniversary of the Israeli Occupation,"
won't be able to
iPad
and patrons won't be able to enter the ballpark with one in their possession.
lasted up to more than six minutes
Shanghai
four hours
Garrido
crimes relating to the abduction of 11-year-old Jaycee Lee Dugard
documents he gave to the FBI would be key,
kidnap
Terrorist leader Osama
"Iraq is the perfect base to set up the jihad to liberate Palestine."
bin Laden,
of ridiculous
[director] Gavin [Hood].
Former Cuban President Fidel Castro
impending change
Penn,
Carlos Pose
of his recent conversation in Havana with RaÃºl Castro,
great person.
she lives by the philosophy, "Negative out, positive in."
she lives by the philosophy, "Negative out, positive in."
You learn that you're happy inside you,
often don't realize they already have it.
don't believe we deserve any more than we have."
1
at least 24 hours
"I mean, I'd never, ever guessed that coming into
more than a day,
Spiridigliozzi and Perry will get to wander outdoors again once their fevers have dissipated for at least 24 hours
1 percent of the student body,
about 400,000 people
246 celebrity hand and footprints
concrete is mopped
December 1933
worsening case of bronchitis
he was hospitalized (Sunday night)
10 years ago
ice shelf nearly 10 years ago
140 square km (54 square miles),
about 1,700 km
massive iceberg
someone decapitating the blindfolded lady and smashing her head into pieces.
projected path shows it moving north toward New England and then Canada.
Sunday evening,
should start seeing large swells
Atlantic island
3 storm
"cowards."
attempting to carry out "genocide" against the Palestinian people.
"genocide"
Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez
the increasingly bloody ground war in Gaza.
Hugo Chavez
radar and lifting
militia members supporting President Robert Mugabe's party
opposition party Movement for Democratic Change,
embassy officials
tax rate rise
on identifying a man charged with one of a number of deadly wildfires
two requests from CNN to respond to the complaints.
triglycerides
The fatty particles found in your blood
triglycerides
majors and also the Ryder Cup are particularly collectable and ones from the 1930s and 1940s
majors
$800.
trespassing
killed by Komodo dragons
Francis Ford Coppola,
Argentina
Francis Ford Coppola,
visit the child in the hospital Friday.
He said he rescued his sister from a fire in Romania that killed their father.
Christopher
still alive?
rescued his sister from a fire
is expected to recover,
industrial complex in the North
fully reopened its border to South Koreans on Tuesday,
the industrial complex in the North
Cross-border gates between North and South Korea
India.
general election
Voting
client told him he is innocent.
Indonesia
devastated by massive deforestation.
a government initiative to bring back the Garut province's devastated forests.
two saplings
Newly married couples must
plant two saplings
50
'70s-era
fact-based
corporate turncoat,
take his own life.
a series of injuries since 1988
has suffered a series of injuries since 1988 that have left him with limited foot movement and the ability to wriggle only one finger.
admitted striking Hill
FBI
Police
West,
beaten
which recognize the worst films of 2008.
Myers'
which recognize the worst films of 2008.
£383,325 ($627,000),
£41.6 million ($68 million) to £35 million ($57 million)
Ramsay's British restaurants
in Paris, Los Angeles and Prague,
11
$130 million
the big-spending Spanish giants
World Player of the Year,
by June 30.
The judge
Judge Herman Thomas
Former Mobile County Circuit Judge Herman Thomas
Lebanon
Beirut
for trial by 2010.
management and executive
approximately $150 million.
approximately $150 million.
the world's fourth-largest PC maker,
world's fourth-largest PC maker,
Saudi Arabia,
President Ali Abdullah Saleh
Independent Spirit Award nominations
"Precious"
"Precious,"
pressure of the oil which is gushing out with significant force.
try to cap the well using an underwater robot
experiment had failed.
the leaking pipe
try to cap the well using an underwater robot
are small enough to plug gaps between the rope and tires and strong enough to withstand the pressure of the oil which is gushing out with significant force.
Stephane Peterhansel,
Stephane Peterhansel,
David Casteu,
"Bruno."
Sacha Baron Cohen
"Bruno."
hungers after fame
covering up sexual
Arthur Budzinski,
The Vatican
"The problem I have with the word is that it seems to encompass movies that don't fall under that category,"
Caesar,"
said he is a huge fan of blaxploitation films
people's pride following the gains of the civil rights era.
a relative
found dead,
Professor Barbara Carroll,
Neighbors
Zinkhan's daughter
100-plus
2020s or 2030s,"
NASA
2030s
Guantanamo Bay.
"There's no indication of
Kyle Garlett
Ironman World Championship,
the first heart transplant recipient to complete the Ironman,
rape of a young girl.
he knows who the baby sitter is, but would not release that information because of the ongoing investigation.
Chester Arthur Stiles,
who the baby sitter is,
the care of a baby sitter
A young girl
Chester
mountains
al Qaeda's extremist ideology
Faisal Shahzad
campaigned for her mother
Hillary Clinton,
Hillary Clinton,
police arrested 160 protesters
of California,
at least 15 people
reducing students' class options and increasing their expenses.
San Francisco affiliate KGO
Bernard Kouchner
since 1988,
nuclear program was not conventional diplomatic behavior.
the possibility of war against Iran over its nuclear program
Nicolas Sarkozy's conservative government,
French Foreign Minister Bernard Kouchner's
paid $100,000
wide leather seat
There's a wide leather seat and alongside that, a standalone bed. This is two meters long with Givenchy duvets and cushions. And for couples traveling, the beds on the middle two suites can be converted into double beds.
A380's first return commercial flight between Singapore
between $1,500 and $5,000.
23-inch widescreen LCD. Laptops can be plugged into an in-seat power supply and business travelers with just a thumb drive can plug this into a USB ports and access a suite of office tools on Singapore Airlines' in-flight entertainment system.
between $1,500 and $5,000.
on the middle two suites can be converted into
completed its maiden passenger journey
majority paying between $1,500 and $5,000.
Athar Abbas
He describes the conflict in Swat as "an existential threat" -- a
Washington is too focused
that the portrayal of that conflict to the West will be critical.
Afghanistan.
safety of Pakistan's nuclear arsenal.
five students at Live Oak High School
T-shirts bearing the American flag
told the youths to either turn their T-shirts inside out or go home.
conservatives
the amount actors should be paid when their movies or TV shows are distributed on discs or through new media, such as mobile phones and the Internet.
union.
amount actors should be paid when their movies or TV shows are distributed on discs or through new media, such as mobile phones and the Internet.
An elderly balloon salesman uproots his house with the help of thousands of balloons
thousands of balloons
capture that on the computer
a nonprofit organization calledTALICA
TALICA
create a positive change in some of their country's schools
highly revered status of martyr.
gunshot
"We come from different corners of the world, but we see the same thing,"
captures the death of a young woman named Neda Agha-Soltan,
for the remarks I made regarding Hitler
Nazi dictator's ability to "get things done."
Nazi dictator's ability to "get things done."
remarks in which he praised German Nazi leader Adolf Hitler.
rejected
an apology by Formula One
They cite "probable cause to believe" that the premises contained "records, shipping orders, distribution lists, use records relating to the purchase, transfer ordering, delivery and storage of propofol (Diprivan)."
Dr. Conrad Murray
drug addict.
Amanda Knox
meeting by Israel's decision to begin construction at the West Bank outpost of Maskiyot.
to discuss, among other things, the endorsement of a two-state Palestinian solution and relations with Iran.
Obama and Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu
Parents read them to their children, forming a powerful bond.
all classics share some characteristics,
"The Very Hungry Caterpillar"
123 pounds of cocaine and 4.5 pounds of heroin,
Firefighters Joseph Graffagnino,
blocked off by barriers erected to seal off floors being stripped of contaminants.
Robert Beddia
issue a
south coast of Japan
7.1
Warning Center
throughout his career.
Living Golf's
today, tomorrow,
controversial figure in Haiti. A former priest,
fleeing Haiti during a violent uprising in 2004.
Exiled Haitian president
"They came in with all guns blazing,"
Gautam Patel
"They came in with all guns blazing,"
to come together and "set a long-term goal for reducing" greenhouse emissions.
greenhouse gas emissions.
"all the world's largest producers of greenhouse gas emissions, including developed and developing nations," to come together and "set a long-term goal
initiative to develop a common approach to combat global warming
Christopher Savoie
Japanese
Japanese
the two nations' points of view
Repeal the Corporate Income Tax:
raise wages above market levels, increasing unemployment.
move toward faster withdrawal, and from both countries.
is senior lecturer in economics at Harvard University
Galaxy
the Eastern Conference title
the furore that followed his return to the LA Galaxy from his loan spell
"no one should have to see."
The train in front had stopped
of Columbia National Guard,
three people
Alex Ferguson
Old Trafford
referee Martin Atkinson for the amount of added time played,
Alex Ferguson
Suspected pirates
arrested nine more suspected pirates off the coast of Somalia
Suspected pirates
the Indian-flagged Premdivya sent a distress call to all ships in the area reporting that she had been fired upon by a small skiff, and suspected pirates were attempting to board it.
nine
Karen Schwarz,
Bolivia and Peru
the maritime dispute.
Bolivia has no grounds to claim the dance in the international court,
6-year-old
attempted murder,
India's Uttar Pradesh state,
man,
remain in jail as they await trial,
spying
former State Department employee and his wife,
their Cuban handlers,
conspiracy to act as illegal agents of the Cuban government,
police station in Pakistan's capital, Islamabad.
police station in Islamabad,
return to Japan with their children to live,
Christopher Savoie is in jail in Japan after trying to get back his son, Isaac, and daughter, Rebecca.
United States.
Isaac and 6-year-old Rebecca.
Solar
(Solar Water Disinfection Process) is already used by more than two million in over 30 countries.
the saguaro cactus
play a major role in saving lives in the developing world.
Whitewater River,
Whitewater River,
Adam Herrman
Adam Herrman
disappeared in Kansas almost a decade ago
videos posted at iReport.com,
the election.
they care a great deal.
issues
"market oriented, patient-centered, and result driven"
I fundamentally disagree,"
"market oriented, patient-centered, and result driven" measures such as
I fundamentally disagree,"
the president's assertion that Democrats' heath care proposals will rein in costs and eliminate waste and inefficiency in the system.
on the outskirts of Naval Amphibious Base Coronado,
"Prospective SEALs go through what is considered by many military experts to be the toughest training in the world.
to duty.
133
The clashes followed a dispute over an election that pitted a Christian candidate against a Muslim one
substantially higher
over the course of 18 days in December 2008
Muslims
Most of the
"He's had a fabulous and unprecedented career and that makes it even more tragic."
Lucien Gambarota,
economic viability.
portable floors,
pedal-powered computers on bicycles,
'California Fitness'
third
Orascom launches its mobile phone services in
"Mad Max"
conventional stereotypes of Australian culture as straight-talking and macho.
2007,
committed suicide
115 confirmed
The Army said that 128
at all unit levels.
1991,
President Obama and Defense Secretary Robert Gates
the family of Staff Sgt. Phillip Myers
died Saturday
Nafees Syed
crew of seven astronauts
for fake newsman Stephen Colbert of Comedy Central's "The Colbert Report."
in 1937
Friday.
have more than one confession in the case and the individuals will be charged with murder,
Sean Taylor,
Taylor,
F is for Free Culture movement Led by Harvard
Modifying software
online piracy debate.
in the hallway
mother and her infant
Murfreesboro, Tennessee,
mother and her infant were killed
self-imposed
consideration this year as it remains under investigation by the NCAA over allegations
joint inquiry to determine the true facts."
5:20 p.m.
performing non-screening duties
walked through an exit on the public side to the secure "sterile" side
Sunday's
Ciudad Juarez, Mexico,
Authorities
bullets.
Police
deployed to Iraq
captain in the National Guard and Delaware's attorney general
"I've come here many times before as a Delawarean,
Delaware
Delaware
region in Nigeria consisting of nine oil-producing states.
nine
the nomination is the "most humbling honor
the Bronx
Obama's
in the Bronx
in the Bronx
in the Bronx
could have a chilling effect on the religious freedom of citizens of all faiths
mosques
civil investigations
Federal prosecutors
Alavi Foundation
"concerned about alleged irregularities during the election process and post-electional violence
"followed carefully, and admired, the passion and debate during the Iranian election campaign.
"Pakistan
concerns raised by the U.N.
Pakistan's foreign ministry
Pakistan
see the doctor, especially if you're 40 and up,"
prostate cancer
a German citizen.
other countries
three people from other countries
in the Philippines.
Philippines.
Denny and 10 other martial arts enthusiasts
before the end of next month.
two years.
24 July 2009."
fencing
an asymmetrical workout.
chess."
Olympic medalist Sada Jacobson
town hall participants
$30 billion of the remaining Troubled Asset Relief Program funds
offering cheap capital to community banks that boost their small-business lending this year.
lipstick
Saudi Arabia?
first female minister
Abdullah
Norah al-Faiz,
the conservative ministers of justice and the head of the Commission for the Promotion of Virtue and Prevention of Vice with people closer to his way of thinking.
his faux-patriotic lapel pins
President Obama
the big, smart kid
"SDS: The Rise and Development of the Students for a Democratic Society,"
Occupy Wall Street
its demands.
Declaration of Occupation
Maria Sharapova
last 16.
She had shoulder surgery in August
Sharapova
the first woman to lead the Army's Drill Sergeant Training School.
governance, providing security, justice, jobs and services,
"That's great news, and this is just how I wanted to start my morning,"
she wonders if part of the appeal of plus-sized
struggles with weight
weight-loss
August 27.
conflicted about leaving the situation they've acclimated
Dugard and Chekevdia
to her face and hands.
Monday
friend's pet chimpanzee
primates and crocodiles should be added to a state list of animals citizens are not allowed to own.
Charla Nash,
extensive injuries to her face and hands.
pander to the far right wing of the GOP.
burned his bridges with most independent voters
Donald Trump
fierce fighting
Moammar Gadhafi's
American Civil Liberties Union
orders immigrants to carry their alien registration documents at all times
It's now awaiting the signature of Republican Gov. Jan Brewer.
following in Arizona's footsteps would take states in the wrong direction.
Polish
over 26 years
61st in its 2006 Hot 100 list.
Polish, Italian, French, German, English, Spanish, Croatian, Portuguese, Russian and Latin.
Joanna Crupa,
over 26 years
Marie Curie,
freshly dug trenches.
is a deeply spiritual country with great respect for the dead.
the loss of its entire crew of 645.
More than 300 of the sailors
Kormoran,
645.
Kormoran,
the first two weeks of the regular season
about $200 million in revenue,
Palestinian President Mahmoud Abbas
Palestinian President Mahmoud Abbas and Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu.
"It is time to show the flexibility and common sense and sense of compromise that is necessary to achieve our goals,"
"It is time to show the flexibility and common sense and sense of compromise that is necessary to achieve our goals,"
resolution of their decades-old conflict,
last week
nearly 25 years.
Sri Lanka
officially began in 1983.
young women
pursuit of higher education
the West Bank village of Anata,
women and girls throughout the West Bank,"
wear bracelets in memory
honor "prisoners of war, missing in action, killed in action, and those who died of wounds or injuries sustained in a combat theater,"
Amos
majority of deaths have happened not in the first wave, but later."
of a much more virulent disease.
1889, 1957, 1968
based on computer simulations that assume a flu virus with an R-naught between 1.6 and 2.4.
is that the majority of deaths have happened not in the first wave, but later."
good planning and good relationships between local state and federal authorities,
pedestrians, especially mothers or nannies
Lyon in southeastern France.
the school
A gunman
eight adults,
Shahar Peer
"I'm not sure it's a big deal for most voters. There's not a lot of support for the public financing system." Schneider said. "About a year ago, the polls asked people if they supported the idea that candidates and campaigns should be financed by taxpayer money ... and most persons said no.
"special interests [to] drown out the voices of the American people"
more than $272 million,
spend an unlimited amount of money during the general election.
national security issues
eight Republican
Newt Gingrich,
Newt Gingrich,
eight Republican
Republican presidential
more production
trim more production
In a TV exclusive, Abdalla Salem El-Badri, Secretary General of OPEC, talks
The Secretary General
the Middle East.
Middle East.
"I haven't seen snow like this in Bastrop in over eight years,"
inclement weather.
Vick "will be considered for full reinstatement and to play in regular-season games by Week 6 based on the progress he makes in his transition plan,"
Michael
charge of bankrolling a
has confessed to killing 15 girls,
outskirts of Basra,
drinking,"
"This one was killed because he was drinking,"
Iraqi army that executions often take place in the area,
Dutch soldier
at least 20,000 additional troops
deaths of two Israeli diplomats
deaths of two Israeli diplomats in Egypt.
Egyptian president Gamal
"BADBUL,"
exotic sports
Grand Ronde, Oregon.
Sadr
that a Sadr City cafe, which was a popular gathering spot for gays, was also set on fire.
Sadr City cafe,
a tribal meeting was held
a Sadr City
shot dead
She had been stabbed and beaten,
found dead in the bedroom of her Germantown home October 12. She had been stabbed and beaten,
Gypsey Teague
college football fans
for Dragon*Con,
Steampunk pirates
science fiction, fantasy, comics and gaming.
national election
Saturday
to meet with the Conservative Party
while a broader meeting between Liberal Democrats and the Conservative Party
the French Open,
104 in the world
Slovakia's
higher levels of flu activity
chronic heart and lung disease, suppressed immune system, diabetes, and obesity.
showed that the majority of the 30 patients who were hospitalized with H1N1 in California had other medical conditions, such as chronic heart and lung disease, suppressed immune system, diabetes, and obesity.
illnesses and deaths in the United States,
higher levels of flu activity
H1N1
Kenya's largest Kikuyu
Raila Odinga
allegiance to around 40 different tribes.
a member of Kenya's largest
opposition leader Raila Odinga
complicated man
the refusal or inability to "turn it off"
engine
Interior Minister Juan Camilo Mourino,
no trace of explosives
no trace of explosives
Learjet 45
500 kmh (310 mph)
Members of the predominately Orthodox Jewish Englewood community
the front lawn of a house owned by the Libyan Mission
ambassador to Colombia,
Hugo Chavez
take over Colombian companies operating in Venezuela if Colombia offends Venezuela
Venezuela's ambassador to Colombia, as well as most of the embassy's staff.
troops had found AT-4 shoulder-fired grenades
guerrillas were trying to buy anti-aircraft missiles.
to take over Colombian companies operating in Venezuela if Colombia offends Venezuela
Maurice Jarre
"Lawrence of Arabia" among others,
last month.
Voice of
60 groups
announced Friday that more than 4,000 former Gurkha
Have close family settled in the United Kingdom;
white "smoke" billowing from the left side of the Boeing 747-400 jet on takeoff and then again at cruising altitude of over 30,000 feet.
300 passengers on a United Airlines flight from Chicago, Illinois,
He videotaped the midair vapor from his window seat and tried to warn a flight attendant.
The jet
Gen. Stanley McChrystal,
at least 16 militants
Buner district
She and other children
above ground
19-year-old woman whose hospitalization exposed a shocking Austrian incest case
in the cellar
Kerstin Fritzl,
triggered by an 8.0 earthquake
Tsunami
is on rise on college campuses.
Jewish students
Daniel
was kidnapped and killed by al Qaeda extremists
Daniel Pearl,
she wasn't drinking at the time of the accident.
eight
he believes Diane Schuler may have suffered stroke-like symptoms and that a fire after the accident could have turned blood sugar into alcohol.
may have suffered stroke-like symptoms and that a fire after the accident could have turned blood sugar into alcohol.
a fire after the accident
150 million, or 20 percent, of the 750 million handsets
Some manufacturers, like Nokia, say they are working with the Chinese government
a turnkey solution
150 million, or 20 percent, of the 750 million handsets produced in China were either counterfeit or off-brand
This made it much easier and cheaper to build handsets and churn out
at 10 a.m. PT Tuesday.
for Michael Jackson at the Staples Center in Los Angeles is set
at the Staples Center in Los Angeles
their plans, which were part of "a package" of events
answer questions about where or when Jackson would be buried.
service would be held Tuesday morning.
Madonna
Madonna won a court appeal to adopt a second child from Malawi.
a rich foreigner and have a better life.
son of an infamous CIA double agent,
ordered that Nathaniel Nicholson, 24, can be freed
Judge Anna J. Brown
between accidents and high speeds on rural highways,
Their message of hope
group of eight musicians who are all physically disabled
more than 20
of hope.
Zimbabwe
Rocher Joseph-Michelet
Sekte Atis Lib, or S.A.L.
"We want to make the people, the survivors live better,"
Port-au-Prince, Haiti
families
a Republican political strategist and co-chair of the Hispanic Alliance for Prosperity
Obama
Elena Dementieva
ranked 80th
a back injury
3-2 in their second round clash.
No.4
Thursday.
China
devote more resources
almost 13 million
almost 13 million
hide them away.
Special Olympics
Special Olympics.
Fame comes with a cost, however, and the couple has become tabloid fodder with stories of interfamily squabbles and marital discord.
"Jon & Kate Plus Eight" and "18 and Counting,"
like TLC, Discovery Health
Defense Minister Juan Manuel Santos
Defense Minister Juan Manuel Santos
guerrillas,
19th
United States
23
Eighty-six
tested a sea-based component of its missile defense shield
an interceptor
Navy Aegis-class ships to protect against incoming short- to medium-range
www.beijingticketing.com
100% guaranteed
scam customers
primarily www.beijingticketing.com and www.beijing-2008tickets.com
the incident for Benedict is having to give up writing by hand,
wrist
and its commitment to resolving the North Korean nuclear issue,
Tuesday.
U.S. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton
on her first trip overseas.
Obama administration's
failed policies" of the Bush administration,
"bombastic exaggerations and fear-mongering"
failed policies"
Sen. John McCain
McCain called some of Obama's ideas "reckless" and questioned his understanding of America's standing in the world.
Obama
President Bush
"bombastic exaggerations and fear-mongering"
central Pakistani city of Dera Ghazi Khan,
at least 22 people
Trabant.
at the International Motor Show in Frankfurt in September.
The old-style Trabi is a common sight in Germany where tourist operators use the car for local tours.
simplicity.
dumped by their owners
auto parts
Trabant,
Gregory's new novel "The White Queen"
Gregory's new novel
"The White Queen"
subject of an intense manhunt
in the deaths of four Lakewood, Washington,
New York's John F. Kennedy International
New York's John F. Kennedy International
200 Haitians
15
67
Abu Wissam
trauma and pain
trauma and pain
victims and perpetrators
provided a forum for victims and perpetrators to give cathartic public testimony on human
a forum for victims and perpetrators to give cathartic public testimony on human rights abuses and come up with policy recommendations to correct the root cause of the abuses.
"After stopping his car, Brown and the woman got out and the argument escalated,"
at the Grammy Awards
the Grammy Awards
evacuees from California's wildfires
Daniel Brautigam,
the word "panic" came to mind to describe how some evacuees were feeling. "But it's not. People are just worried sick. That phrase alone explains it all."
stress and worry
Petty Officer Daniel Brautigam.
fatally beaten
they are looking for three more people in connection with the beating.
Derrion Albert,
2009.
minister for Interior Relations and Justice announced efforts this week to combat
"It's a combination of economic-driven crime ... with other types of gangs, to police abuse,"
Corps of Engineers
Nagin
the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers'
Lower Ninth
"Shorts"
Estero, near Fort Myers,
Chinese-made drywall
drywall
at least five
three U.S. soldiers and an interpreter
Two bombings in separate Iraq provinces
January 28
killed a sheik and a 5-year-old,
Baghdad.
female
"There was fear on their faces,"
engine fell.
fly long enough to dump fuel and make an emergency landing
100 hundred people
"intensive discussions"
"will not regain full sovereignty and independence without getting rid of these resolutions."
New Orleans
passenger
economic development
Michael Jackson,
He died at UCLA Medical Center.
"Thriller"
at his residence in the Holmby Hills section of Los Angeles, California,
suffering cardiac arrest,
the four questions from his opponents,
is pretty clever in these exchanges.
seven opponents, and four of them
Rick Perry doesn't seem to get any part of these debates right,
an anti-gay
"it pains me deeply that I may have hurt" his colleagues who "are members of the LGBT community."
an anti-gay
Madoff
heart attack,
March,
heart attack,
162,380,
GlaxoSmithKline
Rage Against The Machine
"It would be kind of funny if Rage Against The Machine got it."
Sir Paul McCartney,
sitting in water.
"It just came so fast,"
Six Flags,
swallowed by muddy waters as the rain refused
Anne Pressly,
Curtis Lavell Vance,
Anne Pressly,
Little Rock Police
he said it was "a very, very solid case due to solid detective work."
1,000
accused Iran of torturing
the allegations.
two men, two women and two boys
killed six people in a Memphis, Tennessee, home may still be on the loose,
The OTS
$32 billion IndyMac
Federal regulators with the Office of Thrift Supervision were "asleep at the switch" when it came to IndyMac's "reckless" behavior,
$40
650
100
apple cake
August 13
company DHL
22-24 tonnes of freight,
18,600
the transport of cars, equipment
the transport of cars, equipment and fuel
a safety officer
"He saved me. If it wasn't for him, I would not be here."
"With five people and four life jackets, we had to watch the person without the life jacket closely," he said. "These young men
They had a fierce will to live."
hanging out with people who can tell you more than a guidebook about the area's culture and hidden gems.
Make friends
Alexander McQueen
Champions League
Bayern Munich
St. Etienne
Thursday
runways in parallel configurations
Airport's new runway
planes to take off and land two abreast during inclement weather.
long-term effects of anti-virals on children.
from the University of Oxford found that while the anti-virals reduced the duration of illness by up to one day and a half, they had "little or no effect" on the likelihood of the children developing complications.
reduced the duration of illness by up
reduced the duration of illness
more harm than good,
the story of Bertha,
Charlotte Bronte
A tiny handwritten and unpublished manuscript by "Jane Eyre" author Charlotte Bronte
$100 million
pirates had been expected to release the Sirius Star, which they've held since November 15, after a ransom payment was parachuted onto the ship.
explosion
house,
Seattle, Washington,
Frankfurt Zoo.
in quarantine at the zoo
in a German zoo
4,500 meters (15,000 feet) deep, amid underwater mountains and mixed in with tons of sea trash.
Atlantic Ocean.
former Pakistani Prime Minister Benazir Bhutto
rise through the sunroof of her vehicle to wave to supporters
terror attack
indicted on federal charges
noose hanging from a pickup
Grant Parish,
indicted
civil rights
injustice in the handling of racially charged cases,
allegedly displaying hangman's nooses
allegedly displaying hangman's nooses
the hanging of nooses in a tree after a group of black high school students sat in an area where traditionally only white students sat.
shows a noose hanging from
Authorities there had been accused of injustice in the handling of racially charged cases,
displaying hangman's nooses
allegedly displaying hangman's nooses
hangman's nooses
WBO welterweight title
Philippines
American Floyd Mayweather
Floyd Mayweather Jr.
Christmas day
the Johnsons.
grandfather
Brown-Waite
observers and other page participants
Kenzo, Lee Cooper
own line of clothing
arrived in Chennai in 1971
Fabre
Christian Fabre,
fans
at age 34, she decided to get
Bernadine Nelson
Bernadine Nelson
students receive their GEDs.
Women in India
to have a working partner,"
One of the casualties of the global economic slowdown is the Non Resident Indian (NRI) groom. They were once considered premium
Food, water and medical supplies,
Drs. Claude and Yolene Surena
and eight U.S.-based relatives and friends
800,000 dead.
Hutus and Tutsis
one of Africa's most stable nations.
the privileged ethnicity,
said the new automobile battery should have "the size, capacity, cost and power to leapfrog the commercially available plug-in hybrids or electric cars."
the Fair Pay Restoration Act,
Sen. John McCain
someone to develop a battery that can "leapfrog" those available in current electric cars.
that can "leapfrog" those available in current electric cars.
Bogie and Bergman
Andrew Joseph "Joe" Stack III
Revenue Service
its own visual-and-audio experience,
interactive game,
the investigation file, with recommended charges,
an arrest warrant for reality TV producer
an arrest warrant for reality TV producer
$200,000.
15 years in prison.
DUI manslaughter
sample
$200,000.
computer science engineer, formerly CEO of Constructive Instruments
Jonathan Ive
€500 ($700).
an old Boeing 747
Stockholm-Arlanda
December 7,
"As the two largest consumers and producers of energy, there can be no solution
greenhouse gases,
Carol Ann Gotbaum being arrested at a Phoenix airport
his wife was distraught
being bumped from a flight
45-year-old
three
the streets of two cities;
at least four people dead; three soldiers wounded,
armed men in Escobedo.
18
West Milford,
three people
"sensitive" and valuable "military-grade" equipment.
in Washington
scopes and night-vision goggles
an open window
stunts ever pulled
the best stunts ever pulled off
Stuntman: Wayne Michaels
on NASA's Mars Reconnaissance Orbiter.
craters, valleys, ridges, channels, weird surface patterns and other features in incredible detail.
a new batch of these photos taken in the last several months.
They reveal an alien landscape of craters, valleys, ridges, channels, weird surface patterns and other features in incredible
in the last several months.
mounted on NASA's Mars Reconnaissance Orbiter.
They reveal an alien landscape of craters, valleys, ridges, channels, weird surface patterns and other features in incredible detail.
President Obama
about the slow pace of the economic recovery.
nearly doubling the child care tax credit for middle-class
limiting federal student loan payments
doubling the child care tax credit
Peruvian air force officer was spying for the neighboring country,
Victor Ariza Mendoza,
"give the corresponding explanations,"
the result of fear and an inferiority complex by the Chileans.
dismissed the espionage allegations.
has been no public talk of
"You have a disturbing disparity in how these laws are enforced,"
"You have a disturbing disparity in how these laws are enforced,"
that are ignored in some cases can be used to put other teens in prison and land them on sex-offender registries.
car dealership.
Cessna 172
near Vancouver Island, British Columbia,
authorities at the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center
175 miles west of the city of Vancouver
"Anna was the center of a cruel tabloid feeding frenzy,"
Howard K. Stern
conspiring to furnish controlled substances, unlawfully prescribing a controlled substance and obtaining fraudulent prescriptions
Monday,
Havana's Karl Marx Theater.
theater in central Havana
Actor Benicio Del Toro
Granma,
Benicio Del Toro
Granma,
"Che"
Benicio Del Toro
"Joyful Noise,"
Olivia
capacities of insight, creativity and innovation
institutions,
tend to stifle many of them and as a result we are fomenting a human and an economic disaster.
Sir Ken Robinson.
the deaths
in Brunswick, Georgia.
called to the home
Police have "no known suspects,"
Seven people were found dead Saturday at a residence in the New Hope mobile home park in Brunswick, Georgia.
in a Georgia mobile home,
Australia
the banks ignored her or refused to discuss the matter for privacy reasons
woman from the south coast of New South Wales,
Commonwealth Bank, ANZ, Westpac and NAB
"The New Promised Land:
I think Arrington truly believes everything he has
racial epithets
disorderly conduct, false imprisonment
the attack occurred after she warned West to be careful after almost hitting her 7-year-old daughter with the restaurant's door as she was leaving.
other players were also mentioned during the trial; they will be investigated and further action may also be taken.
the PCB
corruption,
was able to do.
Formula One
fourth place
the corporation
Thursday in Fulton County Superior Court,
"converted substantial funds from the estate's financial account at Bank of America for their own use."
deciding the duties of the new prime minister has been a sticking point in the negotiations.
Thabo Mbeki,
successes,
the quadrennial Republican attack line.
wound down Iraq and helped win back international respect,
Texas Gov. Rick Perry
a victory for all who stand in defense of life,"
"This clears the way for the enforcement of an insulting and intrusive
This will be the second
Naples
an Italian and six Africans
The Casalesi Camorra
second
southern city of Naples
Mafia
Alexander Deundray Draper,
of violating a custody order,
the boy was ordered into state custody because of medical neglect,
The FDA
promoting regeneration of the heart or preventing scar formation,
available in a little over four
bank or a company.
have a surface marker called CD34, which means they are capable of growing new blood vessels.
in a little over four years,
own stem cells,
U.S. Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice and Israeli Foreign Minister Tzipi Livni
Gaza.
northern and southern sections of Gaza.
stop arms smuggling into the Palestinian territory.
him
locations but had not
"Ten
two small high-speed motor boats and a mid-size, support vessel
the MT Chemstar Venus,
10
an upscale Bogota neighborhood
car bombing
the FARC guerrilla
hospital treatment
Olympic Stadium
Olympic Stadium
Manchester United
embassy spokeswoman
"I thought it was another rumor. My friend told me about it, and then
Michael Jackson
Michael Jackson memorial in Moscow.
along the fence in front of the Embassy.
visual-spatial processing,"
skills that are normally mediated by the right side of the brain,"
Born with only half a
rewired itself to take over functions controlled by the left.
routine delays.
air their grievances
Airline passengers who were trapped on tarmacs "like sardines in a can"
advocates of the Airline Passenger
others may be harmed."
faces and a tip hotline
with the girls' faces and a tip hotline
the memorial site set up at the crime scene,
have no suspects
in visiting the memorial site set up at the crime scene,
their Somali colleague and a driver,
Somalia
Amanda Lindhout,
conducting interviews at a refugee camp.
international journalists, along with their Somali colleague and a driver,
international journalists, along with their Somali colleague and a driver, were
four
Dutch star Arjen Robben's
Injuries
loosened
U.S. residents
peanut butter
The Kellogg Co.
salmonella.
Peanut butter produced by Peanut Corporation of America,
it is recommending that consumers not eat its peanut butter
Austin- and Keebler-branded:
salmonella.
"Kellogg Company's investigation has not indicated any concerns, nor has the company received any consumer illness complaints
Austin- and Keebler-branded:
Fernando Lugo
Fernando Lugo
the suspected hazing-related death of a 26-year-old drum major.
reprimanded the school's
the university "did not act" following the death of Robert Champion,
Weinman
19 counts of felony animal cruelty, 19 counts of improperly disposing of an animal body
"One appeared to be posed with a slit down the middle of its stomach,"
Tyler Hayes Weinman
the well-publicized "balloon boy" case.
a felony charge of attempting
admitted clashing with outspoken
the Real Housewives of Atlanta,
NeNe Leakes
NeNe Leakes
9-8
Michelle Obama would wear
bold invocation of Jesus in the form of the Lord's Prayer.
giving his inaugural speech.
ushered in a new digital age
Tuesday's inauguration
first blog post by director of new media for the White House, Macon Phillips,
Everyone
Kennedy Space Center
Al-Bashir
The International Criminal Court
charges of crimes against humanity,
Landon Donovan,
U.S. national captain was "unprofessional" for publicly voicing his opinions,
L.A. Galaxy teammate Landon Donovan,
AC Milan
Donovan,
is planning showdown talks
"Smiles of a Summer Night."
"Send in the Clowns,"
Angela Lansbury
Zeta-Jones
Friday evening
within 24 hours.
Hurricane Paloma
northeast through the Cayman Islands.
near 115 mph
Sean Parker
Egyptian Theater.
fall
about 50 miles
The shortlisted 50 will now be cut down to a final 11 -- 10
sending weekly reports via blogs and video on
July 1.
six-month post of "caretaker" on Hamilton Island, part of the Great Barrier Reef off Australia
nude or semi-nude photos,
photos.
declared her opposition to same-sex marriage
cannot be treated as criminals.
governments that can be held accountable for their conduct
No one can build public support and legitimacy for such a cacophony of positions and voices. It is time to settle the matter and tell the government lawyers to move on.
placing a false bomb or hazardous substance in the first degree; placing a false bomb or hazardous substance in a transportation facility; and making terrorist threats.
flights
determine whether he has the capacity
Scott McGann,
Vernon Forrest,
Vernon Forrest,
inmates at the Janet S. York Correctional Institution,
inmates at the Janet S. York Correctional Institution,
fiction
personal stories
Janet S. York Correctional Institution,
scored the only goal of the game
Sasha exhibited signs of potentially deadly meningitis
her own family's experience
Let Shriners hospitals themselves accept insurance or Medicaid
slash spending systemwide.
partnering with non-Shriners
Shriners doctors would perform major surgery at the partner hospital,
Two-thirds of the roughly 1,400 representatives
Cristal
impending divorce.
stretched over six decades
a Hollywood heartthrob in the 1940s
Van Johnson
inspection records
falsified existing records to make it appear the work had been done.
"There is not, and never was, any danger to the crew or the public,"
duty on the submarine
neither maintained inspection records nor conducted the required inspection of chemical levels
existing records
Cmdr. Michael B. Portland
neither maintained inspection records nor conducted the required inspection of chemical levels associated with the cooling system of the ship's nuclear reactor,
"nonjudicial punishment"
Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez
Cuban airfields
four or five
a criminal court sentence of 60 lashes and a two-year travel ban imposed on female journalist Rosanna al-Yami.
for her work on an episode of the television show "A Thick Red Line"
Abdullah
social taboos.
74 percent of the public thinks the father of our country did lie to the public while he served as president.
make Intel architecture the platform of choice for smartphones,"
Google, will be compatible
smartphone
call it one of the largest counterfeit operations ever discovered, involving about 300,000 bags and wallets with names like Burberry, Gucci and Coach.
counterfeit luxury handbags
counterfeit
three Chinese citizens
The Chinese defendants will be taken to Richmond, where they will be arraigned at a later date,
underpaid
A controversy erupted this week when the children's parents told reporters they
welcomed their successors to their future home
President Bush and Laura Bush
Laura Bush gave Michelle Obama a tour of the residence, the first lady and her successor discussed raising daughters in the White House.
importance of working together throughout the transition of government
"relaxed" and "friendly"
Bush's "failed policies"
Minnesota's Supreme Court ruled in
their potentially filibuster-proof 60th vote.
Al Franken
Sean Penn,
best leading male actor in a movie
actors of "Slumdog Millionaire"
best leading actress
won outstanding performance by a cast in a motion picture,
Meryl Streep
actors of "Slumdog Millionaire"
a refund,
"refund."
months
Kristin Budden,
Holiday Inn
owes you a refund.
200
a five-percent pay cut for all new ministers,
£50,000
about £50,000 ($73,800) this year,
approximately £3 million
also agreed to a ministerial pay freeze for the lifetime of the current Parliament,
short fuses
how the current crop of immigrants aren't like their predecessors,
to transport 40 children from Haiti to the Dominican Republic.
kidnapping
traffic black spots, junctions
habits of other drivers,
AAA Foundation
professional
"drivers trying to deal with their emotions in stressful situations."
Miami
males aged 18 to 26.
Traffic black spots
drivers should adjust their habits accordingly.
Miami
Akihito
hereditary monarchy
tennis),
"WE'RE SCREWED"
100,000
everything in the bogus edition of the tabloid is "100 percent" true.
the Emancipation of the Niger Delta, or MEND,
Shell Petroleum Development Company
A rebel group
major trunk pipeline"
"successfully sabotaged another major trunk pipeline"
Vicks Sinex nasal spray
bacteria
finding it contained bacteria,
Congress should cut spending "and send me a responsible measure that I can sign into law,"
should cut spending "and send me a responsible measure that I can sign into law,"
wasting money
projects such as a prison museum, a sailing school and a program to teach Portuguese.
said was laden with $10 billion in "pork"
in Somalia's capital city, Mogadishu,
the al Qaeda terrorist network.
foreign fighters would turn
Ibrahim "Awwad Ibrahim" Ali al-Badri,
Ibrahim "Awwad Ibrahim" Ali al-Badri,
homeland security adviser.
Fran Townsend
Fran
job doing 20-hour days,
25
Medina
in May 2008.
charged with sorcery while visiting the country in May 2008.
valves
valve may crack
underinflated
Tech International, the part's Johnstown, Ohio-based distributor,
1982
Landis
"Thriller" video
50
"Sporn," short for "Spore" porn.
create animated characters.
EA and YouTube.
Players
a Creature Creator program
Will Wright and Electronic Arts,
potential world-record-breaking sailor,
become the youngest person to sail solo around the world
Laura Dekker
Laura Dekker,
resisted multiple
both classified and unclassified machines at Creech.
it may be a common piece of malware
Keith Nicks, Terrance Nicks and Maurice Daley,
about 300
Indian Premier League
starts on April 10.
England
ever-evolving gear and technologies creating faster and faster competitors,
TJ Lanning,
drill down on how to
drill down on how to make racing safer.
the issues I think are important.
Social media
important outreach supplement.
is an important outreach supplement.
Chinese
Melding different musical cultures and ethnic influences, notably Tibetan,
56,000 customers
Newberry, McCormick, Edgefield, Lexington, Aiken
Storms that killed two people
possible tornadoes
severe weather
possible tornadoes
a twister
Suffolk, Virginia,
Suffolk, Virginia,
health conditions
Where you live may affect your state of mind,
stress, depression, and emotional problems
6.6
those in Kentucky:
of her son's estate,
Katherine Jackson
Adam Streisand,
Branca and McClain
Branca and McClain
"black box" label warning
include Cipro, Levaquin, Avelox, Noroxin and Floxin.
alert patients of possible tendon ruptures and tendonitis.
put the "black box" warning on Cipro and other fluoroquinolones,
Cipro, Levaquin, Avelox, Noroxin and Floxin.
to alert patients of possible tendon ruptures and tendonitis.
is not doing everything within its power to prevent more people from needlessly suffering disabling tendon ruptures."
Jen
"You gotta play in order to win.
three women,
three women,
Alfred Nobel,
241
parts of South Asia and Africa
"Global
in its annual press freedom survey
was accused of blocking a criminal investigation into his office and firing a police deputy to
Mayor Kwame Kilpatrick
former Detroit, Michigan, Mayor Kwame Kilpatrick
Kindle Touch 3G,
$149,
still be able to use 3G to sync book and document purchases, but anything beyond Wikipedia
3G
unfettered Internet access through the experimental browser.
releasing a caged butterfly,
on a Dubai beach in July
"extremely naive"
his wife, Susan,
hospital in Gaborone, Botswana,
Zimbabwe's prime minister
Morgan Tsvangirai
58 percent of the military
Nathaniel Frank
gays
threatening
hazard to aircraft, reducing visibility, damaging flight controls and
Mike Duncan
"A new president must govern from the middle,"
if Democrats moved too far to the left, Republicans could take back seats in the 2010 midterm elections.
"A new president must govern from the middle,"
Nancy Pelosi
professional football player,
Saturday
Kemp served nine terms in Congress as a representative from New York and was former Sen. Bob Dole's running mate
his family
he checked himself into a Los Angeles mental institution
Iggy's
David Bowie,
David Bowie,
1973's
ordered to evacuate and others faced a voluntary evacuation order through the morning, said Iowa City Mayor Regenia Bailey.
18 shelters set up across the state,
flooding
at his Premier League club
Wigan Athletic
a fine
The uptick marks the
15 months.
grew 3.7 percent on an annualized basis from April to June
"Yes vienna and I have split.
"Yes vienna and I have split.
"We went into this together, and we will work it through together because we are stronger together,"
July
abuse of detainees.
between 2001 and 2006
heated
reversed course last week, telling government lawyers to object to a court-ordered release of additional images showing alleged abuse of detainees.
Abdul Rahman al-Rashed
Sri Lanka
Tillakaratne Dilshan
Sri Lanka
the Grand Ole Opry.
is a collection of bluegrass tunes.
bluegrass tunes.
at the Grand Ole Opry.
diversity has always been our
home state of Colorado
Americans agree that the economic and national security burdens placed on state and local governments
evangelical ministers,
and I will always love her,"
Honda Civic
Honda Civic*
Camryn had multiple rib fractures, including several that apparently were incurred on one or more previous occasions.
multiple rib fractures, including several that apparently were incurred on one or more previous occasions.
first baby born this year in Summit County, Ohio, arriving at 12:33 a.m. January 1.
a $25 billion increase in funding
mental health aid.
mental health aid.
its platform
unveil a set of tools to create interactive e-books.
alternatives in leisure
biggest indoor golf center
are "hurting very badly" in state custody
kids are going back with their mothers,"
sexually abused
appeal to the Texas Supreme Court
multi-million dollar bid for the Spain striker.
Teresa Tambunting,
Police
up to 25
about $7 million worth of
possessing weapons for sabotage, banditry and terrorism.
Bennett, a
a senior opposition
suspended with pay
3 million
contrary to FPL's standard procedures and established practices,"
with pay as the investigation continues,
massive power outage
Without authorization, the engineer disabled two levels of relay protection,
ended up losing 65
mowing his friend's lawn in a dress,
make sure the loser was appropriately attired,
in the United Arab Emirates,
7,000 public and private
how well American children are doing in mathematics,
Columbia,
Lisa Ann Russell and
about the increased threat of a
British
UAE,
British Foreign Office
had not issued any
I thought it would be brilliant to have something like a telephone booth that could help me disappear from the madness and allow me to relax or walk through the Amazon or let me sleep under a starry sky or whatever. You also have to see it like a retreat, it's to chill out.
I think graphic design, for us, is very important as it helps to break down very complex information into digestible, easy-to-understand buttons or whatever. In the world we're living in, we're flooded
design, virtuality and the future
the sci-fi scenarios depicted in The Matrix, and Star Trek's 'Holodeck' are now comprehendible realities
Emotiv
the sci-fi scenarios depicted in The Matrix, and Star Trek's 'Holodeck'
Detecting your thoughts:
detects and processes real time brain activity patterns (small voltage changes in the brain caused by the firing of neurons) using a device that measures electric activity in the brain.
Emotiv EPOC headset
after suffering an epidural hematoma in a fall during a ski lesson.
died after suffering an epidural hematoma in a fall
30 minutes to an hour to 90 minutes
air transport
No
30 minutes to an hour to 90 minutes
the mid-1990s.
roughly 4,000
At least 50,000
Pibor,
the port of Ashdod,
"attempting to break the maritime security blockade
Israeli police
weapons charges
reported Tuesday to
366-day
Clifford Harris Jr.
charges related to purchasing machine guns and silencers.
entire amazing performance of Beyonce's "Listen"
Dexter Haygood,
Nick lose the Michael Jackson choreography and focus on his vocals,
New Jersey's highest court.
inflatable or portable signs and banners on public property.
large rodent-shaped balloon
maintain an "aesthetic environment" and ensure public safety,
Lillo Brancato Jr.
An actor who played a wannabe mobster in
wannabe mobster in "The Sopranos"
15
Oprah Winfrey
lawsuit
defamation
a group of local singers and rap artists
partly because of the "democratic commitments" by President Mills.
Obama's decision to pick Ghana the first African nation he visited
because of the "democratic commitments" by President Mills.
northeast England
aircraft carrier
Greenpeace activists
more than $1 million each.
Max Baucus,
Senate Finance Committee Chairman Max Baucus,
Congress is looking at ways to deal with the outrage surrounding AIG's controversial
the tax could be as high as "90 percent."
Insect
anaphylaxis,
antihistamine and an epinephrine auto-injector for emergencies, experts
At least 40
insect stings,
epinephrine auto-injector
Abhisit's Democrat
attended Eton, one of the UK's top private schools before studying politics, philosophy and economics at Oxford University.
Abhisit Vejjajiva
Abhisit Vejjajiva
Rift Valley town of Naivasha
between 500 and 1,000
brutal attacks by members of President Mwai Kibaki's Kikuyu tribe on other ethnic groups.
$40,000.
Jenny's
Tommy Tutone's "867-5309/Jenny" hit
Tommy Tutone's "Tommy Tutone 2" album.
phone number
a New Jersey
summer,
during the summer,
Stockholm
fall under Iraqi jurisdiction,
several "points" in the draft that "need more time for discussion, dialogue and amendments [to] some of its articles,"
specific "points"
Iraqi jurisdiction,
2004.
using a photograph of the couple's then-7-year-old daughter,
The photo, apparently taken as a prank by their former nanny, shows the couple's daughter bound to a chair,
extortion
175 million gadgets
Bangladesh
160 army officers
88
genuine autonomy for Tibetans, not independence for Tibet.
stance, immediately adopt measures to wipe out the adverse impact, [and]
China
Deputy Foreign Minister Cui Tiankai.
under which he will serve five years of probation and do about 1,400 hours of "labor-oriented service."
in a video statement posted on his personal Web site
excuses."
paralyzing a scout and injuring 11 others.
Scouting assistant Rich Behm,
75,000 passengers
a partial train service
75,000 passengers
on running at two-thirds our normal service tomorrow
a fault that caused a series of breakdowns blamed on winter weather.
nuclear issues,
Iran must provide inspectors with "unfettered" access to the new site within two weeks.
"a step towards building confidence that Iran's [nuclear] program is, in fact, peaceful."
that world powers and Iran will hold another round of talks before the end of the month,
United States, Britain, France, Russia
"a step towards building confidence that Iran's [nuclear] program is, in fact, peaceful."
two
no violation of flight regulations
the deck of the USS Nimitz
Eva Schloss
Jewish
one of the world's mostly widely-read books,
a similar one-week learning experience under the Tuscan sun at the 11th-century, 450-acre property
Tuscany.
bed and breakfast,
foul play is involved,
a local fire department's hazardous materials
a local fire department's hazardous materials building around 4:30 a.m. January 3.
in her backyard
foul play is involved,
husband
health
"This is a 6-foot, 240-pound guy who doesn't usually complain about anything,"
100
Nikki and her mom, Vicki Peterson,
drowning.
Riding on the back of Dad's motorcycle.
en route to Dunwoody, Georgia,
Georgia,
Mazda
The investigation has found nothing to indicate that Shahzad had any long-standing grudge or anger toward the United States,
Shahzad
California research group.
kicked out a disproportionate number of women
the military.
military
the Army
a planned assassination
Indonesian
actual number of arbitrary killings by security forces may be substantially higher
James Manook, a spokesman for Plateau State
Another witness described police units going from house to house, summarily executing unarmed men and boys.
"It was a big mistake sending an e-mail to Israel's football federation,"
"It was a big mistake sending an e-mail to Israel's football federation,"
Israel.
Israel,
after the federation mistakenly sent a New Year's greeting to its counterpart in Israel,
Tuesday
England,
Bilal Abdulla
to plant car bombs in London
Abdulla
Bilal Abdulla
Bilal Abdulla
Tuesday of conspiracy to murder and conspiring to cause explosions.
delaying 'The Tonight Show'
no
delaying 'The Tonight Show' into the next day to accommodate another comedy program will seriously
NBC's
Kevin Reilly,
The images -- naked prisoners stacked on top of each other, or being threatened by dogs, or hooded and wired up as if for electrocution -- caused outrage around the world when they were leaked to the news media in May
abuse by U.S. troops.
water fountains, a freshly planted garden and a gym -- complete with weights and sports teams' jerseys on the walls.
photographed in degrading positions, as Americans posed next to them smiling.
notorious Iraq prison once called Abu Ghraib
prison
later apologized,
India
attacked L.K. Chaudhary,
murder in the beating death of
his comments
rolling cuts to water service
Caracas,
Facebook Credits
Rising Tide Capital
low-income entrepreneurs
"bad guy" roles in such films as "Something Wild" and "GoodFellas."
"Edgy guys stand out in people's minds,"
Seattle,
trying to break up a fight with pepper spray,
pepper spray
arrested on four counts of assault
the moniker
President Bush
also railed against the culture wars that his party and campaign are
John McCain,
patriotism,
"Put Country First,"
mother of a Spanish man
human form of mad cow disease
Ten years can pass between eating contaminated tissue and the appearance of
Utah mountains
2 feet of snow.
Heather Gross, 27,
died.
at least one
about an hour after the avalanche,
at least one person
$250 or $300,
the most pressing issues of the day, including hunger and homelessness, disaster
participating in "alternative spring break" programs
I think John Lennon was surprised because it had been said in a casual way to a journalist who was a
getting too big, too proud
the Vatican's newspaper
the Vatican
"more popular than Jesus"
"not in terrible pain,"
"not to the best of my knowledge."
ABC's "Good Morning America,"
front lawn of a New Jersey house
to be planning to stay in an air-conditioned tent on the front lawn of a house owned by the Libyan Mission
planning to stay in an air-conditioned tent
Englewood community
China, Russia and India
high-fat diets including fast food and decreased physical activity,
China, Russia and India
for the rise in the disease include high-fat diets including fast food and decreased physical activity,
high-fat diets
China, Russia and India
38 percent
leather seats, wooden dashboard, surround-sound systems, iPod players, lower lighting
status symbol."
glorified golf buggy,
a status symbol."
leather seats, wooden dashboard, surround-sound systems, iPod players, lower lighting and air bags,
veterans
Jose Reyes Ferriz,
Ciudad Juarez,
The troops
before September 15.
more than 300 people
Dr Tina Tin
World Wildlife Fund
One of the most concerning aspects of recent data is evidence that, in some places, the Arctic Ocean is losing sea ice 30 years ahead of current IPCC predictions.
Brussels-based al Qaeda recruiting network,
alert for new al Qaeda terrorist plots
a Brussels-based al Qaeda recruiting network,
recorder system
Utah
guilty but mentally ill
the attempted kidnapping of Smart's cousin
Anna Wintour.
Roitfeld
Matamata, New Zealand,
sites that have served as settings for blockbusters on the big and small screens.
New Zealand
some of the stunning locations featured in the movies.
some of the stunning locations featured in the movies.
Bayambang, Alcala and Basista,
in the Pangasinan area have been
32
no comment
had no comment when asked
A former Cave Funeral Services employee has alleged since James Hines' death from skin cancer in 2004 that Hines was too tall for his coffin and that the funeral home took extreme measures to make him fit,
Catholic bishop
"We were dismayed to hear that Bishop Prof. Luigi Padovese lost his life as a result of being stabbed by his driver today in Iskenderun, Hatay,"
driver
Santo Domingo.
Fortaleza Ozama
SANTO DOMINGO,
Santo Domingo is
coach bus ride
that the track offered "nowhere to get away from anybody."
the 15-vehicle wreck
at the Las Vegas Indy 300.
Italy
Guilio Andreotti,
Italian politician Giulio Andreotti,
seven
seven time Italian Prime Minister,
Paolo Sorrentino's
Italian politician Giulio Andreotti,
early 1990s
Tropical Storm Kammuri
100
100
tropical storm
Larry King's
to get out and have lunch with a friend and watch the horses come down the stretch.
nearly eight thousand dollars.
horse to win.
compatriots to draw blood.
the grounds of the Government House,
held out their forearms to allow their compatriots to draw blood.
tens of thousands of protesters
Anti-government protesters
brown and black
The News of the World, the company's flagship Sunday British tabloid,
the Journal's publisher secretly directed funds
Andrew Langhoff,
bearing the message: "You are my hero, Daddy. I am 4 years old, and I miss you and love you very much, Grant."
in the United States
Arlington,
$500 million Zimbabwean bank note.
the bills
the new notes are for "the convenience of the banking public and corporate sector" in light of price hikes.
the bills still aren't enough to buy a loaf of bread.
his long-running children's show "Lunch With Soupy Sales,"
slapstick pie-throwing
Thursday.
"Hollywood Squares," "To Tell the Truth" and "What's My Line?"
getting walloped with pies in the face.
comedy American icon,"
her early release.
the self-styled revolutionary Symbionese Liberation Army
23 years,
"Letting a domestic terrorist like Kathleen Soliah set the terms of her parole
Loire,"
26 brightly decorated
La Roseraie
a guesthouse and restaurant specializing in French country fare,
Loire,"
six visitors to Jungala,
Piiholo Ranch, a working horse and cattle ranch on Maui,
finding love
Too many people are caught up in the fantasy of how love works and happens,
her husband.
"It sounds good from a marketing standpoint, but life doesn't work like that,"
there's more work
combined with jubilation over Barack Obama's historic achievement.
Dr. Alvin Poussaint.
Dr. Alvin Poussaint
jump-start the still-sluggish economy.
16.7%,
the NAACP's Ben Jealous, the National Urban League's Marc Morial and the Rev. Al Sharpton from the National Action Network.
alleged sex abuse by employees
the ultra-Orthodox Jewish community.
sexual abuse
sexual abuse
Manchester City
3-3
he lacked support among key decision-makers
Belgian Prime Minister Herman Van Rompuy
Prime Minister Herman Van Rompuy
his latest movie,
John Travolta,
earlier this year,
crawl space of her home.
had not delivered a child at anytime in the recent past."
not able to revive the baby,"
in the crawl space of her home.
flashy Humvees, flat-screen TVs and more weapons.
"Some of the tactics used
flashy Humvees, flat-screen TVs and more weapons.
flashy Humvees, flat-screen TVs and more weapons.
Wachovia,
50 cents to make a telephone balance inquiry; 65 cents to make an ATM withdrawal after two free withdrawals are taken; and $2.75 if the
50 cents to make a telephone balance inquiry; 65 cents to make an ATM withdrawal after two free withdrawals are taken; and $2.75 if the card is used at an out-of-network bank.
receive payment via debit card, direct deposit or check.
The United Kingdom
the Taliban from giving al Qaeda ... safe haven.
brand a multi-million dollar fashion empire.
simplicity became synonymous with feminism and the sexual revolution.
a patterned piece of jersey tied around the body like a kimono
ex-member of the German royal family, daughter of a holocaust survivor, socialite and business-woman,
300
leaving the full plastic jugs on the refuge
full plastic jugs on the refuge is
leaving water bottles in the desert for illegal immigrants
300 hours of picking up trash on public property and a year of probation,
Africa and Asia,
200 million
200 million children
nutrition supplement programs have helped deliver vitamin A and iodized salt
"They are more likely to suffer from chronic diseases, such as heart disease or diabetes."
job-related and combat-related stress.
Houston, Texas-based
their job
U.S. Army
fourth
U.S. Army
a four-part "economic rescue
"what America needs in this hour is a fighter."
provide relief to families and communities,
released new guidelines this month for containing the spread of the virus across the nation's school system.
exercise caution and restraint
About 1.55 million
1 million
Mexico
suspend Syria from the Arab League
Iran.
36,
survived for three days without water in a California
in a California forest.
California runner
agents seized 2,880 rounds of ammunition
fostering social skills,"
David Savill,
Second Life
Former British Prime Minister
monitoring of the Palestinians' promised reforms to reassure donors that their money would be used efficiently.
$7.4 billion
"Over the next few months, we have to show people our capability of making the difference on the ground,"
multiple prescription medications
Hong Kong-registered
health has improved,
convalescing at his residence
second deputy prime minister, Prince Nayef bin Abdul Aziz Al-Saud,
Shaun Donovan
"folks who are playing by the rules,"
deadbeats or speculators,
February 20, but confirmed it had been in discussions with the South African Ministry of Sport and Recreation with a view to "resolving the issues surrounding Caster Semenya's participation in athletics."
'It is deeply regrettable that information of a confidential nature entered the public domain.'
the International Association of Athletics Federations
Semenya had been found innocent of any wrongdoing
sports ministry
couldn't afford the $40,000
scraped together the remaining $9,000
to save money,
14,000
about 14,000
Flint, Michigan, which will go without its traditional July Fourth explosions in the sky this year, according
flights,
proximity of the mountains
wind gusts were reaching 112 mph, and Morakot, a medium-strength typhoon, was moving west-northwest at 14 mph en route to landfall,
Taipei county, Taiwan,
Taiwan
one-of-a-kind bicycle belonging to U.S. cycling legend Lance Armstrong
California
Countless tips
more than three weeks ago
southern California,
was
three weeks
Robbie Potter.
more than three weeks ago
my dog, DJ.
Rihanna
dog, DJ. He
my dog, DJ.
Los Feliz
Rihanna
Mutungo, Uganda.
founded Ranch on Jesus Ministries,
orphan home,
making false statements to investigators.
Salah Osman Ahmed and Abdifatah Yusuf Isse
Ahmed and Isse
al Qaeda
Motorsport's
animals
jackals
of flights were delayed at India's New Delhi airport Monday after lizards, birds and
lizards, birds and
lizards, birds and
lizards, birds and
are getting too expensive over there,"
"I kind of feel bad that I can't help my parents,"
weak job market
rising costs and less work.
fixer of glass
Anaheim, California,
officials
Philip Alston
government
not consulting a pocket checklist that outlined emergency procedures.
Two adults and two small children from a Korean immigrant family
"incorrect assumptions and inaccurate data"
They were in no way related
wind direction, ocean current direction, and shape and depth of the sea floor.
waves crashed into
Rogue waves,
Mexico,
Andrade is just
trying to place spike strips in
place spike strips in the path of two vehicles
two vehicles believed to have illegally entered the country from Mexico
2008.
12
stabbed actress
13th
dolls as representing false ideals.
Barbie
immediately and to stop selling them after the holiday shopping season ends.
after the end of this year.
President Obama's plan
removing most U.S. troops
plans to leave between 35,000 to 50,000 residual forces in the war-torn country, serving in a training or advisory role to the Iraqi military.
he supports Obama's "step in the right direction," the new troop plan does not "go far enough."
Hubert Humphrey.
"DALLAS"
visited Romania some years later and was
J.R., Larry Hagman,
Hubert Humphrey.
Michelle Duggar
fourth
Meredith Baxter
that she is a lesbian.
Baxter being spotted on a lesbian cruise through the Caribbean with a "female friend,"
through the Caribbean with a "female friend,"
a political pragmatist and consensus-builder who enjoys the support of liberal and conservative academics.
Federal appeals judge; Justice Department lawyer in the George H.W. Bush and Clinton administrations
could move the court incrementally to the right
"Twilight"
Stephenie Meyer's
"Very communicative looks,"
Robert Pattinson
Quentin Tarantino's "Inglourious Basterds"
"The Final Destination"
$28.3 million.
"Inglourious Basterds"
$8 million,
Labor Day weekend
Edward Kennedy,
Irish Prime Minister
process.
U.S. Senator Edward Kennedy,
Edward Kennedy,
U.S. Senator Edward Kennedy,
America's leaders need to pay attention to the crisis affecting our children.
to pay attention to the crisis affecting our children.
However, against the run of play, Milan gave themselves hope with a 71st minute strike.
Inter
"It's my daughter's birthday today,"
one of four students from South Florida's Lynn University
Mexico City.
her husband, Diego Rivera.
the St. George Terminal on the north shore of Staten Island.
The impact
Staten Island Ferry lost power and hit a pier
compared the ferry's loss of power as it neared the pier to a car losing its brakes.
A Staten Island Ferry lost power and hit a pier
Lincoln Chafee
create strong lines of consultation with
achieve policy objectives without obtaining congressional consent.
you need a structure,"
early Monday morning,
120 days
The actress must work at least 12 days a month at the county morgue until she completes the 53 remaining days on her court-ordered community service,
failing to inform police about the incident.
Burress to face jail time.
"not reporting a gunshot wound
Plaxico Burress
accidentally shooting himself with a gun he is
gun
New York Presbyterian Hospital for failing to inform police
pulls a woman from a van after it crashes into an icy pond.
a woman
on railroad tracks
everything they can to mitigate how widely the swine flu spreads in the United States.
about
the Atlantic Ocean
the crash of Air France
Saturday
location of the crash
"Everything is happening so fast. There doesn't seem to be a lot of time to really talk
technology
cell phone subscribers
America now has more cell phone subscribers than people
Roger Mills County, Oklahoma,
five
900 residences in and around the city of Hammon
900
story of an aging hippie bowler turned bumbling detective
eighth suspect accused of being
Seven
plotting "violent jihad"
England,
in Boston.
and the armed robbery of two
offered massages via Craigslist,
Boston Police Department,
a tall, clean-cut young blond man in a black windbreaker
sitting at an outdoor table.
denied that he is the man shown pointing
the figure captured on Google Earth outside a pub in London is not him.
Liam Gallagher
robbery and assault
held without
be held without
LAS VEGAS,
Saturday night
football
robbery and assault
Thousands of people
Santa Barbara, California,
school in South Africa considers the talk-show host heaven-sent,
allegations that a dorm parent mistreated students at the school.
South Africa and the United States
South Africa.
"Oprah is an angel, she is God-sent,"
"How High the Moon,"
Jerry Lee Lewis
jazz
a routine training mission
Training Range west of Salt Lake City, Utah,
routine training mission
a remote area of the range,
the Air Force
700-acre farm
Virginia's John Paul Jones Arena in Charlottesville,
streams,
President Bush, first lady Laura Bush and their daughter Jenna,
President Bush,
White House to the halls of the United Nations.
in the United States
the White House to the halls of the United Nations.
President Bush, first lady Laura Bush and their daughter Jenna,
of Ahmadinejad's treatment of the protesters in rallies demanding a new vote.
started riots and set up fires and attacked people,"
have publicly complained of Ahmadinejad's treatment of the protesters in rallies demanding a new vote.
to fans of a losing soccer team,
the putative losers to fans of a losing soccer team,
with growing
Bloc Identitaire
through social media.
Uighurs
the United States
Chinese authorities would torture them.
The USNS Vandenberg
USNS Vandenberg
The USNS General Hoyt S. Vandenberg, a retired U.S. Navy warship,
the world's second-largest artificial coral reef.
New York's Carnegie Hall
came through with a top-notch set of songs,
he would have been dropped from his label.
the U.S. Senate to ratify a major nuclear arms treaty between the United States and Russia before November's midterm elections.
Greece's
Russia
292,752 euros ($382,743)
Authorities are investigating whether a foundation headed by Inaki Undangarin improperly used public funds,
Authorities are investigating whether a foundation headed
a corruption investigation
labs
human fat,
at least 60
at least 60
fat-like substance
1980s,
1982 and 1983.
Glasgow Airport.
London
attack at Glasgow Airport.
a group
five Marching 100 band members who wanted to join a group in the clarinet section known as the "Clones."
unrelated to the November hazing death of drum major Robert Champion.
hazing on campus.
another storm that will dump more snow in the Sierra Nevada was brewing,
Freezing
Sierra Nevada
Corinthians
Andy Warhol Museum in Pittsburgh, The Museum of FIT and the Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York, and the Victoria and Albert Museum in London.
Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York,
In 1995, she introduced the
1994,
ultimately incorporated into the permanent archives
Ghirga
American
the defense of "lynching" the Italian police who worked on the case.
Ghirga
the defense
one person
was shot in the head while being interviewed by journalists
it was forced to take action after demonstrators disregarded an ultimatum by Prime Minister Abhisit Vejjajiva to vacate the intersection by Wednesday.
government troops
Philippines
Philippines
Philippines over the weekend, triggering landslides that killed at least 12 people,
12 people,
three
no
Snowe
would lack a government-run public health insurance option favored by Obama,
But if those changes failed to occur within the defined period,
public
"I don't think there's a great deal of support for sending more
Defense Secretary Robert Gates
Carl Levin,
Gates
700 percent in two years.
canned goods for charities
canned goods for charities
martial law
Andal Ampatuan Jr., mayor of Datu Unsay
martial law
Andal Ampatuan Jr.
57 people
martial law
Northern France was directly occupied by Nazi Germany
to their deaths in concentration
an archipelago that sits in the Saint Lawrence River on the U.S.-Canada border,
an actual chain of islands?
Edmund McIlhenny,
the Mexican state of
Hanna, Gustav and Fay
100 miles north of Hispaniola
water
Haitian city of Gonaives,
at least 137
SSRIs
the differences seen at birth will have lasting effects on a child's development and health.
that women who are treated with antidepressants are more likely to give birth early or to have newborns that need to spend time in a neonatal intensive care unit.
1990.
Borden
would like you to consider working well past
The man who shot
at a football stadium in Cameroon
Cameroon
soccer stadium in Cameroon
mention condoms,
Cameroon
"It's A Wonderful Life"
"It's A Wonderful Life"
It's A Wonderful Life (Frank Capra, 1946) "Remember, no man is a failure who has friends."
"It's A Wonderful Life"
mom
Hannah Montana
Hannah Montana
Pakistan
Indian ground incursion,
ISLAMABAD, Pakistan
Satellite images
part of the Antarctic Peninsula,
breaking away from part of the Antarctic Peninsula,
over thousands of years
temporary warning sign on the car.
putting restrictions on young drivers
"Caution Newly Licensed."
health care reform bill, and congressional Democrats
health care
were hanged
that all 30 were convicted of various crimes, which included: murder, murder in commission of a crime, disturbing public safety and security, being a public nuisance while drunk and being involved in illegal relationships -- relationships between men and women who are not married to each other.
hanged
should serve as a warning to those who are contemplating committing such crimes,
Iran executed 317 people last year, second only to China's
The 23-year-old hit the stanchion high outside goalkeeper Victor Valdes' left-hand post in the
made a string of
Nystekt Strömming (fried herring) wagon,
hip island neighborhood of Södermalm.
in the hip island neighborhood of Södermalm.
picnic tables
27-year-old recent college graduate
be the father of a child
Jude Law is expecting his fourth child,
due in the fall of this year,"
expecting his fourth child,
After 22 years
raises a reasonable doubt that he acted alone and the possibility that others were involved in the crime."
the scandal had highlighted flaws in the country's entire food supply chain.
baby milk scandal that has killed four children and sickened nearly 53,000 others.
four
nearly 53,000
France
measles
through three airports
any plans to retire and enjoy the life of an ordinary citizen,
spoke for four hours and fielded 80 questions out of 2 million-plus submitted on a live call-in program,
"It will take time and effort to overcome the crisis,"
officials
an escape route
as 40,000
Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger
Hall, a captain, and Quinones, a firefighter specialist,
Gov. Arnold Schwarzenegger
people
refund some tickets purchased before a traveler is laid off from a job.
offering to refund fares.
some tickets purchased before a traveler is laid off from a job.
"could be lunch money for somebody for the next six months,"
was the getaway car driver,
"The victim was concerned for his own well-being and the safety of his family,"
Pfc. Michael Jackson Apodaca, 18, Ruben Rodriguez Dorado, 30, and Christopher Andrew Duran, 17, were each named as
victim's cell phone bill hoping
Michael Jackson Apodaca,
18,
Yorktown High School in Arlington.
students,
bitten Monday by a rattlesnake
students,
born again,"
has been credited with saving two of the three children
A newborn Indian baby
newborn Indian baby found abandoned with 26 stab wounds has survived,
she had been choked and physically restrained by Merriman
A U.S.
Lance Cpl. Larry A. Dean,
bred resentment among
Police
64,
taken to police headquarters for processing,
saying he had a delivery for the president,
Vladimir Lenin's
announced he was gay
are placed on television for propaganda purposes, in order to persuade people to be more accepting of homosexual conduct,"
singer,
little bit of homophobia.
announced he was gay
illegal gambling ring had laundered profits of its betting,
secret compartment covered with animal hair,
laundered profits of its betting, rather than just proceeds.
to win the Solheim Cup
fourth successive occasion
Solheim Cup
Europe
Killeen Castle Golf Resort in Ireland
Mumbai,
and about 20 others
plan to return and rebuild.
Mumbai, India's,
militants from within its borders carried out the attacks,
potential maritime attack
India
India
we live very frugally.
I just can't imagine having eight at once and the responsibility that that brings.
18
buy used and save the difference.
buy used and save the difference. We shop a lot at garage sales, thrift stores.
I just can't imagine having eight at once and the responsibility that that brings.
giant whale murals
Georgia Aquarium in Atlanta
how they can help conserve water.
Georgia Aquarium,
were headed to ports in the Persian Gulf to stock up on provisions and allow for some recreation,
U.S. Navy submarine and a Navy amphibious ship
Strait of Hormuz
to parade empty coffins through the streets of the English town of Wootton Bassett,
most people in the Islamic community believe that those people who have adopted a perverted view of Islam to justify murder as terrorism are outside the traditional elements of what is a peaceful
"To do more in Afghanistan, our Marines have got to see relief elsewhere,"
Afghanistan
Afghanistan,
Marines
Gen.
"goofed off,"
a guest on the popular late-night entertainment show,
'Who's responsible for this?'
Israel
Israel Defense Forces
of the civilian population in the dense neighborhood,
The Israel Defense Forces
found a "sketch" detailing
The IDF said the map depicts sniper positions at a mosque entrance and in nearby mosques.
positions of booby traps and snipers in Al-Attara.
a treaty banning the use of cluster bombs.
Russia, China, Israel and the United States,
United States and Russia
"an absolute moral obligation"
Russia, China, Israel and the United States,
Russia, China, Israel and the United States,
Peter Graves,
his daughters
outside
Switzerland
GIST,
GIST,
February 27,
on suicide to allow for assisted dying.
Gogo
carriers' planes is limited to flights within North America.
Southwest Airlines and Alaska Airlines,
trans-Atlantic and European service
The Wi-Fi venture has the potential to be "very profitable,"
service in the third quarter of this year,
more than 190 commercial
Gilbert said there are at least two
Gilbert
her kneesocks.
pet dog,
found clothed only in her kneesocks.
Australia,
death quickly overshadowed all else Friday, commentators worried
political developments in Iran.
and on Fanfou.com, China's version of Twitter,
On a Facebook page dedicated to Michael
"I remember growing up in the Middle East, influenced, enjoying his music, waiting for his albums,"
London.
August.
4,000
Two
at work
incidents aboard two other Airbus A330s.
Airbus A330s
two recent failures of airspeed
the Gulf,
increasing the acquisition or the
money will not come to me, money will go somewhere else.
to continue the openness that exists.
off the coast of Dubai
Oprah Winfrey, Michael Jordan, Robert De Niro, Janet Jackson
Thursday
five people dead
"In the patients we have seen in the last couple of days, there are many which we believe were not actually punctured with needles,"
six strokes with a rattan cane
awareness and encourage testing for the disease.
calls to a AIDS national helpline
calls to a AIDS national helpline shoot up by 200 percent,
One million
the gym
17-month-old twins Max and Emme
wife Elin
you want to do with your life, I guarantee that you'll need an education to do it,"
to work out,"
"I love to accessorize.
one of my best friends
one of my best friends had ditched me after I logged onto
I emailed her an apologetic note.
when you break up with a girlfriend, things are murkier.
sorry for you the way they do when a romantic relationship bites the dust.
to listen to conservative and Republican lawmakers, presidential candidates, business owners and media commentators use such vitriol
Now is not the time to dismiss the protesters as a bunch of lefty college students
Carrie Prejean,
help launch her show business career.
pass a health care bill.
every tool
to pass a health care bill.
list of every special request every member wanted
every
at least 24
spying for the Israelis
Palestinian political faction,
most of them civilians
accused Hamas militants in Gaza of kidnapping, killing and torturing
Sheikh Sabah al-Ahmad al-Sabah,
he was forced to dissolve parliament to safeguard Kuwait's national unity,
Kuwait's leader
Kuwait's
dissolved parliament on Wednesday and called for early elections, after the
Cabinet
Chabon
("The Amazing Adventures of Kavalier & Clay")
Federal District of Sitka, Alaska,
many of the body parts that flounder with age could be upgraded using own-grown tissues and more durable implants.
of Leeds in northern England
100 years old,
Tom McHale,
chronic traumatic encephalopathy (CTE).
John Grimsley, Mike Webster, Andre
30
Jason Moran and his associate Pasquale Barboro
a smash hit television series in Australia called "Underbelly."
30
Murray carrying the
usually peaceful and orderly home
al Qaeda and Taliban
U.S-led
Pakistan is not being proactive enough in battling militants who are launching attacks from Pakistan's swath of tribal areas along
U.S-led coalition and NATO
not being proactive enough in battling militants who are launching attacks from
"psychological issues,"
his wife and three young children
he suffered from "psychological issues,"
several weapons, including a shotgun, were found inside the home.
Middletown, Maryland.
Racial segregation has been outlawed,
a couple years after the conclusion of "Gears 2"
couple years after the conclusion of "Gears 2"
fans.
"You know, you always need a lot of luck,"
Sigma Gamma Rho sorority
suspended
Rutgers
Army
they can be escorted in by a soldier living there if they have identification and a reason for coming onto the facility.
an acquaintance"
A 16-year-old girl was found dead and another girl was found unconscious
Army solider
huge sums,
Hungarian Grand Prix.
Felipe Massa
wave the chequered flag.
life-saving surgery
video game
Diprivan
Propofol
Propofol
accompanied Jackson during the HIStory tour
that indicators such as inflation are underreported by as much as half.
Nestor Kirchner
Justicialist
Buenos Aires.
The ruling Justicialist Party, or PJ by its Spanish acronym,
rebels were firing at and killing civilians who were trying to flee the fighting.
it has made more inroads into the remaining territory
firing at and killing civilians who were trying to flee the fighting.
Military jets pounded the rebel's "transit camp" in the district of Mullaittivu Wednesday evening,
The defense
Prince Harry has been serving on the frontline in Afghanistan and
UK's Prince Harry
Toilet paper
clay
more than $6 billion
to wipe one's bum?
Arturo Gatti
released from jail Thursday,
Arturo Gatti
world champion boxer
International Boxing Federation (IBF) super-featherweight
Arturo Gatti
Gikongoro,
Emmanuel Uwayezu
Gikongoro,
genocide, conspiracy to commit genocide, complicity in genocide and crimes against humanity.
"Sunshine Policy"
Jong Il in June 2000, becoming the first South Korean leader to do so since the Korean War unofficially ended in 1953.
from 1998 to 2003,
pneumonia.
In August, a man on Southwest Airlines exposed himself and punched a fellow passenger, an
unruly incidents
The Federal Aviation Administration,
a $250,000
900
$1,100 to $25,000.
Tom Waits, Neil Young, Jackson Browne, Bob Dylan, Joni Mitchell, Carole King
Tom Waits, Neil Young, Jackson Browne, Bob Dylan, Joni Mitchell, Carole King
singer-songwriters of the '70s -- Tom Waits, Neil Young, Jackson Browne, Bob Dylan, Joni Mitchell, Carole King --
Hank
"Here With Me"
Hank
20th
"Velvet Revolution"
to mark a 1939 clampdown on opposition in what was then Nazi-occupied Czechoslovakia.
20th
1989
in a military camp.
French Foreign Ministry and a top African Union official
Members of the Somali Transitional Federal Parliament are meeting in the neighboring country
Djibouti,
Majurin Sivakurunathan,
The fighting between the Sri Lankan troops and the rebel Tamil Tigers
Minnesota legislators,
1975
St. Paul, Minnesota.
23 years,
attempted bombings of two police cars
lashed out at those who rush to defend her.
Gov. Tim Pawlenty.
Symbionese Liberation Army
in hospitals
perform for children and patients in hospitals
"Lev Leytzan allows me to take [something] scary and mundane for the patient and into something exciting beautiful and playful,"
The Lev Leytzan
filed suit against the Hotel Nacogdoches in Nacogdoches and the Super 8 Brookshire Motel near Katy, accusing them of illegally raising room rates after Gov. Rick Perry had issued a declaration of disaster on September 8.
1.2 million
estimated 1.2 million
$99.99 for a room that had cost $49.99 two days before Ike.
chaos throughout the region."
a regional superpower that can support them financially, militarily and politically in their confrontation with the international community.
Iran and Arab states
worldwide audience
Adults
classified as air-like
were exposed to large amounts of secondhand smoke during childhood
increased vulnerability to developing emphysema and other
United Nations
Ayman al-Zawahiri
war
members of the mujahedeen
members of the mujahedeen
"Organized crime"
other countries, including Guatemala.
"One of the possibilities is organized crime."
displayed rather off-key singing and diplomacy skills when asked if there was a plan to attack Iran back in April 2007. Changing the words to the classic Beach Boys' song "Barbara Ann," the Arizona senator responded: "Bomb bomb bomb, bomb bomb Iran."
early Sunday morning
announced the arrests of the four teenagers
away on business
fare well.
the electoral process.
Mexican President Felipe Calderon
aggressive management of the swine flu crisis
six
General Anders Fogh Rasmussen
France
NATO Secretary General Anders Fogh Rasmussen
U.S. Marines
Guadeloupe
Caribbean island
four state police
Guadeloupe
denied he was fanning the flames of unrest.
younger
the family's No. 1 way to communicate.
to entertain
the use of the A1C in diagnostics
A committee of international experts recommended the test, called the the
A1C assay,
use of the A1C in diagnostics
Brian Lara
billionaire businessman
has suspended its cooperation with Cambodia,
Los Angeles-based attorney Pierre Prosper
are largely uncontroversial.
professor of law at Georgetown University Law Center.
the nomination process of Sandra Day O'Connor,
Thursday night's "Daily Show" on Comedy Central
stunned that Jim Cramer kind of did a rope-a-dope strategy and didn't really defend himself against Jon
stunned that Jim Cramer kind of did a rope-a-dope strategy
Jim Cramer
"attacked Cramer's credibility."
CNBC "Mad Money" host
accusations of sexual abuse
widespread child abuse
products
"tablet computers"
"tablet computers"
Taliban and their al Qaeda associates
Sunday,
10
presidential palace
U.N.-backed
Somalia's
southwestern part of the country,
Somalia's
neighboring country of Djibouti,
Somali lawmakers
Islamist fighters
Somali
Baidoa,
in the private economy,
reduce the role of middlemen who take sizable fees
Global profits from human trafficking and forced labor have reached
to reduce the role of middlemen who take sizable fees
last year.
charity ball
divorce.
Amy Winehouse
A London court cleared
common assault.
Amy Winehouse
poppy fields
Afghan President Hamid Karzai
terrorism.
Afghan President Hamid Karzai
tested the weapon in an underground explosion,
The U.N. Security Council
influx of refugees
government forces, rebel groups and allied militia groups
Fighting
Red Cross employee dead,
in his classroom
[the teacher's] part, very ill-conceived and nothing to fool around with,"
"It was obviously imprudent on [the teacher's] part, very ill-conceived and nothing to fool around with,"
"The Blues Brothers."
read short, humorous poems
"Nashville"
twice a
overkill won't improve
moisturizers
Wash once a day
Overwashing, overapplying, and product overkill
Dry
debt.
spend, spend, spend
start Kid One Transport,
more than 16,000
Russell Jackson
Alabama
inconclusive
undergoing renovation.
the terms of the settlement."
Warner Bros. and producer Chuck Lorre
a sentence of either 25 years to life with the possibility of parole, 30 years to life with
more than 21
more than 21 hours
pregnant girlfriend, Jessie Marie Davis, and their unborn child.
police officer
penguin waste,
a 4-0 win
40-car
U.S. filmmakers
Dan Parris,
it was flying unusually low,"
struck a building
three-story residential building in downtown Nairobi.
shooting video of Kibera, one of the largest slums in Africa.
a Texas landfill.
San Antonio
She told Gabriel's father she killed the boy and has also said she gave him away to a couple in San Antonio,
8-month-old boy
Elizabeth Johnson,
1. Real Madrid (Spain) 365.8m euros 2. Manchester United (England) 324.8m 3. Barcelona (Spain) 308.8m 4. Bayern Munich (Germany) 295.3m 5. Chelsea (England) 268.9m 6. Arsenal (England) 264.4m 7. Liverpool (England) 210.9m 8. AC Milan (Italy) 209.5m 9. Roma (Italy) 175.4m 10. Inter Milan (Italy) 172.9m 11. Juventus (Italy) 167.5m 12. Lyon (France) 155.7m 13. Schalke (Germany) 148.4m 14. Tottenham (England) 145m 15. Hamburg (Germany) 127.9m 16. Marseille (France) 126.8m 17. Newcastle (England) 125.6m 18. Stuttgart (Germany) 111.5m 19. Fenerbahce (Turkey) 111.3m 20. Manchester City (England) 104m
exchange rate
H1N1 infection
people who died of swine flu in the United States had pre-existing health problems,
pre-existing health problems,
642
around Boston's inner harbor.
Swan Boat.
summer
Boston's inner harbor.
cannabis
hid the package in a suitcase
passenger's bag.
package of cannabis.
thanked voters for their support.
Congress party
made it easier for a woman to choose to delay having children until after she established herself in a career.
by the early 60's The Pill had made it easier for a woman to choose to delay having children until after she established herself in a career.
seven
least 400
The arctic blast
At least 400 flights at Chicago, Illinois', O'Hare International Airport were canceled.
It's spiny tail lobster season in the
Florida Keys,
"Lobster is going from eight dollars a pound to three dollars a pound.
Massachusetts.
He's pleaded not guilty.
Lackland Air Force Base in San Antonio,
murdering three terminally ill patients by giving
with murdering three terminally ill patients
murdering three terminally ill patients by giving
In contrast to its U.S. services, however, the buses are glitzier and more
British transport company
FirstGroup,
in Illinois.
Reform Commission
review of state government practices completed in 100 days.
Patrick Collins,
Nine.
got to get past just the color of our skins being newsworthy. It's really about all the things we knew we could do for this country and now we have the opportunity to show it and it's going to come through his leadership,"
In 1957,
Carlotta Walls LaNier and eight other members of the Little Rock Nine
a man is still
eastern Michoacan
10 a.m. until 5 p.m. Friday and 10 a.m. until 1 p.m. Saturday,
March 2007
everything she can to draw attention to her husband's disappearance.
FBI have denied he was working for government.
security consultant
Iran
radiation
by 0.02 percent,
CT scans
0.02 percent,
how much plaque they have in their arteries,
600 chest X-rays, or about 12 milliSievert (mSv) of radiation,
individual's cancer risk
mammograms
women in their 40s
"My message to women is simple. Mammograms have always been an important life-saving tool in the fight against breast cancer, and they still are today,"
A federal advisory board's recommendation that women in their 40s should avoid routine
Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius
"My message to women is simple. Mammograms have always been an important life-saving tool in the fight against breast cancer, and they still are today,"
Eugene Terreblanche
bludgeoned with clubs and stabbed with a machete
Eugene Terreblanche
was killed
attempted murder
Terreblanche, the leader of the neo-Nazi Afrikaner Weerstandsbeweging
an apparent dispute over wages with workers on his farm.
that government should not intrude on
Roe v. Wade "not only protects women's health and reproductive freedom, but stands for a broader principle: that government should not intrude on our most private family matters,"
affirmed his support for a woman's "right to choose"
when did your life begin?"
civil commitment, which allows the government to keep sex offenders in custody even after they have served their sentences.
the government to keep sex offenders in custody even after they have served their sentences.
Protesters used dummies to represent victims of violence
Protesters used dummies to represent victims of violence on Brazil's Copacabana beach this week.
each one representing a victim of urban violence.
16,000 coconuts
16,000 coconuts on Brazil's world-famous
Copacabana beach
16,000 coconuts
Lester Mullet, 26, Johnny Mullet, 38, and Levi Miller, 53,
become the oldest living artist to have a number one album.
in World War II after recording
made her name entertaining troops in World War II after recording
Georgia initially suggested Russian peacekeepers were to blame, drawing heated denials from the Russian Defense Ministry, which called the allegation "dirty informational provocation."
$1 "energy surcharge"
cancellation fee,
cancellation fee,
Funes' victory
51.27
Sunday
flew his small airplane into an Internal Revenue Service building in Austin, Texas,
brown-skinned Arab Muslim men with foreign-sounding names
equally, the only clear message that we will be sending to the rest of the world is that the word "terrorist" applies only to those with olive skin and foreign-sounding last names.
nation fail to adequately condemn all acts of terrorism equally, the only clear message that we will be sending to the rest of the world
photo album full of pics of you looking smiley.
Facebook
Facebook
every single text, Tweet, Facebook poke and email from here
your ex's loved ones ask why
unsecured at an Afghan facility
attempted murder and armed assault
"Anger should be directed to where it belongs. I can testify to this. I have proof."
a series of wildfires
housing, business and infrastructure repairs,
Texas
Alabama
natural disasters
reached the final of the Champions League
Milan stayed on course for the
Lazio
American soldier
One shows the image of an American soldier shaking hands in a group of kids with the message, "One of our American guests is missing. Return the guest to his home. Call us at ..." and lists a phone number.
the U.S. soldier visited a military post in the Yousaf Khel district in Paktika province, got drunk, and was ambushed while returning to his car.
'blimps'
German company Cargolifter AG in the mid 1990s.
2010.
openly gay actor.
closeted art director Salvatore Romano
openly
Nicholas Troy Sheley,
Nicholas Troy Sheley,
EDWARDSVILLE, Illinois
reef off
Efforts to recover oil from the grounded ship,
"This is a place where we honor the First Amendment,"
more than 700
at least seven
Mohammad Sohail
a recent robbery attempt,
Pinter,
Pinter,
2005.
The conflict between Israel and the Palestinians
real-time intelligence on crises around
Abduwali Abdukhadir Muse
three pirates,
potentially dismantling the cartel.
significant step in potentially dismantling the cartel.
Arellano-Felix
However, the Iranian government deployed thousands of police and plainclothes Basij militiamen
crude oil
Alaska
a containment area
No oil has been reported outside the containment area.
starting the strike
Evo Morales
Bolivian
Pakistan's North-West Frontier Province
three bombs exploded
Hangu district
four
Marrakech
"I am shocked. We should not permit it. It was done by a tiny minority, but the crime is terrible,"
at a synagogue
Molotov cocktail
graffiti.
David McKenzie
Diego Maradona
first time in more than three decades,
a bill
1975.
the country become "stronger, cleaner and more secure."
raises automotive fuel economy standards
"a great, wonderful first step for an energy revolution that starts in America and ripples throughout the world."
the Reading Terminal Market?
edit stories for CNN and make sure my news team eats well on the road.
some of the questions that are on the minds of the American people,"
was not suggesting that someone inside the government might be complicit with al Qaeda or might be failing to follow through in fighting the terrorist group.
"I don't think the way you deal with negative feelings is to pretend they're not there."
Hillary Clinton
Thursday
a website
evening of July 15, 2008,
Casey Anthony
received a strange
location-based social networks
bring awareness to location-based privacy issues,
location-based social networks
Gulf of Mexico,
more than 1.2 million feet of boom
charges of sexual battery and failure to register as a sex offender,
Jackson County, Mississippi,
Jackson County, Mississippi, jail
530
14 percent
74
almost 30
7 percent
14 percent of former detainees
number of released detainees turning to
Money,
Pallai.
Sri Lanka's
Pallai,
"physical and verbal aggression"
Atalanta.
Jose Mourinho
The Italian Sport Union of Journalists
A 23-year-old Somali national
"farewell" letters
the plane
at Cologne airport
panel of three military judges,
Fonseka's supporters say the former general was seen as a threat to the government and his arrest was ordered to prevent his participation in parliamentary elections April 8.
Fonseka and President Mahinda Rajapaksa
Fonseka
panel of three military judges,
Sri Lanka's former army chief
British government lawyers,
foreign troops to stay in the country past the end of the year,
Sadrists,
Wednesday
Senate Foreign Relations Committee
35 million Zimbabwean dollars.
35 million Zimbabwean
Amid allegations of illegal foreign currency trading,
inflation
its worst economic and humanitarian crisis since attaining independence from Great Britain in 1980.
$2 million Stradivarius.
by the sweet sounds, and profits, of something new
be hosting three events looking at modern strategies in today's business arena.
looking at modern strategies in today's business arena.
three events looking at modern strategies in today's business arena.
CNN
Howard Schultz,
CNN
China Europe International Business School in Shanghai
moderate-to-liberal Republican
Charles Percy.
Alzheimer's disease.
three
died
this week
Yar'Adua
Nigeria
"At the moment I'm undergoing treatment. I'm getting better from the treatment. I hope that very soon there will be tremendous progress to allow me to get back home,"
a constitutional order on his absence
by mid-October,
mid-October,
"But I'm optimistic that we will be able to get Title III as well,
dealt with authorized trade and food aid,
authorized trade and food aid,
The Airbus 310
reckless.
reckless.
criticized Zelaya's
Honduras,
"I am not afraid when I work for a just and noble cause,"
"I am not afraid when I work for a just and noble cause,"
the two remaining crew members
San Diego, California,
helicopters and boats, as well as vessels from other agencies,
It crashed about 20 miles off the Mexican coast,
operating from
U.S. Navy
11:30 p.m. Tuesday,
traditional silhouette from that era
a dazzling yellow Lela Rose number
Lucy Liu
muted, ethereal garb.
Normandy Invasion or "D-Day landings,"
the ones they left behind
the Normandy Invasion
the 65th anniversary of the landings
Jim Tuckwell
One a Republican and the other a Democrat,
Delaware
fell prey to a system that is rigged to punish political independence
a Golden Globe-nominated actor who has had roles in the "Pirates of the Caribbean" movies, "Ronin," and the James Bond film "Tomorrow Never Dies." He won a best actor award in 1995 at Cannes
New Year's
Vidal Sassoon, Christopher Lee
have confirmed that they intend to continue racing in F1 for the future and also have appointed Bob Bell as the acting team principal for the remainder of the season.
Formula One.
Nelson Piquet Jr
Nelson Piquet Jr
The 24-year-old Brazilian attended a Motor Sport Council hearing on Monday over the conspiracy which saw him crash his Renault in the Singapore Grand Prix last year,
More than 2,200 killings
just before 8 p.m. Friday.
Raul escaped from the vehicle,
Republicans
government commission
"We got this farm legally. In fact, they [Etheridge] opened the gates for us, and we moved in,"
plunged 25.7 percent
6.5
since November
6.5
looking at school abuse.
33,000 instances of seclusion, restraints or other punishments in Texas and California alone.
nontraditional procession
Kevin Heinz
A YouTube
Minnesota wedding party dancing down the aisle.
in her United Arab Emirates apartment.
Lebanese singer Suzanne Tamim
offended the dignity of the president of Honduras,
Sunday night
seventh Moto GP world
The 30-year-old currently leads the world championship by 38 points,
maximum three
the cause of the crash which killed all 228 passengers,
Atlantic Ocean
stormy weather
maximum three months
Edinson Cavani
get out of their nightgowns and look for work.
computer skills,
get out of their nightgowns and look for work.
"Sometimes fibromyalgia is used as a wastebasket term if a patient has pain and they don't know
fatigue and sleep disturbances, depression, headaches, irritable bowel syndrome and heightened sensitivity.
6 million
almost 6 million Americans
fibromyalgia.
western corner of the valley.
Chenonceaux
a 10-minute stroll
"Butcher of Bosnia."
1995
were reported to have massacred over hundreds of thousands of Muslims and Croats
over hundreds of thousands
genocide, complicity in genocide, extermination, murder, willful killing, persecutions, deportation, inhumane acts, terror against civilians and hostage-taking.
Americans contractors detained in Baghdad have been ordered released
U.S. contractors taken into custody by Iraqi authorities.
on suspicion of having unregistered weapons.
five
U.S. Marine
of raping an Okinawan schoolgirl.
Previous criminal cases against American troops
rape of a 14-year-old Japanese girl,
A U.S. Marine based on Okinawa
one of the sailors
on board in Mombasa
CNN's
in the hand
around 7 a.m.
350 miles off the coast of Somalia in the Indian Ocean.
As the leader of a major city, I had to step forward and deal with fears
H1N1 virus,
H1N1 virus,
718
on Monday,
assuming new identities, fleeing Europe
investigate and prosecute cases of genocide, crimes against humanity and war crimes.
perpetrators of World War II
many lower-ranking servants of the Nazi regime
the ICC
publishing of Sokaluk's street address or his image
a ban on identifying a man charged with one of a number of deadly wildfires
darted toward the bus
The man drove the bus for less than a mile before a student confronted him and the bus crashed into a wall off the road,
school bus
I think we should legalize
by coming to Las Vegas, it gives us an opportunity to take ourselves and the people who come to listen to us into a place where people are free from thinking they're sinners or unworthy.
European football's
Ukraine.
Milan goalkeeper Dida has been cleared to play in next month's
is suspended for two matches, but one of the matches will now be deferred for a probationary period of one year,"
to play in next month's Champions League match
Dida
made a mistake
The first mortgage is the first lien against your house. They can actually start foreclosure procedures on the smaller mortgage but it's not typical because the first mortgage holder is going to want to protect its assets.
"Most people feel like it is going to get worse before it gets better,"
With the higher unemployment comes increases in the number of residents without
up from 4.4
"Most people feel like it is going to get worse before it gets better,"
comes increases in the number of residents without health insurance.
75 per cent
involved in issues relating to inter-Korean relations.
in an area close to his home,
Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia,
end of U.S. military operations
a much greater presence of U.S. companies in his country to help spur greater spending and investment on the country's infrastructure
Iraqi Prime Minister Nouri al-Maliki
"looking pale and bloodstained"
toilet bin
tossed out with the trash.
TV Everywhere,
Hulu and TV Everywhere,
Time Warner.
"premium" television content via broadband,
Comcast and Time Warner
Iraq
Iraqi Interior Ministry official
a coffee shop
vehicle
names, photographs and addresses of cartel supporters can be published
Anonymous
names, photographs
about 3 million
3 million people
four,
dispel the misconception that Arabs are all extremists, that Arab people are violent and that women in the Arab world are oppressed and suppressed,"
the world's youngest living queen.
dealing with issues on the ground, dealing with ... the problems that our country faces.
Queen Rania
Queen Rania
the federal agency he worked for is now a "cult of corruption"
"I think the government should be transparent.
"Halo 3."
midnight Monday
CNN.com
stroke of midnight Monday
at the stroke of midnight Monday
CNN.com
"We essentially closed the wheelhouse doors. I went to the port side, and I looked out up at the derrick. That's when I see the mud coming out of the top of the derrick,"
Kenner, Louisiana
Bush-era
that limited federal tax dollars for embryonic stem cell research,
overturn
officials
Monday
Southwest Airlines
double
Southwest
Southwest Airlines
FAA
a 16-month drawdown,
A closed-door
Joint Chiefs
Joint Chiefs of Staff and Gen. David Petraeus
the bullying in school, the senseless beatings of people
Natanz,
Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps
Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps
accusing Iran of violating international agreements by keeping the construction plan a
Monday
"The success of our UK business has given us the confidence to move to the Santander name now and with it deliver the next phase of our transformation program and make 1,300 branches available to our 25 million customers in the UK.
hundreds
"The success of our UK business has given us the confidence to move to the Santander name now and with it deliver the next phase of our transformation program and make 1,300 branches available to our 25 million customers in the UK.
87 passengers
city of Karbala, Iraq.
the birthday of Imam Mohammed al-Mehdi,
holy city of Karbala, Iraq.
a parked motorcycle
injured at least 70
400,000 acres
"We want to keep these fires as small as we can,"
15 wildfires
"It will not end ... until it reaches the ocean or the winds turn around," Cartelli said.
Capt. Barry Parker
resources,
kidnapped children
Haiti
abducted
West Baltimore community
"The Wire."
22
D-Day and war experiences.
the whispers are true.
Twitter
removed without taking the entire kidney.
short real-time updates about the procedure.
Dr. Craig Rogers,
September 11, 2001.
pristine red comb
horror of the day.
Defense Department liaison officer to the White House Drug Policy office.
flu,
H1N1 virus,
Cover your mouth with your elbow when you cough or sneeze, and remind your kiddos to do the same.
that germs can make us sick, and that's why it's important to wash your hands.
that germs can make us sick, and that's why it's important to wash your hands.
to stop the publication, sale and advertisement of "60 Years Later: Coming Through the Rye,"
U.S. District Court in New
Lawyers for Salinger
Monday.
expected Monday.
the publication, sale and advertisement of "60 Years Later: Coming Through the Rye,"
abandoned cabin in rural Cambodia"
J.D. Salinger
Steve Jobs
knew exactly who
Nancy G. Brinker
a bill by Sens. Ted Kennedy and Kay Bailey Hutchison
founder of Susan G. Komen for the Cure,
breast
placing an emphasis on early detection
inside his throat.
at TEDMED.
laryngoscopy.
Cannavaro
cortisone.
36-year-old
I didn't cry. I remember that. I didn't cry. I was more befuddled than anything else. It must have been difficult for the cop.
Larry King
Sarah Palin
"His name is cleared," Stevens' lawyer, Brendan Sullivan, told reporters. "He is innocent of the charges, as if they'd never been brought."
Former Republican Sen.
Justice Department and Attorney General Eric Holder
"His name is cleared,"
near the Danube River.
the best festivals
Kim Kardashian
suspect approached him and "reached into his waist area,"
shot in the abdomen
the suspect reached into his waist area
Maurice Clemmons,
in the killings of four Lakewood, Washington,
Jared Bergstreser and Colin Trapp?
They fired them.
says Best Buy should have lauded employees who ran after a shoplifter, not fired them.
Best Buy should have lauded employees who ran after a shoplifter, not fired them.
moon was virtually dry.
trace amounts of water
rocky environments and in craters,
Pieters' team found signs of
and possible ligature strangulation.
first-degree murder while armed.
her daughters were possessed by demons and
Banita Jacks,
be withdrawn from the auction.
metal-rimmed glasses, pocket watch, sandals, bowl and plate
"commercialize and thereby demean the
metal-rimmed glasses, pocket watch, sandals, bowl and plate
software system
the public debt to the penny
West Virginia,
debt software,
public debt building
Her teeth
apparent suicide,
Alexander Jenkins, a reality TV contestant suspected in his wife's slaying,
was gay and in a long-term relationship.
a ban on same-sex marriages in California
same-sex
Philip Kunhardt Jr.,
five
Meserve/Kunhardt family
photographed
Pervez Musharraf's
Pervez Musharraf
"The United States will help with these efforts
Pakistani President Pervez Musharraf's
other countries
1977-89,
parents
a period that spanned from 1977-89,
333 children
hospitalized
"an act of violence
"an act of violence that would have been heartbreaking had it occurred any place in America."
a dozen soldiers and a civilian
the 1870s,
the exact cause of its distinctive color is a mystery.
is shrinking.
Great Red Spot,
NASA's Cassini spacecraft
Two members of the family had jumped before -- including family matriarch Harriett.
"I'm never scared up there," she
central Florida.
Ryan Jenkins
Ryan Jenkins
Arizona police to determine whether people are in the United States legally
Mayor Phil Gordon,
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP),
anti-hunger program.
Afghanistan.
Pakistan,
"We intend to push the Pakistanis very hard,"
more than 100 million
motors.
"It's just adding the throttle aspect, other than that it handles
four times
everything you've dreamed your bicycle should
Efes Pilsen
Istanbul Modern
pudding and a beverage,
take over nightly news anchor duties for ABC
news anchor
Diane Sawyer
someone with an unmatched enthusiasm
"It's always good to come back
performing some of his signature moves.
a small Las Vegas bank,
he was forced out for favoring slow growth.
warnings to banks concerned they were amassing large amounts of commercial development loans and lowering lending standards.
Silver State
Cargill,
Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez's government
Friday
Venezuela
sentencing commission
guidelines in place by 2012
a controversial proposal that
introduces a separate bill
new sentencing guidelines in place by 2012
Michael Jackson's
Michael Jackson's "Number Ones"
international staff members of five non-governmental organizations
A meningitis outbreak
tens of thousands
death penalty.
The anti-democratic institution
Haugen a reprieve
the September 11, 2001, terrorist attacks on New York and Washington.
Sweden, Australia, Belgium, Uruguay and Spain
Iraq and Afghanistan
President Barack Obama
Friday night.
four:
sunglasses to furniture
head of the Italian fashion house
Gianni Versace
"glamour, femininity and sensuality."
1997,
Gianni Versace
raked in at least $200 million from 3 million people.
at least $200
pyramid schemes
scores
government forces
the Horn of Africa
Dadaab
overcrowded and unsanitary conditions
Black-Yellow government."
Angela
FDP
Social Democrats
Social Democrats
Angela Merkel's Christian Democratic Union,
President Obama,
Only about 19 percent of its pre-Katrina population has returned; roughly 3,600 people live there today, compared to some 19,000 when
Freedom Square
last month's presidential election
unfair elections,"
Freedom Square was empty, Ghazarian said, but the protesters were demonstrating in a main square elsewhere in the city.
Freedom Square
four
in a San Diego home,
did not
two
Kent Conrad,
co-op idea as an alternative to a government-sponsored insurance program
are nonprofit
Richard Shelby,
a governing board.
chemotherapy.
Daniel Hauser's
'Come back and be safe and be a family again,'
"It is imperative that Daniel receive the attention of an oncologist as soon as possible,"
was charged with criminal contempt and sentenced to 179 days in jail.
scheming-to-defraud
antihistamines,
shots, pop antihistamines, squeeze eyedrops, squirt nasal spray, use inhalers
10 million
Luke Mescher
"I'm on the 10th floor
8.8-magnitude
Both women
J.Crew,
Sarah Brown,
Only five
at least two and a half hours.
deaths
it was a form of torture for him
when they got into a dispute
climate change can trump natural selection.
1985.
Scotland's wild Soay
tranquil beaches,
tranquil beaches,
northern island of Sylt
the Burj Dubai,
Sunday
Annise Parker
Vick's
Vick.
Andy Reid
"We hope that Mr. Vick uses his stature for the betterment of the community and the advancement of the issue of
Vick,
The former Atlanta Falcons quarterback
CNN
CNN
photos of Russia
"Once you know the basics, you go from there."
Mustang Barbers.
lightning strike
a lightning strike
Rio de Janeiro,
a lightning strike was a possibility,
(just before my 40th birthday),
Chaz Bono
Chaz
transition from female to male will be effortless,
trying their best to help the mentally disabled and mentally ill, but that the needs were 'enormous'
less than one percent
Daniel Mungai's family
Daniel Mungai
the administration has failed to protect and support them.
they were attacked by students,
assaults are commonplace,
Baltimore, Maryland,
attacked by
individuals on any bonuses received in 2009 from companies getting $5 billion or more in money from the Troubled Asset Relief Program, or TARP.
legislation Thursday to try to recoup bonuses
90 percent
tax individuals on any bonuses received in 2009 from companies getting $5 billion or more in money from the Troubled Asset Relief Program,
the same day,
Whitmore
St. Dunstan's care home in Ovingdean, England,
at the age of 113,
Queen Elizabeth and Prime Minister Gordon Brown
Family members
Plymouth, Massachusetts.
Morghab River near Afghanistan's border with Turkmenistan.
Officials are continuing their search for a second paratrooper lost at the same time.
U.S. paratrooper
Both men
The Lakers
Thursday night.
Monterrey, Mexico,
"These reprehensible acts require us all to persevere in the fight against gangs of unscrupulous criminals. All the support to NL (Nuevo Leon)."
STOCKHOLM, Sweden
Stockholm
in Stockholm.
Stockholm
Dykstra and Robert Hymers, 27, his accountant, provided information from a man they claimed was a co-signer, but who had not authorized his name to be used.
that Dykstra and Robert Hymers, 27, his accountant, provided information from a man they claimed was a co-signer, but who had not authorized his name to be used.
Major League Baseball All-Star
a voter-approved measure outlawing same-sex marriage.
a state Supreme
California
said it will not block the implementation or enforcement of the law in the meantime.
"improperly used" to strip away a right protected by the state constitution.
state Supreme Court
third
Sebastian Vettel
Cho Ben Thanh Market.
café
Ho Chi Minh
"moto drivers."
"Watchmen,"
Terry Gilliam, Darren Aronofsky, Paul Greengrass and David Hayter
mid-2007,
American Nurses Association,
to cap out-of-pocket costs and create a health insurance exchange in which individuals and small businesses can pool resources to help bargain
number of people without health insurance rose from 45.7 million in 2007 to 46.3 million in 2008.
the new director of national intelligence,
Clapper,
"Eid Mubarak," or happy festivities.
On the morning of Eid,
prayers
Taliban to join the peace process
"behaved differently" from the rest of the structure during its catastrophic collapse.
President Bush
50
Transportation Secretary Mary Peters,
pledged the government would "eliminate roadblocks" and "cut through paperwork" to get it rebuilt.
pledged the government would "eliminate roadblocks" and "cut through paperwork"
50 feet
to inspire American Muslims and non-Muslims alike.
other criticism.
Friday afternoon prayer session,
the Mall for the inauguration,
several hours
Barack Obama's inauguration.
9 a.m.,
did not
$216 million Mega Millions jackpot,
The ticket is worth an estimated $216 million if the money is paid out over 26 years, or about $140 million if they choose an immediate cash
The Pentagon is making detailed plans to send about 34,000 more U.S. troops to Afghanistan
plans for Afghanistan
NATO countries would
contribute more troops
top advisers
top advisers
Video clips of the kids performing
current events.
knowledge,"
"global curriculum"
a "global curriculum" with a heavy emphasis on current events.
Seventh graders at Ron Clark Academy
various
Egyptian Embassy in London,
Egypt
"I'm still a soldier day in and day out,"
in January.
San Antonio
"Allahu akbar,"
Facebook and Twitter
Cimino
a single, massively coordinated attack."
Thursday
Mainland U.S.
a ground-breaking Puerto Rican politician from New York City,
Lyla Rose,
June,
his wife and two
is a suspect in an off-campus shooting.
months of racial tension in the community
flu-like
4,298
H1N1
"for the right to know,"
R.E.M.
a series of Freedom of Information
Iraqi government
40,000
the end of the year.
Friday
complete withdrawal
968
Nine
third major
release of Roy Bennett
magistrate
three
a magistrate
continued detention of Bennett,
Livingstone Chipadze
nothing less than a "slap in the face."
the money that the church receives from Snyder will be used to finance demonstrations.
127
South Korean star Park Ji-sung
South Korean star Park Ji-sung
Park Ji-sung
"These are people in poor health; they are soaking wet because of the torrential downpours.
thousands of Congolese refugees fled camps Tuesday in the Democratic Republic of Congo
Rwandan Hutu
made the movement even more difficult.
375,000
troops under
Torrential rain
from their homes
one woman's lost love and the emotional journey over the course of a night that helps her let go of a man and recapture her fire.
one woman's lost love and the emotional journey over the course of a night that helps her let go of a man and recapture her fire.
abort the rescue,
a disabled freighter carrying 22 people,
military
Coast Guard and Air Force
strong winds made it too
Hurricane Ike without power,
central Oklahoma
could not immediately be determined.
Journalists saw shell fire coming from
Journalists saw shell fire coming from
30
could not immediately be determined.
Britain's Prime Minister Gordon Brown
MPs
Gordon Brown
Britain's Prime Minister Gordon Brown
picking taxpayers' pockets by subterfuge
(CNN)
Port-au-Prince.
no diplomatic relations
Laura Ling and Euna Lee,
reporters for California-based Current TV
more than 111,000 people
The Haitian government says it will be switching from a search and rescue operation to a search and recovery mission.
111,000 people
a 24-year-old man
Jon Hamm
Jon Hamm
"The Day the Earth Stood Still."
Space Shuttle Columbia
the crew's helmets, spacesuits and restraints,
Columbia
NASA
knew for about 40 seconds that they did not have
that they did not have control of the shuttle
13
Chambersburg town square.
I
Some
President Obama
Obama's speech was not unprecedented.
urged students to work hard and stay in school.
"There is no excuse for not trying,"
the rains
The drought, combined with soaring temperatures,
Mali,
"Six
young elephants
"The stench of rotting corpses fills the air, and
a valve in the main engine.
February 19
a valve in the main engine.
space shuttle Discovery
no earlier than February
a valve in the main engine.
"early warning system"
respect their obligations under international humanitarian law."
an independent state in Sri Lanka
"that all parties respect their obligations under international humanitarian law."
their obligations under international humanitarian law."
Obama and the Security Council
Tiger rebels
"travel document checkers,"
security
Security Administration
in Abu Dhabi
11 other
Vergne, who will drive for
$900,000
using her sorority credit card for personal items and its board of directors of spending too much on her.
using her sorority credit card for personal items
spending hundreds of thousands of dollars on President Barbara McKinzie
claims in the lawsuit against her.
credit card for personal items
the organization's president of
Cambodia
soldiers had not gone anywhere they were not permitted to be.
three men dead in a car
rates of suicide
on a London Underground train
Police in London
Officers staking out a home in south London saw and followed
President Richard M. Nixon and his Brazilian counterpart, Emilio Medici,
reacted to this by saying that the United States obviously wanted Brazil "to do the dirty work,"
in July
money or other discreet aid
overthrow the socialist government of Salvador Allende in Chile,
details collusion between the colossus of the North [the United States] and the colossus of the South [Brazil],"
Jerusalem
Shalit's return,
Iran
nearly 2-to-1 landslide for Ahmadinejad
the hopes, fears and aspirations of young Iranians.
The mullahs
found that mining the huge amounts of heat that reside as stored thermal energy in the Earth's hard rock crust could
invented a portable geothermal power plant.
geothermal generator
portable geothermal power plant.
Alaskan entrepreneur Bernie Karl
a portable geothermal power plant.
$625,000,
Peoria, Illinois.
it would
indicted for tax evasion and breach of trust.
Lee Kun-hee
The chairman of the Samsung Group
Lee Kun-hee
tax evasion and breach of trust.
affect fertility and blood pressure,
power plants,
prostitution.
told CNN it had not seen Dart's complaint but that "craigslist is an extremely unwise choice for those intent on committing crimes, since criminals inevitably leave an electronic trail to themselves that law enforcement officers will follow."
information on 4,000 credit cards and the company's "private client" list,
activist hacking group Anonymous.
Stratfor's website
South Waziristan
Sararogha
Ground Self-Defense Force
U.S.-led coalition in and around Afghanistan.
a teacher left Garrett Peck in an isolation cubicle for at least two and a half hours.
auditors have uncovered widespread abuse of techniques used to restrain or discipline
restrain or discipline
special-need children are subjected to the policies of seclusion and policies of restraint
"I'll Make Love
"I'll Make Love
How much you paid for that (ridiculously cheap) pair of shoes
Swat Valley,
Kundar in Pakistan's Swat Valley.
The bomb,
Aboriginal people.
to Aborigines and the "Stolen Generations" of children who were taken from their families.
Islam4UK.
as Islam4UK.
A controversial Muslim group planning to stage an anti-war march through a
governments of Pakistan and Afghanistan
North Waziristan region
November 10,
Rohde, Ludin and their driver
Pakistani military
New York Times reporter David Rohde,
she had trousers considered too tight and a blouse too transparent.
40 lashes in public,
40 lashes in public,
wearing clothes that Sudan deemed indecent
trousers considered too tight and a blouse too transparent.
American people to honor the dignified and respectful return of war casualties to home soil for the last time.
war dead
allowing media coverage of coffins of war victims returning
$18 million worth
San Juan,
nearly $20 million worth of cocaine
delayed his approval of the exhibition agreement
further delay in approval would cause the
proposed she or one of her children be added as an executor to Michael's will.
delayed his approval of the exhibition agreement
The arrest of Mullah Abdul Ghani Baradar
the most significant Taliban capture
church fires.
three
the drawings
their access to education is restricted.
and ineligible to receive a visa under Section 212 (A) (3) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, which prohibits issuance of a visa to aliens for security and related grounds,"
their access to education is restricted.
Berlin, Madrid, Rome, Bangkok, Tokyo, New Delhi and Paris.
the wheel and even cup noodles were among the varied answers
the wheel and even cup noodles were among the varied
Romney
Romney
Mitt Romney
unite his ideologically fraying party,
Chris Christie
Mitt Romney
Jonathan Ayers,
nothing illegal
on al-Raei Iraqi satellite television
transferred to Syria
30-minute
an onboard computer failed,
an onboard computer failed,
fly a fifth and final space shuttle mission
ground testing of a critical replacement computer
more than six
attacking 73-year-old Deloris Gillespie.
U.S. Department of Agriculture
students
"On the investigation itself, President Chirac repeats that no such 'system' has ever existed in the Paris city hall,"
a five-year sentence and a fine of 75,000 euros
five-year sentence
The suspicion is that the employees were working for Chirac's right-wing political party, RPR, which no longer exists, while on the city payroll.
allegations stemming from his time as mayor of Paris,
75,000 euros
up to $108
receive $108 U.S. dollars worth of shopping vouchers
Taipei, Taiwan,
of deceased Libyan strongman Moammar
family of deceased Libyan strongman Moammar Gadhafi
Pennsylvania
Pennsylvania
a national memorial where the crash occurred.
Sri Lanka's embassy in Oslo
authorities to "seek immediate arrest of the perpetrators of this serious act of terror"
the massacre of Tamils,"
Norway
1942.
1942
Jane Tedeschi,
"Every American should be grateful for their service, and I am honored to sign this bill to finally give them some of the hard-earned recognition they deserve."
WASPs
for at least 13 years, just waiting for a connection to be
Dennis Earl Bradford,
DNA
His DNA was found on underwear left behind,
"This metro station was built by prisoners of gulags who were in there
"I have no positive emotions towards Stalin,"
of citizens
Moscow's Kurskaya
who were imprisoned, punished
40
remote part of northwestern Montana
the Montana side of Buckhorn Mountain,
wolf activity
Chignik Lake,
animals
wolf activity close to the community of Chignik Lake,"
to house the inmates might be troublesome.
warned this was not an issue with which Congress should concern itself.
sports teams
off the Brazilian coast
16
Atlantic.
is still not known,
Brasilia,
truck safer,
"The extensive use of advanced technologies and materials in the 2009 F-150 required us to develop new, specific procedures and repair recommendations," said Gerry Bonanni,
try and reduce the cost of auto repairs and insurance premiums for consumers
Paint and Body Technology Center in Inkster, Michigan,
baseball bat
$40 and a loaf of bread.
Muslim
$2 million
Hisham Talaat Moustafa and
Dubai apartment
outpouring of sentiment
the symbolism of a black man taking the oath of the president's office
"White women of the South, how do you like it?"
author of "TR: The Last Romantic" and the just-released "Traitor to His Class: The
White House
Likewise, the outrage expressed by Southern editors and spokesmen over Roosevelt's alleged affront to the South, while couched in the language of race,
Shiv Shankar Menon, the Indian foreign secretary and M.K. Narayanan, the national security adviser,
"Given that the area has shrunk even further, the potential for further significant casualties still remains,"
vehicles and fuel expenses account for nearly two-thirds of the
vehicles and fuel expenses
five percent out of every
Taxiway M,
on a taxiway
Hartsfield.
no damage
20,000
The German government in Berlin later ordered the Somali pirates released because they were not caught while harassing German interests,
20,000
Berlin
German navy
U.S., Russian, NATO and Indian vessels in the waters off Somalia, a
The German government in Berlin
aboard a circus train.
Kate Meinhardt
living in such a small space,"
five
Daniel and Clinton Rowling
December
31
at retailers nationwide, including Target, Toys "R" Us, Wal-Mart, Dollar General, Kmart, Walgreens, Ace Hardware
causing children to slip into the water, posing a drowning risk,
Richmond, California,
authorities are still looking for a
Adult obesity rates
44.4 percent of Mississippi
Mississippi,
44.4
conducting harsh interrogations, beatings, sleep deprivation, and threats of torture
of conducting harsh interrogations, beatings, sleep deprivation, and threats of torture to coerce false confessions.
The Texas Department of Public Safety
students
The State Department
one in three of the 6,000 recognized
one in three of the 6,000 recognized amphibian
frogs, toads and salamanders.
Michael Vick
"Michael wants to again apologize to everyone who has been hurt in this matter and he thanks all of the people who have offered him and his family prayers and support during this time,"
dogfighting
Monday
August
December 10
December 10
for his actions and his self-surrender
Billy Martin,
on a jalapeño pepper imported from Mexico
they found the bacteria on a jalapeño pepper imported from Mexico
Salmonella Saintpaul.
goalkeeper
Hannover 96 and Germany goalkeeper Robert Enke
mount the "strongest appeal possible"
Gael Kukuta
Premier League side Chelsea
"induced" Gael Kukuta
the Indian Ocean
The Yemenia Airways Airbus 310 crashed into the Indian Ocean early Tuesday, carrying 142 passengers and 11 crew members.
Marseille,
Prachanda
Prachanda
A simple majority
464
he will appeal the ruling.
cannot be enforced,"
ordinances passed by Hazleton,
"Hazleton, in its zeal to control the presence of a group deemed undesirable, violated the rights of such people, as well as others within the community. Since the United States Constitution protects even
ordinances passed by Hazleton,
10 seats are available to the public,
buying influence on Capitol Hill.
not recommend people go on nonessential travel,"
travel health warning
about Mexico on Monday, and the U.S. State Department
April Fools' Day.
made a reference to China's tainted-milk scandal that sickened 300,000 people last year.
control,
Lear jet
Lear 45
"presumed deficiencies" in the pilot's certification to operate a Lear jet,
all aboard,
tests found no traces of
The Lear jet
a Boeing 767-300
extremely fine
Icelandic volcano
Julissa Brisman,
personal services.
Craigslist ads for personal services.
better relations between the United States and North Korea.
better relations between the United States and North Korea.
Rev. Franklin Graham
Rev. Franklin Graham
have received threats and we take them seriously."
security
"It's very sad,"
in the state of Chihuahua.
Namiquipa, a small town in the state of Chihuahua.
the Sun's
was off the Sun's online front page by Monday evening.
he was battling a potentially fatal disease
the author of an upcoming book about Jackson
Jackson's illness had robbed him of 95-percent of the vision in one eye and that he needed a lung transplant "but may be too weak to go through with it."
A history of childhood abuse and use of a provocative online identity
how their adolescent girls present themselves on the Internet and be aware that provocative self-presentation might have implications for sexual solicitation.
in Pediatrics
monitoring of adolescent Internet use
a provocative avatar,
your children by monitoring their Internet use.
risk factors connected to increased rates of Internet-initiated victimization of girls.
history of childhood abuse
"Walmart
Big Damn
Brown County,
Brown County,
'em hurt with us."
children have died in the Nakivale settlement,
three
no children have died in the Nakivale settlement,
IDPs,
Presidential Medal of Freedom,
provided shelter
more than 1.5 million
President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
Ahmadinejad,
annual meeting of the U.N. General Assembly.
International Criminal
his duties
president and general director of Pax
a two-year affair.
Rev. Alberto Cutie
World Health Organization
433 public and nonpublic
16 deaths
Mexico and the United States, Canada
367 worldwide,
South Africa
The Springboks
the victim's screams could be heard outside the boys' locker room at Walker Middle School, in southern Tampa,
allege the four boys raped the 13-year-old victim multiple times over two months with a broomstick and hockey stick.
Tampa, Florida,
a 13-year-old boy.
broomstick and hockey stick.
the Exxon Valdez
a blazing car at the entrance of the terminal building at Glasgow
"absurd" British Islamists
we will be commenting not on close shaves but on completed terrorist attacks."
under terrorist attack
man cave,
(CNN)
civil war,
Nani
United's
Hollywood
more than 80 features to his name,
Bollywood
before the death of his father was announced,
"If anyone knows I'm talking, I would be sent to prison and there's no mercy there. I would be shot dead."
people are starving, aid is scarce, and the only operating factories serve the military.
"North Koreans don't speak openly,"
a friendly question from a voter.
Sen. Hillary Clinton's
Barack Obama
"It's not easy, and I couldn't do it if I just didn't, you know, passionately believe it was the right thing to do.
Clinton
Hillary Clinton
Operation Spy
Fall and winter weekends
Fall and winter weekends are a great
before 9 a.m.
International Spy
the government,
An Islamic militant group in northern Nigeria
Kevin Costner
for a long time.
20 years
making music
His new record is "Untold Truths."
new hearings
Medellin execution
1988,
Michaela's abduction and other unsolved kidnappings in the region are in any way related to Phillip Garrido,
poem
method of kidnapping
items labeled "tax free"
alcohol and cigarettes.
labeled "tax free" and otherwise taxed heavily
Duty-free shops
duty-free is hit-or-miss
very detailed good information
Human Khalil Abu-Mulal al Balawi,
both countries' intelligence services
1,800-strong security force
to send an 1,800-strong security force to
Youssif
Youssif
Grossman Burn Center in the heart of sunny Southern California.
eight to 10
Youssif
5-year-old
near the Indian Ocean island nation of Seychelles
the Pompei
Dutch naval forces
the U.N. soldiers who have sex with the child prostitutes and beat the older
a local brothel.
to have personally killed 20,000 people including babies, and to have sometimes cannibalized his victims.
shotgun houses
tire-size hole in the roof
some houses
in 30 B.C.,
Cleopatra and Mark Antony
Cleopatra and Mark Antony
a tomb
10 mummies, two of them gilded.
to plead guilty to one count of misconduct of a ship operator causing death,
is a popular hangout because it's quiet and secluded.
fences and warning signs.
Carnes, in southern Mississippi.
the 27-year-old mum's boyfriend
jailed indefinitely.
a furor in
93
"It is with great excitement that I read the press release from the Central Falls Teachers' Union referencing their proposed comprehensive reform agenda,"
all the teachers and staff from
93 people
recent successes
Russian football."
Russian football?
Andrei Arshavin
after the collapse of the Soviet Union in 1991,
the injection of money
desperate need of money;
Andrei Arshavin
bombed
Kareli, a part of Georgia that is about 50 miles northwest of the capital, Tblisi,
to regain control
Retired Gen. Mauro Enrique Tello Quiñonez,
Tello
Retired Gen.
Gen. Mauro Enrique Tello Quiñonez, his aide and a driver were tortured
Retired Gen. Mauro Enrique Tello Quiñonez, his aide and a driver were tortured before
United Nations
United States
is not violating
professor Philip Alston,
planned U.S.-Iraq security pact,
allay Iranian fears over
Iraq's Prime Minister Nuri al-Maliki
to become a launching pad
"Iraq today doesn't present any threat as it used to be in the times of the former regime,"
Pat Hingle,
Gotham City's Commissioner Gordon
character actor
84,
He also guest-starred in countless TV series, including a memorable turn as a character named Col. Daniel Webster Tucker in a 1980 "M*A*S*H" episode.
"Pourquoi Pas?"
228
France's
Chinese
built an animal in 45 minutes.
master model builder at the new LEGOLAND Discovery Center
allegedly abducted his two children
for at least 10 days
there also follows a tradition of sole-custody divorces.
centered about 200 miles (320 km) north of the capital,
175
something scary
Friday each week
Future Friday.
Alan of Glasgow.
33
Forward Operating Base Dwyer, Afghanistan,
changed the constitution to allow longer terms for the president.
Honduran President Jose Manuel Zelaya
reached an agreement late Thursday to form a government of national reconciliation.
ousted Honduran President Jose Manuel Zelaya
Apple's
reported to be 15 years old,
the U.N.
Conditions for women
U.N. and rights groups
women
the U.N. and rights groups
Suraya Pakzad, founder of the Voice of Women Organization,
the U.N.
Tenzo Artisan, a bakery and catering company in Baltimore
Janice Shih
obstetrician/gynecologist
like the Food Network's "Ace of Cakes" and Bravo's "Top Chef."
a bakery and catering company
President Obama
Dave Matthews
want ratings more than we want to deliver information.
fifth consecutive No. 1 album
creating its own and giving back.
in America that's already there, and I don't think I noticed it when I lived here as a kid. But when I went back to South Africa, and then it's sort of thrust in your face, and then came back here
Harvey Milk,
1978
100,000
May 22
in 1978
ankle injury
Queen's final
Wimbledon
$1.8 million.
Hunger Project,
He told her he wants to "sit down when it makes sense" for her, said
how unified the Democratic Party is going to be to win in November,"
Wednesday
beauty pageant
Stephen Colbert.
TV anchorman Stephen Colbert.
Stephen Colbert el dos, a Pomeranian Chihuahua mixed-breed puppy
Don't get angry, and don't lie
unless you really need it
call your doctor
CNN.com
Matthew Friedman
their favorite players.
baseball
Baseball's biggest stars
baseball
December 1989,
the second-highest,
The city of Anchorage advises citizens to stay indoors,"
at least a year.
Fidel Castro
economic matters and medical checkups,
medical checkups, according to the state-run newspaper.
President Rafael Correa
Communist leader Fidel Castro
Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
"expect another confrontation"
bodies of three students
the women
about 10:45 p.m. Sunday,
Infantino "SlingRider"
in the United States,
two baby slings, the "SlingRider" and the "Wendy Bellissimo," offering customers replacement slings.
Prince William
a four-month attachment with the Royal Air Force
Prince
in the British Army,
an outright ban, backed by criminal sanctions. Section 441b makes it a felony for all corporations -- including nonprofit advocacy corporations -- either to expressly advocate the election or defeat of candidates or to broadcast electioneering communications within 30 days of a primary election and 60 days of a general election.
The American
"Saturday Night Live"
has spoofed, ridiculed and hammered presidents and other political figures without regard to political affiliation or any other sensitivities.
spoofed, ridiculed and hammered presidents
made a lot of promises regarding health care reform,
Americans
spoofed, ridiculed and hammered presidents and other political figures
brings "a wealth of experience in the law and in life.
"Women belong in all places where decision are being made,"
"I would hope that a wise Latina woman with the richness of her experience would more often than not reach a better conclusion than a white male who hasn't lived that life."
said she was able to capture an informal moment,
Gallery.
Gallery.
Edward Flynn,
Law enforcement officials in the Wisconsin city
"Francisco Martinez, a Mexican-U.S. citizen, was in permanent contact with opposition groups during the whole era of conspiracy,"
"Francisco Martinez,
Evo Morales
opposition groups,
"Francisco Martinez,
J.Crew
Obama.
black family
PITTSBURGH, Pennsylvania
a center for high-tech innovation
"has transformed itself from the city of steel to a center for high-tech innovation -- including green technology, education and training, and research and development,"
PITTSBURGH, Pennsylvania
innovative 21st-century recovery
green technology, education and training, and research and development,"
the global economy.
is still missing.
a school bus stop.
charging for content
News Corporation-owned newspaper Web sites to start charging
will soon be over."
shake-up the culture of freely available content.
"malfunctioning."
New York Post, the News International stable of UK titles including the Sun and the Times, and a cluster of Australian papers including the Daily Telegraph and the Herald Sun.
mine exploded
second
four people
A mine
on a road in southern Somalia,
into the activists deaths
Alston said many are suspicious that the police were involved
Kenya's capital,
in the summer
energy
approximately 71,000 people.
Coca-Cola.
in more than 200 countries across the world.
Coca-Cola
race stewards deemed it had breached rules banning team orders to drivers
president Luca di Montezemolo
U.S. officials
strong winds and rain
36
Sunday's
strong winds and rain
have yet to
U.S. Embassy in Bangkok
89
U.S. officials
89
stopped studying third down tendencies
Alabama
Tuscaloosa,
recommending that consumers not eat its peanut butter
six-year
Blur on Thursday played the first of two outdoor concerts in London's Hyde Park.
Graham Coxon
Damon Albarn
ran a women's clinic in which he performed abortions.
Dr. George Tiller,
"necessity defense"
a defendant argues an action was justified because breaking the law was more advantageous to society than following it.
performed late-term abortions.
Sedgwick County Judge Warren Wilbert
Yemen and Italy,
96,000
The bulk of the more than 96,000
Yemen and Italy,
"I don't think I should take any s*** from anybody on that, do you?"
denied Tuesday he had accused Sen. Barack
Tuesday
WHYY Web site.
Core 2 Quad Q6600 CPU,
Core 2 Quad Q6600
"Awakening Joy
bring more happiness
things that made her happy, and getting a "joy buddy"?
of activities you enjoy, checking off those you do regularly and circling the ones that could be done more often
"Shoot me, kill me,"
hairbrush
they were about to receive fire.
"I've got a gun, I've got a gun,"
"I've got a gun, I've got a gun,"
A young man
large-scale business interests involved in logging, mining, agriculture and,
large-scale business interests involved in logging, mining, agriculture and, especially, cattle ranching.
50,000 square miles
growing back
repair police cruisers and join local authorities on patrols
"Public confidence in the [Puerto Rico Police Department's] ability to protect the citizenry
Puerto Rico,
a drug-fueled crime tsunami that has flooded the Caribbean island.
Knights Hospitallers,
around 3600 BC,
stone temples at Ħaġar Qim and Mnajdra,
A simple majority
Minneapolis, Minnesota,
Evangelical Lutheran Church
only if celibate.
"The virus is not stoppable,"
the H1N1 virus
is considered inevitable,"
Hong Kong
highest level,
World Health
was on track to defend his Dubai Tennis Championship title
Novak Djokovic
7-5 2-0
torrential rain, thunder and lightning
Sunday afternoon.
wildfire in Yellowstone National Park
wildfire in Yellowstone National Park has grown to 9,300 acres
no danger to travelers.
Evanescence
Carly Smithson
It is very promising to see that America is moving toward a balance of punishment and prevention, thanks to inventive ideas like the Missouri model. No matter how many prisons we build and criminals we lock up, the fact remains the best way to fight crime is to stop it at the source. And that is exactly
rehabilitation, therapeutic intervention and conflict resolution
focuses on rehabilitation, therapeutic intervention and conflict resolution rather than force and punishment.
reduce illegal immigration.
the law known as HB
Youth Becoming Healthy
Jasmine Warren
YBH
New Orleans and the entire Gulf Coast
January 2006
Baghdad
Abu Uthman
the first
In the most high-profile
300 militants.
Kamdesh district
"attractive target"
The attack killed eight U.S. service members
12 hours,
October 3
last year
father of Haleigh Cummings,
not feel Misty Cummings has told them everything she knows.
father
his wife,
flip-flopper.
180-run ninth wicket
2-0
Graeme Smith
first-ever Test series triumph in Australia
nine-wicket
inflicted the first home series defeat on Australia
site of the Hanging Gardens of Babylon
U.S. military did major damage to the site
The site of the Hanging Gardens of Babylon
U.S. military
site of the Hanging Gardens of Babylon
Rotterdam
Mikhail Youzhny
switching off power to promote energy efficiency.
Britain's Scilly Isles
homes, schools and businesses on the Scilly Isles are switching off all non-essential electrical equipment to promote energy saving.
E-Day,
the next mirror.
relationship
see themselves reflected in someone else's adoring eyes.
definitely cheating,
co-founder
included in the American experience.
mainstream of America.
Republicans
new "Hispanic outreach" initiatives
"Hispanic outreach"
Hispanics,
Inspector General Edward McGuire
blistering report
National Intelligence
DNI's office.
918
helped Jamaican authorities handle the situation
Halifax, Canada,
Prime Minister Bruce Golding.
Four U.S. soldiers died in a roadside bombing
4,000 deaths.
U.S.
about 80,000 to the hundreds of thousands,
urged Americans to be patient with the progress of the war, contending that it is "well worth fighting" because it has implications about "global terror."
an improvised explosive device
4,000
14th successive World Cup defeat
Namibia
change
"top-down liberalism."
Alex Castellanos
U.N. Resolution 1874 imposes an embargo on the shipment of arms from the communist regime
states to "exercise vigilance"
an embargo on the shipment of arms from the communist regime and broadens a ban on the import of weapons.
the Galapagos Islands in the Pacific Ocean.
near the equator,"
tether
2030s
developing a design,
the Japan Space Elevator Association
Premier League
facility twice presented Barrow with the chance to change either rooms or roommates,
strangling
Laura Lundquist killed centenarian Elizabeth Barrow,
"sisters," saying they took "daily walks together
near their Orlando, Florida, home,
authorities believe the remains are Caylee's because no other children have been reported missing in the area, the remains are consistent with a child Caylee's age and the remains were found near the grandparents' home.
DNA analysis
discovered bones
subordinates.
microblogging
Jobs' death and 23 million messages of Tencent QQ Weibo,
to disrupt, dismantle and defeat al Qaeda in Pakistan and Afghanistan,"
"We have a clear and focused goal: to disrupt, dismantle and defeat al Qaeda in Pakistan and Afghanistan,"
the war in Afghanistan?
At 4½ years old, Tai Shan is more of a panda adolescent than a cub,
Mei Lan - a 3-year-old panda born at Zoo Atlanta in Georgia.
breeding
when a roadside bomb detonated in a marketplace in northern Iraq,
free fixes
there could be many affected Toyota models that do not get the requisite fix
25 percent
Nancy Grace's twins
Nancy Grace's twins
Nancy Grace's
remaining routers to become overloaded with traffic.
when the company took some servers offline
Tuesday.
World Taekwondo Federation
disqualified by referee
taekwondo
referee Chakir Chelbat of Sweden
pushing a judge, then pushed and kicked Chelbat in the face.
Americans to "renew a sense of common purpose and shared citizenship."
country's military
military personnel and their families
events were too far apart in both time and distance to be
the recent deadly earthquakes?
activity could be related.
Lancaster
the senator from New York
fit of rage
Indian Assam Rifles
remote northeastern state of Manipur,
Baghdad
At least 18
a suicide bomber
north coast of New Zealand's North Island
struck the Astrolabe Reef,
fatal attack at a military recruiting center in Arkansas in
Pvt. William Long,
Abdul Hakim Muhammad
killing Pvt. William Long, 23, and wounding Pvt. Quinton Ezeagwula, 18.
to have ties to al Qaeda in Yemen
two rockets fired by coalition
Taliban fighters
710,
devastating flooding and mudslides
Nova Friburgo
rains caused devastating flooding and mudslides
Mohammed
The FLDS has strict rules, especially for girls: no pants, haircuts, drugs, booze or boys; just "keep sweet" and obey. So young women who leave often delve into worldly pleasures once outside, indulgences as innocent as blue jeans and as destructive as heroin and prostitution, survivors and an
those who have left the Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints,
some of the insights we have gained over 17 years of implementing the current law, including the need for consistency, oversight and clear standards."
President Obama and Adm. Mike Mullen, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff,
the Pentagon is raising the threshold for
president-elect
rally against Israel.
audio message
make the issue a top priority in his administration.
al Qaeda's deputy chief
the economy,
"witch"
a list of 22 people banned from Britain
22
White supremacists, Islamic clerics, a controversial Kansas pastor and a U.S.
Abdullah Qadri Al Ahdal, Amir Siddique, Yunis Al Astal
John Lennon
Elvis Presley
Greek-owned vessel and its crew of 22,
off Somalia, near the islands of Seychelles,
Somalia,
Andy Roddick
Kei Nishikori
about 5:30
state-run group
Two victims died at the site of the fire and two died during hospitalization,
probed nine fatal medical helicopter accidents that killed 35 people,
The recommendations
35
The agency recommended to the FAA in January 2006 that all medical chopper operators be required to develop and implement risk evaluation programs, use dispatch and flight procedures that include up-to-date weather information, and install "terrain awareness and warning systems" on their aircraft. A fourth recommendation would require medical flight operators to follow federal regulations regarding their flights.
how to stem the "drastic increase" in medical helicopter accidents.
The House,
New Hampshire would become the fifth state allowing same-sex marriage,
to the House of Representatives
50
50
Jackson's sudden and unexpected death
images of an impact scar near Jupiter's south pole.
near Jupiter's south pole.
an image of the planet's mysterious new scar.
early Monday.
3.6 million gallons of regular gasoline, more than 1 million gallons of premium gasoline and more than 1 million gallons of diesel fuel
graffiti found on two San Juan tunnels that referred
butter sold by King Nut company.
three of the patients
southwestern Virginia
an open container of King Nut
10 days imprisonment and was removed from his battalion and all combat postings,
"The division commander decided to cancel the
one of its combat soldiers
called off a raid
"Dawson's Creek" and "Party of Five."
He's also admired by fellow
in Africa and Asia to feed their people.
the country should largely escape the effects of the global slowdown.
a prior unreported incident.
records of body work
hidden damage.
A cloned vehicle involves using a vehicle identification number (VIN) from a legally owned, non-stolen vehicle to mask the identity of a similar make/model stolen vehicle.
McManus
"Brand loyalty is overrated,"
Saturn
Sunday's Christmas
is overrated,"
Kat Koonce
three
numerous
really cool.
Rolex
The recession
phones starting at $6,000
Vertu makes phones starting at $6,000
teachings of Islam.
against the teachings of Islam.
a wife.
going to strip clubs,
visited the club a handful of
Hasan
retail carriers with open source access to inexpensive bandwidth.
"This is going to reduce the cost of doing business in Africa, within Africa and with international parties"
17,000 kilometer
said
Not recycling
The highest bid was $250
Rock Wall"
listed the rock formation he dubbed the "Hand of God Rock Wall" on the online auction Web site eBay.
the rights, complete and exclusive rights" to the rock, including literary and movie rights,
Idaho
polio,
Hillary Clinton,
Bill Clinton
"It was a wrong-headed policy. It persisted through Democratic and Republican policies alike, including mine.
his acting job on the CBS series "Two and a Half Men"
Charlie Sheen checked into a rehab clinic
between November and February,
employee carrying the disease,
tuberculosis cases
Carnegie Hall.
13th-century Persian poet and philosopher Rumi.
the 13th-century Persian poet and philosopher Rumi.
Carnegie Hall.
setar
his music might be able to bridge cultural divides between Iran and the United States.
Iranian and classical Western music.
Kandi Burruss
aspiring singer Kim Zolciak,
Kandi Burruss
in a good light,"
award-winning singer, songwriter, producer and single mother
describe him as quiet and nice, but a little odd
loved to shop.
Wednesday
CNN's
Chains
neck
Fidel and Raul Castro
Cuban
Communist government Central Committee,
"Lyon
mother
her thoughts
possible, four years in a state prison,
President Lincoln
equal rights
to achieve.
turn the corner on past prejudices and racial politics.
Democratic candidate,
most people,
Donna Brazile
the school's fired teachers.
Don't bash our school.
93 teachers, support staff and administrators at Central Falls High School were fired for the low performance of the school,
was then placed into a wheeled suitcase along with mothballs and fabric-softener sheets,
resurrection
with images of swastikas in them.
received hate mail
manila envelopes Tuesday with images of swastikas in
Brett Ratner,
Brett Ratner,
would not host next year's Academy Awards,
quit over an anti-gay remark he made over the weekend.
24 and younger,
remove the Joker from future Batman movies.
was really the best.
parents
Health, Social Studies, Technology, Current Issues
the country will never move forward toward genuine
create a new political framework that guarantees majority rule while protecting the rights of religious, ethnic and political minorities.
must create a new political framework that guarantees majority rule while protecting the rights of religious, ethnic and political minorities.
rigged every election, abused human rights and monopolized the political
China's Wanda group
20 million
200,000
20 million
Chinese skiing industry.
China
it appeared to be a free-tailed bat that probably had a broken left wing and an injured right shoulder or wrist.
clinging on the foam of the external tank of the space shuttle moments before the Discovery launched,
urged everyone to take the bipartisan dinner past "just an inaugural tradition" and turn it into a "new way of doing the people's business in this
McCain
Obama
John McCain,
poll numbers
8-point
a presidential race has a non-incumbent in the lead,
CNN/USA Today/Gallup
New Jersey and the District of Columbia,
Maria Stephens
Rose (Amy Adams) and Norah (Emily Blunt) struggle with menial jobs and periods of unemployment.
Sisters Rose (Amy Adams) and Norah (Emily Blunt)
"The series of stunts drove buzz and the introduction of grilled chicken spiked short-term sales, the moves also contributed
bunless bomb o' meat
Burger King went against the fast food industry trend of offering more healthy choices by introducing the Enormous Omelet Sandwich
33 soldiers
Afghanistan,
Almost 4,000 Marines and sailors,
Almost 4,000 Marines and sailors, along with several hundred Afghan security forces and British
Dublin, Ireland
U2.
"only a few instances"
not participate in harsh interrogations of suspected terrorists detained
building a rapport with prisoners is the best way to gain intelligence,
Justice Department
"We believe that while the
the CIA and Defense Department.
President Obama
United States
much of that promise has yet to be fulfilled,"
Obama
"will stand behind efforts to hold war criminals accountable"
Washington
Binyam Mohamed,
UK government
Pakistan, Morocco and Afghanistan
claimed his third 100 meters success
Yelena Isinbayeva
in the women's pole
Monaco.
a dual-core 1.2GHz processor with 1GB of RAM,
8.2-inch and 10.1-inch
in one hand
hold it one-handed.
Thursday
many people in the community told her they don't feel they've been told the truth about the December 22 spill that occurred after a retention wall was breached at the Kingston Fossil Plant.
42
bed-sharing
planned to co-sleep with their babies,
lower in countries where co-sleeping is the norm,
co-sleeping
Stefan Reinartz
Leverkusen had defeated
ID cards,
unknown travelers who could present a higher risk."
ways to speed up screening of service members and, to the extent possible, their families,
Members of the military may get expedited treatment at airport security checkpoints
that this recall will have no effect on Just Salad's romaine lettuce,"
at least 19 people
"It is a show trial, there's no doubt about it,"
confirmed that an investigation has been opened and that a man called Helg Scarbi was arrested
($51 million)
the population there,
a history of animosity and mistrust.
United States is proposing new international limits on the number of landings from tourist vessels,
of pollution in Antarctica
47
this month.
a little millinery that I frequent out in Detroit.
of Barack.
cold weather
There's a love affair going on with the country and Barack.
classified information
tried to deliver classified information to someone he thought was an Israeli intelligence official, but who was actually an FBI undercover agent.
possible life
sell "some of our most guarded secrets"
possible life
"systematically stirred up" widespread contempt toward the country's
Dwight Bashir,
the media "uses brainwashing to entice Muslims away from their faith," and "security attractive young women to lure converts."
Stainless steel benches
which is being built to honor the 184 people killed when American Airlines
184 cantilevered benches
have the memorial finished and dedicated
$22 million
14
it is vitally important for pregnant women to recognize the signs and symptoms, like fever and cough, to get to their doctor quickly and to begin taking antiviral medicines early on.
has died,
pregnant women,"
pregnant women,"
Open lists would name candidates and their parties; closed lists would name only parties.
Baghdad,
Fort Lauderdale,
your own set of wheels.
Hotel prices
December to March is the peak
offer fishing, kayaking and snorkeling,
Evergreen Everglades
Geoff Lawton
work anywhere in the world,
back in the 1970s.
1970s.
Helvecio Ribeiro,
Goldman
hospital
Albrecht nose-dives down Kitzbuehel's Streif course after crashing during
carrying a bag in a great color is a fun and inexpensive way to update your look. Just make sure it's on the small and structured side. "Generally oversize bags can overwhelm the wearer and give her a sloppy appearance,"
today's working woman
Brewer and others
it does not involve racial profiling or any other illegal acts.
new immigration
groups that advocate for immigrant rights
new immigration law,
of Latinos that is already going on in Arizona much worse," said Alessandra Soler Meetze,
Japan,
promised not to take his children back to the United States "in this manner."
admitted to an extramarital affair with a woman identified as Maria Belen Chapur.
GOP Gov. Mark Sanford
South Carolina Republican Party Chairwoman Karen Floyd
Daniel Verdin, Shane Martin, Ronnie Cromer and Wes Hayes
Karen Floyd
Mercy James.
were admittedly reluctant
Sunday.
Ted Kennedy Jr.
Ted Kennedy Jr.
Rep. Patrick
times have changed,
Ted Kennedy
Friday
Hasan's neighbors at his Killeen, Texas, apartment complex
killed 12 soldiers and one civilian and wounded 38 people
Fort Hood
for a motive in the massacre that left more than 50 casualties at the largest U.S. military base.
animals showed signs of psychosis and self-mutilation.
a nine-month undercover investigation.
the rising tide of the Taliban in northwestern Pakistan
continues to be Pakistan's most vocal defender of prostitutes.
the rising tide of the Taliban in northwestern Pakistan has some
the conservative
sex workers.
Lahore's high court declared the mujra dance "vulgar" and banned it
Lahore, Pakistan.
Alfa Romeo
Light winds
"Fordlandia."
the noble Fordlandia experiment
Henry Ford,
Amazon rain forest
9 percent cut of the
Henry Ford
Moncks Corner,
herself, or her religion.
Islamic
30-year prison sentence was too lenient.
30-year prison
life in prison
2005
life in prison
lawmakers.
wrote a
South Carolina student Ty'Sheoma Bethea
Ty'Sheoma Bethea
help rebuilding her school
"willful blindness" in not acting faster to identify and correct the problems
instances of mismanagement and inadequate accounting
instances of mismanagement and inadequate accounting at Dover,
accused the Pentagon of
Congressman Rush Holt,
274 fallen military personnel
The Air Force
called Strangites
a new playground at the Russian hospital where he was born.
Krasnoyarsk.
build a new playground
many would perceive to be Islamic terrorists."
have won the Stanley Cup for a third time
third
Stanley Cup
Iraq.
Pedro Espinoza,
Hyderabad-based
hold their weddings
an annual science fiction costume and convention extravaganza
long distance
wind power
next 10 years or so,"
high-altitude wind turbine
A prototype of a high-altitude wind turbine made by Magenn Power.
20,000
human papilloma virus,
and there is no cure.
recurrent papillomatosis,"
serious breathing problems
create serious breathing problems
Pfc. Jose Medina,
Just six hours before shipping off, Medina's
"If Haitians were constantly questioning their faith, they would all be atheists."
Pat Robertson
houses of worship, in living rooms and on the torn-up streets of Haiti.
Veterans
"America will do right"
an aid camp
he is an envoy from the al Qaeda leader,
Ayman al Zawahiri,
he is delivering aid that al Qaeda had purportedly collected, including food, clothing and $12,000 converted into Somali currency.
will work with the United States on trying to root out extremism within its borders,
southern Afghanistan,
new administration, the new leadership,
extended a cease-fire
Pakistani Foreign Minister Makhdoom Shah Mehmood Qureshi
fuel economy
fuel economy and safety while boosting
jobs up and down the auto supply chain: from dealers to assembly workers and parts markers.
promotes fuel economy and safety while boosting the economy.
right hip
athletics
hip
fastest 100m time
allegations"
Naval Criminal Investigative Service
were "credible allegations"
allegations that civilians were intentionally killed during the operation,
Kennedy's
Robert McNamara
U.S. Defense Secretary Robert McNamara,
the real estate bubble in Qatar
first firm
first firm in Qatar to conduct investment banking
English football deal
undeveloped land from a government agency for about a third of its estimated value.
corruption,
prime minister Thaksin Shinawatra guilty of
locations in Tehran
Guardian Council
Khamenei
free weekend night with two stays
summer,
the recession
"Luxury hotels
worsened
Monday
"a climate of impunity has prevailed, the economy is in tatters and the refugee crisis" keeps escalating.
Monday
Amnesty International
New York's John F. Kennedy International
cat that vanished in baggage claim at New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport
an online sensation
Jack the Cat
were freed Sunday and they were sailing to Oman,
Gulf of Aden
Gulf of Aden
Train
disrupted in some areas,
8:20 a.m. (7:20 p.m. Wednesday ET)
Friday on Woods' site
longer the right representative for its advertising."
has determined that he is no longer the right representative for its advertising."
advertising."
Steven Good was found dead of an apparent self-inflicted gunshot Monday,
Steven Good
Jackson's will,
Katherine Jackson
Branca and McClain
Wright questions his critics' patriotism
Rev. Jeremiah Wright
"theology of liberation,
impact on security in the
nuclear and missile programs.
"North Korea, and its provocative actions,
crying, waking both of us.
Jack
sleep in his own bed,
the crib.
1999 murder of Stacie Reed and the rape of her 14-year-old sister
He admitted pinning the victim, threatening to rape her, then stabbing her in the heart when the girl resisted. He then stomped on her throat.
in January
local law enforcement
local law enforcement
Jeremiah Jackson,
1,211
traditional animated
"We've had fans clamoring for a movie for the past 18 years,"
"We've had fans clamoring for a movie for the past 18 years,"
explained. "What really held us up for a long time was to have enough people to do the show and the movie," he said.
State Children's Health Insurance Program,
dish
the whims of China's hundreds of millions of Internet users,
about $3 an hour,
decided to put her life up for sale after an unhappy 2008.
more than 500
A 53-year-old French man was killed
Thursday.
Lt. Thierry Delorme
Thursday.
sports psychologist,
is incredibly positive
Top flight golf is a high-stakes, high-stress
golf
playing against your mates
debate would have to be reopened by March in order to get a bill passed before the November midterm elections.
tens of thousands of protesters descended
The four-meter boat, "Avalon",
break a world record
sensors
across the Atlantic Ocean without any human assistance.
an eight-strong team of third-year engineering students at Swiss science university ETH Zurich.
Stephen Bosworth,
it recognizes the importance of keeping our team in place as we go through this integration."
The Huffington Post has audio of an executive talking about the "awards."
$60 billion of your bailout dollars.
business as usual
full of criminals,"
Rio de Janeiro
door-to-door searches.
Steve McCurry,
photograph a colony of elephant seals.
Raghu Rai
Raghu Rai
At least 240
waist-deep
power is back on
the smell.
80
Taliban
10 supply trucks
Malakand Division, the northwestern region
issued a series of threats and ultimatums against Pakistani
sensible fiscal recovery plan
surged far above
is unsustainable for as far as the eye can see.
Greece,
David Freese's
running mates.
Obama downplayed headlines
start thinking about running mates.
Obama
Mali, had made his political point.
pro-Gaza T-shirt
breaking article 120 of the Spanish FA's rule book which states that "revealing messages of a religious or political nature on the pitch is strictly prohibited during the time of play."
pirates
pirates.
Racing
Ronaldo and Gonzalo Higuain
1-1 draw
Kaiserslautern
start training its SEALs, Green Berets and other Special Operations troops in the use of Mark 16 and Mark 17 rifles.
a new series of rifles designed for their unique and dangerous missions.
the greater rate of use
unique and dangerous missions.
Mark 16
longer than the current
make the VA system better
"I feel like a Social Security number. I don't feel like Tyler Ziegel."
Iraq
part of his skull
Ty Ziegel
that the majority of veterans are moving through the process and "being taken care of."
disability ratings
Half of his left
VA
part of his skull
five lucky passengers
Five people
Five people
Richard Dyer
a polymath,"
a painter, architect and engineer to the King of France,
warned that Pakistan's previous dealings with the Taliban have only given the fundamentalist Islamic militia time to regroup and gain more ground.
to allow strict Islamic law, or sharia, to be implemented in parts of North West Frontier Province.
Pakistan's previous dealings with the Taliban have only given the fundamentalist Islamic militia time to regroup and gain more ground.
hanged in 1979
of Pakistan and of any Islamic nation.
suicide bombing
around a cross-country journey by DeNiro's character
"Pretty much everyone,"
a cross-country journey by DeNiro's character struggling to bring together his grown children
the University of Georgia mascot
heart-related causes
early Thursday,
Uga
five members of parliament serving
proposed nuclear partnership
"We will not tolerate any strike.
Friday,
About 13,000 employees at state-run Air India
employees at state-run Air India
their pay would be delayed by two weeks.
Argentina's Estudiantes and Uruguay's Nacional
Argentina,
big clubs,
Argentina,
many Americans
"My massage therapist, my yard person, my hairdresser. Now people are really stepping back from that and saying 'If I cut my own lawn, I'm going to have that $60 in my pocket.'
Consumers
are looking for value for their spending,
frugality
during the economic downturn.
Erik Prince,
Mike,
Shiner, Texas.
Mike
The VSS Enterprise
Honduran government
"The situation in Honduras
Zelaya's announced return has re-ignited a stand-off between the two disputed leaders of Honduras. Brazil now finds itself involved because of its embassy.
water, power
somehow won't get the care they need.
the president is going to take something away from them.
that President Obama's health care proposals would only make things harder for them,
an impersonator.
"Mini-Gaga," an impersonator.
achondroplasia,
amounted to unconstitutional roundups of Latinos.
checking the immigration status of inmates already in his Phoenix jail.
Sheriff Joe Arpaio
searched a church near where an 8-year-old California girl was found dead
the mobile home park
Tracy, California.
a historic 1912 mansion near downtown Atlanta.
an anonymous bidder
American photographer Lee Friedlander
over the phone.
bidder
explores the man behind
Linus, Lucy and Charlie Brown meant to them.
"Peanuts," the
"Peanuts"
Charles M. Schulz
Jailbreak Toys
the new doll is not children but adults
purple dress
"The entire political scene was a little rosier at the time,"
Wednesday night,
Amber
protests
Supreme Council of the Armed Forces
the Supreme Council of the Armed Forces -- appointed by the former president, Hosni Mubarak
(12,000
economic stimulus plan.
Creating and saving jobs while boosting investment in the future
plan has created jobs.
British throne.
official birthday of Queen Elizabeth II
frolicking naked on college grounds,
"zombie walk"
"Zombieland"
no
including hair loss, numbness in hands and feet, severe diarrhea, a drop in blood cells and nausea.
Taxotere
Iressa
Ford
gas turbine
gas turbine
Hundreds of unexploded bombs
an unexploded German flying bomb from World War II was found
an unexploded German flying bomb from World War II
Hundreds of unexploded bombs from the war are
Sharks
59 attacks worldwide
Sharks
59
attacked 59 people in 2008,
"Hello" and "All Night Long"
in the '80s
recently
his latest album is some of his best work.
makes it easier to promote than a series created from scratch.
United Arab Emirates.
Libyan leader Moammar Gadhafi
U.S. Sen. John McCain
Russia's
McCain was not of sound mind
three
16 Buddhist monks
crowds
lack of coherent message
processing education benefits
processing education benefits
Department of Veterans
10-year
Ingmar Guandique
seeing Guandique with "a fat lip and scratches on his face"
using political muscle to wrest from him a farm he was given during the land seizures.
Grace Mugabe,
a constitutional amendment that would create the new posts called for under the deal,
wrest from him a
at three English Channel ports
it had resumed running normal services to Calais.
Calais, Dunkirk and Boulogne
forced a halt to all cross-Channel traffic, including passenger ferries and freighters, stranding tourists on both sides of the waterway and causing a backlog of freight trucks.
eight-year war with Iraq.
Rezaie,
the United States.
running with a purpose: getting rid of Mahmoud Ahmadinejad.
Oakland Raiders
three
a building in North Waziristan.
three government
Hassan Kafi Hared,
of the medical humanitarian group Medecins Sans Frontieres and a journalist.
Victor Okumu, 51, a Kenyan doctor; Damien Lehalle, 27, a French logistician; and a Somali driver named Billan were the MSF workers
mine exploded
on a road in southern Somalia,
college.
the students were returning to failed
dulled urban
a question from a parent
review of the country's laws on gun ownership.
college in Kauhajoki in southwestern Finland,
in Kauhajoki in southwestern Finland,
"We must considerably tighten them,"
1990s.
daughter
I acted incredibly gauche, stupid and clumsy.
placate her by wagging a finger at her and telling her, "I am your great great grandfather."
President Barack Obama,
radio rules, where impact is far more important than accuracy.
"This is one thing we know about Barack Obama. He has essentially handed over our interrogation of terrorists to the ACLU. He's outsourced it to them. Our CIA has no ability to have any form of interrogation for terrorists."
Jack Butler,
watch the baby sleep,
daughter.
the double agent who killed eight people at a U.S. base in Afghanistan
Jordan
has spent more than $2,888 in exam fees.
South Korean
4 million won ($2,888)
2005,
"largest new investment in America's infrastructure since President Eisenhower built the Interstate Highway System."
roads
investments in highways
Leavenworth, Kansas,
2007.
to a federal charge of bankrolling a dogfighting operation
Atlanta Falcons
Newport News
a federal
Italy
Egypt
was red-carded after handling on the goalline
Westroads Mall in Omaha, Nebraska,
rapid burst of three gunshots
himself.
a gunman opened fire inside the city's Westroads Mall,
Twitter feeds
feeds about a hot topic in the
SusannahFox:
health care reform
helicopter donated
two
two more longtime prisoners
I don't think it's healthy
"saddened and confused by Jon's public media statements."
642 million
almost one in six
more than a billion
to tackle long and short-term hunger by making farmers productive and more resilient to crises.
obligatory celibacy for Catholic priests,
Easter Rite Catholic
church even
obligatory celibacy for Catholic priests,
"I want to be sure that everyone understands that the communication was sent without my knowledge,"
sending out a "reprehensible" e-mail depicting President Obama as two cartoonish white eyes peering from a black background.
Sherri Goforth,
deployed more troops to Maysan province
dismissed
injury time free kick by
seventh successive victory,
Levante
lasting solutions to poverty and injustice.
women receive job training and education.
showing further abuse of prisoners
The one-star general
detainee abuse
Iraqi detainees.
Todd McCarthy, Variety: The King of the World sets his sights on creating another world entirely in "Avatar," and it's very much a place worth visiting.
Halliburton
gas project
tour beginning in December,
"This is the party capital of the world,"
Habib Battah
a passenger's situation
calling one is the quickest way
because cabs haven't seen you,
passenger's situation dictates
is the latest innovative application to come to your iPhone and allows a user to book a
before the end of the game
allows a user to book a
Adm. Dennis Blair,
Dianne Feinstein,
high-end specialty coffee industry
10th annual World Barista Championship,
"A third cited they didn't have insurance or were unable to afford
language
language and cultural barriers, lifestyle choices and lack of
they often get the diagnosis at later stages.
as U.S. Marshals.
Forde was a one-time member of the
Shawna Forde,
Raul Flores
Raul Flores
security.
faithful to pray
Zambia
an explosion in the Nad-e-Ali district of Afghanistan's southern Helmand Province.
explosives-clearing operation
Mandy Moore
"Amanda Leigh," and that is my
the ethnic violence in his native Burundi in 1993
that every time I try and train
qualify for this year's Olympics.
Jose Manuel Zelaya
Zelaya
Thursday
coffee shop on New York's posh Upper East Side,
teenagers, both white males,"
coffee shop on New York's posh Upper East Side,
wrapped in black tape,"
3:30 a.m.,
Kalla
"Mr. Clean"
no sooner than next week.
no sooner than next week.
Yudhoyono
no sooner than next week.
God
Obama wishes to conclude the oath with the phrase "so help me God,"
to block any mention of God during the inaugural ceremonies.
President-elect Barack Obama
Christian Louboutins
you know your favorite dress? Well, it makes you look kind of fat. No offense. Speaking of which -- have you gained a little weight? Or are you pregnant? Are you sure? Well, never mind, you can have some of her old "fat" clothes since she has no use for them anymore.
"pain that continues a month or more beyond the usual recovery period for an injury or illness or that goes on for months or years because of a
chronic pain
11-day
must take the lead in reforming
South Africa, Angola, the Democratic Republic of Congo, Nigeria and Liberia.
must take the lead in reforming their own countries,
the remains of a man who had died four days before.
Life Quest Anatomical.
a shipment of exotic fish
may have been wounded by one of the victims,
"big fish"
all you want to do is catch a fish,
Fly-fishing
ability to collect health data.
set national health policies aimed at reducing the number of people who lack health insurance, decreasing high-risk behavior and determining immunization rates
to determine sexual habits, childhood immunizations rates, and dozens of others factors related to American health.
likely to destroy habitat for 40 chimpanzees on the volcano's lower slopes.
hearing a loud explosion at 3:45 a.m. and then seeing lava flowing from the crater of the 10,033-foot volcano.
human populations.
Tehran
Security
Iran
Neda Agha-Soltan,
One security force member sustained some sort of injury to the head and
to lead England's charge
currently sidelined with a groin injury
four
some 250 people
250
the Marriott Hotel in Islamabad.
Marriott
truck bombing of a Marriott Hotel
Rangers
Aiden McGeady
Darren O'Dea and Aiden McGeady
Allan McGregor.
November 26
Taj Mahal Palace
that solar cars are getting closer to the real thing,
Adelaide
solar-powered
one in six
developing countries,
almost one in six of the world's population
greater investment in agriculture
as the global economic crisis took hold
hobo condo.
A 17-year-old
Israeli military
give them the green light
100 Palestinian
ambulances obtained access to several houses in Zeitoun
officials have yet to speak to the IDF and the Israeli government.
embryonic stem-cell research,
limits on embryonic stem-cell research,
the Bush administration's limits on embryonic stem-cell research,
more than $1 trillion
Afghan President Hamid Karzai's Cabinet
the presidential palace; the ministries of Finance, Mines and Justice; and the Serena Hotel,
President Hamid Karzai's Cabinet
Five militants
the official
has proved to be harmless
flour,
stem cell
skew official government findings on issues such as global warming.
Conservative leaders
Sean Maurice Taylor,
murder and burglary
Eric Rivera Jr.,
suicide safety smocks.
Garcia and the couple's 18-month-old daughter were not hurt.
Four suspects indicted on murder and burglary charges
rape and beating death of an Arkansas television
a 19-year-old Beijing woman
demand a replay in the interests of fair play.
Television
eating less meat
get involved and opt for vegetarian meals at least one day a week.
livestock is responsible for generating around 18 percent of the world's greenhouse gas emissions.
obesity, cancer
the summer.
offer health workers the best protection.
at least 95
N95 respirators
95
on Sunday afternoon.
Alligator Point area of Florida's Franklin County
3 to 6 inches of rain, with isolated amounts up to 10 inches,
possible flooding,
"It's an event that Haleigh really should be at, but when she comes home, we'll have a great big wedding so she can be the flower girl and see it all again,"
missing child
Misty Croslin
Catholic
a Catholic church in Santa Monica, California,
highest-paid model in the world,
Dolce & Gabbana
wore a Dolce & Gabbana gown.
Sri Lankan
J.S. Tissainayagam,
20 years in prison
J. S. Tissainayagam
address the concerns of blue-collar and rural whites who are reluctant
the Obama campaign
get this far in the United States.
cover up his own potentially incriminating presence at the scene
dampen vibration on the structure.
Travelers
ferries,
Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
his second term.
Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
large swells on Bermuda as well as the islands of the northeast Caribbean Sea
4 hurricane,"
"Bill is a large tropical cyclone,"
Atlantic island of Bermuda
135 mph
Bill is not
"Wrigley is concerned by the serious allegations made against Chris Brown,"
Doublemint commercial
Mars
Sunday,
is to analyze the soils and permafrost of Mars' arctic tundra for signs of past or present life.
analyze
Spain
Board
four miners
earlier in the week.
neutralize potentially explosive air
unknown,
Lisa Brown
$400.
Children's Aid Society,
moving and transitional expenses.
One person, 13-year-old French girl Bahia Basari, survived
French and U.S.
went down just miles from Comoros' capital, Moroni.
One person, 13-year-old French girl Bahia Basari, survived for hours in the Indian Ocean clinging to the debris of the downed plane. She arrived home in France on Thursday, where she was reunited with her father.
yet to be
French and U.S. divers are helping to search
yet to be found,
One person,
investigation into the massive oil spill spreading
23-year-old
"It is our policy not to
Pfizer is near a deal to buy rival drugmaker Wyeth
up to 8 percent of its R&D staff,
January
three Sacramento sheriffs
more than 40
mouth,
human salivary microbiome
bacteria,
a depressed woman who killed herself and framed her husband.
a depressed woman who killed herself and framed her husband.
told reporters that the letter gave them
conviction,
leader of the Pakistani Taliban, Baitullah Mehsud, and his followers
gunmen
Eight
police training center in Lahore,
Anil Kapoor
the best runners-up spot.
500 feet down an embankment
by eating leaves and drinking water from a creek,
down a steep embankment in the Angeles National Forest
California Highway Patrol.
Aleutian Islands
waters off the Aleutian Islands
Katmai Fisheries,
"What can you say?"
suffer from pregnancy-related complications.
pregnant women
United States
a cancerous tumor in a salivary gland.
it's only localized in this one area and it's not in a place that affects my voice,"
The Beastie Boys
"MCA"
his controversial land reform would not be reversed.
at least $250,000
walking down the street in Shenandoah, Pennsylvania,
A central issue in the case is race
"My family is forever destroyed."
"Energy is going to be a huge fight,"
a huge fight,"
"climate czar"
next week
Tamil Tigers
civil war
Tamil stronghold of Mullaitivu
Sri Lankan army troops
more than 65,000 people dead.
The local "burgeoning medical marijuana scene" in Denver, Colorado, is growing and the weekly publication Westword wants to be on the forefront,
14
in Denver, Colorado,
Colorado is one of 14 states
still bans its use.
"quite stupid and foolish"
The nation is facing acute shortages of fuel, electricity and medical drugs.
The nation is facing acute shortages of fuel, electricity and medical drugs. The inflation rate
Zimbabwe President Robert Mugabe
has ignored international calls for him to
meets Israeli Foreign Minister Avigdor Lieberman
Netanyahu and other Israeli politicians
Israel will do everything necessary to improve the Palestinians' economic situation.
U.S. envoy George Mitchell
"null and void."
U.S. envoy George Mitchell
tune.
NZ$18,500 (US$ 9,362),
the plaster cast that New Zealand Prime Minister John Key wore
TradeMe,
New Zealand shopping Web site TradeMe,
a strategic review of improving conditions in Afghanistan.
took immediate action
in mental health institutions
his high school classmates.
had her son committed to an Idaho mental institution.
Richard Sonnen
Convention on International Trade in
exotic
be returned
"They're so beautiful and it's just really hard to live with, especially when you're living on the road right here," the 33-year-old said of the toad deaths. "So we started doing something about it. We started saving them off the road in the middle of the rain."
Volunteers in South Africa
nonprofessional
squirrel sightings, bird photos, ant anthologies, snapshots of leaves, flowers and trees, water quality info, beetle hunts and firefly tracking, among others.
Volunteers in South Africa
iPhone applications and computer programs that could analyze digital photos of
why the rampage happened,
Portland, Oregon,
Investigators
reuniting a multi-racial nation and shoring up an economy in dire straits.
Abdullah Badawi
A group of Nigerian rebels
are destined to grow.
renewables
A judge dismissed all charges Wednesday night and ordered the release of the four men
her office has launched a criminal investigation into the statements and reports given by the woman.
dismissed all charges
claims that she was lured to a dorm and assaulted in a bathroom stall.
that she was lured to a dorm and assaulted in a bathroom stall.
she had been lured from a club, forced into a men's bathroom at a university dormitory, bound and assaulted.
that she was lured to a dorm and assaulted in a bathroom stall.
Gabon's
son of Gabon's former president
son of Gabon's former president was declared the
Ali Bongo
abnormally high concentrations of radioactivity
radiological material was aboard the boat.
abnormally high concentrations of radioactivity
Australian Grand Prix.
Virgin
"They really did heal me. It's the alma mater that matters,"
on Thanksgiving,"
whether the Federal Communications Commission may constitutionally enforce its policies on "fleeting expletives" and scenes of nudity on prime-time television programs, both live and scripted.
ABC, CBS, NBC and Fox
a key aspect of multimedia regulation
challenges many families face when trying to control the video material their
the video material their children receive from a range of content providers:
whether the Federal Communications Commission may constitutionally enforce its policies on "fleeting expletives" and scenes of nudity on prime-time television programs, both live and scripted.
30,000 additional
reverse the Taliban's momentum and stabilize the country's government.
to Afghanistan is part of a strategy to reverse the Taliban's momentum and stabilize the country's government.
is part of a strategy to reverse the Taliban's momentum and stabilize the country's government.
withdrawing most U.S. forces by the end of his current term,
to Afghanistan
Taliban
educated,
Non Resident
the opportunities they have at home and don't feel they need to go abroad to have a better life.
(NRI) groom.
largely split into two camps: those who felt that his words were a heartfelt effort to acknowledge wrongs and set them right, and those who didn't believe a word of it.
us who
Taliban
computer programs
movie,
"Warrior"
the former European champions,
Ronaldinho
Ronaldinho
He could return to professional football
Michael Vick,
Michael Vick
Sovereign Wealth Funds
Minister of Foreign
secure more funds
Sovereign Wealth Funds
Pakistan-based Haqqani network,
arguing the organization has ties to Pakistani intelligence and enjoys safe havens in the country from whence it is able to launch attacks across the border in Afghanistan.
the anniversary of the Babri mosque demolition.
India's defense minister met with the chiefs of the army, air force and navy and
India's defense minister
Press Trust of India,
last week's terror attack in which gunmen killed 179 people in Mumbai.
Thursday
a 21-member team of congregation members from his church, Shiloh Baptist Church in Trenton and Kingdom Church of Ewing has been out of contact.
30-year-old daughter, Chelsey.
her 30-year-old daughter, Chelsey.
Two Americans
Americans visiting or working
7-year-old
twins.
Maine
she won re-election
Republican Sen. Olympia Snowe
the state of Maine
an 18-year bloody separatist campaign
Anti-election demonstrators
The protesters yelled pro-independence and anti-poll slogans and threw stones at polling stations in two villages in the Ganderbal constituency,
a day after Indian paramilitary forces,
we thought about the evolutionary tree concerning the part dealing with transition from fish to land vertebrae."
fossilized footprints
the oldest fossilized footprints made by a four-legged creature,
a rethink on when fish first crawled out of water and onto land.
fossilized footprints made by a four-legged creature,
heard a few
Sen. Hillary Clinton
Clinton for throwing back a
Barack Obama
Spanish
Hot Latin
made history as it marked the
more than 800
Basque separatist
the fifth ETA suspect arrested in France in the past two weeks.
Jurdan Martitegi Lizaso,
in-your-face requirements that encourage more users to take their privacy more seriously
364 euros per person
package that will take you from the festive meal right to the Kaiserball
"Neujahrskonzert"
hit on a guy while his girlfriend is actually there, or even if she's in the same town.
someone's hitting on them while their girlfriends are in the same ZIP code.
infidelity?
anything.
Baptiste
Baptiste launched a crusade to help end the slaughter of the gentle giants.
Nature Seekers'
most successful eco-tourism
two women suspected of being
Special services
photographs
photographs Tuesday of two women suspected of being
three suspected accomplices of the bombers,
increased dramatically in 2008,
Flogging and other forms of physical abuse are
number of child abuse reports in Jamaica
73
50 Plates,
Portland's Pearl District
Pacific Northwest College of
Pacific Northwest College
until the Cuban government releases all "prisoners of conscience," shows greater respect for freedom of religion and speech, and holds "free and fair" elections.
ignored the plight of political prisoners under the Castro regime.
Latin American School of Medicine,
members of the Black Caucus
Wal-Mart,
as Kacie Aleece Peterson,
do not
The teen who mysteriously turned up in New York
murder is murder and has no religion whatsoever.
Fort Hood, Texas,
the Holy Quran states quite clearly
officially
"I got to be physical with some of the hottest guys in Hollywood,"
"I got to be physical with some of the hottest guys in Hollywood,"
A homicide investigation into the incident is under way, authorities said.
two hours inside the sweatbox,
homicide investigation
homicide investigation
President Bush
the bank's headquarters in Frankfurt,
boat carrying cocaine
hundreds of miles northeast of Barbados,
minimum of $80 million.
drug smuggling
Atlantic Ocean,
Michael Lamar.
Turkey,
JP Morgan Chase
lead poisoning,
lead poisoning,
Aug. 15.
China is shutting down a pair of smelting plants suspected of sickening several
sacked by English Premier League club West Ham,
Gianfranco Zola
claim current coach Leonardo will leave the club in the summer
blood spatter evidence
Cpl.
first-degree murder,
Ed Brown
rape
failing refugees and internally displaced people.
tackle the issue.
half
computers, stereos, printers and televisions.
Lagos's second-hand electronics Alaba market.
local electronic stores.
products are broken beyond repair.
Beirut
Saad Hariri,
Hariri's speech.
128 seats in parliament
more than 200 international observers monitoring the election.
that the band's second performance was not part of a "big plot"
include double handrails, glass stairwell partitions and careful crowd control,
pop the question to his girlfriend, Erica Breder.
2008
"there is no criminality
Nearly a year after surviving a plane crash in South Carolina,
"The circumstances surrounding his death are unclear,"
Taj hotel
went down in the Taj hotel
200 hostages.
200,000 deaths
88
Sondra Crosby,
"the atmosphere of intimidation was palpable as we listened to women describing their profound suffering and fear, and their yearning to return safely and with dignity to their former lives."
Husien Shehada,
whether the officer was cleared for patrol duty too soon after the first shooting.
Four nights later,
both police shootings,
took off on foot, federal officials said.
Adam Leon,
Canadian
Canadian flight school,
Adam Leon,
the confusion surrounding the role of Parliament.
the second
The Marriott
eight
Ritz-Carlton
Ritz-Carlton
12
south Jakarta,
Arbaeen,
six more
six
at least 12
the young mother had plenty of time to sort out family issues and has been confined to her post
Alexis Hutchinson
her family care plan
"Our goal is to be able to offer it to people for free,"
Google
diarrhoeal
contaminated water and food supplies.
contaminated water and food
bowels
HIV or are malnourished
have HIV or are malnourished
Philippe Senderos
Italy's AC Milan.
in the summer of 2003
California
January 2009,
The other three men were
involved in the search overnight,
using dogs, two helicopters and thermal-imaging equipment
jail
Covington,
neighborhoods,
St. Tammany Parish Jail in Covington, Bonnett
Friday evening
7-year-old
not the
More than 2,200
in the back,
FARC
about three days
artificial intelligence.
a new function called Siri.
Street View camera cars
application
blurring of faces and license plates,
250 feet
gold medals
climbed to the top
Four
abuse, physical punishment and ridicule of subordinates,"
"verbal abuse, physical punishment
cruelty and maltreatment
"If you are going to do business in India, there is a lot of red tape and corruption.
business or politics
"The mindset has changed
Causeway Bay shopping area.
attack
three
Port-au-Prince
"The camaraderie is so perfect that we don't need anything else. We forget about our problems."
a group created to bring attention to soldiers listed as POW or MIA,
a great tribute to people that have sacrificed everything, including their life,"
more than 88,000
more than 88,000
Gay marriage,
did upset me was on the way out, her whole group gave us the finger and booed. And I thought that was .. not good. Not good.
why Rivers had what it took to emerge the winner.
"shocked and appalled"
images of police actions during the protest
made a public apology for the incident.
Kabul,
Afghan President Hamid Karzai
"assured President Karzai of his government's long term political and military support with
Kabul.
meet with Karzai and visit
1,900 French troops
Afghanistan
the software runs without their knowledge and appears difficult, if not impossible, to uninstall.
Web fallout
a hidden app could be tracking
Carrier IQ,
that a hidden app could be tracking smartphone
the Biscayne Bay
freshly caught fish and a great view from a deck
the end of 2011,
until 2011,
June 30,
A U.N.
mandate that authorized international forces in the country
U.S.-Iraqi pact
by the end of 2011,
year
a year
blow up a key part of its controversial Yongbyon nuclear reactor
blow up a key part of its controversial Yongbyon nuclear reactor
The destruction of the plant's cooling tower
North Korea
North Korea
is likely to
Theo Van Gogh
the assassination of Mr. Van Gogh
I fit that description."
Anthony Williams
rejected a world record transfer move to Premier League Manchester
Brazilian star Kaka
car sales have plummeted since last year. In the United States, the number of sales of passenger cars and light trucks in November 2008 was down 36.7 percent from November 2007
"It's definitely a tough climate right now,"
all-time lows.
automotive
Some "Occupy" demonstrators
U.S. congressman, Rep. Darrell Issa,
Some "Occupy" demonstrators
McPherson Square
legal crops
reputation of banks in the Gulf
grow legal crops and pressure from NATO-led soldiers.
20
it lacks a retail presence in many markets,
standard DVD players and recorders.
Blu-ray
Germany's
that Helg Sgarbi had threatened to release pictures of them if she
Helg Sgarbi
adult mesenchymal stem cells,
The FDA
which adult stem cell techniques are allowed to go into clinical trials.
treat heart ailments.
patient's own body's repair capabilities,"
scientists are making headway toward using
April 22,
live coverage of Earth Day events
July and October
April 22,
July and October
James von Brunn
Khalil Ibrahim,
Justice and Equality Movement (JEM),
the most powerful Darfur rebel
Ibrahim was attacked from air
JBS Swift Beef Company, of Greeley, Colorado,
Greeley, Colorado,
E. coli
JBS Swift Beef
41,280
his company's products may have had nothing to do with the outbreak.
Cuban President Raul Castro is moving his own people into power,
Raul Castro
four
nine points.
Japan
dispense medical advice,
can dispense medical advice,
next three Italian Serie A games
stranger into a paying customer in just a few seconds."
preservationist.
one-string diddley bow,"
Alexandria, Virginia.
Mir Hossein Moussavi,
publication of the newspaper.
Khatami
the government and its crackdown on the media,
Iranian reformists
a 22-ton firetruck that was nearly swallowed by a water-logged sinkhole.
the San Fernando Valley neighborhood of Valley Village,
there also follows a tradition of sole custody divorces. When the couple splits, one parent typically makes a complete and lifelong break
standardized laws on international child abduction.
Japanese
it has deemed a narco-terrorist organization.
obtain recruits, support and protection
U.S. assets of eight members of
Treasury's action,
Sunday night
more than 600 years old and stood at the center of Seoul, having served as a main gate into the capital for centuries.
a can of paint thinner
SEOUL,
crew of seven astronauts
space station.
just before midnight Friday
late Friday
The Leonardo logistics module, science experiments and the Combined Operational Load Bearing External Resistance Treadmill (COLBERT),
Hannover 96's Niedersachsen Stadion
German goalkeeper
eight
Phoenix,
for post-traumatic stress and brain injuries, Obama says.
his government will always honor military service and never abandon what he called true American heroes.
increased help for America's war veterans in dealing with life after combat.
U.S. troops
dealing with life after combat.
"Afghanistan, to save the country from war, conspiracies, the killing of innocent Afghans and to reach peace, agrees with the talks between United States of America and Taliban that will end up in establishing an office for Taliban in Qatar,"
President Hamid Karzai
talks between the United
"serious and constructive talks"
Peace talks
disagreements on the issue of Israeli settlements in the West Bank.
Israelis
a repetition of a failed initiative
of a man suspected of killing five people in Tennessee and one in Alabama was among
five counts of criminal homicide
Hundreds of angry protesters,
insulting religion.
Gillian Gibbons,
insulting religion.
protesters,
President Obama
nomination of Elena Kagan to fill the seat of retiring Supreme Court Justice John Paul
nomination of Elena Kagan to fill the seat of retiring Supreme Court Justice John Paul
3-D action flick
"Spider-Man 3,"
$22.0 mil
plotting attacks on the Australian Embassy and J.W. Marriott hotel in Jakarta.
Jemaah Islamiyah,
Abu Dujana
last June,
music,
food and beverage.
Try eBay or Craigslist.
$1
vinyl
56,
are deciding whether or not to
.25-caliber European semi-automatic handgun
the scheduled candy drop
on the aircraft,
Hooper, Utah,
a man and his son
Utah,
almost twice the rate of unemployment for
Michael Vick
three
"The idea with dual currencies is that there is a paid currency [Gold Coins], which is paid for using real money and exchanged between sellers and buyers. In addition, there is a second currency -- a free or so-called 'earned' currency [Silver Coins] -- which is gained through activity and progression in the world or game."
business
directly incorporate real-money transactions with virtual-world activities.
Sen.
passed a
Vice President-elect Joe Biden meets Pakistani officials in Islamabad,
invented the suicide belt.
cyanide capsule
Tamil Tigers,
Velupillai Prabhakaran,
more than 70,000 dead.
70,000
near Pakistan's border with Afghanistan
a dozen
outside the NATO headquarters in Afghanistan
outside the NATO headquarters in Afghanistan
helped start Japanese [professional] baseball.
Babe Ruth
Hideki Matsui and Ichiro.
voted in favor of Sarkozy's plan, 329-238.
France back into NATO's military command after more than 40 years,
armed forces are in the midst of a suicide epidemic."
dozens of lawmakers
of treating suicides differently from deaths in action flew in the face of military funeral procedure, which treats both the same.
President Obama should end a longstanding policy of
dozens of lawmakers
Afghanistan
Defense Secretary Robert
Barack Obama
Jalalabad, Afghanistan,
restore blood flow to a coronary artery
Former President Bill Clinton
to restore blood flow in one of his coronary arteries,
hospitalized at New York-Presbyterian Hospital's Columbia campus after experiencing brief periods of discomfort in his chest over several days,
roses
John McCain currently holds a 1-point lead over Obama,
returned home so she could attend her son's deployment ceremony
flowers and other mementos
who at age 9 won a 1967 Apollo amateur night showcase with
the first African-American to own a major film and TV studio.
writer, actor, director and producer
"Why Did I Get Married," "Meet the Browns," "The Family that Preys,"
Tyler Perry
nearly $400 million
cup of sulfuric acid.
acid attack
burning the skin on
He wants to increase funding for VA by $25 billion
President Obama
could be stabilized
Treasury Department and Federal Reserve
Freddie Mac
Treasury Department
Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac
Freddie Mac and Fannie Mae
almost half of the
federal government
Steps to shore up FannieMae and Freddie Mac
Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac
NEA
2 million
save and create jobs.
arts funding
create jobs."
1993 through 1997
folk trio Peter, Paul and
"Mary Had a Little Lamb"
side effects of treatment
vehicle was stolen
in a shipping container in the Los Angeles port
out by the end of the timeline agreed
"We, the government of Iraq and the security forces in Iraq are much more suited now for this fight,"
U.S. troops will be out of the country by the end of 2011.
top U.S. military commander in Iraq,
government is making improvements in handling its own
2011,"
internationally renowned paleontologist
a felony charge of theft.
federal land,
federal land,
in Vietnam
top advisers
of the war in Vietnam,
the assault
signed the Rescission Act, taking that
$15,000 each;
about 15,000
15,000
$15,000
full veterans benefits
the U.S. government
old river bed
and Romanesque
Sunrise Medical Center in Las Vegas.
Seven
the Hudson River,
tried to
Monday morning,
400
Around 400 people were
get a pardon for the 81 accused witches that had been put to death there.
a posthumous pardon for the hundreds of people executed for witchcraft between the 16th and 18th centuries.
London
at least 19
at least 19
British Foreign Secretary William Hague
"Our mission will be to portray the truth about the nature of the injuries (and) numbers of casualties and assess the hospitals,
is for Obama to take the lead.
the Obama administration's performance on Iran and the Middle East,
former U.S. National Security Adviser
This overall tension within the GOP between the mainstream and the extreme was in full display Tuesday night in Iowa. As such, the biggest winner of the Iowa caucuses by far is Obama. As I saw someone tweet Tuesday night -- somewhere in Iowa, the Obama campaign is smiling.
has made a career of changing his stances to match the prevailing political winds.
has made a career of changing his stances
Samoa
People Against Switching Sides (PASS)
Morgan Tsvangirai
that there are people who were willing to help me."
showcasing specific stories and needs. Anyone who wanted to help could browse through the requests and decide exactly whom to support.
active-duty U.S. troops
exactly whom to support.
micro-lending Web
dozens of active-duty U.S. troops and veterans
Islamic Jihad
Islamic Jihad sources
in the coastal territory, including Islamic Jihad.
Hamas
June 19,
Islamic Jihad sources
he plans to continue writing
the Order of the British Empire "for services to literature"
"a very rare form of early onset Alzheimer's."
writing his multi-million selling Discworld books.
in a fantasy universe
voted for me,"
"I can promise you that her life dream when she was growing up was not to be first lady of the United States,"
some of the main elements of his national security agenda.
to lose public support for some of the main elements of his national security agenda.
really good marriage,"
Laura
National Health Service (NHS),
the NHS
British Prime Minister
Gordon Brown
unprotected sex with her while suffering from HIV/AIDS.
confirmed he was HIV positive
sex with her while suffering from HIV/AIDS.
in filling the New York Senate seat
of President John F.
Chuck Schumer
New Hampshire.
rally
picture-perfect day of togetherness
New Hampshire.
corporations (which don't grow),
corporations (which don't grow),
of America
They run http://baselinescenario.com/,
Fort Hood,
girlfriend, Rihanna,
"Abuse, it just survives and thrives in silence,"
1978
nine-year
by her ex-husband during their nine-year marriage.
nine years,
unease
a curmudgeonly senior citizen, Carl, tries to cope with the enthusiasm of Russell, a young boy.
a bouquet of flowers
followed President Obama on his trip to the Middle East
the Middle East and Europe,
CNN's
two nuclear powers historically divided by political and sporting rivalry.
Sania Mirza
announcement of her marriage to
CNN Headline
CNN
Carl Azuz.
Mondays
4 a.m.
lightweight, rolling duffel.
portable GPS!
Society of United Coffeeshops
German or Belgian
foreign tourists
on New York's Bruckner Expressway in the Bronx,
on New York's Bruckner Expressway in the Bronx,
Tom Brokaw
the limitless resources held by the stars will help humanity seek a bold new future.
we should fix Earth's problems,
The proponents of the NewSpace movement,
deliberately losing two games at the Champions Trophy
deliberately losing two games at the Champions Trophy
"We went with a pre-determined mind to lose the match against Australia,"
chairman of the National Assembly's standing committee
"We went with a pre-determined mind
Brunn's death partly made him "feel good but, on the other hand, it doesn't because my daughter will never be with me again."
7-year-old Jorelys Rivera.
in a trash compactor
in February
in February
the Joker in "The Dark Knight,"
Heath Ledger's
about 3,000 late-night showings,
a push from Pelosi.
Nancy Pelosi,
young Africans,
Ghana
Dr. Ave Kludze.
Rutgers University.
never
kidnapped, raped and murdered
was touched
CNN sister network HLN's "Nancy Grace" show.
more assets
be for troops and equipment for conducting intelligence, surveillance and reconnaissance, as well as more assets to deal with roadside bombs and explosives,
top U.S. commander in Afghanistan
a cheerleading accident at age 17,
medications to kill the pain for a series of injuries,
a health spa
Ladies' Home Journal
prescription pain medications
on Friday.
Pyongyang
Pyongyang
work toward forging a permanent peace treaty
proposed exchange of video letters between families separated by the divided Korean peninsula.
to work toward forging a permanent peace treaty between their nations,
the hard-drinking Grandma Lynn.
Emily Gilmore
made an appearance, but the anti-grandmother role we know today was more than likely inspired by the spirited older women on "Golden Girls," and has since become a television staple.
Mark Wallinger
of a giant white horse
a "waste of money," an "abomination" and "depressing."
white male students
racist
hall workers into eating stew containing urine,
"Reitz Fear Factor,"
video
White students at a South African university
the women that there is urine in the mixture.
LONDON,
the English Midlands
"Do The Dog"
the English Midlands
British new wave ska legends The Specials
severe poverty
severe poverty
"To apologize for the pain that has been caused. To apologize for the failure to offer proper care. To apologize for those who have gone before us and ignored your cries for help."
the suspected gunman,
12
six
probation report.
six months
probation
five years probation and to spend more than 1,400 hours in "labor-oriented service"
help repair holes in the human heart.
pioneering research to regrow damaged bones and teeth
team of cardiologists
Libreville,
Sunday
a successor to President Omar Bongo,
Thursday.
So eat! But only if you do the work on the other side of those calories.
they gained about 15 pounds,
unhealthy patterns
focus on gradual improvement of our diet and our exercise programs, we will likely regain our healthier, slimmer form.
Markus Winkelhock
sons following fathers into racing careers
Markus Winkelhock
Van der Sar
Edwin
Chelsea and Liverpool
van der Sar
crises sweeping the globe,
she encouraged Britons to look for happiness and courage through helping others,
Britain's Queen Elizabeth
people with mild problems with mental function or dementia;
Between 20 and 35 percent of Americans
increases the risk of Alzheimer's disease
gene carriers
mental disorder,
ask questions
Josef Fritzl had a mental disorder,
raped his daughter and fathered her children.
a man "brave enough to think differently, bold enough to believe he could change the world, and talented enough to do it."
"The world has lost a visionary. And there may be no greater tribute to Steve's success than the fact that much of the world learned of his passing on a device he invented,"
recipient of an advanced copy of the iPad 2
"Steve Jobs changed the world for the better w/his innovations and genius."
Michael Jackson collectibles
More than 80 Michael Jackson collectibles
1,200 aircraft
American Airlines
Southwest Airlines and Alaska Airlines,
expected 1,200 aircraft
Wi-Fi Internet access aboard planes,
AirTran and Virgin
a "group 2B" possible human carcinogen.
the most realistic, intuitive way
less than 1.6 watts per kilogram.
cell phones may increase the risk of some kinds of brain cancer,
to raise awareness of violence in the
Congolese
incumbent Joseph Kabila
2006
new contract.
Fenerbahce have lined up current Spain coach Luis Aragones as a replacement.
failing to reach an agreement over a
an agreement over a
Brazilian coach Zico
are circular structures with a hollow center that serve as a base habitat
Cayman Island coral reef
circular structures with a hollow center that serve as a base habitat
world's ocean reef ecosystems.
8,750
two
two
health care reform
Scott Brown's stunning victory in Massachusetts
to take its lumps now and readjust priorities
President Obama
ultimate success as an industry
some one-liners at the White House Correspondents' Association dinner
Republican
on Saturday.
to break the 50-knot sailing speed barrier
Sean Langman
canoe-style pod with a nine meter-long
four Sundays before Christmas Eve;
vendors selling iced doughnuts slathered
Christmas
cups of gløgg, a steaming hot mulled red wine laden with raisins, almonds, cinnamon sticks and cloves
threatened to kill a U.S. undercover sheriff's deputy.
trafficking charges
lives of two U.S. agents.
will suspend all
Three aid workers
Daryeel Bulasho Guud
men's and women's 4x400m relay events
10
at the show.
himself
allegedly assaulted by singer Chris Brown
suspicion of making criminal threats.
2007 Connecticut home invasion
selection in the case of a deadly 2007 Connecticut home invasion
The Piper Comanche 260
The Piper Comanche 260
Belgian Olivier Rochus
Olivier Rochus
cut taxes
"I'm hearing the same round of arguments,"
Reaganomics is built on a fable.
reviving the nation's economy.
'spread the wealth,'
Obama's plan for reviving the nation's economy.
John Beyrle, "supports" Hatcher,
John Beyrle,
"They are pretty much unreconstructed," he said. The security services may have wanted to compromise Hatcher's ability to work with religious groups, he
The employee, Brendan Kyle Hatcher,
Brendan Kyle Hatcher,
Colorado Springs
Nico Cruz Santos,
additional charges
GM,"
want to stress that again, preserve all the German Opel locations,"
Magna
Monday
words of Pastor Robert
past weekend,
policy and deciding whether a candidate shares your views
early detection and treatment of mental illnesses in young women.
anxiety disorders
50 years.
"Action Steps for Improving
(OWH),
Those who've borne witness to it.
Pulitzer
"Coming of Age,"
shooting death last year of Eve Carson,
federal charges of carjacking resulting in death, carrying and using firearms in relation to carjacking, being a felon in possession of a firearm, and possessing a short-barreled shotgun not properly registered to him.
because he was 17 at the time of the slaying, the newspaper said.
few signs of slowing
influenza-like
About 2,500 students
125 "interface languages"
17-year sentence
Non-partisan Web sites
all-time lows in
need to protect themselves from efforts at political manipulation.
generally stick to the issues and rely on factually-accurate information.
Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia
Colombia
Bogota.
boy, known as "Emmanuel,"
The boy, known as "Emmanuel,"
the hostages
"Secrets & Lies"
Leigh's work is known for gritty realism and a focus on underprivileged sections of British society.
gritty realism
England
gritty realism and a focus on underprivileged sections of British society.
Famous
gritty realism and a focus on underprivileged sections of British society.
build a $357 million fund to help the Pakistani government's flood response efforts.
least 361 people have died and 600,000 were living in refugee camps because of flooding
Author Walter Mosley found fame with
ex-boxer named Leonid Trotter McGill,
Easy Rawlins mysteries
Now Mosley, who has found success writing everything from erotica to science fiction, has launched
an arc of fault lines circling the Pacific Basin that is prone to frequent earthquakes and volcanic eruptions.
his last World Cup.
over the 100 mark
France
'Ndrangheta
Duisburg
the shootings appeared to be linked to a feud between two mafia clans
the "highest levels of the Kurdish leadership" to accept a compromise that would dictate how national elections would be held in January.
law to prepare to carry out
the United States
Iraq's
two members of "The Ville" faction
More than 150 alleged militants were
the government's teaching of Islam
More than 150 alleged militants were
400
More than 150
minority Uyghurs and majority Han Chinese.
not present in the building
not
nine
Marchisio
2007
that things are getting worse slower, "hardly a positive goal statement."
1982,
justification to attack Iraq,
Iraq
"We destroyed them. We told you, with documents. That's it,"
"zealot"
Iran
as a "zealot"
Congress.
Sonia Sotomayor
McCain's decision
has helped boost self-confidence for many.
Latino communities
Russia.
in an old textbook in her
most of its foreign debt
Medvedev.
Kudrin
Bruuns
Strøget,
Texas
no one is allowed to enter or leave,
Warren Jeffs,
from electrical projects
are designed to last longer and to be fixed when they break;
Electronic and electrical products
piling up on the world's rubbish dumps.
"Lawrence of Arabia"
Los Angeles.
Maurice Jarre,
fire all teachers at a struggling high school,
Yue Minjun
2.9 million British pounds ($5.9 million).
crackdown
its list of terrorist organizations two Colombian groups
two hostages
Santaquin City, Utah, home
a domestic violence case,
from O, The Oprah Magazine,
women who are making up our lives as we go along.
with news cameras rolling on a busy Saturday night in the middle of Times Square
New York
He said his training kicked in.
middle of Times Square
whenever the unit checks out a suspicious package, bomb technicians jockey for the opportunity to suit up.
connects more than 600 sponsor and recipient
Family-to-Family, a nonprofit
provided nearly 800,000 meals to struggling families
CNN.com/Heroes.
CNN.com/Heroes.
charters are a growing trend
connects
OK to ask for a quick picture.
a four-day Christian music retreat filled with concerts from all types of bands that share one message.
adjusted its disaster response with new evacuation plans.
Three
several officials, including some from the Latin American Medical Centers for Disaster.
The State Department
several officials,
Customs supervisor Walter Golembiowski
a lengthy sting operation by a state, local and federal task force.
to strongly support nuclear weapons treaties, and the presidents who pursue them.
During the Cold War, presidents from both parties learned that the American public tends to prefer
for the disabled, including wounded soldiers.
service
Fishkill Correctional
work with the dogs to prepare them to help wounded troops.
Khan questioned the lack of Pakistani players in this year's competition,
were "stateless actors."
Pakistani security officials
have Pakistani security officials participate with India in a joint investigation.
he believes the Mumbai attackers were "stateless actors."
Zardari confirmed he is
Pakistani militants
8.
the voter-approved measure, which defined marriage as
Attorneys
violated the U.S. Constitution.
"What's your best case to allow for your standing in federal court?"
Hillary Clinton's
in Essex
cervical cancer
Barcelona
Barcelona and Real Madrid
"I'm not guilty of any criminal wrongdoing,"
trade or sell the Senate seat
Oprah Winfrey
resigning
major political figures
Oprah Winfrey
resigning
Oprah Winfrey
Rod Blagojevich's
major political figures
of a rubberized
Luke Gullberg,
Anthony Vietti, 24; Luke Gullberg, 26; and Katie Nolan, 29, set out
seek help.
the hikers may have been involved in an accident
gadgetry inside,
$20,000
highly sprung motoring at a price that appeals to the first-time buyer's wallet.
Hyundai's sporty coupe
gadgetry
December 30 blast at a U.S. base in Khost, in southeastern Afghanistan,
has claimed responsibility for the suicide bombing in Afghanistan last month that
claimed responsibility for the suicide bombing
suicide bombing in Afghanistan last month that
Gordon
African elephant ivory,
New media and talk radio
Ted Kennedy
Chappaquiddick Island, Massachusetts,
would have had a "very, very difficult" time politically surviving the drowning
worldwide,
About 98,000
British
About 98,000
south of the airport and across the street from the 190-room estate owned by famed heavyweight boxer Evander Holyfield.
Atlanta
almost lost their home to foreclosure.
rebels
President Sheikh Sharif Sheikh Ahmed
an effort to halt fighting between Somali forces and Islamic insurgents.
stand down.
that he impose Islamic law, or sharia,
a strict interpretation of the law, which forbids girls from attending school, requires veils for women and beards for men, and bans music and television.
Islamic law,
are conducting demonstrations on YouTube, holding virtual fundraisers and using social network sites like Facebook to change the world
Social activism is being
rejected a series of allegations from the Chinese government,
seek "meaningful self-rule"
violence
the Dalai Lama
Tibetan independence
change is possible because of a jump in the number of Border Patrol officers in the region, an increase in technology and a drop in apprehensions at the border.
several
the windows
Champions League clash in Rome,
New York Hospital Medical Center of Queens,
Hate Crimes Task
surfing reef
Australia, Fiji, Tahiti, Hawaii and France
motorized wheelchair.
has a significant, incidental, incendiary effect
"not specifically designed to cause burn injury to persons."
multiple air-bursts of artillery-fired
multiple air-bursts of artillery-fired white phosphorus
multiple air-bursts of artillery-fired white phosphorus over
"not specifically designed to cause burn injury to persons."
Atlanta on December 6.
felony dogfighting conviction.
in August 2007
Vick
Four men
Four men were
2004 Madrid railway bombings,
al Qaeda,
in a "safe house" for their own welfare,
one in four voting-age Afghans are confident the
legitimacy to the new government."
election,
stifling corruption
your constantly running late.
your sleeve,
in virtually any other kind of swimsuit.
echo that of Elvis Presley,
"was not 'a sham' as is being reported in the press,"
"was not 'a sham' as is being reported in the press,"
a further three months
be secured" in Afghanistan's Helmand province,
Operation Moshtarak
spare parts and science experiments
shuttle Discovery
two
reduce carbon emissions, decrease dependence on coal and oil, and speed a national drive toward "clean" energy.
the stranglehold coal has over our government and future,"
use of coal.
Allen, Lambert, Danny Gokey and the other seven
Kris Allen,
probably would be more apt to go for Kris' style.
Lambert
We are there to do music and there to sing, and hopefully people vote on that.
through a procedure called peripheral blood stem cell donation, or PBSC.
are collected through a procedure called peripheral blood stem
Cronulla
Rugby
New Zealand.
group sex in 2002
Centers for Disease Control
King Nut peanut butter
Minnesota
two
Mexico
Liberato Vega,
The pilot,
a three-story residential building in downtown Nairobi.
"The pilot had warned that he was going to hover and go slow,"
government
caused panic on the streets below
making three passes by the Statue of Liberty,
op of "Air Force One" flying over New York
of ceding the coveted mustard yellow belt
Reigning hot dog-guzzling champ Joey Chestnut
Joey Chestnut
told the magazine.
said she was shocked by the firing.
Michaela Watkins and Casey Wilson
"The issue of race has touched this community, much more deeply than it has in other places.
York, Pennsylvania,
39 years ago.
York, Pennsylvania,
at Thanksgiving dinner.
Prattsville
"We are trying to rebuild,"
Thanksgiving
Thanksgiving dinner.
in about 20
to 30 million
climate change, population pressure and natural variations in climate,
people of Haiti,
Four
pilot John Ward of Fort Myers,
Dominican Republic
African-Americans
job Obama's doing in the White House,
The CNN/Opinion Research Corp. survey,
African-Americans
Australia
Opera House
"unless we have protection in a courtroom for not ordering a test, we're going to order that additional test."
agrees
Obama
lawsuits and medical students' debt burdens.
care
Rohack
memos on interrogation tactics, saying the country will ultimately be stronger as a result.
release of the memos
Deputy Director Stephen Kappes and other officials,
Paraguayan
author of a new book, "Now or Never: Getting Down to the Business
special
most arrogant and perhaps most corrupt administration
longtime adversaries Cuba and Venezuela,
climate change, drugs and terrorism
Friday night.
Henri, 4, Johan, 2 and Leni, 5,
four:
"Lou Sulola Samuel
Barak Obama
Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac,
also help Main Street,"
that his opponent would raise taxes
also help Main Street,"
faked his own death
suicide
with unlawful acts by a compensated adviser and unlawful transaction by an investment adviser.
power source to all sorts of large vessels.
from 2000 to 2008?
the election of Barack Obama.
music
a buffet of Southern favorites like okra, macaroni and cheese, banana pudding and peach cobbler at low prices.
is a little over three miles from Tuskegee University,
Walmart
California
Mission Viejo Christian Church
a text message
Mission Viejo Christian Church
foul play
said the wreck raised suspicion.
have been placed on paid leave
Zoraya Suarez said the action was "part of an
The National Transportation Safety Board,
Sunday's
preventing violence
It is primarily students, the reputed problem, who
students often know ahead of time when and where violence will flare up on campus.
the right thing.
gang rape
Claxton Chrysler Dodge Jeep
Jerry Akins,
Little League baseball
cars from Claxton Chrysler. But
donated to local charities,
Claxton Chrysler.
shot and killed his wife and
two
USA, Germany, China and Japan.
thrive
UK
USA, Germany, China and Japan.
machinery, transport equipment, plastics, non-metallic minerals
purchase of 72 Eurofighter Typhoon Jets
machinery, transport equipment, plastics, non-metallic minerals
Saudi Arabia's
UK
20 years.
2 a.m.
eight
roughly a goal every three games.
2007 World Footballer of the Year award.
goal every three games.
Ricardo Izecson dos Santos Leite
Sharapova
Tathiana Garbin
shoulder problem
in Paris starting on Sunday.
"You'll talk to anyone when you're playing games, because you're trying to beat them."
the typical nightlife scene
Timeless Entertainment Concepts,
the typical nightlife scene
Timeless Entertainment Concepts,
Pictionary
Timeless,
in jail
Craigslist
Phillip Markoff
BA
in the number of crew members on flights,
IEDs
166
IEDs
attacks
in Afghanistan
southern Alabama
Mayor Clay King, Samson, Alabama:
the shooter's
that we are not shielded.
convicted of killing
in the front yard of a mobile home in Chidester, in south-central Arkansas,
asking the public for help.
"I wanted to take her there because it's a place where so many
safety defects
a ruck of entanglements and potential conflicts of interest
agreed that Oprah would provide the best platform.
go to Oprah, get
"He is suddenly, I hate to
The head of the secret informant department and the men of the special operations branch [of the Integrity Commission] played a major role
Iraq's deputy minister of transport
is rampant corruption in the country.
many Iraqis say is
the biggest fear is people will be
are operating in Haiti. Fifteen of them
French soldiers,
coast of Tanzania
Gulf of Aden and the Indian Ocean
Around 20,000
Florida
Henrik Stenson
a pair of white boxer shorts
on the Blue Monster course at Doral
charges of conspiring to furnish drugs before her death in 2007,
halfway cut for only the sixth time in 14 years as a professional.
PGA Tour
Bridgewater
$25 million
signed by Travolta releasing the ambulance company from legal liability,
a local hospital,
Bridgewater approached her in the days after Jett's death on January 2, saying she had a client who had a document Travolta might want.
round of investigations
EU
AMD
anti-trust laws.
$1.45 billion
AMD, a competitor, launched this in Europe (and in Japan and South Korea)
been abusing its dominant market position in semiconductors
200
300,000 Pakistanis were on the move or expected to flee
New York taxi driver
both al Qaeda figures
a sentence of up to life in prison.
There are at least 400
10 million
none of the
Rowan Williams,
A 15-year-old from Topeka, Kansas,
flu
Kaitlin Hannigan
stop the spread of the virus.
"incompetence"
Ronald Reagan.
Harry Truman.
historians
"Right now there is not a lot of good will among historians. Most see him as a combination of many negative factors,"
George W. Bush's presidency
Shamu Stadium in Orlando, Florida.
a killer whale
European Union
United States, NATO member states, Russia
almost 100 vessels
Mogilevich moved on after YBM and began manipulating international energy markets, giving him a large influence on other nations.
has been involved in arms trafficking, prostitution, extortion and murder for hire.
swindling Canadian and U.S. investors out of $150 million
arms trafficking, prostitution, extortion and murder for hire.
arms trafficking, prostitution, extortion and murder
arms trafficking, prostitution, extortion and murder
was on automatic pilot when it
"faulty" left altimeter,
Netherlands,
"faulty" left altimeter,
more than 1,000
to continue building on progress in the south, while keeping Kabul and its environs secure, eventually linking the two areas via Afghanistan's ring road,
more than 1,000 coalition and Afghan forces.
the militant Haqqani network,
to set up a new youth scholarship program.
South Korean President Lee Myung-Bak
He was since been cleared of all charges.
amassing his fortune through illegal means.
Lee Myung-Bak
one person,
The death toll from severe storms in northern Arkansas
23 people
the Pakistani government's decision to reinstate Chaudhry,
Pakistan's fired chief justice
Iftikhar Muhammad Chaudhry
the sources of tension have focused on religious conversions, attacks on places of worship and Coptic resentment that they are not being given licenses to build new churches
Egypt's Coptic Christians and Muslims
somewhere between 8 and 11 % of the 80 million Egyptians,
somewhere between 8 and 11 %
that some long-term illegal immigrants should be allowed to stay legally, but without citizenship, in the United States.
Mitt Romney
that owns the refinery,
you can't discount the reality of the entertainment industry
"It is very easy for comments to be taken out of context and create unnecessary drama
would insinuate that "Sex and the City's" Kim Cattrall doesn't get along with her co-star Kristin Davis,
May 31, 1859,
150 years.
150 years
Some say it was named after the 1850s heavyweight boxer Ben Caunt while others suggest it was named after Sir Benjamin Hall,
drop in morale
have at least 65 more of those providers in the field by December, making the ratio one for every 700 soldiers.
drop in morale
suicides are up
Army
Colom and his associates
bemoaning the "narcos, assassins and thieves" who have taken over the country.
Colom, the president's wife and a top aide would be responsible if something happened to the
Lisa Marie Nowak,
nearly 900
assaulting a romantic rival
Florida
"He was a good man. He had good values. He had problems in the relationship department. He had problems with emotions, which is interesting for an actor, a hard time expressing emotions and being around someone who was emotional. It was absolutely terrifying to him."
"he did the best he could;
was the greatest guy in the world because he started CNN."
debate has been about faith in the public square, and we know that plays well with
GOP
Democrats
climbed four floors up a fire escape to try to help the boy before firefighters arrived.
Jimmy Senk
nurses, physician assistants, pharmacists
nurses are always needed,
Physician assistants
UCLA Health System
"the world's mightiest and most technically advanced warship" when it sank in 1744.
1744.
HMS Victory
The HMS Victory
The HMS Victory sank in 1744.
shooting and killing a security agent and severely injuring another
permanent cease-fire
declared a permanent cease-fire agreement
to flush out militants.
North West Frontier Province,
North West Frontier Province,
Mary Richardson Kennedy
Mary Richardson Kennedy was arrested Saturday night
of a drug baron,
3rd Petty Officer Melquisedet Angulo Cordova
a minimum one to three years, or as much as eight to 25 years in state prison.
grand larceny and scheming to defraud his mother,
"Please don't put him in jail,"
first-degree grand larceny and scheming to defraud.
cantaloupes
to cherish the pet that their father so publicly promised
dress up and trick-or-treat down a
September,
striker David Trezeguet
France
Lithuania
the games against Lithuania and the Faroe Islands.
Deborah Turbiville
"Heidi Fleiss of Houston," referring to a woman who was dubbed the "Hollywood Madam" for providing call girls to famous and wealthy clients, police said.
in Houston, Texas, say they have busted a prostitution ring
$350 an hour,
left their carts
"just as appalled by this as anyone,"
Funeral arrangements
accused of shooting five people in the home he lived in.
costar of the indie horror film "The Blair Witch Project"
shoulder
men's tournament,
at the Hurlingham Club in London
Wimbledon championships.
Maria Sharapova
Iraq
the situation was "under control" and
assist the men.
between $3,000 and $5,000
United Nations workers
questions.
alongside Christina Ricci and Matthew Fox.
Rain
South Korean
an economic stimulus package.
recession
Roy Bennett
Movement for Democratic Change
sworn in as deputy agriculture minister
become a government minister on Friday but
Lady Gaga
"I lost a lot of friends in the eighties and nineties and it was a big heartbreak and I can't just stand by."
power blackouts and disrupting air traffic communications
the sun
interfere with technology, causing power blackouts and disrupting air traffic communications and cell phone networks.
interfere with technology, causing power blackouts and disrupting air traffic communications and cell phone networks.
"Captain America Reborn."
Marvel
superhero
Captain America
July 1.
29,029-foot (8,848-meter) mountain
Nepal
More than 200
Medellin
He tells me they'll sell the heavily cut cocaine for $1.50 a gram. Higher purity powder goes for about $4 a gram. That's much cheaper than the $50 or $60 a heavily cut gram costs on most U.S. and European streets, according to estimates from the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration.
marijuana
cocaine.
cocaine.
Costa Rica,
undisclosed
the devil
voiced optimism at Haiti's potential because of political stability and economic growth
Haiti.
became a full-time position
Condoleezza Rice
"[He's] sleazy,"
sleazy,"
a retraction."
said. "We don't believe that any correction is warranted."
Vanity Fair
bringing peace to Darfur.
"I think somehow we should all know that these people are hanging on by the skin of their teeth,"
needing American dollars,"
"This isn't about needing American dollars,"
"This isn't about needing American dollars,"
Darcheville
Inverness Caledonian Thistle.
Jean-Claude Darcheville and Nacho Novo
scored twice to fire leaders Rangers
2006
more than 800 deaths
ETA,
Perry
"Ronald Reagan
goes on deck with the captain ahead of the ship's historic launch.
Zain Verjee
"Jewel of Muscat"
New Delhi, India.
15,
metal beam supporting pillars gave way,
five
beam supporting pillars gave way,
give workers alleging unequal pay the right to sue
Lilly Ledbetter,
Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act,
The Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act,
in 2007.
controversial editorial cartoon
Murdoch's apology
Rev. Al Sharpton,
"They'll have to find someone else to write the next stimulus bill."
"I probably never did anything the New York Times suggested I do in eight years as mayor of New York City, and if I did, I wouldn't be considered a conservative Republican," Giuliani said
only Republican who promises to end the George Bush style of governing from and on behalf of a small, angry fringe,"
Microsoft stores
of the deals are just
substantial new discounts on laptops, phones, software, games and its Kinect gaming system for the Xbox 360 console.
Friday at 12:01 a.m. PT,
Bobby Zamora
Tim Howard
scored twice late on and goalkeeper Tim Howard saved an injury-time penalty as they
six
is unclear what group is
Five victims and one suicide bomber were killed at the Marriott,
not certain whether this is the terrorism which we are familiar with up until now,"
Gilchrist
Adam Gilchrist
end of the Australian summer.
India.
Tests
the briefing, prepared by the ministry for Lord Strabolgi,
(the study of UFOs) is anything but claptrap and no evidence at all of 'alien space craft,'"
fight between Microsoft and Google
four key
free, online versions of its four most popular software programs
Google
former Drug Enforcement Agency special agent
$700 million,
three-pronged approach needed to curb
diplomatic ties with Iran Friday,
Bahrain,
Iran
between Sunni Morocco and Shiite Iran.
Sunni Morocco and Shiite Iran.
Sunni ruler,
Morocco's
the Leukemia & Lymphoma Society.
Leukemia & Lymphoma Society.
a day after avalanches in British Columbia,
British Columbia
Harvey Pass,
in the far north-eastern tip of Australia,
crocodile has snatched and eaten
requested that the animal is not harmed,
India.
used to beat himself with a belt and sleep on a bare floor
the goal of beating humans at football.
release a concept later this year that could usher in a new era of in foot design.
advance robot technology
Robots
James Arthur Ray,
a criminal prosecution."
criminal prosecution."
"may turn this into a criminal prosecution."
19
Ray's "Spiritual Warrior" program.
California's 370 Democratic delegates.
Hillary Clinton
more states
Sen. Hillary Clinton
Romney
Romney
his front-runner status
his debut album, "Clear
releases his
thinks the president's plan doesn't go far enough. In his mind, the worst part of the proposal is that "private insurers continue to be a part of the health scheme."
program that I think is going to work,"
program that I think is going to work,"
Dr. David Scheiner
health care reform
If the public option is too good, patients who are sick will flock to it, and I'm not sure it will be able to support itself."
design of various auto parts and components
truck safer, but also could make it more expensive to repair after a collision.
Maine
21-month-old girl,
"All we know is that Ayla's missing. We've ruled out no scenario. We've ruled out no one. And we're not going to get into investigative details,"
search for a missing
was killed in an August 5 drone attack
council, or shura,
Riyadh, Saudi Arabia.
Meleanie Hain,
Meleanie Hain,
covering up "an epidemic of corruption" in Iraq.
Rep. Henry Waxman
illegally obtained the supposedly incriminating e-mails, text messages and voice mails to support his "baseless" lawsuit in an effort to "extort" O'Neal and sully his name.
hacking into his personal accounts and attempting to frame him for using child porn.
to dismiss a lawsuit in which a former worker accuses
Colorado
the Vatican
Police are not commenting on details of the crime, except to say the woman's body did not appear to have been moved.
Aasiya Zubair
Buffalo, New York
she heard Hassan
can only imagine how scared and emotional she must have been before she died,"
about $113 million.
CNN iReporter Bruce Barrett
the natural phenomenon aurora borealis:
Whiskey-smoked salmon chowder, burgers piled high
Fresh Tracks Café
Whitewater Winter Resort
able to use his snout to touch photos
using the Apple tablet device as a language interface for marine mammals.
across the African meningitis belt from east- to west-sub-Saharan Africa.
25,000
Somalia
off northern Somalia,
Somali pirates
the high seas off Somalia
The Gulf of Aden, off northern Somalia,
least 24
Cleveland Cavaliers -- the home of league MVP LeBron James.
Cleveland
The United Nations consolidated four agencies that tackle women's issues and created a new super agency.
run by lower-ranking officials and lacked clout.
consolidated four agencies that tackle women's issues and created a new super agency.
run by lower-ranking officials and lacked clout.
Ann Dunham
the East-West Center Gallery, University of Hawaii Manoa.
in the archives of the Smithsonian in Washington, D.C.
in the archives of the Smithsonian in Washington, D.C.
her personal art and artifact collection.
Mark Hughes
success in football management,
Arsene Wenger
Napier said McCroskey was wearing a black-hooded sweatshirt and "was really smelling bad, like real bad. I can't describe it."
blend of horror hip-hop that celebrated macabre killings.
Kentucky-bound
Orthodox Jewish
Orthodox Jewish man apparently preparing to pray
Lion Air.
Indonesia
Hong Kong
Indonesia's middle class
Ruby Mosley
the doctor saved lives.
Andrew Guest,
as if someone has told us, "It may be two days. It may be two weeks."
he and his family didn't expect to be able to enjoy
Bob Greene
Ray's
said that the charges were unjust and that Ray would be exonerated in court.
London subway bombings
Zabih al-Taifi was arrested in a village near Peshawar on Wednesday as part of ongoing security operations in the area,
Zabih al-Taifi
Peshawar
"Don't let the fearmongers, don't let the dividers, don't let the people who disseminate false information frighten the United States Congress into walking away from the opportunity of a lifetime. Tell the members of Congress you will support them. This is not partisan politics,"
Clinton
his stated goal of universal coverage
Clinton and Obama
Poor battery life
not commented
battery life
Battery life was a frequent complaint about the
are coming out now with tape measures and cameras to see
wagered $150 that he could beat
made a bet
he'd still be childless and unmarried when he hit 40 that in 2001, he
the couple were believed to have traveled to Hong Kong.
$NZ10 million (US$6 million)
Iran's supreme leader
June 12 election outcome
international media coverage of the unrest.
street
a cancer gene
Genetic screening
The first child in Britain
Genetic screening allows lab-fertilized embryos to
Quintavalle
in a lab
damaging earthquakes will remain a threat."
The aftershocks
there's "not an inch that isn't damaged"
Hurricane Ike devastated the Texas city over the weekend,
row of houses
comprehensive energy and climate bill,
comprehensive energy and climate bill,
comprehensive energy and climate bill, called the American Clean Energy and Security Act.
the finding will just produce a "glorious mess."
[that] formally determined that global warming pollution 'endangers' the nation's human health and well-being."
end of January 2010
two new camouflage color schemes and patterns on about 1,000 soldiers in Afghanistan,
not blending well in the diverse countryside.
camouflage uniform
at a children's daycare center in Belgium.
a knife
children's daycare center in Belgium.
51
least 51 people have died
subsequent flooding
cast
cast
needed a body double.
broke my ankle.
"Bedtime Stories."
The CNN/Opinion Research poll was conducted December 16 through Sunday, with 1,160 adult Americans questioned by telephone.
policies are good for the country.
42
a bare majority of Americans, 51 percent, believe that the Democrats' policies
whatever my daughter has
FAA require all conversations, including telephone conversations, between pilots of unmanned aircraft and others be recorded and retained.
near Nogales, Arizona,
Pilot error
"MySpace turned over the names, IP and e-mail addresses of 2,116 convicted North Carolina sex offenders found on its social networking Web site,"
requested similar information
Facebook,
control and censorship
Web
access to information and the outside world
censorship
Iran,
Review 2009 Focus on the Middle East and North Africa.
final of the Sony Ericsson Open
Many Zimbabwean traders
1 trillion in
Patrick Chinamasa,
Zimbabwean traders
231 million percent
be born with certain types of birth defects than infants conceived naturally.
relatively low.
All Blacks
light dishes like dumplings,
Felix or Aqua
Peel Street, Staunton Street
Coulter
January 29
kidnapping 33 children
controversy in a club,
The Galaxy
this season's achievements have already gone some way for making up for the previous two seasons.
LA Galaxy
a Miami-Dade juvenile detention facility
a Miami-Dade juvenile detention facility
first degree felony
Sean Taylor.
Sean Taylor.
jail security checkpoint
$25,000.
the foreclosure crisis
so pervasive that U.S. Rep. Dennis Kucinich, D-Ohio, evoked her name on the House floor
a quiet woman
for her stateliness.
struggling U.S. homeowners burdened down by debt and unrelenting mortgage companies.
Addie Polks
Kucinich,
and spouse Kelli Carpenter "are working through their issues"
Reagan's
seventh- or eighth-grade
seventh- or eighth-grade
September 11 terrorist attacks
broadcast on CNN.com Live.
the presentation of the Nobel Peace Prize to former Finnish
recruited 500 volunteers in Seattle to put sensor tags on items they were throwing away, and the researchers tracked the travels of the trash.
items they were throwing away,
sensors
Al-Shabaab
United States
Democratic
Roland Martin
Sinovac Biotech Ltd.
Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome (SARS),
H1N1 vaccine.
millions of doses for the public.
a vaccine for Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome
millions
"You were convicted 99 percent by your own words,"
a rocket attack
begged the court for mercy,
in the United States, in Georgia,
type of rayon imported from Austria,
Defender M
Ciudad Juarez,
drug business.
an "exceptionally long" total solar eclipse that will cross half the planet on Wednesday.
total solar eclipse
every inhabitant of all of India and China will be able to
12:40 a.m. GMT Wednesday (8:40 p.m. ET Tuesday).
chasers.
"All this happens in a couple of minutes."
$11 million
Lloyd
Christopher Lloyd's
Christopher Lloyd's
six
focus on his family.
Tiger Woods
Using these strips blind women are trained to become Medical Tactile Examiners (MTUs) because they are more able to detect smaller lumps than sighted doctors.
Europe
Medical Tactile Examiners (MTUs)
BFW occupational school in Düren,
their sensitive touch
cancer earlier and more precisely than doctors.
Blind women
Essen University's women's clinic,
volatile zone along the equator between South America and Africa.
near the equator,
volatile zone along the equator between South America and Africa.
Debbie Brown
losing its only three McDonald's restaurants
three
its only three McDonald's restaurants
as a result of the poor economic situation
Iceland,
Park Central New York Hotel in Manhattan.
a New York hotel
Three
several health problems in recent years.
"The Tonight Show,"
"Star Search"
"Star Search"
alongside Carson on "The Tonight Show,"
pneumonia
state institutions
Mexican businesses
40
82,000
82,000
anti-personnel
the music industry is so focused these days on the bottom line
executives' hesitancy to spend money
production of Yu Sheng products,
a Sikh guru was shot to death and another was wounded at an Indian temple in Vienna, Austria.
were ransacked
Indian temple in Vienna, Austria.
After they complete their sentence, the pair
British visitors
DUBAI,
Acapulco
11
Hood,
David Shactman and I
has pledged to repeal President Obama's universal health
Economic
cultural, social, economic, environmental
has seen some success already.
she has seen some success already.
overweight and obese children.
weight
tent city of Mina
one of the last rituals of the Hajj season.
950 meters (1,039 yards)
St. Paul's Chapel.
New York.
National Park and Preserve.
Year-round;
$75 for full-day class,
Sedona Spirit Yoga & Hiking
in the Oaxacan countryside of southern Mexico
same kind of arrogance.
party whose leaders partake in lavish and questionable activities,
The RNC scandals
arrogance
private jets, booze, limousines, five-star hotels, overseas resorts
private jets, booze, limousines, five-star hotels, overseas resorts
the RNC
private planes
two
The injured were
two trains collided
Monday,
the conservative movement
the conservative movement
President Obama's
campaign, new activists aren't going to be as easily attracted by witty aphorisms and wordplays
AMD
B6 and B12 vitamins along with a folic acid supplement
B6, B12 and folic acid may help prevent age-related macular degeneration.
vitamins B6, B12 and folic acid
the site of the 2005 slaying of Sister Dorothy Stang
Canada,
1982,
swamps and forests of southeastern Alberta, Canada,
Hesperonychus,
the smallest known North American dinosaur, a
military grade wrapping"
D-Ohio,
Rep. Dennis Kucinich,
"health care is a civil right."
Winzenried refused to speculate on
Royal Dutch Shell
eastern part of the Niger Delta in Nigeria,
Niger Delta in Nigeria,
the Movement for the Emancipation of the Niger Delta, or MEND
unable to obtain private health insurance
juvenile diabetes
Mary Profit
Elizabeth.
on 137 and Clarke 140
13,000
Ricky Ponting
Rep. Mike Pence,
more oil drilling off U.S. coasts,
require states to give their permission for drilling on their land.
Many Republicans
opposed the bill
David Beckham as the best-paid player in world football,
David Beckham
walls and tunnels under the highway
build a series of walls and tunnels under the highway
Thaell
a blistering report
the credibility of the maid,
by the entire House then matched by a Senate version and signed by Obama
F-35 Joint Strike
to reopen the application window for one day to allow Meyer, and only Meyer, to apply,
23-year-old Marine
National Transportation Safety Board,
The National Transportation Safety Board,
monorail crash.
is investigating the Sunday morning accident, is expected to be at the park for several days.
investigative process,
Disney monorail workers have been placed on paid leave
crash.
January,
violence, food shortages and widespread drought
More than 15,000
violence, food shortages
Aden
Somalia,
violence, food shortages and widespread drought
"to refrain from provocative actions"
the meeting in Ramallah
for new settlements on disputed territory,
organizations that support prisoners' rights and better conditions for inmates, like Amnesty International.
to organizations that support prisoners' rights and better conditions for inmates, like Amnesty International.
and without us this label would not be possible,
the pastor
a traffic stop.
interfering with the duties of a public servant
Omar,
The son's
was the target of a racially motivated
of mixed racial parents
retribution
his mid-30s, were beaten and shot to death after armed men stormed into their home
slayings of two Americans
A security camera at a toll booth
the slayings were in retribution for the capture of 25 drug suspects in a nearby town.
at a toll booth near the municipality of Galeana
2001,
38,
Former
former boxing champion
nine miles off the Louisiana coast
oil well off Louisiana,
the radio host over the former secretary of state
Rush Limbaugh
voters questioned,
future was in peril if it went in the Limbaugh's direction.
lucrative business, one
are becoming increasingly more sophisticated,
official documents that the Chinese Gymnasts Association provided.
federation
The Chinese women's gymnastics
at least 16
grounds of the U.N.
"Law & Order: Special Victims Unit"
The "Special Victims Unit"
NBC Universal
the bogs of Finland,
"important figures from the art and magazine world."
two
nine survivors of a plane that crashed in a river in the Amazon
two
located nine survivors of a plane that crashed in a river in the Amazon
Adam Sandler, Seth Rogen and Jonah Hill, and the guiding
"It's an incredibly realistic representation," Rogen says. "Those scenes where you're backstage at the comedy club and you're all sitting around pitching jokes to each other.
have little in common.
"Funny People."
"Funny People"
of up to five years in prison and a fine of up to €375,000 euros ($538,000),
5 billion
commit suicide
Jorge Lopez.
Monday's
screenplays, directing and appearing
2000,
Taiwanese entertainer Jacky Wu while
Taiwan
inspection and surveillance,"
in 1994.
15 years after
robotic fish
bipolar
three seasons
Cathy Lane
two-year jail term,
espionage charges
Her sentence
Jeremy Toeman,
Sandra Day O'Connor,
not the first
New Haven, Connecticut, firefighters' case,
Republicans'
justices voted 5-4 in favor of the New Haven firefighters.
New Haven firefighters.
the meaning and the usefulness, the value of ASEAN,"
Free Burma Coalition
"The latest episode involving the junta's handling of the cyclone victims in Burma really calls into question the meaning and the usefulness, the value of ASEAN,"
too slow in responding
Diane Dobbs and Robert Sandefur,
two years.
Diane Dobbs and Robert Sandefur,
2002,
aiding and abetting child abduction,
the two "have not been able to prove that they did not support terrorism."
Reporters Without Borders
Anders JÃ¶rle
11-year
two
five Turks and four U.S. citizens.
None of their identities have
Amsterdam's Schiphol
Mother's
Mother's Day
five teenage friends,
Sixty-five
Greek-flagged
a revenge,"
Pirates
South Korea
black ice,
Twenty-three
property owned by the suspects,
transporting nearly $20 million worth of cocaine
majority of the global cancer cases
people exulted over the news of Gadhafi's
Gadhafi
continued to hold their own smaller festivities.
showing us the right way to do things and where to be so we wouldn't be hurt."
the ropes.
Sgt.
the deadly earthquake there nearly a week ago.
delivered badly needed food and water
on a field just north of the Port-au-Prince airport in Haiti.
just north of the Port-au-Prince airport in Haiti.
Obama
Martha's Vineyard,
Lincoln
cottage atop a hill at the Soldiers' Home a few miles from the White House.
Tiger Woods
The Syrian Embassy in Washington
denying the allegations,
Swedish director
Members of the president's own ruling conservative party
open on Sundays.
Socialists filed thousands of amendments to the president's
would permit shops, department stores, and shopping malls to open on Sundays in 20 zones.
"Renewal and Remembrance" day
"Renewal and Remembrance"
"Renewal and Remembrance" project.
spreading lime over nearly 300 acres of the cemetery and installing irrigation systems,
Rihanna
his mother suffer abuse from the time he was 7 years old until he was 13.
Oprah Winfrey
"Rihanna told me her parents used to argue so intensely, she used to get these headaches, these migraines that were almost not even treatable with medicine,"
he watched his mother suffer abuse from the time he was 7 years old until he was 13.
domestic violence
Korea resumed firing near its sea border with South Korea on Thursday,
Artillery shells were fired toward South Korean-controlled Yeonpyeong Island,
Yonhap
Theo Janssens
children and one adult were killed
Dendermonde
"grave errors, misinformation and glaring omissions,"
killed 32 students and faculty members
Sandusky's
three, perhaps four, of eight alleged victims
the young man,
Actress Kelly Preston,
2,
"seizure"
Kelly Preston,
Kelly Preston,
Elizabeth Edwards,
Five people were arrested
Acapulco.
Mexican
36 large-caliber weapons, 13 small-caliber weapons, two grenade launchers, 13 fragmentation grenades, 3,525 rounds of various caliber ammunition, 180 charges
nine
there is a product called Allerpet that you can actually just spray on to your pet,
soot and dirt removal sponge.
soot and dirt removal sponge.
Oreck XL.
soot and dirt removal sponge.
shake off the excess water and rub that over the upholstery, and the hair will collect on the
soot and dirt removal sponge.
Tokyo,
crushed by a tree.
Typhoon Melor roared into central Japan on Thursday, leaving two people dead and
crushed by a tree.
that the situation is being exaggerated by the West in an effort to exert pressure on President Robert Mugabe to leave office.
an unfolding crisis in a country once known as Africa's bread basket.
Africa's bread basket.
Zimbabwe's
One Zimbabwean health care worker,
cholera outbreak
killed 775 people and infected more than 15,000.
the West
cheated on his wife
he had cheated on his wife Elin,
possibly thousands of unexploded bombs and shells
Lebanon
operations in Lebanon.
BACTEC, which had been responsible for a quarter of the clearing work, has to shut down its operations in Lebanon.
thousands of unexploded bombs and shells
with Hezbollah
328 people
"It's been a while since that's been the case,"
City of David, part of Jerusalem.
The "short hair style, the prominent lobes and curves of the ears, as well as the almond-shaped eyes
is extraordinary,"
City of David, part of Jerusalem.
"one of the largest and most impressive coin hoards
Fargo, North Dakota,
"Otherwise I believe we would have washed out a considerable amount of our town,"
fill a million sandbags and place 700,000 around our city,"
rebels from Sudan had crossed the border.
a non-aggression agreement
the fans.
three children.
cubic zirconia diamonds in an environmental wrapping.
Growing up surrounded by generations of jewelry wearing tradition, I was drawn to the brilliance and transparency of diamonds from an early age. Later, it was the fact that diamonds are a unique resource, evoking beauty and eternal love that lead me to found DIAZ Fine Jewelry.
they balance the imperative for profit with environmental concerns.
The maker of the world's most popular e-book reader is rumored to be announcing a color, touch-screen
has actively encouraged political operatives of all ideological stripes to hold their fundraisers and receptions at the ballpark,
Monday,
political operatives of all ideological stripes to hold their fundraisers and receptions at the ballpark,
to drop charges against three Navy SEALs accused of assaulting an Iraqi suspected of orchestrating the 2004 killing and mutilation of four U.S. contractors.
about a dozen
thousands
the U.S. is sending the wrong message to its troops.
"Trafficking in Persons
"Trafficking in Persons Report"
trafficked and forced laborers
dismal records on trafficking.
in developing countries such as Brazil, China and India
a 25-kilogram (55 pounds) bag of rice
people affected by the
Frank and April Wheeler (Leonardo DiCaprio and Kate Winslet)
6.5 percent
plunged 25.7 percent
World Bank
Seuss book "Green Eggs and Ham"
Dr. Seuss book "Green Eggs and Ham"
Easter Egg Roll
the annual White House Easter Egg Roll,
guards
indicted three suspected former Nazi concentration camp guards
serving in the Nazi SS.
Austria,
50
north of Baghdad.
an Iraqi police checkpoint
Five
weapons
to pursue Al-Shabaab fighters
Islamic militants
Al-Shabaab
have made people start to be much more doubtful than they used to be,"
the mood swing he has seen in his 30 years in the U.S.
gather information on the incident and send it to the Civil Rights Section of the U.S. Department of Justice.
Cobane using racial slurs against the detainee and kicking him in the head, and another officer stomping on his leg while he is lying face down on the ground without handcuffs.
Cobane using racial slurs against the detainee and kicking him in the head, and another officer stomping
"We give officers guns, batons and badges with the hope that they will not violate our public trust, with the
support
the Defense of Marriage Act
gay-rights groups
Defense of Marriage
nurses, from a group called Angels in Waiting,
spying on her to report her to child-welfare authorities,
boxes of candles
"People are actually stealing this, then will sell it later, and then they'll use that money for their families,"
violence and looting
peacekeeping force in Haiti with 1,500 additional police and 2,000 peacekepping troops
Israel must improve its relations with neighboring
"I don't think there is any question in talking with leaders from Israel that they recognize that they've becoming increasingly isolated in that part of the world, and that's not ... a good situation,"
becoming increasingly isolated in that part of the world,
Pandora,
clearer, more intuitive user interface
23-month
second chance."
"Too bad they don't have him for the whole year,"
Tokyo, Japan
attempted murder
attempted murder
Monica Conyers,
$1.2 billion
state law, Conyers will have
77.4 percent
sophisticated computer fraud schemes continue
schemes continue to flourish
mobilize resources from across the country. He also announced increased funding for flood and coastal defenses across the country.
increased funding
unemployment
the future home of a $40 million, 64,000-square-foot factory that would churn out feta and brie.
the strictest
kosher and halal
Jewish and Muslim
lifetime achievement
Clint Eastwood
old driver's license and credit cards,
Central Park,
27 years ago,
$420,000
"Lisa Marie Presley
$420,000
great green gadget for occasionaly campers.
a British
Solar powered tents
"If true, the nature and amount of charges made are very shocking to me and all Penn Staters.
perjury
sexual child abuse
real meltdown
"12 steps to financial disaster."
"The people who survived the Great Depression were the ones who had money to buy when everybody else was selling."
you just read will happen?
Roubini
flight back
Michelle Palmer,
having sex on a Dubai beach
Acors and fellow Briton Michelle Palmer,
use of intersecting runways at Newark Liberty International Airport,
the disciplinary actions had nothing to do with Adams' safety complaints.
There were four such instances last year
planes above the Newark airport
"saloon girl" dresses purchased at a nearby costume shop.
saloon-themed wedding
her cousin
choose less-than-attractive dresses for her attendants to keep everyone's attention on her.
Bridesmaids
"saloon girl" dresses
See the bridesmaids' lavender dresses
inside a mobile home, Choctaw County
Sunday
tornado
test-fire its long-range missile,
annual defensive exercises,"
"war maneuvers"
puppet war-like forces
they can uncover a person's natural strengths and weaknesses with 99 percent accuracy.
parents
that the Sudanese president and his government are not cooperating with investigators.
he doesn't know
at least one person
secondary collapse,
at least one person
mission is complicated,
small motel in the Florida Keys
6-year-old
Peter Bergen,
Eight
On Saturday, Taliban militants attacked American and Afghan troops in the Nuristan province in eastern Afghanistan.
relationship with club owner and Italian Prime Minister
Italian newspaper Corriere dello Sport
an historic
50 hours
tie salesman
Polo because "it was the sport of kings.
ties
Ralph Lauren
Bronx.
the desire, not just to be a success but to look like one before you'd even achieved your
ties
former tie salesman
way American men and women dress
tie salesman
ties
Rapes targeting girls as young as seven are on the increase in Afghanistan
has failed to adequately protect the
urging greater protecting
human
The law also targets
the celebrity themselves,"
California law makes it a crime to take and sell
Madison County District Attorney Michael Guest
jury
Carla Hughes
Carla Hughes
spring and summer of 1932, with the Great Depression gripping the country, tens of thousands of World War I veterans and their families gathered in Washington to demand what they felt they had been promised.
Contadora,
Contadora, one
'Survivor'
the Pearl Islands.
Pearl Islands,
After a short flight from Panama City in a puddle jumper, we were on the island of Contadora,
Samimi sent this photo of a bus struck by a suicide bomber on Tuesday.
S. Samimi
Samimi,
photo of a bus struck by a suicide bomber
Chris Bryant
an insider's view of his secret life as a spy and his role in fighting the war on terror.
John Kiriakou,
congenital heart condition,
daughter of Sen. Dick Durbin
daughter of Sen. Dick Durbin
sixth
became a car salesman in Texas.
late 1970s,
"Not very successfully,"
Apollo 11 Commander Neil Armstrong
in the Mreiji neighborhood.
U.N. High Commissioner
seven people, including three children,
Syrian border
the resettlement of "vulnerable and sick" children in Al Waleed refugee camp at the Iraqi-Syrian border.
About 2,000
since July 1983.
Velupillai Prabhakaran
Velupillai Prabhakaran
intense military
"We're very relieved
McCurry
a move
Carlo Ancelotti,
sexual intercourse
Hamid Karzai.
"victims of political games,"
career grand slam
are "better than expected,"
U.S. Open
things are looking
capturing his sixth straight title in America and extending his record of 15 grand slam wins.
Former world number one,
the sale and marketing of videos showing dog fights and other acts of animal cruelty.
1999
decade-old
is overly broad.
overly broad.
Congress
the end of TV's rabbit-ears era.
rain
performance-enhancing
performance-enhancing drugs,
Miguel Tejada
using performance-enhancing drugs,
Congress about his knowledge of Major League Baseball players using performance-enhancing drugs,
February
From January 1
From January 1
Italy, Spain, Belgium and Britain
police detaining between 20 and 30 individuals with plastic handcuffs
300 individuals
St. Paul, Minnesota,
for Marriage.
star in a new $1.5 million ad campaign
More than 880,000
Michael Jackson hopping out of a coroner's
Afghanistan and Iraq.
About half
nearly four million
191
train bombings
held indoctrination sessions for Islamic militants at his former Madrid home,
191
killed 191 people and wounded more than 1,800.
indoctrination sessions for Islamic militants
a British soldier
had been taking part in a routine patrol in the Garmsir district of Helmand province
the Garmsir district of Helmand province
an explosion
13 international relief organizations
Sudan,
U.N.-Sudanese
"are impulsive, highly distractible and clumsy, can't pay attention
teenagers with ADD or ADHD
the effects of alcohol
Maoists
were chopped off when he was just a few months old in preparation for dog-fighting.
British Royal Marine Paul "Penny" Farthing,
former British Royal Marine Paul "Penny" Farthing,
An unknown soldier in Afghanistan first
U.K.
The Times
the Financial Times,
Sunday Times
United Nations cultural organization UNESCO
1.56
St Mark's Square
flooding
Venice
St Mark's Square
Moon River Theater,
Kris Allen,
Southern California
their favorite American cities.
I-Reporters have been telling us about their favorite American cities.
their favorite American cities.
Severe weather hit the Houston area Monday, flooding streets and homes and leaving thousands
the area and two other reported areas on Tuesday
6.3 inches
the area and two other reported areas
more than one in 10
said she sometimes skips meals so her three children can eat.
Alexander McQueen
off the Florida Keys
boat
off the coast of Marathon Key,
Judy Kay Zagorski,
John Marchione.
two miles
American Legion and to the entire veterans community,"
"Rightwing Extremism: Current Economic and Political Climate Fueling Resurgence in Radicalization and Recruitment."
Department of Homeland Security Secretary Janet Napolitano
Department of Homeland Security Secretary Janet Napolitano
Janet Napolitano
"Rightwing Extremism: Current Economic and Political Climate Fueling Resurgence in Radicalization and Recruitment."
Janet Napolitano
No. 8
crushed No. 8 Jo-Wilfried
Tiger Woods
nicknamed Raptorex,
Tyrannosaurus rex,
China
in lake beds in northeastern China.
Annual Caddy
Tiger and anyone else I have offended."
Tiger and anyone else I have offended."
$9
Santo Domingo is the New World's first city,
the Gibson Les Paul
recommendations on how to improve guitars,
improved ties with President Barack Obama;
Jesus Christ
his relationship with Iran but denied having said that Iran would help Venezuela obtain nuclear technology.
"I'm a man with many defects," he said. "I love. I sing. I dream. I was born in the poor countryside. I was raised in the countryside, planting corn and selling sweets made by my grandmother. My children, my two daughters are with me and I want
Hugo Chavez
apologize for hijacking her speech at the 2009 MTV Video Music Awards.
Beyonce Knowles should have won.
a Turkish government official denied that Ankara blocked Iraqi planes.
Iraqi
Iraqi government
President Bill Clinton
President Bill Clinton
April 20,
orange juice
"We didn't even know that it had been banned in orange juice in the United States in 2009,"
Brazilian farmers
65 horses
11
preliminary information from the men's autopsies may be available by Sunday.
43.
no
Asha
reduces the chaos in my mind.
After the gathering ended,
fill 1 million,
Fargo, North Dakota,
They hoped to fill 1 million,
a flood warning
as they were the last time,
issued a flood warning
21 counts of tampering with a consumer product and another 21 counts of obtaining a controlled substance by deceit or subterfuge,
the number of embryos that can be implanted in a woman's uterus during in-vitro fertilization procedures.
a backdoor effort to outlaw abortions in the state.
embryos a doctor could implant
legislation to limit the number of embryos that can be implanted in a woman's uterus during in-vitro fertilization procedures.
backdoor effort
all the charges.
any part in the deaths,
can remove large objects from photos, altering the background to make it realistically appear as though the object was never there. It can zap tourists, delete power lines and otherwise alter photos with click-and-drag ease.
$1,300
later this month (or possibly early
between $1,300 and $2,600
later this month (or possibly early
Jessica Watson, of Mooloolaba,
Jessica Watson
Kay Cottee,
has said that if he's elected, he would commit more troops to Afghanistan and would order the military to end the war in Iraq, which he has called a "dangerous distraction" from the Afghan battle.
therapy,
The airline and insurer say compensation
the number of food-borne illnesses every
roughly 80,000,
Making eggs safer
Nestle cookie dough. Spinach, peanut
10
Alexey Pajitnov,
the simple puzzle video
"I either work or he'll kill me,"
U.S. citizenship
Julio "El Negro" Padilla,
slit their throats,"
expanded testing
children in India
HIV cases among children,
Nobel Peace Prize acceptance speech?
"Clear-eyed, we can understand that there will be war, and still strive for peace."
that once the United States withdraws, that the historic tensions between Arabs and Persians along the strategic border are likely to resurface,
racially profiling the Latino community,
positive publicity,
fear the show will give the controversial sheriff positive publicity,
the trash they dispose of goes where it should.
trails of
wanted to learn if society could more efficiently dispose of
Milwaukee Mayor Tom Barrett,
Anthony Peters
a woman crying for help,
battering him with a metal pipe,
Barrett
that unless the world takes action the group, which wants to impose an extreme type of Islamic sharia law, could extend its grip across parts of East Africa to gain control
An Al Qaeda-linked militant group
threat was not limited to
praying
"No discussions about retirement with JVP,"
shouted hostile slogans against Germany
"terrorist," "bitch" and "Islamist"
"terrorist," "bitch"
now in its eighth
"There actually is no line at all between the video-game artist and the fine-art world,"
former leaders Udinese are now in fourth place -- level on points with Milan -- after losing 2-0
"The Americans are coming."
to unfold,
high
Tuesday morning,
later in the day.
Tuesday morning,
anti-government
31st
"instability," disrupting public order
an independent panel would make the final decision on a doping violation.
autobiography which is being serialized by The Times of London.
eight-year
World Anti-Doping Agency
Jesse Browning,
Istanbul, Turkey
several hundred Kurds
after Turkey's highest court banned their political party on charges that it was a "focal point for terrorism."
"Travel only when you are well,"
with 46
across Mexico
saved my life,"
on-the-street interviews to bust breast-cancer myths for the non-profit Bright Pink
filmed some on-the-street interviews to bust breast-cancer myths
a mammogram while undergoing another round of in-vitro fertilization
Amanda Knox,
in Perugia, a university town about 185 kilometers (115 miles) north of Rome.
Raffaele Sollecito,
Debbie Rowe
Friday afternoon
consider who will raise Michael Jackson's three children
who is buried in a grave marked "Unknown."
Arlington National Cemetery
a new investigation
poor record keeping
poor record keeping
how well the government is managing this massive support force called up in the immediate aftermath of the war in Iraq.
Blackwater, now called Xe
by an Iraqi
Three of five Americans
five Americans
Three of five Americans
ordered released
since last week
exhibition at the British Museum.
"Hadrian: Empire and Conflict"
consolidated imperial power,
he consolidated imperial power, was a patron of architecture and travelled extensively across his lands.
an empire that
For our road trip, we had chosen an eight-day itinerary from our homes outside Atlanta, Georgia, through the mountains of North Carolina and Virginia, then east to the Atlantic shoreline and south along the coastal islands of the Outer Banks.
through the Blue Ridge Mountains.
a baby gorilla
overheated and dehydrated
Mat Kearney
urged his brother to surrender.
killed
Michoacan state,
that all the candidates have had their problems in Palmetto State, one reason why today's outcome has been so hard to predict.
no one takes him seriously outside of his hard-core supporters,"
prescription medicines
taking nonsteroidal, anti-inflammatory medication
putting ice on an aching joint,
Iraq, health care and the economy
her husband's plan,
Super Tuesday
Iraq, health care
his wife and four children
minister
His mission is to establish five orphanages in five continents to symbolize the five family members he lost.
$1.5 million.
fastest
operates six love, or "leisure," hotels in Japan.
"deeply disappointed"
governing body of women's tennis
Israeli tennis player,
competing in the Sony Ericsson World Tennis Association Tour in Dubai,
she was "very, very disappointed" to be denied access to the tournament.
legalizing marijuana
drug rehabilitation programs
Hillary and Tenzing Norgay,
ordinary New Zealanders
members of Nepal's Sherpa community and Buddhist monks.
became the first men to climb the 29,035 feet to the top of Everest and safely return.
North Korea
"This type of North Korea behavior
several short-range missiles
Pyongyang fired six short-range missiles in less than seven hours,
U.S. official
about 500 kilometers
through pain,
running did not damage joints or leave
senior runners
fourth
bed tax in comparison to a year ago,
Disney
just like many other U.S. businesses.
be laid off the next day.
Orlando
laid off the next day.
Nick DiMola
60 artifacts and pieces of artifacts
Nick DiMola
Mexican Cultural Institute
The Peanut Corporation of America
The Peanut Corporation of America
salmonella
Peanut Corporation of America
nearly 600 illnesses, including eight deaths,
one of the largest food recalls in U.S. history, encompassing more than 1,000 products.
the Canadian flag bearer for the closing ceremonies.
the glitches that plagued the first week of the games.
on a 2007 survey of 3,501 people.
46 million
About 46 million
46 million people in the United States
Anna Loginova
a car thief
that she fought off a car thief just four months ago.
a toy monkey wearing the Star of David,
A woman charged with sending threatening packages to two lawmakers,
a hoax weapon of mass destruction,
U.S. Rep. Peter King of New York and New York State Sen. Greg Ball,
original brief was for the work to be created by 27 artists
Italy,
earlier this month
at a school in the Punjab province of Pakistan,
raise awareness of environmental issues.
Jenson Button
Sebastian Vettel
Tuesday at a news conference.
afflicts the well-to-do as well as the poor.
author
National Violence Against Women Survey
a cyber-attack on Department of Defense computer systems
military computer systems,
the continued increase in Chinese military spending is slowly tipping the balance of power between China and Taiwan in China's favor.
efforts to break into U.S.
take a loaded, concealed weapon into a national
Interior
"It's important for people to be able to protect themselves at all times and in all places even from wild animal attacks."
three
decision on Wednesday to halt the September 11 terrorism cases at the behest
Massachusetts Institute of Technology
survey submerged boats or oil and gas pipelines, researchers at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology
MIT
map the ocean floor,
the community
the community
the duration of their relationship,
(500) Days of Summer,
Joseph Gordon-Levitt and Zooey Deschanel fall in love
E. coli bacteria
Monday of the
E. coli
booming economy provided jobs and opportunity.
many African-Americans
left the South, migrating to cities like Boston, Massachusetts; Philadelphia, Pennsylvania; Chicago, Illinois; Detroit, Michigan, and New
built the family a custom-designed home.
Maria Ruiz
a rotor blade hit a three-story building, causing the helicopter to fall in a ball of fire.
11 of the 12
rotor blade hit a three-story building,
12
Bruce Reynolds,
1963
four months
Stuttgart
district attorney filed two felony counts against Brown,
Media reports have said the couple has reunited since the alleged incident;
Chris Brown
Choice Awards,
"The Godfather," "The Godfather: Part II"
"The Godfather: Part II,"
Francis Ford Coppola
Peter Kleeman
22-month-old son, Trig, who has the genetic disorder.
CNN Political Ticker: Palin slams Fox's
Simon
University of Florida College of Veterinary Medicine in Gainesville
Humane Society's equine protection program,
21
where their investigation will go,"
Marlin Miller,
Marlin Miller's live oak
a creative tribute to the live oaks that lined the scenic highway before the saltwater surge of Hurricane Katrina killed them at their very roots.
manufacturers have not had enough time to pre-install new computers with the software
will simply further strengthen the government's control and censorship of the media.
prevent children from viewing pornography
Green Dam
Web filtering
was necessary to prevent children from viewing pornography and other harmful content.
San Francisco 49ers, Philadelphia Eagles, Buffalo Bills and the Cincinnati Bengals.
reschedule the October 24 hearing in order to attend an NFL workout
a domestic dispute call,
Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania,
Paul Sciullo
keeping DNA records of anyone they arrest
the UK should not be keeping DNA records of everyone they arrest.
retained their fingerprints and DNA when criminal cases against them ended without conviction.
Iraq
carry on with our nuclear program without let or hindrance,"
stop attacking coalition troops in Iraq
a rocky perch for the terraced restaurant,
sea-filled volcanic crater
critical condition, but was making progress,
kick and punch him,
white males
NATO's International Security Assistance Force
British
Nahr-e Saraj District of Helmand Province,
British soldier
the so-called fanboys
Tom Cruise, Brad Pitt and Adam Sandler
"Button."
Christmas Day
Thursday
Rev. Billy Graham,
the illness does not appear to be life-threatening, as Mr. Graham's condition had stabilized over the hours following admission and treatment.
have come from diverticuli,
said the illness does not appear to be life-threatening, as Mr. Graham's condition had stabilized over the hours following admission and treatment.
Mission Health
hospitalized in
the BCS ranking system prevented
Alabama,
mother, Darnell Donerson, and brother, Jason
performances on "American Idol" in 2004
800
Hudson's mother, Darnell Donerson, and brother, Jason Hudson,
"Planet 51,"
childlike side
was brought on by the stress of war and the distance from loved ones.
the families of troops who have died in combat, but not if they committed suicide,
a letter from the president.
the stress of war and the distance from loved ones.
The family
three and half
His team tried to summit via the mountain's notorious West Ridge
"a good time"
hosts the big show Sunday night.
Hugh Jackman
hopefully will be YouTube moments.
cookies
a ball autographed by Howard.
the baseball
as far as Liverpool, England.
John Lennon
Hollywood headquarters of Capitol Records,
in 2001,
George Harrison's
20 to 70.
7,000 clubs
battle Indian rule
U.S. Joint Chiefs Chairman Adm. Mike Mullen
a top operational commander of Lashkar-e-Tayyiba, and Zakir Rehman Lakhvi, whose arrest had been reported Tuesday,
U.S. Joint Chiefs Chairman Adm. Mike Mullen
systematic detention of such leaders has been condemned
Palestine.
Someone who nurtures your
the soul is the ultimate G-spot for happiness."
Indira Devi,
Amar and Kundan Singh Pundir
in India
illegal
the village of about 200
Indira Devi,
lob on 34 minutes for his third goal of the season,
Real Zaragoza
Atletico Madrid
2-0
Luis Garcia
UEFA Cup
Levante,
Maxi Rodriguez
Luis Garcia
Togo were not disqualified
machine-gun attack
Sony
Microsoft and Sony,
launch new video-on-demand and live TV services for Xbox
in partnership with dozens of media companies,
ice, beets, apples and pears?
giant panda.
ice, beets, apples and pears.
people react that way because of how pandas resemble children.
people react that way because of how pandas resemble children.
endorsements from two key unions
election is about
"Barack Obama
Saturday.
swap out their poppy plants for wheat crops
heroin
opium and heroin
the U.S. Agency for International Development has been offering them seeds, fertilizers and improved irrigation.
300 tons of poppy seeds
make opium and heroin,
topics of diversity, tolerance and the role France should play in Europe.
Watch the panel discuss these issues
the strength
makes the country competitive and which way its culture is headed.
Coast Guard Adm. Thad Allen
very, very small spot in the ocean compared
crude offshore
Alabama's Dauphin Island,
South America, as far apart as the Falkland Islands and Fortaleza, Brazil.
west coast of Chile
Sumatra.
killing at least 57 people,
More than 400
"We face threats to our health, our climate and, of course, our security that have left many of our young people wondering
you'll be sorely disappointed."
President Obama
George H.W. Bush.
Muslim human-rights
to attack by the Islamic group,
call for a referendum
Friday
strengthen the country's indigenous majority
part of its 18-month journey around the world.
on average 94 kilowatts of power
31 meters (102 feet) long and 15 meters (49 feet) wide,
31 meters (102 feet) long and 15 meters (49 feet) wide,
and renewable energy at home everyday,"
hydrogen fuel cells
Riversimple,
hydrogen-powered
for several weeks,
Sunday,
Hosni Mubarak
science experiments,
Obama administration
NASA's
Obama administration
enjoys her pizzas, she's drinking coffee from the cup."
nose, upper lip, cheekbones
a gunshot wound
Canadian
Immigration and Refugee Board
African National Congress in South Africa
the methamphetamine market in the United States
a four-year
La Familia
operation targeted the distribution network of
the Syrian
no longer viable,
International sanctions, including those against oil exports and
Alexandros Grigoropoulos
Alexandros Grigoropoulos
shaking hands and kissing
H1N1
al Qaeda
More troops is not the way to go,
in protest over America's war
Kgalema Motlanthe,
Zuma
after a judge threw out the corruption, fraud and racketeering case against Zuma
Zuma
a court ruling that allowed Christians to use the word Allah as a term for God.
southeast
Muslim
Richard Gasquet
in March.
possible two-year
be considered a "declaration of war."
encroaches upon the sovereignty and dignity of the DPRK
considered a "declaration of war."
to step up efforts to develop nuclear weapons
pressure applied against it
Underwires, boning and padding add shape and fullness to your chest,
give you the confidence you'll want
Faith Hill
"Sunday Night Football's"
February 1.
Formula One legend Jackie Stewart.
more than 900
the mobile home park where she lives, skipping and happily swinging her arms on the day she disappeared in Tracy, California.
a pink Hello Kitty T-shirt and black leggings.
shows the child in
the Church of the Nativity
BETHLEHEM,
host
Robin Scherbatsky.
Hearings
1.5 million
tribunals,
ice free" during summer within a decade.
the Arctic will be ice-free in summer within about 20 years, and much of that decrease will be happening within 10 years."
Arctic sea ice
the Arctic.
by the end of 2011.
allowed foreign troops, including British forces, to remain in Iraq
Russian-controlled territory
Russia's Deputy Foreign Minister Grigory Karasin
his contract
Edward Fatu,
famous Anoa'i wrestling family,
the peace with Israel
January 17 to February 4.
video game programmer Richard Garriott
Richard Garriott
'Spinning Chair of Ultimate Sickness.'
three major strands:
20 years
20 years in prison, a $250,000 fine
a sedated monkey
to find a monkey small enough to smuggle back to the United States. The journal also described the pair's "acquisition of a small monkey and their experimenting with different medicines to sedate the monkey for their journey home," McDevitt's office said.
smuggling and conspiracy to smuggle the monkey in violation of the Endangered Species Act and other federal laws.
a sedated monkey
a third of the
Fish
"I'm happy
sense of optimism and patriotism
Elliot Tiber (Demetri Martin), son of the owners of a fading Catskills hotel, who helped attract the Woodstock festival to the area.
Woodstock festival
Tiber's memoir.
between 1974 and 1975,
Chile
South Africa
India.
India and Pakistan
Sardar Patel,
Wal-Mart
"carelessness, recklessness, negligence."
post-Thanksgiving bargains
from being caught in that surge of people" that rushed into
Barcelona
Arsenal
Messi
dogs and cats
from $75 to nearly $300 each leg.
Only cats and dogs are allowed in the cabin areas on
the release of DreamWorks' latest animated feature, "Monsters vs. Aliens,"
cost of installing new technology
"Murder: Most Foul" "accomplished."
portrays a soldier very upset about taking a life:
through the Internet
the lowest price around to other dealerships
Internet
could be as low as 35 individuals,"
60
23
above 60 percent
DeKalb Superior Court Judge Daniel Coursey
24-year-old, attorney
"pawns in a larger operation."
drug-smuggling,
teenage girls from Great Britain
less than an hour.
it's like to go to war virtually.
spy on and attack enemy combatants without putting their own forces at risk,
unmanned aerial systems
by the end of court Friday.
the case against Michael Jackson's
peacekeeping mission in Congo, said government troops were leaving the city, which wasn't on the front lines. He said he didn't know where the soldiers were going, but suspected they were headed to areas of heavy fighting.
more than 50,000 people
"extremely volatile."
Danville, California.
cheering people
"soft body impact damage,"
piece together details from the double engine failure that hit the plane after it took off
ceremonial key to the city,
Nizar Trabelsi
Jacob Ngwira
2006.
as they drew 1-1 with Malawi to book their place at the 2010 World Cup in South Africa.
his sense of vindication
speak publicly
mother, grandmother, cousins and other family members.
waited another 10 years
18-year-old,
Government
told lawmakers Wednesday how his newborn twins came close to
blood-thinning medication,
Dennis Quaid
he felt like a guinea pig during an injury plagued four-year spell
Manchester City
United's archrivals Manchester City
Armenia and Turkey.
soccer game
Gulf of Aden and neighboring coastal areas.
New York.
"Speed Racer"
no one was
American and Indian flavors,
in a tent set up on the White House South Lawn,
White House
a phenomenon,"
a phenomenon,"
constitutional law,
United Arab Emirates
$2 million
Hisham Talaat Moustafa,
apartment in the United Arab Emirates
18 of Brazil's 26 states were left without power
Sao Paulo, Mato Grosso do Sul, Rio de Janeiro
electricity
southern Brazil that was plunged into darkness when power from a major hydroelectric dam was lost.
obvious they don't have the foggiest
another's cultures, with respect. Just because someone shows cultural pride --
responsibilities. Like this one: Americans have the responsibility
The report explores three scenarios on climate change, none of which leads to
compares global warming to a house fire that the world is currently failing to contain.
compares global warming to a house fire that the world is currently failing to contain.
average temperatures to 2.85 degrees above pre-industrial levels by 2100.
three scenarios on climate change,
proposal [for a global upstream cap] is similar to but not identical to the proposal from the Kyoto 2 project,"
creates "cool, futuristic soul with a real '80s quality,"
Trinidad,
Janelle Monae
Janelle Monae
Janelle Monae creates "cool, futuristic soul with a real '80s quality,"
help film their music videos.
"Live Music," and amateur videographers are re-filming
art projects.
collaborative online art
a music video.
maximum
A Moscow jury
this is a "very dark
Uyghur Muslims, a Turkic-speaking ethnic minority in China, and the group's far-flung diaspora.
Chinese crackdown against Uyghurs
Natasha Richardson,
basic information."
that he undergo Olympic-style pre-fight blood testing
claims he used performance-enhancing drugs.
Mike Huckabee,
McCain
projected losses in Texas, Ohio, Rhode Island
Floyd Mayweather Jr.
Barnes & Noble CEO William Lynch
Apple iPad,
$50
1-1 for an emphatic 5-1 aggregate win.
capital murder, rape, residential burglary and theft,
ratchet down on emissions from cars, trucks, factories and manufacturing processes that produce ozone.
return the EPA to its roots, to serve the American people and show that your work involves issues that they care about.
her aim is to make people see the connection between the environment and their lives.
Indonesia.
as a recovery,
near the northern community of Mayer,
Barack Obama
has done for politics.
King Sr.
Otis Sutton,
at least three
52.5
may have
10:30 p.m. October 3,
a "happy ending" to the case.
the eighth day
help reduce malaria among Nigeria's nomads.
grant applications, open
efforts to prevent the transmission of HIV through breast milk.
GCE launched its latest round of grant applications, open to anyone with a unique approach to solving
Palin and Biden
St. Louis, Missouri,
only vice presidential
it was Burton who piqued her interest in playing the deliciously cruel White Queen.
Hathaway
"Alice in Wonderland"
deal with evacuation, long-term shelter, medical emergencies, lost or missing children and violent confrontations,
the Christian Security Network has been actively training churches,
San Bernardino, California.
homecoming party
Army Spc. Christopher Sullivan
man accused of shooting
says African-Americans remain skeptical about racial progress in the U.S.
particular racial barrier.
the possibility that the scars of America's racial legacy were healed or, at least, that they were less raw.
increase of reports of students with flu-like symptoms.
swine
Queens
Shen Xue and Zhao Hongbo
China's
South Korea's Mo Tae-Bum
"We exercise all around the globe and have joint exercises with countries all over
Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez, whose comments have frequently antagonized Washington, said it would welcome the Russian air force,
Russian air force,
cash, beer and meat
Mexican state of Oaxaca,
prospective bridegroom didn't live up to his end of the deal,
the president's speech,
work hard and stay in school.
University of Maryland School of Medicine.
University of Maryland School of Medicine.
vat of hot chocolate,
New Jersey chocolate processing plant
the head from the vat's agitator,
Vincent Smith II,
nine-foot
money laundering to illegal gambling and murder.
62 people indicted.
according to the charges.
money laundering to illegal gambling and murder.
Gambino
Sixty-two members of the Gambino, Genovese and Bonanno families
Roy Bennett
charges of terrorism and inciting people to carry out terrorism.
impeach its own witness.
Michael Peter Hitschmann
Hitschmann
Hollywood Bowl
"I went to see Andrea Bocelli last night. The first time I've been out in months. The Hollywood Bowl allowed me to use my wheelchair,"
Middle East.
Western universities
Over 40
Over 40 prestigious
the founder of the cosmetic
Los Angeles-area community of Porter Ranch,
wildfires
FA charge against him.
Friday,
this planet is like 4,000 degrees Fahrenheit.
Earth-size planets,"
discovery was that planet is extremely hot, very, very hot. And it's very, very hot on one side, compared to the other."
to find planets the size of Earth and to determine how common these planets are.
only one
one
giant gas planet
think things are going very badly has dropped from 40 percent in December to 32 percent now,"
three out of four Americans
three
21 percent suggesting that
15
Franklin D. Roosevelt,
Roosevelt used his first 100 days to launch the New Deal,
your passport,
extra ID photos
his passport
Web sites offer easy-access digital storage.
your passport copy and any other traveling or ID-related paperwork
Beijing, China,
passportsupport.com
Gov. Rod Blagojevich
Gov. Rod Blagojevich
Rod Blagojevich
Pirates
by pirates,
the MV Delight,
Saudi-owned
four
Jack Black and Michael Cera
"Year One,"
emergency aid,
one-third
"The international community must urgently focus their attention on finding ways to assist the millions of people in desperate need,"
Dr. Vance Harris is a primary care physician
$55
less than half what I did 20 years ago.
extra time added by referees
extra time
allowed the game
Machu Picchu via the Sun Gate,
alternate treks land right in Aguas Calientes
the Inca Trail.
leaders of the mosque, at the very least, allowed people to come around their facility and recruit young men to fight in Somalia
Sheikh Abdirahman Sheikh Omar Ahmed.
Casey Anthony, mother
Casey Anthony,
Anthony
mother of a missing toddler
personal identification
four life sentences
China, Japan and South
Korean mini-sub fired torpedoes at the Cheonan
Lester William Hobbs,
a 7-year-old girl
Aja Daniell Johnson
her mother
an Amber Alert
al-Shabab militants advanced to the presidential palace in Mogadishu, sparking sporadic fighting and shelling in the Somali capital. The recent fighting has killed
college degrees.
insight, creativity and innovation
creativity and innovation that these systems are systematically suppressing in yet another generation of young people.
There's a wealth of talent that lies in all of us. All of us, including those who work in
Herman Cain
I'm the first to admit that the ways of Washington are a big part of the problem.
Washington "scandal industrial complex"
touted the new muscle of the expanded Democratic majority.
Nancy Pelosi
committees
$3,000 tax credit for each worker they hired
Barack Obama's proposed economic recovery package in the next couple of weeks, with a vote in the full
Gary McKinnon
he was simply doing research to find out whether the U.S. government was covering up the existence of UFOs.
hacking into U.S. government computers
the rule of
prison conceived outside the rule of law
eventual closure of Guantanamo Bay prison
New York City, Philadelphia
International hip-hop artists
Hassan El Haf,
meeting American hip-hop artists and dancers
Roger Von Bergendorff,
Roger Von Bergendorff,
I'll ever get over it."
Jaycee Lee Dugard
kidnapping and raping
warehouse,"
Katie Callaway Hall
"With all the joy I should feel, I want to scream from the depths of my soul," she said. "Scream because my fears turned out to be justified -- he struck again."
for kidnapping and raping Hall,
she wanted to scream when she heard that Phillio Garrido kidnapped someone else.
supposedly kept some gamecocks at the White House.
Millie
that they'd get to bring a new puppy with them to the White House
capture and dramatic rescue in the pirate-infested waters off
Africa
to say thank you
Sheikh Mukhtar Robow Ali,
early Thursday,
has signaled a desire to negotiate with Kenya
extremist group Al-Shabaab
North Korea
Security Council resolution in June
extracted plutonium is being weaponized."
the first Italian-American on the high court, and the rhetorical battles he has waged on the court and off.
at the first Italian-American on the high court, and the rhetorical battles he has waged on the court and off.
a book that would demystify him,
a native New Yorker who loves opera].
to address the misdemeanor charge
sale of a marine mammal product for an unauthorized purpose.
"ignored its responsibilities" to endangered species.
French club Perpignan.
the incoming president
thousands
There had been a "handful" of domestic disturbance calls to police since 2000 involving the
33-year-old
positive contribution to British life.
led the team of scientists that created the first mammal produced through genetic cloning in 1996.
Prof.
Australian pop star Kylie Minogue and the professor
from Queen Elizabeth II in her annual New Year Honors list.
Australian pop star Kylie Minogue and the professor
people who are thought to have made a positive contribution to British life.
Daytona Beach, Florida,
Friday and will end Sunday.
2003
South Korea will open its market to most U.S. beef, a senior
deal to revive beef imports
that his client never intended to kill anyone,
Dr. William Petit
local clinic near Amstetten
it would be impossible for the four held prisoner underground to lead normal
at a local clinic near Amstetten
captive for more than two decades,
Johnny
started firing,
Stanley W. Cooper
security officer Stanley W. Cooper
125
9 p.m. ET/PT November 27
p.m. ET/PT November 27
on Thanksgiving
Viewers were asked to select the
"The Farrah Fawcett poster
"The Farrah Fawcett poster really is one of the last iconic pinup images of the 20th century,"
actress
CGI,
Annecy is the Cannes of animation.
Geneva,
Annecy
CGI,
French, German,
"They should be grateful for good jobs
Transport Workers Union leaders
Transport Workers Union leaders
93
hijacked jet
governments
become an ideal destination for eco-conscious
Antalya
will disembark at an undisclosed port,
use extreme caution because of the recent pirate attacks.
Dubai
Somali
Brazilian squad
Fabio Capello's England
Dunga
passenger rail tunnel
The Department of Transportation
Department of Transportation
harmful effects of climate change on ecosystems.
various diseases
generations of scientists over a 50-year period at multiple sites in Oregon, Washington, California, Arizona, Colorado, New Mexico and southwestern British Columbia.
multiple sites in Oregon, Washington, California, Arizona, Colorado, New Mexico and southwestern British Columbia.
they enjoy the luxury of a free
Since 1919, Davidson has been operating a laundry facility
computers
Davidson college students
students' parents to join the Birthday Club.
Inner Gardens
5 a.m.
Shinto Meiji-jingu
Roppongi Hills Mori Tower
Former world number
Speckles the star-nosed mole
Speckles the star-nosed mole
that Academy Awards are "not as important as children and making them happy."
acting
U.S. soldier
Army Pvt. John Bennett
murders and other crimes in the Fayetteville,
"We built something extraordinary together. We
offer comments on their website.
"We walk away with a great sense of gratitude, of finality, and of astonishment at all we have accomplished. To anyone who ever felt touched by our music, our deepest thanks for listening."
three decades
Rev. Alberto Cutie
Rev. Alberto Cutie
has not been publicly identified,
They have "both struggled"
Miami Beach, Florida,
two-year affair.
of Flight AF 447, which included 61 people from France, 58 Brazilians, 26 Germans and people from 29 other countries, took place Wednesday at the Notre Dame Cathedral in Paris.
three days of mourning.
A memorial for the victims
"Until the aircraft is identified, and the remains indicate that survival is technically impossible, we will maintain the possibility that there could be survivors,"
Joey Chestnut
Joey Chestnut
dropped 100 million
Tung Desem Waringin's
because of their size, immature judgment and lack of experience with traffic
nearly 5,000
size, immature judgment and lack of experience with traffic
slow down, especially in school zones
Children
an immigration worker
Alabama,
Tammy Renee Silas,
walk through grass. He
the demand for one-of-a-kind kicks.
Big Boi:
200
at least 400
one-of-a-kind kicks.
sexual impropriety.
sexual impropriety.
militants.
areas of the Lower Dir
had been at the center of fierce
Taliban
Sufi Muhammad
aircraft parts
old aircraft parts
"Saturday Night Live."
her favorite pastime,
swimming pool
Rolling Stones
home in Cotchford Farm, East Sussex
Airways Capt. Chesley "Sully" Sullenberger and First Officer Jeffrey Skiles
It was like coming home,"
Four
coming home,"
removed both her breasts,
Rancic,
"We prayed on our own, but now we prayed together and you'll never know how much that means until you do it. Bill and I have changed our lives in that one way."
response to the HIV/AIDS fight has been widely praised and adopted as a model around the world.
patients are presenting with complications of chronic HIV and AIDS, which requires
state of emergency Sunday afternoon.
91 people died
a Category 2 hurricane,
South Dakota.
will be issued
The band
Ike and Min
Washington
Obama's
she moved with them into the White House,
when Truman fired Gen. Douglas MacArthur for insubordination,
pictures with some of the grandchildren.
deport him
Immigration and Customs Enforcement plans to deport him and his family
should spur U.S. diplomacy to prevent Iran from developing nuclear weapons
Iran's Green Movement of protesters
military strike
Palestinians being resettled
in refugee camps along the Iraqi-Syrian border,
Guatemalan families who are in dire need.
to get food to the thousands of Guatemalan families who are in dire need.
Guatemala
Army Cpl. Nathan Hubbard,
Friday
In 2004
last week
Iraq
failing in his appeal against a two-week ban.
More than 1.2 million
international footballer
during a friendly against Lebanon
his federal trial.
Anthony Pellicano
war crimes suspect
war crimes
consider their claims that he is too ill and frail to be sent overseas.
asked the high court to consider their claims that he is too ill and frail to be sent overseas.
accessory to 29,000 murders in a Nazi death camp.
Demjanjuk's lawyers
Birnbaum had been fired.
federal inspectors overseeing oil drilling in the Gulf of Mexico accepted meals and tickets to sporting events from companies they monitored.
across the Rio Grande from El Paso, Texas.
are expected to depart Friday.
the violence in Mexico has increased in large part to competing drug cartels.
has increased
a portfolio of Facebook applications,
in the seven figures.
The 26-year-old, a former Microsoft employee who helped put together the Windows Home Server product, founded a company called Esgut within months of the debut of Facebook's developer platform in May 2007. Esgut is a portfolio of Facebook applications, and a few of them, like Superlatives and Entourage, became genuine
six Democratic candidates
The Democratic participants
Thursday
six Democratic candidates
Furthering stereotypes can strengthen the rifts between rural, urban and suburban residents and, in the worst-case scenario, can affect the way some people are treated by government and industry, he said.
"People of Walmart"
photos taken by users at the mega-chain.
"People of Walmart"
goes out of its way to mock poor and rural patrons of the store, reinforcing stereotypes along the way.
photos taken by users at the mega-chain.
Arizona
4,000
About 4,000 Americans, mostly from the Marines, and 650 Afghan soldiers and police
Taliban
Helmand
"The X Factor,"
Nur Hassan Hussein,
accept his dismissal.
Abdullahi Yusuf Ahmed
March
at his home in Alaska.
marine biologist
son had committed suicide
his home in Alaska.
won Austria's second gold medal at the Vancouver Games
Korea's Lee Jung-Su
Lee Jung-Su
Luis Miguel Gonzalez,
Heavy fighting
Nearly 26,000
Khamenei overruled President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad's acceptance of the resignation of the country's intelligence minister.
Ayatollah Khamenei,
Heydar Moslehi
up to 10 years in prison.
certificates and certificates signed by doctors stating
Australia's Medi Bioactive
fully solar-powered boat
a round-the-world challenge.
two weeks.
Raphael Domjan,
14 knots (26k/m)
arrested if
The Organization of American States suspended Honduras
June 28
a pallet and crate
6,000
Muslim north of Sudan
40 lashes
the punishment for the player
Alcohol
an unforgettable adventure
uphill walking.
your itinerary, but also your body.
44 percent in 2008 compared to 2007,
offers work, teaching and volunteer programs to students and graduates in the U.S. and abroad.
Americans over 50
hazard may occur due to re-entry of satellite debris into the earth's atmosphere."
meteor-like object
at least one fireball in the sky
There were no reports of ground strikes or interference with aircraft in flight,
Austin, Texas,
CNN
The dirty little secret of American government
a war on poverty, a war on crime.
carbon emissions
customers
could result in "fragrances of fries drifting under Mona Lisa's nose".
Carrousel du Louvre,
McDonald's
after a month of excavation
Lembah Bujang
evidence of an iron industry
last month
"I love ORU
John Swails, Tim Brooker and Paulita Brooker
misconduct.
stepped down Friday,
he ran to see if he could help after he heard shots being fired.
empty 30-round
there was no indication of terrorism.
Colom, the president's wife and a top aide would be responsible if something happened to the
in the Irish capital.
a space for aspiring entrepreneurs to brainstorm with like-minded people.
Facebook and Google,
Dogpatch Labs
Tokyo's Narita airport in Japan,
spending time relaxing
enjoys spending time relaxing
157 ft (47.8m)
157 ft (47.8m)
taken the lead role in the investigation
flew an airplane into a building housing an Internal Revenue Service
several seats
Baby boomers,
leave
leave the work force
an entire generation of workers might leave the work force in the coming years.
explore new avenues.
her home
More than 11 inches
icy cold
Newark-Liberty International Airport in New Jersey
Martin University
L.P., a global communications company
The mayor,
independent
The mayor,
helping New York City recover economically after the terror attacks on September 11, 2001,
Cannavaro
heart of a Palestinian neighborhood in East Jerusalem.
U.S. President Barack Obama and Netanyahu
President Barack Obama and Netanyahu
final approval for a controversial Israeli housing project
two
two
Monday morning
two
drought, poaching
Japan and Uzbekistan
Saudi Arabia
Iraq,
the airport,
Baghdad International Airport
as Iraq's trade minister under allegations of corruption.
"Helping Hand Books."
any of the discussions that occurred.
"Helping Hand Books."
Abraham Shakespeare,
Moore befriended Shakespeare after he won a $31 million Florida lottery prize in 2006 and was named a person of interest in the case after Shakespeare went missing,
bank
know the local market conditions where you're buying. Go after the properties that are REOs for 45 days or longer. Lenders are usually unrealistic about the pricing of properties on their books for about the first 6 weeks.
property.
tinderbox
police officer who died after
Orissa.
bludgeoning Modesta Navarro Nieves and her husband at their home in the mountainous Guadalupe del Cobre community in April 1998,
it's grueling.
A wedding!
Katherine Heigl
Katherine Heigl
Katherine Heigl
has every reason to smile
how mottled the tan will be when (or if) the lotion
In Style's first ever triple-cover girl.
at Fox.
Katherine Heigl
Incest:
in a cellar for decades and fathering her seven children, testified against him by video at his trial Tuesday.
Elisabeth Fritzl's
in a cellar for decades and fathering her seven children,
I could see I can do whatever I want,"
that you can be whatever you want,"
Obama is "the best thing since running water."
that Obama will deliver on his promise to change the nation's course.
hip-hop
Cuban-American
rapper
Pitbull
Pitbull.
Armando Christian Perez,
Pitbull
98 milligrams of tetrodotoxin
in puffer fish
possession of a potentially deadly neurotoxin
tetrodotoxin delivered by an undercover federal official at his home, the FBI said.
the number of lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender (LGBT) characters on scripted programs
showed his support among likely Republican Iowa caucus-goers has fallen to 8%, down from 23% in October.
sexual harassment and an Atlanta woman's claim that they carried on a 13-year affair.
the weight of the allegations
Werder Bremen hammered his side 5-2
Germany
between Yemen and Somalia.
Gulf of Aden,
crew saw the men throwing objects overboard before they picked up the
six suspected pirates.
of suspected pirates
but soon released
shake hands or kiss, and stay away from crowded places.
H1N1 swine flu.
3-2
Moscow.
Didier Drogba
defending champions Barcelona
at least 20 people
around 10 p.m.,
said that Capt. Richard Phillips and three other sailors were on the bridge when
Matt Fisher
engine and steering areas.
tells a gripping tale of sailors
reform health care
Gergen
Political Analyst David Gergen,
David Gergen,
Like Obama, Clinton came into office with reforming the nation's health care system as one of his top priorities.
Republicans want to make sure the massive economic stimulus plan is used wisely.
to provide meaningful tax relief directly to middle-class taxpayers and the small businesses that they operate or work for.
The GOP
Republicans want to make sure the massive economic stimulus plan is used wisely.
was correct to point out recently that no one party has a monopoly over sound
Sunday in connection with a string of deliberately
multiple pieces of
call to a tip hot
admitted to playing with matches, and accidentally starting the
The boy,
and age were not given,
A boy
a vicious attack on
Nash lost
2001, he won
Lula da Silva
The soldiers
string of bombings
three
bomb
a contagious facial cancer
facial cancer
Australian state of Tasmania,
Dov Charney, founder and CEO of American Apparel,
dressed as a Hasidic Jew
American Apparel.
scheduled to be executed
Have you struggled to sleep at night with the idea that any one of those might have been innocent?
executions carried out during Rick Perry's tenure as Texas's governor
business at the box office.
in the Nazis' Mauthausen, Ebensee and Auschwitz
looking for "a man and a woman" in connection with the homicide.
Felix
Upper East Side
its assault
the recession
15 percent more U.S. applications
the recession
100 percent
between March 30 and June 2008
Open Skies,
June,
European and U.S. airlines
flow of gas to Israel and Jordan,
natural gas
flow of gas to Israel and Jordan,
financial help from state agencies,
the stress of financial demands
financial demands when they're
The unexpected demands of caring for grandchildren full time
to take good care of themselves. Find time to exercise and eat a healthy diet.
dismissed the Dalai Lama's claim
"We have really urged the
"There is ample fact and we also have plenty of evidence proving that this incident was organized, premeditated, masterminded and incited by the Dalai clique,"
ClimateCare,
The aviation
ClimateCare, one of Europe's most experienced providers of carbon offsets,
Hong Kong and Taiwan
of US $11,068,193 (HK $85,780,000) was by a private Shanghai businessman.
Sotheby's auction in Hong Kong.
carved panels, curved legs and an elaborate "Five Dragon" carving on the front and back.
Book of Genesis.
The voyage of Apollo 8
the moon
December 21-27, 1968,
from December 21-27, 1968,
8
house on New York's Madison Avenue,
"several options"
$100 million of additional aid
Haiti
Iran
a terrorist
between 15 and 20 people,
Thursday.
help replenish the endangered species' numbers.
China
Abu Hamza
an app
the app
felt blood streaming from his head
McCain
Texas, Ohio, Vermont and Rhode Island,
Sen. Hillary Clinton
Texas, Ohio
the stories that come out about us fighting
Sunset Marquis
"measures taken since the end of the Second World War have compensated for the damage."
77,000
Nazi Germany
city of Bordeaux.
there's more than 100 billion barrels of untouched oil and gas in this country
2 to 3 million barrels more a day in this country,
a boost in U.S. production would startle the world market.
her way of life is being threatened by the Taliban.
Pakistan.
several hundred protesters gathered
carved panels, curved legs and an elaborate "Five Dragon" carving on the front and back.
Emperor Qianlong,
zitan wood
Uruguay and El Salvador
Uruguay and
several miles from the Massachusetts shore in the iconic waters of Nantucket Sound.
Cape
abiding by China's domestic laws.
allow open reporting and unfettered access to information,
Amnesty International
85
hospital in Kabul, Afghanistan,
deliver four months worth of food
drought and armed conflict,
is facing life-threatening food and water shortages
high inflation on food and fuel
in central and south Somalia
15 miles east of Cancun, Mexico, in the Caribbean
33-year-old Jennifer Feitz,
was aiding the search
$500 million,
Jackson
Jackson
learning tools in
Carl Azuz.
MP3 players
NOKIA's 5300 Music Express
A college professor has found a way for his students to listen to his lectures even when they're not in the classroom.
The girl's family
cheerleading
a cheerleader couldn't sue her teammate.
a camera
possible security
a camera
years to the station's life after the space shuttle fleet is retired next year,
2:28 p.m. ET
generic counterparts.
sales were up almost 10 percent quarter-over-quarter,
Sen. John McCain
4 primary
Texas.
fire
in central and southern California
central and southern California
central and southern California
Wednesday afternoon.
burning through the Angeles National Forest-La Canada Flintridge.
But these interesting theoretical potentialities exist mainly on the blackboard. In real life,
the British Medical
referenced by a medical researcher in the BMJ
the condition known as "cello scrotum"
by a medical researcher in the BMJ late last year.
Halle Berry, Sharon Stone, Madonna, Jennifer Lopez, Gwyneth Paltrow, Beyoncè Knowles, Charlize Theron
children's line, knitwear, accessories, eyewear, watches, perfumes, underwear
wild animal prints
Victoria Beckham.
colorful creations
ripped through the highway and drained into the Wisconsin River
the day before.
"waterpark capital of the world,"
between Independence Day and mid-August,
this week,
Democracy,
democratic leaders, and instead engage them in a genuine dialogue."
ten Burmese pro-democracy activists
Military
to meet with senior leaders of the National League
Applied Behavior Analysis.
lose their diagnosis of
about $35,000,
Kansas Gov. Kathleen Sebelius
India's
Nano,
Twitter,
they hope
NBA talks,
three years in prison and
the most serious charges against him.
networking and making industry contacts through public relations and
interviewing guests to moderating panels to providing commentary for occasions such as parades
serve as advocates
serve as advocates for professional organizations or individuals
Social Columnists
Radio/TV Announcers
Officials at the Panamanian embassy in Washington
"At first, he (my husband) thought it was a lunatic ninja," said Ettlin's wife, Verity Beman. "It leaped through the window, this martial-arts kind of figure. It was very Jackie Chan."
crashed through a window.
a window,
a headlock,
a loaded, holstered handgun
a shot and a scream,
went upstairs and shot himself,
Pig
on Sunday
farmers
was at 38 percent containment
anniversary of the 1979 Islamic Revolution,
the beating
Great Barrier
15 nautical
up to three years in prison and a fine of A$220,000 (U.S. $203,411).
Lahore
bombings in Lahore and Peshawar,
about 2.4 million
when novelist and convert to Islam,
punk
San Francisco to New York
in the past few
the family's holiday villa at the Portuguese beach resort of Praia da Luz
Thursday.
was said in the conversation but the clues have led police to try to find the woman.
Portuguese water
are "active athletes," far from couch potatoes,
Portuguese water dogs
a thorough understanding of the dogs' needs,
Rochester, New York,
Myrtle Beach, South Carolina,
Saturday evening,
Brittanee Marie Drexel,
17-year-old Rochester, New York, high school student
more than 125 "interface languages"
Hawaiian language.
language.
Keola Donaghy,
tips in the Hawaiian language.
Singapore
because the 87-year-old might be having "complications,"
An explosion
in front of the coffeehouse,
an explosion in a Manhattan Upper East Side neighborhood.
blew out
examine surveillance cameras for information that could lead investigators
explosion blew out the windows
proposed Islamic center near ground zero
chaotic land reform program
soared
rising food prices are a world phenomenon because of the use of bio-fuel,"
its safety protocols to provide the safest environment for its trainers.
killer whale
killer whale
"We can provide resources, but there must be ownership by the Haitians themselves and especially by the Haitian authorities,"
7-year-old.
minibus
killing two passengers
and 'The Lion King,'
included 'The Little Mermaid,' 'Beauty and the Beast,' 'Aladdin'
the Disney entertainment business
Boston Symphony Orchestra
other cultures and prejudices.
Richard Barboza,
said a paramedic from its ski patrol "arrived on the scene within minutes" after Richardson, 45, fell during a lesson on a beginners' trail.
Paramedics dispatched to help Richardson
Natasha Richardson died of injuries caused by blunt impact to the head,
Richardson,
died of injuries caused by blunt impact to the head,
more than 700
construction equipment
in their offices
Caterpillar
Nicolas Polutnik,
four anonymous former Clinton aides
suggested that Bill Clinton's personality had changed since his 2004 heart bypass surgery and said that there were reports of Clinton "seeing a lot of women on the road."
"President Clinton was understandably upset about an outrageously unfair article, but the language today was inappropriate and he wishes he had not used it."
an intervention" about the reports of philandering.
Chile,
"historic debt."
Teachers and doctors
better salaries, but also improvements to the public health system.
"historic debt."
Julian Epstein, a Democratic strategist,
the recession shows signs of ending,
economists
President Obama
overhauling health care is a key part of economic recovery.
1979,
badly wounded his father's girlfriend, who with young Norman was tossed violently onto the top of an 8,600-foot mountain
life-or-death descent
the Storm: A Memoir of Survival."
more than a plane crash, namely his relationship with an adrenaline-junkie father who basked in the wild life of Malibu in the 1970s and relentlessly pushed his "Boy Wonder" to excel from the ski slopes of northern California to the crashing surf off the Mexican coast.
in the Middle East
"are crap at drums."
Middle East
concern and dismay as the Obama
Liz Cheney formed Keep America Safe with William Kristol and Debra Burlingame.
is to focus media attention on continuing and emerging national security threats, and marshal grassroots opposition to the president's policies.
Sandra Andersen
kidneys were failing rapidly and no one in
Ausnes
barista:
a kidney.
just over £38 ($58) a week.
that the British government had not breached their
just over £38 ($58) a week.
"Whatever they thought they were doing, whether it was a 1970s-style student sit-in, the results of it were very
Americans,
not convinced by the comparison.
hostage crisis
Cook County,
The World Health Organization has counted 14,557 cases of H1N1 -- 96 of them
11 U.S. deaths
the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001,
after the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001,
Iraqi
"So our plan is to draw down the troops as we've said we're going [to] do."
schedule of troop withdrawal,
August,
Friday,
Two
The military
has not yet been determined,
in bushes along a quarter-mile stretch of Ocean Parkway in Oak Beach.
along a remote stretch of Long Island beach was
two men.
Friday,
Sandra Cantu
playing for AC Milan in a 1-1 draw with Liverno on Wednesday night
two-hour operation
left knee
injured left knee
a decade ago,
Janine Benyus
2007,
the apostle St. Paul
"traces of a precious linen cloth, purple in color and laminated with pure gold, and a blue colored textile with linen filaments,"
Scientific tests
the tomb of St. Paul
Sri Lanka
Sri Lankan Air Force,
rebels
both planes were shot down by the Sri Lankan Air Force,
October,
the hackers never really did much with the botnet that they created. So they created an army of lots and lots of computers
to create the same kind of wedding infrastructure available in Connecticut, Massachusetts and Vermont.
same-sex couples
create the same kind of wedding infrastructure available in Connecticut,
surge in gays and lesbians traveling to New England to tie the knot.
in same-sex couples traveling to New England to tie the knot.
Hamilton
League clubs
Litigation known as the Pigford Case established a longstanding pattern of discrimination at the U.S. Agriculture Department against African-American farmers who had applied for farm loans and support from federal programs.
racial bias case
racial bias case
there is a "total commitment" from President Obama and the majority party in the House and Senate to make sure the settlement is taken care of.
Portugal's
along the drive to the medieval fortress town of Lagos.
rugged Moorish
A rugged Moorish
The Algarve, southern
rugged Moorish castle
past five years,
between two fences
Saturday
U.S. border officers
the U.S.-Mexican border
Taliban
Swat Valley,
Islamabad
Buner
one of Pakistan's premier tourist destinations,
interfere with technology, causing power blackouts and disrupting air traffic communications and cell phone networks.
wreak havoc on our planet.
new data provided by twin spacecraft analyzing the sun
coronal mass
their structure, velocity, mass and direction.
how so-called solar tsunamis wreak havoc on our planet.
The United Nations
Kalma camp,
Dr. Stephen P. Leatherman,
Sarasota, Florida's, Siesta Beach
giant Russian Nikolai Valuev in Zurich, Switzerland on Saturday.
whether to return to the ring
Nikolai Valuev
Chinese and international laws
they said was harassment by Chinese ships earlier this month,
Anthony and Lisa Leoni are afraid of
12-year-old Jessica
"self-representing
at a hearing
responsibility for the worst massacre in Europe since World War II,
a hearing to discuss his refusal to appear for trial.
of responsibility for the worst massacre in Europe since World War II,
The trial began without his presence on October 26, more than a
individuals in same-sex relationships to hold clergy positions.
people to serve as members of professional rosters only if they were celibate.
celibate.
allows gay and lesbian clergy, lay people to serve only if celibate.
Chrysler
O'Bryhim cannot legally sell any new cars he has left after June 9
"Millions,"
June 9.
"Our 13-month-old daughter took her first steps
Upright Citizens Brigade Theatre.
additional million
Philippines Sen. Antonio Trillanes
surrendered to government forces after taking over a luxury hotel in Manila.
tear-gassing.
issued a health advisory Monday, saying two lots of a generic version of the drug had tested positive for endotoxin, a contaminant.
of the drug had tested positive for endotoxin,
rebels
The violence in Darfur
Darfur,
the death penalty
old, and Anthony "stood in a position of familial or custodial authority over her,"
Caylee's death occurred during aggravated child abuse, was especially "heinous, atrocious, or cruel," and was committed in a "cold, calculated and premeditated manner without any pretense of moral or legal justification,"
vacant lot near her grandparents' home in Orlando.
only one of 15 possible aggravating factors
was especially "heinous, atrocious, or cruel," and was committed in a "cold, calculated and premeditated manner without any pretense of moral or legal justification,"
hospital ward in northwest Pakistan,
Shaista
a mortar shell
hospital ward in northwest Pakistan,
in Vietnam,
38,
outside the building
Mark Todd was one of two civilian police sergeants credited with helping take down
Sachin Tendulkar.
514
Sanath Jayasuriya's life.
Jayasuriya
UN Goodwill Ambassador.
association with the game and humanitarian work has also helped transform the lives of many others.
an earthquake and tsunami
electricity,
to California to face trial.
former professional football player and his ex-girlfriend
shooting of Bill McLaughlin,
a year ahead of schedule,
a year ahead of schedule,
million visitors by the end of 2011
opinions
family of fallen hero Lance Cpl.
answer the call to defend freedom
Eighty-six
Navy Aegis-class ships to protect against incoming short- to medium-range
The exercise was the 19th successful test in 23
19th
Aegis Ballistic Missile Defense Program.
has become a tidal wave of cost-efficient
bottomless pit of venues where preeners are prized commodities and abnormal behavior is not only encouraged but intrinsic to the common goal.
out of the "Entertainment Tonight" spotlight for a day or two.
abnormal behavior
Its inhabitants increasingly are called on to step up the pace in pursuit of myriad available slots on networks large, small and sometimes desperate.
of South Florida
No one was hurt,
Obama
pledged delegate
Hillary Clinton's
Pakistan
demonstrators set fire to houses in a Christian enclave
50
the threat of home-grown radicals inspired and recruited by al Qaeda.
threat of home-grown radicals
home-grown terrorism,
internment camps in places like Cyprus.
more than 100,000
Yitzhak Rabin,
weather patterns
Nancy Allen.
Dutch Harbor.
pollock fishing
Bering
the wooden cart pushed by Acevedo
honor the 350 soldiers
recognize 350 American soldiers
350 American
lawmakers have urged U.S. Army Secretary Peter Geren to recognize 350 American soldiers
the Nazis picked those soldiers who looked Jewish,
anecdotes
Cupertino, California,
in the head
six
three
Tyler Peterson, a sheriff's deputy,
I do think it's a little harder for the
Adam Lambert
Former 'American Idol' runner-up Diana
Adam Lambert
three months
young actress
developing your own unique personal
Rachel Zoe,
Agent 99
Congress to act
Congressional Black Caucus
Congressional Black Caucus to support
Both presidential candidates
just across the California border
southern tip of Nevada,
2006.
Maureen Fields,
a prison system run
system run like the mafia.
he feels he has cleaned up the corruption. It's time, he said, "to turn this over to law and order people that have made this their life's goal."
5-month-old Zack
high-powered rifle
man shot and killed his wife and two of their children and then killed himself in central
shootings
Lakeland, Florida, just east of Tampa.
Troy Ryan Bellar shot and killed his wife, Wendy, and two of their children,
Spring 2012.
The Royal Resort's hidden restaurant,
next spring,
and Nazak Afshar
Reiss can return home,
a French academic
70 percent
its fees
Zirkilbach
DocTalker Family Medicine in Vienna,
Being with her family,
to say is just thank you,
really overwhelmed
2011,
NATO send reinforcements to the volatile Kandahar province.
Neverland Ranch
Michael Jackson,
his "Wacko Jacko" persona,
that you don't care -- nor do we. So I'm not going to pretend that we're even going to contemplate saving you," replied Cowell.
new doors to her future.
its operations got off to a good start
was able to operate flights as normal at two London airports,
was enough to operate its planned schedule.
Calling the rationale "flawed,"
should be expelled
female genital mutilation.
"My dream was to go for the fifth anniversary, and that didn't come true,"
private security firm
"We grieve today for the loss of our colleagues and we pray for their families."
Iraq
Washington state,
Joe Kennard, a land developer and Christian philanthropist.
Iraq, the economy
in Texas
March 4.
March 4.
Vermont and Rhode Island also hold primaries that day.
Bill Schneider.
John Madden has had a great perk: seeing America on his own bus.
his own bus.
John Madden
marching from Iranian diplomatic offices to the Russian embassy,
Russian President Dmitry Medvedev
Washington
"We're hoping that the world attention does not end from
Stefan GP team,
Serbian-backed Stefan GP team,
Serbian-backed Stefan GP team,
Sport's governing body, the FIA,
scenes of nudity
If these are public airwaves, the government is entitled to insist upon a certain modicum of decency."
to find ways to measure the progression of Alzheimer's and the precursor condition known as mild cognitive impairment.
at least 130 people
feared going back to prison and losing the life he had built,
feared going back to prison
campaign.
get tested
African kingdom of Swaziland
get tested together
they will give back Leno the 'Tonight Show,' leave it on at 11:35 p.m., and Conan will move to Fox,"
"Deep Throat"
Woodward and Carl Bernstein
died Thursday at his California home after a life in the shadows.
a missile strike from a suspected U.S. drone
government
over missile attacks
three
missile strike
terror cases
unionization of TSA employees.
is no stranger to
Republican Sen. Jim DeMint of
memory of her name or family.
memory loss,
CNN viewer in Maryland
pleaded not guilty by reason of insanity
remains of six women
Nil'in and Bil'in,
"closed military zone orders are not meant to deal with demonstrations,
between the hours of 8 a.m. and 8 p.m. every Friday
military order is illegal
which her voice cracks heartbreakingly over the lines "From scratch begin again, but this time, I as I/And not as we."
Weezer
1,100
1,154
GlaxoSmithKline
swine flu
GlaxoSmithKline
Sen. Hillary Clinton
Sen. Hillary Clinton
Hillary Clinton
believes the world will end in May.
Members of a Russian doomsday cult
29 cult members
the end of the world
Members of a Russian doomsday cult
the "don't ask, don't tell" policy
December 22, 2010,
children's father had other legal options.
children's father
Fukuoka,
Heene
fame
6-year-old might have been trapped in the drifting balloon
6-year-old might have been trapped in the drifting balloon
The lawyer of a Colorado father accused of carrying out a bizarre hoax
fame
next week.
the past decade,
Jim Gemmell,
our entire life histories
"Total Recall,"
5-0
The Space Needle
"Rain City,"
rugged green wilderness;
at Star City, the Russian cosmonaut training facility.
Senior International Correspondent Matthew Chance
Matthew Chance
the Arctic north of Murmansk down to the southern climes of Sochi
week
"We question the judgment of anyone who relies upon and [reiterates] anonymous declarations."
retaliatory "violence,"
Tuesday, saying it would respond "to the anonymous unsubstantiated and offensive assertions put forward by the plaintiffs," in a brief to be filed August 17.
a share in the royalties
the seminal 1960s song "A Whiter Shade of Pale"
in 2008,
Take in the scenery when it's cold
Christmas carnivals
South Africa.
retired Adm. Dennis Blair as director
to announce his resignation sooner
Adm. Dennis Blair
left the post Tuesday after nearly two years on the job.
chief of intelligence.
retired admiral
authority to prevent any release of the 44 photos.
physical abuse and denial of rights guaranteed under international law.
he was issuing an order to block the release.
Supreme Court to dismiss a lower court ruling
A candidate for the United Kingdom Independence Party (UKIP) was injured
Ahmadinejad
daily protests
across Iran's rural areas and among the Basij militia.
a disputed presidential election
Wednesday
U.N. summit
In a bid to offset the considerable carbon dioxide emissions
Ethiopia, Djibouti, Kenya, Eritrea, Ghana, Sudan and Uganda.
Al-Shabab,
Israel
Somalia.
"an entire nation homeless under the pretext of Jewish suffering
Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
1995,
electrical
Sardar Zulfiqar Muhammad Khosa,
Sardar Zulfiqar Muhammad Khosa,
access all content
Fancast XFINITY TV
$37,500
an anonymous bidder
Lee Friedlander
an anonymous bidder
crashed into the Hudson River.
the Hudson River.
"soft-body impact damage"
All 155 crew members and passengers
a flock of birds.
Motorcycles,
Jaipur.
wounded 150 others in a top tourist spot,
the Guinness World
Serino,
entry into the Guinness World
nation's second-largest city,
1985.
look at search trends for the year.
Rebecca
donate handcrafted bowls.
Money raised is donated to organizations
Grauman's concrete courtyard on Hollywood Boulevard
Barack Obama's inauguration
Barack Obama's inauguration as U.S. President.
"We're a nation of Christians and Muslims, Jews and Hindus -- and non-believers,"
the powerful symbolism and unifying power of the arrival of an African-American
Barack Obama's
Barack Obama's
Barack Obama's inauguration as U.S. President.
sound from the main PA system
the smell of burning animals was making him sick,
McCain's aircraft
Gov. Kathleen Sebelius
Gov. Kathleen Sebelius'
frilled-neck lizards
human impact on the
Invasive species,
a loss of biodiversity,
snow
pornography, solicitation of a minor and related counts,
soliciting someone he believed was a girl.
someone he believed was a girl.
tried to meet with a person he thought was a 14-year-old girl
pump "tens of millions" of dollars into the luxury car brand
"devastated by the situation,"
to change course
Alfred Liggins.
"You lie!"
his outburst toward President Obama.
the site disabled edit options for Wilson's entry,
"He is a [expletive] that called the president of the United States a liar on national television
"He was not part of a larger conspiracy emanating from abroad."
possession of a bomb for terrorism, conspiracy as a crime of terrorism, soliciting support
2009
two weeks
large barbecue fork
large barbecue fork lodged in his head for days,
large barbecue fork
two days,
Chihuahua
up to 210
more than $220,000 in claims related to Hurricane Katrina, authorities said.
Gregory Brent Warr and Laura Jean Warr
"We went with a pre-determined mind to lose the match against Australia,"
to knock traditional rivals India out of the limited-overs tournament
deliberately losing two games at the Champions Trophy
more than 200,000 people,
"Hey Bush, you can't hide!
"Hey Bush, you can't hide! Help us end this genocide!" and "President Bush! No more excuses!"
of ethnic cleansing in Sudan.
two
in the ocean off Darwin
Australian pilot
Australian media
155
to try to prevent his extradition
breaking the law and intentionally gaining unauthorized access to computer systems,
carrying out the biggest ever U.S. military hacking operation.
there was sufficient evidence
Charleston, South Carolina,
to be fit for this year's second grand slam tournament,
this year's second grand slam tournament,
about 50
21
to fill the Chesapeake Bay 21 times.
Greenland, Antarctica and Alaska
Greenland, Antarctica and Alaska
Greenland, Antarctica and Alaska
1.5 trillion and 2 trillion tons of
the annual pilgrimage that every able-bodied Muslim is expected to perform at least once in his or her life.
five-day
happy Eid al-Adha to Muslims worldwide
"We have to help each other and help especially the young generation progress and not make the same mistakes we did,"
research that found that oncogenic human papilloma virus, or HPV, causes cervical
X-ray
1980s
it is not the
George W. Bush
the legislation
Democrats
rural doctors and hospitals.
took a military plane to Haiti
his two-day mission.
28 million young people
28 million young people
"We condemn and denounce the criminal act by the American soldier in Radhwaniya in tearing the Holy Quran and using it as a shooting target."
"We condemn and denounce the criminal act by the American soldier in Radhwaniya in tearing the Holy Quran and using it as a shooting target."
"every individual flying into the U.S. from anywhere in the world traveling from or through
focus on actual criminal behavior
Transportation Security Administration
the Obama administration's stated commitment to civil rights, equality before the law, and a much-needed effort to rebuild U.S.-Muslim world relations since the disastrous presidency of George W. Bush.
in Berlin will shut it doors for good on Friday.
in Berlin
The giant Tempelhof Airport in Berlin
American and British pilots touched down after the war when Soviet Forces blockaded West Berlin.
home of Lufthansa,
16
food bank.
she was laid off in February,
middle-class families coming to their doors.
$70,000
Rossi
Valentino Rossi's
MUGELLO, Italy
Reese Witherspoon),
"Ginormica,"
XXXL lady
toothless satire with a knee-jerk feminist theme and a sorry excuse for a
Orissa state,
Twenty-three
occurred on a day when India's federal government called upon the state administration to take "effective, focused and firm measures"
the Indian state of Orissa
Murder and rape
Fayetteville,
12
Sandor Ferenci, 28,
12
(130 mph)
Gov. Sarah Palin
Palin
stirs excitement
a polarizing figure in the Republican Party.
"Barracuda" side
$21 million as part of contracts with the Department of Defense,
pleaded guilty to bribery conspiracy and money laundering conspiracy in federal court in Birmingham, Alabama,
fear of flying in icy conditions,
"A stick pusher demonstrated in an aircraft simulator is not required by the FAA,"
into a house outside Buffalo, New York,
one man in the house.
the parents,
the teachers
50 percent of the students
teachers
three security guards and the driver of an American development expert
an American development expert
four men are not considered suspects
a crackdown on alleged al Qaeda hideouts since the attempted bombing of an American airliner in December,
of a crackdown on alleged al Qaeda hideouts
can play an important role in Afghanistan as a reliable NATO ally. The question is: How can
His address in the Turkish parliament was one of the greatest speeches made by an American leader in such a setting:
can possibly make the greatest contribution by helping the United States frame the challenges it is facing in a more accurate and honest way.
pulling Turkey into any kind of engagement with the Taliban -- either as part of NATO or bilaterally
Obama
Sen. Hillary Clinton
Sen. Hillary Clinton and Sen. John McCain,
in Rust's apartment in El Reno,
About 300 people
Redlands Community College
to say,
four children
About 300
Afghan Taliban commander
lack of black artists
Michael Jackson
an industry still informed by stubborn prejudices
the viewers
loved it,
MTV was criticizing
Phil Spector's prison mug shot,
depressed
U.S. Supreme Court justices
2007,
Seventh-ranked Elena Dementieva
The world No. 1
Paris Indoor Open
leg injury.
Heineken
former men's assistant basketball coach Bernie Fine, 65, of touching him inappropriately at least dozens of times when he was a boy.
Syracuse
Syracuse fired Fine on Sunday, less than a month after the
"I just hope that no other kids get abused, and that's the main reason why I came out and said
I don't want this to happen to anybody else,"
Ritz-Carlton Hotel
in south Jakarta,
how Gadhafi's life ended
his death means for Libya's future and the
Bennie Thompson
Rep.
Bennie Thompson
8,600 worldwide.
believe that having their bodies dissected, preserved and displayed
8,600 worldwide.
burial or cremation.
plastination
it is education and enlightenment,"
The partners in his new hotel venture ooze rock credential: Iron Maiden co-managers Rod Smallwood and Andy Taylor.
the chance to forget the mortgage and live like a rock star,
and the mini bar is well-stocked with champagne.
U.S.
ARCO
Hank Sheinkopf.
Her unique experience of writing a book or two, smiling well, appearing from time to time
white ethnics
Gov. David Paterson,
planning processes are urgently needed
planning processes are urgently needed
federal ocean planning.
growing crowded,
a lot of different ways,"
Brisbane, Melbourne and Sydney,
close 600 stores
that hundreds of its American coffee outlets are also being shuttered.
Jason Wu,
who came out to vote in dramatically high numbers,
Obama
governments.
Sanaa,
into the nation's neediest classrooms
4,100
same salary and benefits as beginning
Hillary Clinton
President Clinton
Ghana
the African Nations Cup semifinals
citizens
Oksana Grigorieva and Mel Gibson
Oksana Grigorieva,
"He's an incredible artist,"
the war-wracked and drought-stricken Horn
Africa
Obama campaign
International Cricket Council Champions Trophy.
2007.
John Dyson
2007.
company social events,
Communication is key
"Do a deep dive into your company's programs, policies and even discounts
choose from a variety of benefits
(CareerBuilder.com)
management
floods
invisible to the untrained eye.
H.G. Wells' "The Time Machine"
Chuck Klosterman:
hyperreality,
journalism.
Philip Garrido,
a neighbor's property
eight U.S. soldiers
Obama
15
Americans
hit by roadside bombs
"sobering reminder"
three DEA special agents and 15 U.S. troops
a journeyman printer, a husband and a father to two daughters.
a thinner Kindle with a sharper picture
the next-generation e-book reader
a touch screen or color,
some fiscally conservative
Limits on annual out-of-pocket spending.
surcharges on Americans in the top 1.2 percent of income.
Choices Act,"
the life of New York City women through the lens of where they live.
"Sex and the City"
said each one is based on a common type of person.
seemed more concerned with freeing Kevin Mitnick and seeing strippers than hacking each others' computers.
information about vulnerabilities
Hassan Nasrallah
"We don't want to have control over
neutral party
Hassan Nasrallah
convertible pesos
member of Saddam Hussein's regime
he has helped finance the insurgency against U.S. troops in Iraq with Iraqi funds he transferred to Syria before Hussein's government collapsed in April 2002.
30-minute recorded
verify the authenticity of the voice on the tape.
helped finance the insurgency against
improvised explosive device
a Dutch soldier
a deployment order
died in an improvised explosive device strike,
pilots that the problem could cause the planes navigational system to interpret data "in such a way as to result in a nose-up pitch and loss of airspeed."
"As far as we can tell, there is no way this had any role in the accident,"
New York
a red minivan ran a red light and struck two vehicles at an intersection,
Los Angeles Angels
Nick Adenhart
Fullerton, California,
winter weather system
This week's
An Iranian man and a woman made
June
Failing infrastructure, irregular electricity and erratic
Failing infrastructure, irregular electricity and erratic government policies
China
Kristen,
restrictions enacted by then-President George W. Bush
to travel to Cuba and to send money to family members on the island.
send money to family members on the island.
in the Caribbean
living conditions
with Bioshield
celebrities
reuse and recycle.
laundry line
a recent visit by schoolchildren to the grave,
all organized visits to Saddam Hussein's
Saddam Hussein's political movement.
concern over support
in his hometown of al-Ouja near Tikrit in Salaheddin north of Baghdad.
Cristiano Ronaldo
I can't even say whether it was meat or vegetables
the loaf,
stories and memories of MREs and C rations.
bad behavior led to the split.
it's OK to admit
your ex's
every single text, Tweet, Facebook poke and email
colored dye,
spray
communists,
Solidarity
events in 1980 at a shipyard
investment-friendly, market economy.
India and
at least 25
Army was moving against the militants
violent separatist campaign
their biological father, Nephra Payne,
abducted boys
fled with her seven sons and one daughter from the Queens facility
eight
second
third-placed
second in the table
190th goal in 278 games for Barca.
190th
"I'm teaching an eighth-grade curriculum to fifth-graders,"
eighth-grade
"The higher the expectations, the higher the results,"
Manas Air Base in Kyrgyzstan as a route for troops and supplies into Afghanistan.
The United States
Russia
announced it would assist the U.S. in transporting nonmilitary cargo to Afghanistan,
the bomber
Scottish First Minister Alex Salmond
Topping the YouTube charts
The cute factor
novelty.
searched
surrounding neighborhoods.
the Paralympic world records in the 100, 200, and 400 meters.
in the 100, 200, and 400 meters.
the right to be eligible to compete at this summer's Olympic
double amputee sprinter has won the right to be eligible to compete at this summer's Olympic
that his J-shaped prosthetics qualify as technical aids, which are banned in IAAF-governed
Real Madrid
Riki
Cristiano Ronaldo
in Lagos,
were born in Portugal and they raised us in Canada.
a few Spanish-language music artists,
Afghanistan.
15,000
Kyrgyzstan
Germany-based renewable energy start-up Sunfire,
simply grab carbon dioxide from the air
grab carbon dioxide from the air
carbonated fizzy drinks, computer cooling systems and industrial greenhouses."
flight from Niyala, Sudan, to Khartoum
Libyan authorities in the eastern town of Kufra,
released all 87
5 million pounds, or roughly $8 million.
choreographer for the Miss Universe pageant
Michael Schwandt,
Trump personally selects some of the finalists.
"The story posted on that site contains many misquotes and [is] highly inaccurate,"
suggest the pageant is somehow orchestrated or 'rigged' is utterly false and misleading." However,
Burrill Bernard Crohn,
Alzheimer's
evangelist Tony Alamo on Friday of 10 federal
jailbreak their phones
Gerard Pettine
Monday
Tuesday.
mid-1980s until 1995 and possibly beyond,
sixth
April 6,
100,000
Atlanta, Georgia.
Mike Graczyk
In his early days, he kept count. But he eventually stopped. He didn't
"In one circle, I was perceived as putting notches on my gun belt,"
25-year career,
Mike Graczyk
executions
"evolving standards of decency" forbid capital punishment
Justice Kennedy
child rapists cannot be given
Sudan
Criminal Court is going to indict the president of Sudan for war crimes,
last episode with Susan Sarandon and Julianna Margulies.
critics are wrong to chortle at the defeat of the Chicago Olympic bid.
Chicago
"ER"
Prospect Park,
"All My Children,"
on getting "One Life to Live" back to fans,
entertainment and lifestyle shows.
Tal Raviv
entrepreneurs
Tal Raviv
Levitt's and Katie Shea's
found that drivers who text while on the road are much more likely to have an accident than undistracted drivers.
to ban texting while driving,
Fourteen
We have neglected this issue for too long.
nuclear power
an unidentified bomber sitting in a parked Lada car set off an unidentified explosive device
around midnight
patrolling the town of Kizilyurt in a minivan around midnight
The Richard Nixon Presidential Library
conversations about the Vietnam War, Nixon's second inauguration, the U.S. Supreme Court's Roe v. Wade decision in 1973 and the first Watergate trial,
the Vietnam War, Nixon's second inauguration, the U.S. Supreme Court's Roe v. Wade decision in 1973 and the first Watergate trial,
Eleventh Victim."
seared salmon and petite Angus
lavish series of events
Rep. Barney Frank,
of indoor vehicle pollution.
German scientists
years,
Honda
Staffers
Eight inmates
a payment of more than $400 million made in error to failed U.S. investment bank Lehman Brothers.
as 10,000
it announced earlier this week its decision to keep its European Opel and Vauxhall units and cancel a planned sale to Canadian firm Magna.
after it reported an annual loss of $30.9 billion for 2008.
protest
helium balloon
anthem.
discarded the winning lyrics.
Beijing.
Spaniards
2006,
July 10 and July 11,
In 2006,
Africa, Russia and Italy.
Bourque agreed to talk with authorities, and they checked his blue 2008 Ford Focus,
multiple pieces of evidence
terror groups
terrorist
to enlist to terror activity or to pass classified information in exchange for payment,"
Terrorism groups
Morrow, Georgia.
gamblers,
2003
said. "At every point I made it clear that we would support whatever option the military decided upon with the prime minister and the Cabinet, and there would be no
that we would support whatever option the military decided upon with the prime minister and the Cabinet, and there would be no financial barrier to us doing
People that used to give us
inflation
People that used to give us
inflation
Bali governor,
repeated attacks in Bali and elsewhere
bomb
Bali
Bali governor, Mangku Pastika,
the UK,
to take additional measures to ensure her privacy.
Juli Inkster.
weekend
"most first ladies have always been on a pedestal of expensive, elegant clothing, of couture evening gowns. It's something that people can't really relate to."
CEO of the Impacto Group,
fashion choices have helped create a positive image for the first lady.
always been on a pedestal of expensive, elegant clothing, of couture evening gowns.
"Anthology of a Decade,"
fashion magazines
transforming the male silhouette
at a salvage yard in Kearny, New Jersey.
the body of the aircraft
December 17.
Bishop Jim Moriarty
"Our mandate is to track violent fugitives
darkness and calm of early morning
"Our mandate is to track violent fugitives --
more than 3,000
violent fugitives
U.S. Marshals Service
near the village of Talybont,
severe flooding that has hit England and Wales
bodies do not cause epidemics after natural disasters,
The fear of disease
how balloting should unfold
question of how balloting should unfold in the ethnically diverse, oil-rich province of Kirkuk,
left the session.
who bought "Caylee Sunshine" dolls
fabricating a donation receipt and posting it on the site so visitors could view "the first donation" made to charity.
local animal shelters,
Jaime Salcedo,
Showbiz Promotions
Lance Armstrong
"This is a hopeful thing for testicular cancer survivors,"
launching a comeback
Texan
three children
past, present and future
til the fat lady sings.
There's always flashbacks. There's phantasms. There's all this crazy stuff.
Well I mean, I knew ahead of time that it was coming.
Rapper Snoop Dogg
his dance moves,
Justin Timberlake
10
10
George Hennard drove a pickup truck into Luby's cafeteria
"Violence against civilians is a strategy of war for all the parties involved in the warfare,"
"They're more willing to fight over land that is strategic,"
war
to break the Ramadan fast
Jose Mourinho,
Ghanaian midfielder Sulley Muntari
there are only 23 retired ladies
the cause of the crash was not immediately known.
their obligations under anti-drug
The teen vampire romance
teen vampire romance
"Four Christmases"
$31 million,
with upper-limb abnormalities.
children and teens
year, Dr. Paul Dell and his wife, Ruthie, host Hand
We must unite and do our best."
aggressive charm
growing ties between China and the Middle East,
I think the two economies are complementary.
will compliment each other.
Rizzo.
tactics such as waterboarding, sleep deprivation and slapping
"The absence of trust fuels
mitigated the impact of the spill,"
highly neurotic kid,
Steve Earle
a highly neurotic kid, not particularly happy,
highly neurotic kid, not particularly happy, which probably accounts for all those beautiful songs, those beautiful sad ballads. I found my home there.
Doha-based team
Doha-based
2010
70,000 to 80,000
70,000 to 80,000
6,400
more than 50,000
at an average rate of 6,400 a month,
why he and his party keep rowing back from one of the Democrats' most
Republicans'
may have been stepping on the accelerator, instead of the brake
of involvement in the recruitment of suicide bombers,
suicide bombers,
Tunisians
involvement in the recruitment of suicide bombers,
Iraq and Afghanistan,
Europe
arrests
Lake Tahoe.
Great
war
Soviets,
troops remind Afghan locals of two things about the mission: They are not Soviets and they know how difficult it is to live under foreign occupation.
job training,
Rudolpho Marquez, Richard Reyes and Cesar Cruz
a small program
transitional jobs and helps give other free programs to people who otherwise struggle in the outside world.
it does make it harder for bands to progress their careers,
a chance to experience something a bit more substantial and emotionally satisfying than contemporary acts;
jumped considerably from the first trial, which granted just $220,000
$1.9 million
Turkish PM Recep Tayyip Erdogan
Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan,
Israeli President
take it personally. I
Istanbul,
Turkish
suspicion of possessing drugs,
a suspicious toilet attendant,
LONDON, England
class A and class C drugs.
suspicious toilet attendant,
Italian Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi
six Italian
a mostly residential area near the Supreme Court in Kabul,
it would be "best" for the country's troops to leave Afghanistan
Kabul
called on the major pipeline companies to conduct a review of their oil and gas delivery systems to identify the lines with the highest risk.
a 51-year-old man from the Kansas City, Kansas, area was in custody in connection with the slaying of Tiller, who was one of the few U.S. physicians who still performed late-term abortions.
custody.
in custody in connection with the slaying of
his Wichita church
told an undercover agent he would target the facility,
bomb an office tower in Dallas, Texas,
inert/inactive explosive
"My body worked for me,"
six-time
carry a doctor's note when they travel to the United States.
members said he jumped into the river when he saw a fellow soldier struggling in the water.
two U.S. soldiers
in the Morghab River near Afghanistan's border with Turkmenistan
jumped into the river
African-Americans continue to suffer from extraordinary employment
fell short of calling for real action against racism.
Eric Holder's discussion of race in America
racism.
Eric Holder's speech fell short of calling for real action against racism.
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Poland and Ukraine
Portugal
Some were overwhelmed with the beauty and many were saddened
Uttaranchal.
key sites around the city
understanding the gap between the two exisiting worlds;
combat the pollution of the city's main waterway, the river Yamuna.
the villagers' plight.
Kempty Village in Uttaranchal.
then-Assistant Attorney General Jay Bybee
Retired Army Col. Janis Karpinski
state-run Xinhua agency.
natural gas
argued in their filing that the judge should accept the probation office's recommendation that Bonds be sentenced to two years' probation, fined $4,000 and ordered to perform 250 hours of community service.
obstruction of justice
he has had too little time to prepare,
More than 7,000
Radovan Karadzic intends to skip the start of his war crimes trial
More than 7,000
genocide charges and nine other counts of war crimes and crimes against humanity
war crimes
Mogadishu
violence,
bad conditions at the camps
scarcity of international aid agencies,
40,000
to the war-torn capital city
Pope Benedict XVI
Pope Benedict
on Friday morning
a four-year deal with Standard Chartered Bank.
Standard Chartered Bank.
bank will replace
$133 million.
Standard Chartered Bank.
Standard Chartered Bank.
Democracy "is not about violence,"
"I've made statements that I understand people are angry, but violence and threats are inappropriate and irresponsible,"
"I've made statements that I understand people are angry, but violence and threats are inappropriate and irresponsible,"
he described as the only person with worse ratings than his.
immigration law requiring officers in the state to question people about their immigration status
has retained
"Its systematic. The Taliban move into an area, they use local existing resentments. They often go in with the guise of being Robin Hoods,"
"They're making money like in a supermarket,"
The Santiago Fire
man
at least 22
The Santiago
Santiago Fire
burned more than 25,000
The Santiago
burned more than 25,000 acres,
lighting a fire on a hillside
Katherine
Jackson was granted
parents.
22-year-old woman
get back at her boyfriend.
recovery and development
race and football
These two
Dr. James Thompson,
outgoing,
Women in their 40s are
defeat on Scots
beaten
Ronan O'Gara,
Australia
15 people
Mogadishu,
very, very
COPENHAGEN, Denamrk
Connie Nielsen
a little boring,
Actress
Hollywood
keep them sedated during the procedure.
propofol,
propofol,
Michael Vick
on the move -- in 18-wheelers.
two handlers, a referee and Web cams
Fights are also being staged on the move
British actor Tim Roth
arguing that California's ban on gay marriage is unconstitutional.
marry people of the same sex.
"The first thing to think about is the right to marry is a fundamental right in the United States," Olsen said. "It's a right protected by the Constitution. The Supreme Court has held over and over again that it may be one of the most fundamental rights to unite with the person you love to form a partnership."
Manny Pacquiao
the following year
for congress.
Congressman
the London dates at the O2 Arena.
captain Francesco Totti
20
1995.
Pamplona, Spain,
400
sextuplets,
she and her kids would like to continue their TV show,
their TV show,
she and her kids would like to continue their TV show, but admits it will be up to the network.
Pakistan
"I can't tell you how proud I am of all of you,"
sent the e-mail to the client
THIS e-mail
to the wrong person.
President Luiz Inacio Lula da Silva
he can help bridge gaps between cultures.
Cat Stevens.
changed his name
Yusuf,
in the '70s.
LTE
Verizon
Verizon
mid to late 2012.
Verizon's LTE network
Jeffrey Wright
Actor Jeffrey Wright
having had the courage to speak his heart and mind.
Professor Gates
having had the courage to speak his heart and mind.
racial profiling,
Afghanistan.
Miller,
Marylisa
"Mandy's Disease."
22
Remain faithful to the law.
Sotomayor represents the kind of activist judge that threatens the traditional foundation of the U.S. legal system.
a conversation"
the Federal Aviation Administration
Federal Aviation Administration
$100,000 a week
$100,000
largely due to the impact of the recession.
Hilary Swank
usually charges around $100,000
"Travel is down, agents and brokers need deals,
patrolling the region at the time of the incident.
of a high school student
15-year-old boy
Alexandros Grigoropoulos.
western suburb of Peristeri.
guilty of collaborating to violate copyright law in a landmark court verdict in Stockholm.
copyrighted material including
users to exchange files including movies, music, games and software,
controversial and violent land reform program that displaced some experienced commercial farmers, most of them of European origin.
"deepening food insecurity"
Zimbabwe
Graeme Smith
230
312-2
health care bill
a Democratic-sponsored health care bill would not cover illegal immigrants.
health care reform bill
tone and behavior from members of Congress are not necessarily new.
the Hummer
behind the 2006 poisoning death
Alexander Litvinenko.
Russian oligarch Boris Berezovsky
NBC's "Tonight Show"
vigorously played a game of lowered expectations,
Gov. Leopoldo Fernandez Ferreira
he had committed genocide in the deaths of 30 peasants.
President Evo Morales
North Carolina
North Carolina
Andrew's farewell to D.C.
lost his entire body below the hips.
July 15?
Andrew Kinard testifies before a Senate Armed Services
was found dead in his car
seeking more phone records from a dozen people involved in the case.
The state
Orange County Circuit Court,
receiving treatment
Shiite leader
been receiving treatment
Iraqi Shiite leader Abdul Aziz al-Hakim,
October 1,
prevented its first attempt to take Ratchet the dog
Sgt. Gwen Beberg's home state
October 1
Sgt. Gwen Beberg
The new "Footloose"
some of the flips and complicated dance moves in the movie's famous warehouse scene.
Snow and freezing temperatures
stabilize a city
shock defeat
Diversity
their vacation pictures
the Florida Panhandle
The negative gets sandblasted onto a hand-cast glass tile made in Seder's studio. The heavy, 8-inch-square glass tiles get painted, scraped, fired in a kiln and finally added piece by piece to a
Massachusetts artist invented the Lifetiles medium and is the only artist in the world using it.
private money in American politics
United Nations Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO).
The renowned low-fat, high-fiber diet
The renowned low-fat, high-fiber diet
Greece, Spain and Italy,
the convenience of fast food
a first victory in a yacht that
light weather conditions
317 people
"My goal had to be something special tonight for my special boy.I'm so proud of him,and his mum,"
injury
is expected to
indicated there was no sign that Kellermann had problems.
"may have been an apparent suicide."
knows of no connection between David Kellermann's
David Kellermann, acting CFO
Dawn Drexel
California.
Celebrities
leather seats, wooden dashboard, surround-sound systems, iPod players, lower lighting and air bags,
built with leather seats, wooden dashboard, surround-sound systems, iPod players, lower lighting and air bags, in a variety of themes
Europe and even from royal families in the Middle East."
National Trust for Historic Preservation's
Hurricane Katrina
hospital
The 11 sites represent the country's architectural, cultural and natural heritage, and "reflect extraordinary periods of American history,"
plays host to the world's biggest music acts.
Arena,
2013,
plays host to the world's biggest music acts.
London's O2
the inauguration of President Barack Obama.
bus
Brooklyn
inauguration
a group of approximately 40 citizens from New York,
glimpse into Clinton's life during her husband's publicized affair.
dealt with the controversy.
11,000
provide a glimpse into Clinton's life during her husband's publicized affair.
provide a glimpse into Clinton's life during her husband's publicized affair.
involving former president Bill Clinton and Lewinsky,
her full record.
A new shoe outfitted with a GPS chip
offer peace of mind
The embedded GPS tracking system will allow the wearer of the shoe to be located instantly online and for their whereabouts to be monitored in real time.
GPS chip
people with Alzheimer's or other types of dementia to wander from their homes.
37
14
Binghamton, New York,
coordinate the nation's efforts to protect government and private computer systems from hackers, criminal gangs, terrorists and spies,
the White House
for combating cyber intrusions,
the position of "cyber czar."
to lead a state investigation
order.
Nepal's prime minister
serious political crisis
serious political crisis
Prachanda, resigned
help pay for upgrades,
EMI,
opinions
greater value not just on the new and novel, the cool and the trendy, but also on value itself.
value itself. Does it work? Is the price fair? Will it last?
retailers, marketers
new age of thrift likely has begun,"
Adrian Mutu
performance-enhancing drugs
broadband communication
Tuesday
The Nobel Prizes are being awarded
this week and next.
possible need to renovate barracks to separate straight and gay troops.
refused to hear the appeal of William Thompson,
32 years.
Zealand, South Africa, Australia and England.
their nations and improving the standard of rugby within their countries,
Canada's
to prove that we deserve a place among the elite teams.
their nations and improving the standard of rugby within their countries,
Kim engaged in conversation and active.
electronics research facility in Jagang Province
heavy-caliber guns, combat aircraft and aerial weapons
"intense barrage of heavy weapons"
fire and heavy mortar fire from many directions on the northern side of Mu'l'li-vaaykkaal."
sister Sam
on Sunday, February 8,
2008 season.
are dying unnecessarily because they do not have enough helicopters
security of Afghanistan was crucial to preventing terrorist attacks
crossed the Line of Control and "started firing on our patrol," killing an Indian soldier.
Kashmir,
Pakistani troops crossed the Line of Control and "started firing on our patrol,"
after Indian soldiers crossed the Line of Control that separates Kashmir between India and Pakistan.
November 2003
fake payments
by modifying the way doctors bill
1930
a new "Independence at Home"
has cast doubt on whether
Winter Olympics.
American
her right shin
referee
assistant referees
county and local departments,
the fact that everybody does it,"
"We don't really think that hand-held bans have a whole lot of impact,"
a car had been parked on side street off Sunset Boulevard for two days,
committed suicide
children from the Center for the Visually Impaired
"Blind-Touch Tour"
Luis Felipe Hernandez Castillo,
"Este gobierno de criminales,"
Balderas station in central Mexico City
8- to 12-hour day.
between $58 and $101.50 for an 8- to 12-hour
"Dracula
bloodier
Among the seeds for new plotlines was Bram's mention of a police investigator who plays prominently in
they killed six
Militants in Nigeria's oil-rich southern delta region
they killed six
the largest rebel group
Our products have never been recalled,
was sworn
Ambulance Service
Winehouse had been kept in overnight for observation.
Amy Winehouse
suffering a reaction to a medication
battled drug addiction
London
Jalozai
the violence raging between the Pakistani army and Taliban fighters.
"it's very poor
Jalozai refugee
and our sense of history fail us, then we will not achieve
The Berlin Airlift
plans to sail solo around the world
Australian Kay Cottee,
Kay Cottee,
445
"severe turbulence"
same spot over the Atlantic
about four hours after takeoff on Nov. 29,
three different videos
getting his chest waxed,
three different videos
Use the iReport form
think are the best.
Iran's
Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
Obama within less than 48 hours, to basically violate the commitment that he spoke of at the United Nations,"
"Everybody
six Ngan siblings,
"Everybody has opportunities in Hong Kong, it's up to you if you'll take the chance, and make use of your talents,"
to their parents' upbringing and tough rural life in Mainland China,
claim different clients in the headwear market and
Global Headwear Ltd.,
"My elder brothers'
her recently published memoir, "On the Line,"
line judge who had called a foot fault.
Saturday's
J.Crew
black is beautiful,"
caregivers to grow marijuana for qualified patients,
Monday night
bag lunches in her own kitchen.
Paula Deen
Apple, Google and Microsoft
Culinary queen Paula Deen
Apple, Google and Microsoft all were born at home-based
home-based facilities.
regarding China's military
the United States announcing a deal last month to sell more arms to Taiwan,
he appreciates China's muted response
relations between the United States and China
on Sunday
in an FA Cup fourth round clash.
Tim Cahill
Tim Cahill
Outgoing Joint Chiefs Chairman Gen. Peter Pace
"they disintegrated in the face of the coalition's first several weeks of combat, so they weren't here,"
Chiefs of Staff
the U.S. military in Afghanistan
Lahore.
five
Transportation Security Administration.
a terminal at the Newark, New Jersey,
11
tuatara
mated
hooked up with Mildred,
China, Japan, North Korea, Russia, South Korea
reprocessing of spent fuel rods from the pilot atomic power plant
nuclear weapons.
North
and Warren Christopher
suggests that the president talk to "a joint Congressional committee made up of the leaders of the House and the Senate as well as the chairmen and ranking members of key committees."
"a joint Congressional committee made up of the leaders of the House and the Senate as well as the chairmen and ranking members of key committees."
War Powers Resolution
at stake here. This is our very way of life,"
Karen Matthews
eight years
Prosecutors
Shannon Matthews
Donovan planned to release Shannon and then "discover" her,
locked in an apartment for 24 days
Staff Sgt. Cody Reeves
Staff. Sgt. Cody Reeves
battlefield
a tragic boating accident near St. Augustine, Florida,
The Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission has taken over as the lead agency involved in the investigation.
laid plywood sheets on the structure
CEO Steve Jobs
"There are no plans to make a tablet.
"does not hold any confidential information
that the SEGA Pass service was momentarily down.
names, birth dates, e-mail addresses and "encoded passwords,"
"We will be up and running again soon!"
French hostages
were on an official mission to help the Somali government with security.
Yelena Isinbayeva
Yelena Isinbayeva.
rape, unlawful sexual contact, continuous sexual abuse of a child and sexual exploitation
widespread mistreatment,
widespread mistreatment,
a man with a bare backside, and another man apparently drinking a liquid that had been poured down the man's lower back.
widespread mistreatment, sexual activity and intimidation
New York, California, Missouri and Georgia.
next week's "Super Tuesday" contests
BMW's MINI
the most fuel-efficient car on the road and the automaker that "on average" is most likely to save you money at the pump.
BMW's MINI
Toyota's Yaris
Latina Breast Cancer
Other factors included fear of the results and difficulty scheduling an appointment,
included fear of the results and difficulty scheduling an appointment,
issues such as language and cultural
facing felony charges
defrauding an innkeeper and skipping out on a $10,000 hotel bill
Neda
skin scaly, eating them from the inside, and rotting the brain and limbs,
an album with the Southern rock sound that has made the band famous
he was "deeply saddened" by
British reality TV celebrity Jade Goody
choose the way in which we are governed,"
18 seats
Crist,
Mel Martinez,
May
any other public
Dominguez and his three children
culvert
a Christmas tree.
cut down a Christmas tree.
They removed their sodden socks in an effort to stay warm and dry while they waited for rescue,
football is all about?"
launching a new Truth Squad to defend the Arizona senator's military record.
vowed to never question the
McCain's service in Vietnam did not necessarily mean that he was qualified to serve as commander-in-chief.
honors and respects Sen. McCain's service, and of course he rejects yesterday's statement by Gen. Clark,"
never question the patriotism of others in the campaign,
McCain
Adidas,
strength of its brand name and the diversity of its product portfolio,
"We had a good debate last night. It was a lot of fun.
pretty well,"
the maverick."
McCain doesn't seem to understand:
it's really starting to wear very very thin,"
Ivorian striker
"in the coming days,"
853 U.S. service members
buried in Iraq's Lake Tharthar region.
2007
Dwyane Wade
to help inspire kids in at-risk situations.
coach Raymond Domenech
Mexican action would harm American businesses.
U.S. industrial and agricultural products delivered to Mexico,
enter the United States beyond the normal commercial zones, and allowed some U.S.
better regulation
from smoking 50 cigarettes.
you don't have enough breath...You
After two years the U.S. will forego prosecution and formally drop the
because of restrictions
Iranian and Sudanese
Iran and Sudan.
re-enter the atmosphere sometime Friday afternoon,
very little risk
on re-entry.
Peter Axlerod, 55, and Simone Pelletier, 12,
Two
Clio Axlerod,
researchers
very rare find
20
they will remove the excess tissue and tighten her jawline in future surgeries.
Connie Culp,
first genocide
Finland's
Rwanda's ethnic cleansing bloodbath in
800,000
Pentagon
attacked nearly 100 vessels and hijacked as many as 40 in the waters off the coast of Somalia in 2008,
a new maritime anti-piracy mission
United States
patrolling the waters independently
"Mortars
in the Jalozai camp.
tens of thousands
Mardan.
Jalozai camp.
displaced people
Rosemary Port
"Skanks in NYC."
not likely to
Gingrich and Romney
have expressed concern about U.S. cases of a swine flu virus that has similar characteristics to the fatal virus in Mexico.
stay inside and away from the public,
Henshaws'
Cotton's death
New Orleans
an uninhabited island in Galveston Bay.
she talked of beating the child,
Galveston, Texas.
Days of heavy rain
southern Peru's
became stranded after a landslide
inside the Iowa 80 Truckstop, at Exit 284 of Interstate 80, near the small town of Walcott.
to see a dentist,
Dr. Roemer,
Iowa 80
Bob Greene
"I come from a very humble family and
called the 47-year-old astronaut over the weekend to congratulate him.
I would call a typical migrant farm working family,"
off the West Coast of the United States,
"It was like a comet, but smoke,"
"Twenty-six satellite components,
off the West Coast of the United States,
fraud by the Securities and Exchange Commission
losing people's confidence
Goldman Sachs
"I know I'm doing it right in how I treat my customers, and that gives me peace of mind, but it's not generating the results I had hoped." He said he is considering looking for some other kind of work.
Captain America and the Fantastic Four.
Jack Kirby
his work was so powerful and unique
homicide, resulting from a combination of drugs, primarily propofol and lorazepam.
last summer.
The vaccine
Tuesday.
and providing middle-class tax relief."
the country
Clinton
Clinton and Obama are running neck and neck among
"I am innocent. I now will fight in the courts to clear my name."
conspiracy and fraud,
racketeering, conspiracy
"I'm saddened and hurt but I am not surprised by the indictment," he said.
conspiracy and fraud,
money
Drew
Drew Peterson's
October 2007.
Haiti
kidnapping the children.
child trafficking
any evidence or witnesses related to Obama's citizenship is irrelevant to the charges against Lt. Col. Terrence Lakin, who has 17 years of service in the U.S. military.
the doctor's deployment
judge, Army Col. Denise Lind,
banning the import of Chinese milk products
A Japanese food corporation
import of Chinese milk products for children.
Chinese milk products for children.
banning the import of Chinese milk products for children.
soul.
could learn a few things
If you sleep with a man too soon,
you ever wanna
2012 Olympic
boost the leadership and management skills of coaches.
the skills they want to improve.
professional development course
bogus drugs
32
Authorities were carrying out raids at medical stores in India's western Gujarat
The Civil Hospital,
when he asked actor Hugh Grant, "What the hell were you thinking?"
Monday.
"What the hell were you thinking?"
that are fatal
move into the realm of chronic illnesses.
on top of the additional $10 billion provided by the stimulus package for 2009 and 2010.
additional $10 billion
bluegrass musicians, jazz players, classical performers and any number of other talented artists.
completely uncharted waters
banjo-related culture.
is considered by many to be the premier banjo player in the world.
bluegrass musicians, jazz players, classical performers and any number of other talented artists.
FMLN
Mauricio Funes
"create a country without hate and without resentment."
Indianapolis
the current economic climate
Apartments.com and CBcampus.com
of 191 phone calls and sent and received 2,899 text messages per month.
just life.
Chad Hurley
U.S. F1
his start-up experience can help the US F1 team become a major player.
comedy,
"The Hangover"
staggering problems in the U.S. banking system
this crisis
spend money on infrastructure and on other programs that will immediately put people to work.
financial disaster."
immediately put people to work.
infrastructure
Alabama,
President Barack Obama
India, Myanmar, Thailand, Indonesia and Bangladesh
a 7.6-magnitude earthquake in the Indian Ocean
"We're not pansies
bankers
in casual attire.
Bankers
the potential wrath of G-20 protestors.
doesn't make us happier.
chief executive of
good times
sacrifice
sustain future exploration of the moon and beyond.
moon is much more than a dead, unchanging satellite orbiting Earth.
the moon's surface
much more than a dead, unchanging satellite orbiting Earth. It's a dynamic environment, with changes occurring by the day and week, not over millions of years.
an ex-convict,
Hollywood publicist Ronni Chasen was murdered as she was driving through Beverly
"robbery gone bad,"
with girl-next-door Betty Cooper and heiress-next-door Veronica Lodge
"People were dying so fast in our parish, which was old St. Patrick's, they could not bury them fast enough,"
New York
a Jewish immigrant
Austria
New York
to Hebrew University in Jerusalem,
about $145 per month
Japanese cargo ship
small pirate vessels fired on
Sean Griffin,
sweeping health care reform legislation into law
the immediate release of Polanski following his detainment in Switzerland,
Paul Petersen,
Taliban
in the Shangla district in the volatile Swat Valley,
in the Shangla district in the volatile Swat Valley,
completely refitted the
velvet wall hangings and furniture in rich burgundies and gold.
a "significant crack"
crack in the structure's east span.
replacing a double-deck portion of the east span.
early detection
aggressive and difficult to treat version called
not just any form of the disease, but a rare, aggressive and difficult to treat version called
African-American women.
Pittsburgh Mayor Luke Ravenstahl
Stephen Mayhle, Paul Sciullo III
domestic argument
his dad, Craig,
Christopher Savoie
Morrey
Craig,
recent scientific expedition
says the discovery offered renewed optimism.
CI-Colombia,
his girlfriend
on the phone with his girlfriend
involved in apparently inappropriate conversations on the telephone at the time of the accident,"
a plane
that expands education benefits for veterans who have served since the 9/11 attacks, provides a 13-week extension of unemployment benefits and more than $2 billion in disaster assistance for parts of the Midwest that have been hit by record floods.
wars in Iraq and Afghanistan
provides nearly $162 billion in war funding
signed a bill that will pay for the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan
a bill that will pay for the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan
Solomon
in northwest
His bodyguard, a Pakistani police officer,
Pakistan
headscarves at public universities,
Manchester United's
Kevin Davies
Earth
Disneynature
plant a tree
"Planet Earth,"
Alastair Fothergill and Mark Linfield,
whole planet,"
plant a tree for each person who goes to see the movie on its opening weekend.
budget
parents and local businesses
Rotem Zinger
600,000
600,000 iPhone 4
nonemergency legislation
five days."
American public
equal pay for men and women.
"pets" or backyard oddities
Columbus Zoo.
Group of 20
hundreds of delegates and support staff
dubbed the "Benghazi Treasure"
large collection of priceless coins, statues and jewelry
a day care center
day care center in northwestern
A fire raged through the ABC day care center on June 5 in the city of Hermosillo in
Mexico.
January 2002.
failed to get the two-thirds majority required
of Representatives
two-thirds majority
she believes that people act differently in SL than they do in real life,
boot others off their sims,
Second Life,
Jordan Belfi
Ari Gold.
Lloyd.
Adam Davies
John Walsh
She described Green's company as having the worst morale she'd ever seen,
woman-hater
Filmmakers
"seek justice for the young victim in this heartrending situation."
sister
a prosecutor
record profits
CHICAGO, Illinois
$3.44 billion for the second quarter of 2009.
of U.S. President Barack
Obama's steady stream of superdelegate endorsements, combined with the delegates he received from Tuesday's primaries, put him past the 2,118 threshold, CNN projects.
rebuffed pleas by defense lawyers for a more lenient sentencing,
two-time Academy Award winner
Anthony Sowell,
sailboat
U.S. Coast Guard helicopter
took on water
2000 Honda Insight
Toyota Prius
1 million
sure the attackers are
weekend violence.
eight
their 8-year-old son,
Fournier got into an argument
Hundreds of Pakistani residents have taken up arms and are battling local
Both the residents and Taliban
Swat Valley,
Upper Dir district
Both the residents and Taliban
Federico Garcia
two other
More than half of people
More than half of people cannot pinpoint the exact location of the human heart on a diagram,
basic anatomy
people would now know more about their body.
John Weinman, Ph.D., of King's College London.
limit physical restraints or locked seclusion to situations involving imminent danger,
prevent inappropriate restraint and seclusion.
students with disabilities,
children
America
Roland Martin.
his 7-year-old daughter,
the war at the start,
key issues
"I absolutely understand the difference between tactics and strategy. And the strategic question that the president has to ask is not whether or not we are employing a particular approach in the country once we have made the decision to be there."
Sen. Barack Obama
the difference between a tactic and a strategy,"
You said we knew where the weapons of mass destruction were. You were wrong."
first African-American woman
IOC
Jassim M. Jaffer,
in June suspended Iraq's national Olympic committee
to Lausanne, Switzerland, to meet with IOC
Guinea's parliament is holding negotiations with the military,
a curfew from 8 p.m. to 6:30 a.m.
the scandal had highlighted
Li Changjiang
nearly 53,000
World Health Organization said the scandal had highlighted flaws in the country's entire food supply chain.
tropical storm
floods and landslides
floods and landslides triggered by a weekend tropical storm
an Internet game that involves being photographed lying down in unusual places.
an Internet game that involves being photographed lying down in unusual places.
Seven
Seven
save the Arctic from global warming.
arctic archipelogo of Svalbard.
Arctic waters
a long-distance swim at the North Pole
Christian Karl Gerhartsreiter,
Gerhartsreiter
Clark Rockefeller,
Christian Karl Gerhartsreiter,
Hasan
described him as "a very outspoken opponent of the war"
remains in intensive care
"a very outspoken opponent of the war" in the classroom and in public settings.
Michael Oher, who went from being a homeless inner-city high school student whose father was dead and whose mother was a crack addict to a star lineman at the University of Mississippi
Treat yourself to a nice present this holiday season. See this movie.
which is home to a private "museum" of memorabilia and awards collected over the years.
"The JC Group,"
him working out
props, costumes, trophies (including several for his bowling skills), CDs,
health issues.
Tornadoes and storms
20 years.
Macon County,
Robert
uses humor or sarcasm to deflect a
"Trust me, it is a job I would gladly give to anybody who would volunteer,"
Gibbs
President Obama,
a call from anti-government protesters to dissolve the country's parliament in 30 days.
Thailand's
would use weapons and apply violence toward authority.
dissolve the country's parliament
Chinese
much lower death toll
a belief that he should not be president because he happens to be African-American,"
Mary Matalin, a CNN contributor and Republican strategist,
on the fact that he is a black man,"
Jimmy Carter
showed that people in the program were six times less likely to be readmitted with a violent injury and three times less likely to be arrested for a violent crime.
people in the program
Dr. Carnell Cooper,
has largely been on the decline
dropped 2.5
2.5 percent
between measures passed by the Senate and House of Representatives last year.
bridge the gap between measures passed by the Senate and House of Representatives
Larry King
former President
cold medicine is effective only at doses that are too strong for young children.
cold medicine is effective only at doses that are too strong for young children.
looked at how safe and effective antihistamines, decongestants, antitussins and expectorants are in children,
how cold medicines affect children.
ramped-up use of pat downs and full-body scanning
ramped-up use of pat downs and full-body scanning
on young adults 18 to 20
the 21-year-old drinking age
The United States
Alcohol consumption among young adults
off Valencia
BMW
BMW
Bab al-Sharji commercial district
Bab al-Sharji commercial district of central Baghdad,
we
is a proactive choice we make in our personal lives every day. We must do the same as a nation. In order to embrace
peace, in our actions, in our expectations of our leaders, and in our votes.
for the weak but rather for those courageous enough
More than 60,000
full-time jobs
$450
More than 60,000
Turn 11 of the Sepang circuit
eight
Ebenezer Hoar
a month ago
June
off the coast of Brazil
Google
cafes,
338
admitting he lied to investigators about nonconsensual sexual contact with two employees in his courthouse.
the bench of the Southern District of Texas
a year
to impeach a federal judge convicted of obstruction
late husband's memory.
residents of his hometown
Edgar Mitchell,
residents of his hometown "had been hushed and
probably be in operation more than 20 years,
supersymmetry
again," said CERN Director General Rolf Heuer.
Protestant.
counts six Catholics and two Jews.
strong tradition
legal degrees
Metropolis, Illinois
Metropolis, Illinois
"We're committed to the project,"
forward
Metropolis
suicide hijackers
suicide hijackers
expanded an airbag recall
an airbag recall
2008:
deterioration in the relationship serves neither side's interests."
completely
trade relations,
for eight slain Turks and one Turkish-American.
change in marketing strategy.
Pilots praise the hardened cockpit doors mandated after 9/11,
hardened cockpit doors
two
petrol tanker
petrol tanker
tanker
"People were lining up trying to get the fuel,"
Officer Adam Tavss,
the Justice Department
On his first day back out on the street,
first day
Police Chief Carlos Noriega
Four nights later,
Marines and Afghan forces
wax figure of Michael Jackson
waxwork
a member of the Tamil Tiger rebels.
in Sri Lanka at a church outside the capital of Colombo Sunday morning,
Five
the "R-word."
"R-word."
require a great deal of command, neither gets enough training,
Seven of the eight victims
Joseph L. West,
eight people in a southeast Georgia
single gunshot wound to the head.
took a dozen hostages in a suburban Chicago bank
shooting himself in the head,
reckless homicide and wanton endangerment
David Stinson
heat stroke.
found not
key information to defend himself.
slim
life in prison
and lacked key information to defend himself.
on behalf of Clinton's campaign, requesting contributions of as little as $5 in exchange for a chance
"Customers don't wanna come in and see a pregnant woman behind
her pregnancy.
commit suicide
Western powers, including the United States,
South Ossetia and Abkhazia sovereign nations
South Ossetia and Abkhazia
one, the area, the spill, and two, also
late March
Gulf Coast oil
Americans who call this place home,"
The Marines
Stinky, cold, wet, oozy mucky
they call "a 7-ton truck." As the name suggests, it's huge and has some armor plating on the sides.
9.7 million
oil
$1 billion
9.7 million
preparation
completing the solo Vendee Globe race
first
put yourself in that uncomfortable position
hate crime
has died
had lived in the United States for more than a decade and
Ecuador,
basement
19-year-old girl whose hospitalization exposed a shocking Austrian incest case
the cellar
Rangers
Parkhead
have 44 points from 19 games
44
Mobley and 10 other
shooting and killing a security agent and severely injuring another
Karl Bishop
Rob Knox
Karl Bishop
southeast London
Chinonso Ononaku,
the airport.
Port-au-Prince, Haiti
Haiti
John Mica
to determine how effective the TSA's behavior detection program,
U.S. Rep. John Mica
Pew Hispanic Center
one in 10
exist between those who were born in another country and those born in the United States. About 52 percent of foreign-born Latino adults are high school dropouts, compared
sign up as organ donors.
detailed, exhaustively researched
Chris Robinson and girlfriend Allison Bridges
Kate
Friday
Georgia and militant separatists
attempts to help Georgia
U.S., European Union and international security organizations
the Williams sisters
The Williams sisters
beat at the grass-court grand slam.
was killed.
two gurus,
57-year-old
in the Atlantic on Tuesday, east of the northern Leeward Islands, the National Hurricane Center said.
125 mph to 120 mph
His wife
Kalathat's 34-year-old wife,
six of his family members
compensation from West Ham.
Manchester United,
West Ham
Carlos Tevez
He scored the winning goal as the Hammers beat Manchester United on the last day of the
Lyon
Champions
playing in the competition
Atletico Madrid
French
Ed Genson,
"We've been asking for the documents. We've been asking for the tapes. We've been asking for the witnesses, we're asking for a witness list. We have not gotten that,"
"I will fight, I will fight, I will fight until I take my last breath. I have done nothing wrong,"
Gov. Rod Blagojevich
attorney, Ed Genson, said he did not feel it was prudent for the governor to answer questions now.
Rod Blagojevich
trying to sell Obama's former Senate seat.
six-year sentence
18-year sentence.
18-year sentence.
2007
minimum sentence, six years.
an 18-year sentence.
is not
redemption.
Mary J. Blige
Taraji P. Henson, Perry and Gladys Knight.
The plane's data recorders
debris and bodies.
rescue workers say the wreckage is difficult to reach in deep waters.
be found,
beats Nadia Petrova.
Melanie Oudin,
Racquet Club of the South
Marietta, Georgia,
'water footprint'?
agriculture,
hold on tighter to choice than just
This biopic of Jack Kevorkian, the infamous "Dr. Death," may not add anything new to the physician-assisted suicide argument, but it does remind us of a time not too long ago when we were forced to consider where we stand on the matter. And for many of us, where we stand is anything but firm ground.
hold on tighter to choice than just
Albert Camus
This biopic of Jack Kevorkian, the infamous "Dr. Death," may not add anything new to the physician-assisted suicide argument, but it
substance found at the Kennedy Space Center tested positive
zero-tolerance
March 7.
drug policy.
First Sgt. Jose San Nicolas Crisostomo
Kabul
a roadside bomb
during the first Gulf
no indication
Jim Anderson, the hospital spokesman.
Nadya Suleman,
Eight other employees
Fifteen
octuplets,
Sidewalks and roads are poor and wheelchairs, crutches and canes are few.
earthquake is creating "a generation of amputees," something that will pose a challenge
about 5 p.m.
Airbus A320 jet
Thursday,
off the coast near Perpignan,
nearly 24 years
Amstetten, eastern Austria,
24 years
three
released a Panamanian-flagged, Japanese-owned vessel that was hijacked in the Gulf of Aden in November,
two destroyers to help fight piracy in the waters off
reverse this decision.
Thousands, hundreds of thousands of people, could possibly be
Al-Bashir ordered the expulsion of 13 international aid groups from the Sudan earlier
"will be held responsible for every single death that occurs in" the refugee camps of the Darfur region.
each victim
Durcho went to the home of an acquaintance January 12 and said he had "choked" Summer Rust
call the police
bacterium E. coli 0157:H7,
66
an estimated 300,000
could be shut off as early as next week.
Gulf of Mexico
gusher of oil pouring from its damaged Gulf of Mexico
27-year-old
three-year
American
The Justice and Development Party (PJD)
The Justice and Development
both Parliament and the prime minister have greater powers, while the monarch's sway has been slightly lessened.
buried with full military honors at the Dallas-Ft. Worth National Cemetery
Jaycee Lee Dugard
kidnapping and rape
intense media coverage may prejudice his client's ability to get a fair trial.
Jaycee and her parents and the children,
unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor,
"The Pianist"
having unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor,
in 2003.
"full range of multilayered defense and deterrents"
U.S.
"Rab Ne Bana Di Jodi," translated as "A Couple Made by God."
Shah Rukh Khan,
U.S. hit
Tim Henman,
test the air conditioning and playing surface as well."
Former British number one Tim Henman,
candlelight vigil
armed, disabled man
Wytheville, Virginia,
about 2:30 p.m.
about 2:30 p.m.
former Royal Bank of Scotland boss Fred Goodwin
Liam Gallagher
denied that he is the man shown pointing
win back consumers.
melamine
melamine
eggs
"American Idol,"
David Cook
David is one of the most unassuming, down-to-earth people I think I've ever met.
David Cook
2003
2006.
Saddam
let the world think he had weapons of mass destruction to intimidate Iran and
frustrations and joys.
enormous guilt.
Cape Town's
Top of the World:
Drehrestaurant Allalin: Saas-Fee, Switzerland
Top of the World: Las Vegas
Oklahoma
PEOPLE.com.
severe rabies
severe rabies epidemic
violated state law to be used at trial, an important search-and-seizure
Moore's original jury conviction and 3-½ year prison term will stand.
police
the evidence,
detectives detained Moore for almost an hour, arrested him, then searched him and found cocaine.
13
more than 6,200
more than 6,200
involved in the collection of milk and the production of milk products,
Thursday
suspended
tour with Lady Gaga, titled "Fame Kills," has been canceled
else has Apple given the world in the iPhone 3GS?
speed
iPhone 3GS?
42,000
42,000
Doctors Without Borders
2,000
resigned
he and a number of other victims were summoned to a meeting with U.S. Embassy officials and were offered money.
judge
Elizabeth Olten
9-year-old
Donna Greenwell
two children
$1,500.
Donna Greenwell
to attend to a family matter.
Brazil
Manchester
"Robbie left without permission,
been slashed twice in the past two weeks
aid package being negotiated to bail out Greece is worth 120 billion euros (about $160
120 billion euros
fall asleep during a flight
The 53-year-old pilot
sleep disorder and a string of early mornings
(5:40 a.m.),"
Christopher Coleman
"To allow one penny of ill-gotten gain
the husband and father of the victims.
bomb attached under his vehicle exploded
"sticky bombs."
Iraqi official
Interior Ministry.
14
The "bongs" of London's Big Ben
73,
charges of conspiracy to commit economic espionage; six counts of economic espionage to benefit a foreign country; one count of acting as an agent of the People's Republic of China; and one count of making false statements to the FBI,
restricted technology and Boeing trade secrets,
stealing restricted technology and Boeing trade secrets,
including information related to the space shuttle program and the Delta IV rocket.
were so perfect
he was always welcoming,
his voice,
Presidential Medal of Freedom
the reports.
forces were burning the bodies of the dead
an area of Tivoli Gardens they said was under government control.
August 2007,
ARC and SSM.
for Sustainable Energy
to the U.N., to relief agencies, just anybody in the world
"This is a horrible tragedy."
Authorities continue to investigate and have not formally determined a cause,
killed five Guatemalan immigrants
Frank Dwyer, a fire department spokesman,
Thirteen
five Guatemalan immigrants
showdown
murder, armed robbery
July
murder, armed robbery and aggravated assault,
killed July 25
The U.N.'s
it allows richer countries to meet
You get a reward for not cutting your forests."
reward for not
Peter Hoekstra of Michigan,
to try the men in a civilian court as a demonstration of America's might and moral certainty,
"We have a judicial system that's the envy of the world,"
in Asia, Australia, Africa, Middle East, United Kingdom and North America.
the Philippines
four
Charlize Theron
President Umaru Yar'Adua,
armed militants
fight back against budget
new fighter brands
2-0
Australia
South Africa
South Africa
South Africa
South Africa
a nine-wicket
247 in their
explicit warnings
The captain of the container ship Maersk Alabama
35 international oil companies can bid on long-term contracts
1.5 million
the three-week winter
December 2008.
conduct credible investigations, would constitute a "reward
General Assembly and Security Council
between Israel and the militant group Hamas in Gaza.
who share their first names with the
proof of identity and must
Almost 30
The couples must bring proof of identity and must
already signed up for the free night's stay at the Travelodge,
proof of identity
long-term relationship.
"uprooted people worldwide"
2 million,
Donington Park
we ourselves
Penn State University
the Indian Ocean off
U-turned before it crashed,
three
that appear on our show are extraordinarily well looked after.
This is the first time these kind of experiences have really been undertaken by people. People that come out of nowhere all of a sudden are international superstars.
absolute worldwide phenomenon.
I think the downturn in press in our country [Britain], I think, maybe stressed her out a little bit.
pressure and scrutiny
pressure and scrutiny
East Germany
to tear down other walls.
must not exceed 2 degrees Celsius."
need for an agreement on global warming.
Hotel Montana near Port-au-Prince, Haiti,
U.S. Air Force Maj. Ken Bourland sent an e-mail to his wife telling her that he was fine and had just settled in for
Two
Madonna
Thursday.
a crane collapsed while lifting a large metallic truss
At least one
"This was an unprecedented environmental disaster met with an unprecedented federal response which prevented any of the worst-case scenarios from coming to fruition,"
Concordia University and McGill University in Montreal, Canada, and Hebrew University in Jerusalem,
died in 1987,
liquidate the gallery and its inventory,
liquidate the gallery and its inventory,
Russian President Dmitri Medvedev
is to utter threats which it will not, or cannot, follow through.
independence of Abkhazia and South Ossetia.
Dimitri Medvedev
South Ossetia and Abkhazia.
two 15-year-old boys, a 17-year-old girl and an 18-year-old man
attempted murder
national telephone
1 percent of
78,000 parents of children ages 3 to 17.iReport.com:
250
No Games Chicago,
public policy initiatives
CBT
Television
educational programming
Don Draper
About 80
Sheryl McCollum,
Ingmar Guandique.
disclose their findings to the public.
he's in shock. That's a medical term, but it's a big experience for him.
Elton Napier
it was the summer he spent on hiatus between college and the real world, working as a carny at the local carnival.
James
peanut butter
Milan
Ulster's unionists, led by Ian Paisley, and Sinn Fein,
peace process
Ian Paisley, and Sinn Fein,
Northern Ireland
peace and prosperity
diplomacy,
PCWorld researchers
PCWorld,
3,300 gates,
gained fame as a teenager when her family opened up their lives to cameras
"The Osbournes."
Edmontosaurus
1999,
The driver of a truck
Neil Diamond
to the victims of Hurricane Ike in Texas.
the victims of Hurricane Ike in Texas.
Honorary Officer of the Most Excellent Order of the British Empire (OBE).
of thousands
He did not mention condoms,
Pope Benedict XVI
house arrest
Myanmar, also called Burma,
life
Capacity at Port-au-Prince's airport
$1 million
Netflix
improve the Netflix movie recommendation system
is going out with my first headlining tour and having every show sell out.
"very good and substantive."
Russia and the United States
two-day
in Moscow
Russian President Dmitry Medvedev
Daily two-mile walks
an ACE inhibitor
43 percent
a third of them don't
Larry Webster of Popular Mechanics magazine
2010 Prius.
an encampment set up by Occupy protesters
Lida Katehi
kidnapping charges against the other nine
missionaries accused of kidnapping children after a devastating earthquake hit the nation in January.
nine
26,
would be "best" for the country's troops to leave Afghanistan as soon
very bright, very outgoing, had a positive attitude and was very determined to complete her education,"
drunk driver,
next month
change in the hemisphere.
United States must differentiate between its friends, primarily Colombia and Mexico,
Trinidad and Tobago.
virtually all out of the financial hides of employees,
health-care
virtually all out of the financial hides of employees,
financial hides of employees,
the commission selectively omitted information it submitted.
criticized the report's conclusions, saying the commission selectively omitted information it submitted.
a systemic failure in the oil industry,
prepare them for that environment.
British soldier on patrol
high three-meter walls
religious and cultural sensitivities
Nepalese Ghurkha soldiers authorized to handle weapons.
British Army's state-of-the art training ground.
The report said opium has accounted for more than half of Afghanistan's gross domestic product
do more to stop the Afghan opium trade
No More Deaths
unauthorized immigrants spoke of being denied water or food during their custody. Others said they were beaten.
started properly documenting these allegations,
they were beaten.
"Mistreatment or agent misconduct will not be tolerated in any way,"
6,000 cases of overcrowding
Seven
Two French soldiers survived the Saturday night
Two
Seven
seven
Lebanese
"making sure that all his needs are taken care of,"
Eric Heiden
domestic violence
more than 150 top politicians,
DNA
between 250 and 300
between 250 and 300
Fromelles in northern France,
Ed Genson
federal corruption
version updates
email
It may be your software that's slow
FX's motorcycle drama
Congressman Paul Ryan
"one of the most magnificent expressions of freedom and free enterprise in history"
not drinking or smoking.
Gertrude Baines,
Carlo Ancelotti
Carlo Ancelotti
eight-year stint
50 next week,
"sick with worry"
"At this point it looks like it's worse than we all imagined and we still don't know specifics because of the down power lines,"
"political violence
By about 5 p.m.,
$100,000
She would lose her older brother, Sami, and her older sister, Sadete.
April 20, 1999,
strongman Moammar Gadhafi
In Germany,
Moammar Gadhafi
"pro forma"
The U.S. Senate
accept the Democrats'
next year.
he will knock out WBO welterweight world champion
more than a million
George W. Bush
Swat Valley.
decades of living a life of drugs and sex,
front man of rock group Black Sabbath,
2004
"new chapter" of improved governance in Afghanistan
a "new chapter" of improved governance in Afghanistan now that Karzai's re-election as
Taliban rulers
Steve Fossett
fly a plane around the world solo without refueling.
September 3, 2007,
Steve Fossett
present facts
Iraq and Afghanistan
Iraq and Afghanistan
the time since Obama's last visit to the country.
things were not as bad as they had seemed.
North Dakota Gov. John Hoeven.
Fifteen helicopters from the U.S. Northern Command along with active-duty
Fargo
military personnel are being
people
whatever decision I make.
the loss to the USA was not the prime factor contributing to his depressed mood,
Fabregas
"a walking blood bank"
free medical treatment to some of the world's poorest people.
free medical treatment to some of the world's poorest people.
the massive hospital ship "Africa Mercy" every year.
Civet cats:
Jamaican Blue Mountain and Kupi Luwak,
against outside influences in next month's run-off
kidnappings, torture and other violence, including the deaths of opposition party members.
has warned against outside influences in next month's run-off
Tsvangirai
five-year-old war's
the cost of stationing U.S. troops in its country
pay the cost of stationing U.S. troops in its country
$8
of being a small business owner,
amount of children that are fascinated
Vogel cleans and cares
"AIA Singapore has more than sufficient capital and reserves ... to meet our obligations to policyholders," the statement said.
$85 billion
Hundreds of customers
hoping to pull their investments and policies from the company.
U.N. compound.
rocks and Molotov cocktails,
throwing rocks and Molotov cocktails,
village of Kibumba.
AT&T
network performance,
AT&T, Verizon or Sprint
hybrids, plug-in hybrids and battery electric
hybrid cars
chief executives of Ford and GM
GM plans
mandate authorizing the U.S. troop presence in Iraq
mass march
President
just 17 percent of the American public trusted the
biodiesel.
hydrogen engines
Vehicles powered with hydrogen engines
hydrogen shuttle buses
hydrogen shuttle buses
"Miss Pistols"
American employee at the consulate and her U.S. citizen husband. Their 1-year-old child,
"We know that the U.S. citizens were targeted,"
about sex,
NBC
"Good Christian Belles,"
Suzanne Tamim
United States
Britain's Laura Davies
India
Hindu women pray as they bathe in the River Ganges
in Amsterdam
nine
strictly follows its work on flight safety, followed all the maintenance procedures of the plane manufacturer [and] national and international authorities' directives for
Turkish Air Force
Muslim Khan, the Taliban spokesman
the prime minister and lawmakers
Chicago, Illinois,
Deputy Josh Myers
"Get home now."
his mother, grandmother, other relatives
somebody who has experience,
Newt Gingrich
Republican National
abiding by conservative principles, especially fiscally, is the only way to solve the country's financial problems.
Republican Party needs a "fresh new face"
Kevin Neugebauer
social gaming
FarmVille
huge cross-section.
pumped hundreds
authoritarian
better ability to focus, increased lung capacity and improved fine motor skills.
music
seniors
social, emotional, physical and even spiritual growth.
being part of a group that works together toward a significant goal.
Karen Martel,
The Heene family
Karen Martel,
storms,
Niaz said she firmly believes that domestic violence goes against
South Africa...I
poverty and combating climate change
Connecting individuals to ideas and in turn connecting those ideas to a greater audience
Monday.
Lt. Gen. Ann E. Dunwoody
40 percent
the fire
70 homes
yard debris
south of the northern Iraqi city of Mosul,
An Iraqi soldier
Rafael Nadal
early Thursday
charged with animal cruelty and illegal gambling,
animal cruelty and illegal gambling,
dead tigers, bear arms, monkey bones
"violating regulations protecting rare wild animals."
a tiger carcass
Nguyen Thi Thanh,
Nguyen Thi Thanh,
tenure and said he was willing to make the tough decisions.
said he
"world's
Even the terms used to name them -- Hispanics, Hispanic-Americans, Latinos, Latino-Americans, the Spanish-surnamed -- too tightly package the people categorized by those definitions,
group's experience in the United States.
Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban
Hispanics, Hispanic-Americans, Latinos, Latino-Americans, the Spanish-surnamed
44 million
Even the terms used to name them -- Hispanics, Hispanic-Americans, Latinos, Latino-Americans, the Spanish-surnamed -- too tightly package the people categorized by those definitions,
spread of disease and caused
20-year-old rule that banned foreigners with HIV and AIDS,
the $13.2 million
$6.4 million in presidential campaign
the $13.2 million she personally loaned her campaign.
the Dalai Lama's current "middle way approach,"
a small minority
"middle way approach,"
a small minority
Nile Valley in central Washington
was estimated at $20 million,
local resident Koch
was estimated at $20 million, but that would likely increase,
the Nile Valley in central Washington state.
"Marquez
arguably the world's best pound-for-pound boxer.
Israel's recent offensive in Gaza
to help insurgents "liberate" Iraq.
calling Israel's Gaza offensive a holocaust.
good first step
province was a battleground between the U.S. military and al Qaeda in Iraq during the earlier years of the Iraq war.
participating in a combined cache sweep.
Falluja,
a large number of security forces were scouring its Sinaie district for an array of weapons -- machine guns, mortars, rocket-propelled grenades and small arms.
machine guns, mortars, rocket-propelled grenades and small arms.
Marines and police in the nearby town of Karma
mother and his three children receive a court-ordered allowance from the
Katherine Jackson, his three children and undisclosed charities.
a monthly allowance,
created hope, optimism and a better way of thinking about the issue of race.
high unemployment,
Marc H. Morial: I know that a poll is a snapshot of time, and while it's important to keep the proper context, this is a positive thing. Yes, people are beginning to have a healthier view of race relations. But we must keep in mind the underlying conditions that people are currently living in.
Barack Obama
Joe Biden
dozens
car bomb
More than 20 people were killed, according to local and Taliban sources.
iTunes
Michael Jackson's
"Number Ones," "The Essential Michael Jackson"
Michael Jackson
Reese Witherspoon
actress
Jeffrey Katzenberg
Kiefer Sutherland,
Kenya
used a helicopter to fire on a car
one of the leading al Qaeda figures in East Africa,"
U.S. special operations forces used a helicopter to fire on a car Monday in southern Somalia,
falsely imprisoning a male escort,
O'Dowd,
was present in 109 countries and territories.
April 25
go into debt rather than save
India's major shortcomings in infrastructure, education, health care and environmental protection are well known, as are the constant problems of corruption, poor governance, rural poverty, communalism, domestic terrorism, child labor, discrimination against women and
capital inflows
financial crisis.
The center is
A Somali teen
November
Shirwa Ahmed,
his entire cabinet had resigned
Honduras."
"a dead letter."
"that we have been hit by an earthquake,
Signal FM,
Signal FM,
map of where to find aid, hospitals in Haiti
the final
Valencia
Tuesday.
anti-government protests,
Army National Guard's 1st Battalion,
Iowa National Guard soldiers celebrating their return from Iraq.
I-Reporter Myke Goings
Cook County Sheriff Thomas J. Dart
in a dilapidated garage on the cemetery grounds. The
relatives of people believed buried there will not be allowed to visit for several days,
will start seeing more dollars come their way.
Better Business Bureau
Qatar has not made any decisions regarding dropping the dollar-peg.
President Bush's actions?
Hamad Bin Jassim
$70 or $80 is more
at least 10 villages
killed at least 321 civilians and abducted
carried out the brutal campaign in northeastern Congo over four days in December,
Ana Ivanovic,
Maria Jose Martinez-Sanchez
Jelena Jankovic
30,
gusts reached more than 70 mph.
the county hospital, Mena City Hall, a middle school, churches, a library, the Masonic lodge and the courthouse
Mena, Arkansas,
74 mph threshold necessary for hurricane status.
southwestern Florida
southern Philippines
At least six members of the Ampatuan family
Israeli leaders,
conference of Islamic prosecutors in Iran
having your head handed to you on a platter.
served the poor of the South Bronx for decades out of a small medical office.
served the poor
losing his apartment
a $15,000 tax credit to anyone who purchases a home in the next year, more than double the tax credit offered by the House.
a $15,000 tax
the poor of the South Bronx
airport
about 250,000
line waits for paying customers
Identity Pass Inc.'s Clear security system
Sheikh Abdulla
in 2005
11 months
frequent trips to court, probation restrictions, extended drug rehab stints and several visits to jail.
it was selling "very well."
a football-sized hole
there was a loud pop.
Southwest Airlines' fleet
Charleston, West Virginia.
PTSD,
is chairman of the board and CEO of Schering-Plough Corporation.
Fred Hassan
New Jersey.
Fred Hassan,
trafficked or exploited women
Paying for sex with trafficked or exploited women would become a crime
sex
introduced the new measures Wednesday after a six-month review
because they create demand
buy sex from a trafficked or exploited woman in the UK.
"declared a major disaster exists in the Territory of American Samoa"
late Tuesday
appear in next month's Masters.
head Iran's judiciary.
More than two dozen
spent the last week dismissing allegations
More than two dozen
Iran's supreme leader on Saturday appointed a new judiciary chief,
non-appearance from the substitutes' bench during the 2-0 Champions League defeat at Bayern Munich
maximum period of two weeks.
A large wildfire
in northwest and central Oklahoma
because of a raging fire
80,000
Murrayfield.
24
14 demonstrators after they sat in roadways to block traffic, overturned trash bins, knocked over a police scooter and hurled bottles.
for 30 years.
Cedar Rapids, Iowa,
Cedar Rapids."
A&W Drive-In
United States, Britain, Russia, China and France,
in the spirit of cooperation.
13,000 policemen
Dhaka, Bangladesh
13,000
Bangladesh Nationalist Party and its allies, mostly Islamic parties,
the police and the ruling party men beat up their activists
Andersen Air Force Base,
three
Air Force
Metrolink
near Los Angeles, California.
his mother,
app store
later this year.
netbook computers.
programs are in line with federal regulations,
eight of the nine accidents
pregnant,
Sabrina Lee
Bristol
a generation who will seek revenge and punishment with God's help,"
a U.S. airstrike
The statement,
is: a modern American, working woman.
elegant, smart, appropriate
a two-toned silk dress
"because he was tired of all the media attention,"
he'd accidentally shot himself while cleaning a gun.
stealing clothes worth $370
They include: two taxi drivers, two fellow taxi passengers, a local friend, 36 passengers within a three-row vicinity of the patient aboard a China Eastern flight from Shanghai to Hong Kong, and 300 guests and staff at the Metropark Hotel he checked into.
340
threaten the seven-foot-six-inch player's career.
Yao Ming
Yao Ming
his left foot
Misdemeanor assault charges
head-butted designer Jack McCollough
Misdemeanor assault
an incident in which Sutherland allegedly head-butted designer Jack McCollough at a New York City nightclub in May.
1,300 pounds of explosives
"is the biggest attack, volume-wise"
Michael Lamar.
9 percent,
JP Morgan Chase Bank
Barack Obama look-alike.
A "thorough and comprehensive" report into the death of Michael Jackson is complete,
demand that the interim government step down
Mohamed Ghannouchi
resignation of the longtime president in January,
but also has a voice recorder,
underwater,"
underwater,"
"Revealed."
in Italian Marie Claire.
Hydroxycut products,
linked to liver
Hydroxycut products.
Maersk Alabama
Muse
making him 15,
"conducted himself as the leader"
Tom Brady
Canon's headquarters in Tokyo,
them to have more babies.
"We can't say yet it is a
Switzerland
the deed "crossed a line" that had already been pushed against Muslims since a popular referendum in 2009 banned the construction of new minarets.
growing expansion of Islam in Switzerland,"
pig carcass and severed
Zetas drug cartel,
responsible for the majority of the homicides, the narcotic-related homicides, the beheadings, the kidnappings, the extortions that take place in Mexico,"
120 former soldiers
opportunity to study in Hong Kong instead.
for the opportunity to study in Hong Kong
there are some differences between her and her protagonist.
"Hailey is a much better person than I am,"
heroine of the novel
"The Eleventh Victim"
harsh interrogation techniques
Accused terrorists held at Guantanamo Bay complained of abuse that they said led
Dr. Anthony Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy
H1N1
a single 15-microgram dose
90 percent
15 suicide bombers with small arms and machine guns entered the base and inflicted heavy casualties -- claims that the NATO-led force and Khost governor dismissed.
100 insurgents attacked a patrol,
avoid human contact and
conduct tests on the wolves' carcasses to determine whether they killed Berner,
in her hotel room at the Seminole Hard Rock Hotel and Casino near Hollywood, Florida.
now examining that evidence to see where it might lead in relation to Ms.
2007
sleeping alone in his room
Jack (1 month) is sleeping between me and my wife
for the first time, Jack (22 months) has finally slept
Jack
alone:
service could be emotionally harmful
Beresford-Redman was not in court Friday because of the swarm of reporters at the Los Angeles County courthouse,
United States
The United States
$2.2 billion
webcams, provided by Earthcam,
Statue of Liberty,
96-hour rule,
CNN
"Ninety-six hours
received a general discharge
No one has seen this woman drunk
the pancreas, liver and esophagus were clear,"
taken them out to dinner and bought each child a toy doctor's kit.
would my 4-year-old son and 2-year-old daughter do without Mama to attend to them every second of their exhausting days? Who could I get to fill my maternal shoes?
man dressed in a striped prison outfit, dreadlocks and darkened skin make-up,
a man dressed in a striped prison outfit, dreadlocks and darkened skin make-up,
Immigration and Customs Enforcement,
Julie Myers,
head of Immigration and Customs Enforcement,
for nearly eight
Al-Hayer maximum security prison
condemning the arrest
death of Marie Osmond's 18-year-old son has been classified as a suicide,
"There is only one like it in the world
California
seven-time
Mancebo.
InterContinental Bora Bora Resort,
4 million
Orlando's Nick Hotel
September 13.
surpassing 2,000
$8.8 million
China and Japan,
two-year
India
Chang'e
a time-travel fantasy in search of a cozy love seat.
Rachel McAdams and Eric Bana
issued an apology
issued an apology
Federal agents
Naomi Campbell
Naomi Campbell
misdemeanor assault
Naomi Campbell
three
small roles in three movies,
CNN,
in venting
illegal monopoly over the iPhone App Store,
that Apple and AT&T were exerting a monopoly over iPhone service
2012.
the company Experience 6
including four tickets to the upcoming 81st annual Academy Awards and
a suicide truck bomb
Twitter.
marred by violence
impose on AIG
to impose a hefty tax on retention bonuses paid to executives of companies that received federal bailout money or in which the United States has an equity interest.
League Cup tie
The Football Association
looking at CCTV both inside and outside the ground
side West Ham and east London neighbors Millwall.
Upton Park,
prosecutors to indict Lee
announced his resignation
tax evasion and breach of trust.
30-year fixed mortgage, a 15-year fixed mortgage and a 5/1 ARM.
ten
homes that are for sale in their community,
Sunday
plant
which can be used on London's underground
pie and mash
off the coast of the Puerto Rican island of Vieques,
Bratman proposed
Avril Lavigne and Dereyck Whibley's
Avril Lavigne and Dereyck Whibley's
Elephant Pass,
early Sunday,
Elephant Pass,
took the area in a surprise attack
glaciers will disappear
pine beetles
Herds of tiny pine beetles are munching away at
Wichita, Kansas.
hastening four patients' deaths in the wake of Hurricane Katrina.
six weeks after the hurricane.
were accused of hastening four patients' deaths
Eddie Jordan,
December 3.
Marie Osmond's
intelligence collaboration
Deputy CIA Director John McLaughlin
Suleiman
John McLaughlin
Kavya Shivashankar of Olathe, Kansas,
focus so much on my word;
called Haitipal,
she told of how she saw dead bodies on the road, and how she and four other missionaries were helping the injured.
life without parole
were released because the Navy did not have enough evidence
enough evidence to hand them over to Kenya for prosecution in court,
suspected pirates
broadcast a distress call to all ships in the area that it had come under attack
rape and patronizing
rape and patronizing
a Kentucky prison
Kentucky
about 10 to 15 inmates assaulted two others in a
These technologies
Vehicle mounted electronic jammers
University of North Carolina student body president,
a young man driving a sport utility vehicle
a second "person of interest"
Eve Carson's ATM cards
This technique was first shown to be effective in the
must still be ratified
Rhode Island high school
Berlusconi spokesman Paolo Buonaiuti
Rolling Stone Italy
nonphysical attacks,
political opponents.
"What I can tell you is that there has been such a buildup of hatred toward the premier, and this is not good,"
body mass index (BMI)
body composition
a formula that goes beyond
(PBII).
stories on the Watergate scandal
W. Mark Felt
FBI insider W. Mark Felt
Ahmed Khalfan Ghailani
in Tanzania
captured by Pakistan in 2004 and is being held at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba.
Bulo Marer and Quryoley
aims to impose Islamic sharia law in Somalia.
a strategic base in central Somalia,
al-Shabaab militia seized the cities of Bulo Marer and Quryoley
Somalia
Bulo Marer and Quryoley
an Islamic party
the division's international broadcasting rights
39 international rights broadcast holders,
reported plans to lay off thousands of U.S. workers
stand up and say, 'Wait a second. This is just not right.'
colorful, clean-cut songs
at a day-care center in Hermosillo, Mexico,
44
A fire that claimed the lives of 44 children
in an air-conditioning unit in an adjacent warehouse,
Massachusetts
New Hampshire, Vermont, New Jersey
Gov. David Paterson of New York
failing to recognize gay marriages
AC Milan's Brazilian midfielder Kaka
Lionel Messi
Cristiano Ronaldo
both the security situation and governance
breakdown in stability
Iran
denied fomenting violence inside Iraq.
system of military trials
"a striking blow to due process and the rule of law."
give detainees greater latitude in selecting legal representation and afford basic protections to those who refuse to testify. Military commission judges also will be able to establish the jurisdiction of their own courts.
"a striking blow to due process and the rule of law."
give detainees greater latitude in selecting legal representation
August 24,
Detroit
had once been the nation's
2010 census numbers
Tigers
six disaster recovery centers in Iowa
barrier between Gladstone and the encroaching floodwaters.
"X-Men Origins: Wolverine"
$87 million for the opening weekend
"Ghosts of Girlfriends Past"
in many ways, is the prototype of the bad boy.
a monster, who looks, acts, and talks like a man.
outside the Karkh Civil Court
five
Nearly 130
Baghdad,
A "no" vote
Europe
were pronounced dead at the scene,
workers wrestled
identified as Richard Matthews, 53,
near Pleasantville,
three-vehicle
A three-vehicle crash north of New York killed eight people, including four children,
eight people, including four children,
McLaren
consider that Lewis Hamilton, and the Vodafone McLaren Mercedes team, acted in a manner prejudicial to the conduct of the event by providing evidence deliberately misleading to the
"misleading"
presenting "misleading" evidence to stewards.
Dutch
Dutch
relief supplies
the south pier at Port-au-Prince
Haiti
one-way traffic,
terror attacks
western consumerism.
protect against fire from missile launchers
JetEye infrared missile-defense system
thought to have been completed before he died in 4 B.C.
"Justice
1977;
remains of Jeff Klee,
injuries were consistent with someone who had been stomped and kicked.
found him guilty of assault causing serious injury.
defending myself,"
848
is no reason to believe that Norway mass murder suspect Anders Behring Breivik is insane,
is accused of killing dozens of people in a bomb attack in Oslo followed by a shooting rampage on nearby Utoya island.
a further 12 weeks,
Sulley Muntari
midfielder Sulley Muntari
the legendary radio host
Congressman Jason Chaffetz
A powerful snowstorm
Prague and tells of her love for the "Golden City,"
her most important work is her charity, the Happy Hearts Fund.
a compromise on health care legislation,
health care legislation,
another $5.8 million
"Ghosts of Girlfriends Past"
$15.3 million
an estimated $87 million
Korea
The International Red Cross
reunions for families
only 16 people
Two Americans
22
exclude the
January 6,
the asteroid belt is being ground down
one out of every 33
the iconic Hollywood headquarters of Capitol Records,
Walk of Fame.
"Let it Roll:
up to $60.
digital alternatives to traditional college textbooks.
digital, DRM-free textbooks
$20
the HIV travel and immigration
required testing for HIV infection from the U.S. immigration medical screening process
Congress
for HIV-positive people said the new policy was long overdue, calling it "a significant step forward for the United States."
Burmese python.
the Florida Everglades.
A "Python Patrol"
Florida Everglades.
Iraq.
people with swine flu
29
any photo or image from your hard drive or your Picasa Web Albums
your Picasa Web Albums
Leadbetter's
schools,
golfer.
the emptiness on such a day as Mother's Day."
died in a Paris car crash
the flight's government organizers were aware of many New Yorkers' fears of
"Air Force One" flying over New York
a single photograph
the holy city of Karbala
holy city of Karbala
Shiite
south of Baghdad
is now going to live a very good life."
be moved
160
killed 246
"The Last Crusade."
Vic Armstrong.
11Tibetans
at a road crossing in Dawu County, in the Ganzi region of Sichuan Province,
held in a fund that U.S. government draws on to take care of the people along the Gulf Coast and pay the states
broke a law and put the public at risk
the Gulf
take care of the people along the Gulf Coast and pay the states for doing the cleanup.
$100 million
downtown area
evacuation of its downtown area
Mexican soldiers hold rifles Saturday during a clash with organized-crime suspects in
two
hold rifles
Dr. Lisa Newman
of an aggressive and difficult to treat form of breast cancer
16-hour trip over two days
uncover clues in Ghana about an aggressive and rare form of breast cancer.
women, women in the pre-menopausal age range, and women
"The women that are most likely to be afflicted with the triple negative breast cancers are younger aged women,
Sami Abu Zuhri,
Palestinian militant groups including the armed wing of Hamas are committing war
"The international law gives them the right to defend themselves because they are occupied. We have the right to defend our land."
a series of mail bombs over nearly two decades,
a series of mail bombs over nearly two decades,
Dr. Charles Epstein,
DNA
Sarah Skiba
more than a decade ago,
Delray Beach, Florida,
Joseph Harvey, 51, and Anja Kannell, 41,
two Floridians with taking $340,000 in funds intended for victims of last year's environmental disaster
celebration of the country's Olympic gold-medal win in men's ice hockey.
the estate
700
its highest since 1976.
group was kidnapping the children.
MADRID, Spain
identification
plane lifting off, veering sharply right and then dragging or skidding down the right side of the runway.
The United States
provide much-needed security in the run-up to the election.
Afghan President Hamid Karzai's
Afghanistan
professor whose "last lecture" became a runaway phenomenon
to provide support for FARC guerrillas in Colombia, and money laundering.
sell weapons as part of a plot to kill Americans in Colombia,
Monzer al-Kassar
25-year prison
A Syrian arms dealer
Syrian-born arms dealer
to sell weapons as part of a plot to kill Americans in Colombia,
Fighting between government forces and Islamist militias
foreign fighters would turn Somalia into another Iraq or Afghanistan,
over the last decade
Michael Jackson's
that 2002 interlude on the
leg
Rev. Jesse Jackson
Ivory Coast
excellent medical care,"
Ivory Coast
Nalini Sriharan, who has been in jail for 18 years, went on a fast Monday,
authorities agreed to review her demand for early release.
There are 200,000
Gina Bianchini,
January
1985
on his left thumb.
microchipping
help reunite owners with pets, whether lost or abandoned.
stray dog survey
London.
Dogs Trust
humanitarian aid agencies
are predisposed to be tougher on Israel than the Bush administration was.
Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu
had seldom seen him around.
Raymond J. Clark III
Annie Le
standard procedure for defendants in murder cases not to enter a plea until a later stage in the case,
inside a wall of a Yale lab building
When Neil Armstrong took his first uncharted steps on the moon,
"Star Trek: Deep Space Nine"
"Star Trek: The Next Generation."
"Star Trek: The Next Generation."
Taiwan's F-16 fighter fleet,
The fire,
is creating its own wind patterns, making it unpredictable,
their vehicle
Two
leave.
six
U.S. economic stability,
Republicans
Overhauling health care
government-sponsored health insurance
create a government-sponsored health insurance program
it's wrong to view the conflict in Iran as a battle of the middle class vs. the
civil rights movement
for someone to tell everyone to 'buy American' as it pertains to cars, but then take advantage of the great prices on imported goods at
The Big Three's financial woes
waiver from the requirements
early 2012.
waivers
be allowed to opt out of
no "Jeremy,"
There's no "Jeremy," "Daughter" or "Even Flow"
British
trapped motorists.
Nigeria
between October 24 and November 15,
Nigeria,
"Scarpetta."
half a billion people affected every year,
global efforts
Northampton, Massachusetts,
early Sunday,
nine suspicious
Stop the political posturing, make a deficit reduction deal and then work together to
tunes
the original artists
"Shake Your Groove Thing" by Peaches and Herb, "Bustin' Loose" by Chuck Brown and the Soul Searchers and "Fantastic Voyage" by Lakeside.
make it sound as much like the original as possible,"
Obama
December 7
about 34,000
Monday night and said Tuesday
plans for Afghanistan
The crown of the Statue of Liberty
The crown of the Statue of Liberty
after the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001,
The crown of the Statue of Liberty
The crown of the Statue of Liberty
whether women in
naturalization
the burka,
"The president should know that this is a boondoggle, and he is getting swindled,"
more than 20 years.
wasteful to spend money
should know that this is a boondoggle, and he is getting swindled,"
football-sized
Charleston, West Virginia,
had not been determined,
the damage to the jet had not been determined,
no
Kabul, Afghanistan
An Afghan employee of the U.S. Embassy in Afghanistan
An Afghan employee of the U.S. Embassy in Afghanistan
markets in Asia closed higher
"whose journey represents a triumph of the American story."
a triumph of the American story."
German Chancellor Angela Merkel
brushing patients' teeth and taking other precautions
99,000
more than $28 billion
detect explosives in the air despite crowds, cross-currents and other odors.
detect explosives in the air
Auburn University kennel in Anniston, Alabama,
victims died from "blunt force trauma,"
One
Jr. faces eight counts of first-degree murder
first-degree murder in last month's killings
9,
Anna He
Anna He
fungal nails."
fungal nails."
Don't get a pedicure right after you've shaved your legs, had laser hair removal or have any cuts or bites on your legs.
"Gangsta's Paradise."
possessing illegal drugs and drug paraphernalia,
$2.6 million in potato research in four states
The Sapping the Taxpayers Award
Young students like Chen
two military test pilots, one fighter pilot and one commercial pilot, plus an engineer and a physicist.
an arc of volcanoes and fault lines encircling the Pacific Basin
Philippine Institute of Volcanology and Seismology.
55 kilometers (35 miles) southeast of General Santos in the island of Mindanao
to conduct a "preliminary inquiry,"
June 25
tabloid newspapers
some type of domestic argument
A 7-year-old boy
killing five members of his family
Three people
Petrol
Two days after the soldiers were
attack on the soldiers.
two
Two people in masks prepare to throw petrol
11:45 p.m. Friday and 12:45 a.m. Saturday ET,
in the United States,"
won't burn,
"There is a low probability any debris that survives re-entry will land in the United States,"
that he tried to sell 9-year-old Rubina for £200,000 ($290,000),
tried to sell her to an undercover reporter,
a report from police
carrier based in Texas.
be alert.
big airline failing here in the U.S.,
Seoul, South Korea
Fleet Week!
Prince George's County Correctional Center,
Prince George's County Correctional Center,
off-screen mothering experience,
SEACOM
east Africa into high speed Internet
Republican Scott Brown
a surprise victory
the January 19 special election
Victor Guevares,
Victor Guevares,
My mortgage is
Victor Guevares,
the victims of the Madeira floods
victims of the Madeira floods
Manchester United
"We need Tevez.
planning the October 2000 bombing of the Cole while it was in the Yemeni port of Aden.
families of the Cole attack and also
Abd al-Rahim al-Nashiri,
the USS Cole.
the youngest child
policy priorities
Democrats should be questioning themselves on several key points.
health care and the environment,
were signed with the contestant girls,"
eight or nine
United States
U.S. Vice Admiral William Gortney:
Vice Admiral William Gortney:
the full potential of Miscanthus
steep biofuel targets.
giant grass
between 4,000 and 7,000 liters of fuel per hectare,
'It can only be a good thing that parents are using me as a chance to talk disability with their children. It just goes to show how important it is to have positive, disabled role models
New Orleans, Louisiana's Memorial Hospital
New Orleans, Louisiana's Memorial Hospital
inmates
violence
people in Buddhist community
stay on track and get me through prison,"
opposing a government that sought to enforce severe segregation laws with brutality.
imitate the pattern
hammock
her blinking pattern. Then imitate the pattern with a pen flashlight and the males will come
Cross and tie the laces once behind the ankle, then bring them forward, cross and tie again, and continue up the leg, depending on how long the laces are.
a key provision of the 2001 Patriot Act.
2001 Patriot Act.
several parts of the legislation,
several parts of the legislation, finding them
of the 2001 Patriot Act.
British Airways
24-year-old teacher
a 15-year-old student,
Lisa Lavoie and the male student
Amber Dubois,
John Albert Gardner,
hot and bothered
naked human sculptures, giant replica genitals and a photo gallery on the history of sex,
first sex-themed amusement
Love Land
bills passed
plan
A Lebanese man
that her client, Ali Hussain Sibat, was still alive.
70 years
107-year-old Malaysian
107-year-old
Smolensk, Russia
the tall silver birch trees
war crimes
face arrest
Sen. Daniel Akaka
has increased
Veterans Administration's
Veterans' Affairs Committee asked the GAO to
has seen improvements
in staff
Hispanic children
Prior to the recession, more white children lived in poverty than Latino kids, but since the recession began in 2007, those positions reversed, and the number of poor Hispanic children grew by 36.3% between 2007 and 2010, or 1.6 million, the study said.
6.1 million Latino children
celebrate
hospitals across the country,
captain Steven Gerrard
5,000
"Bahrain's security and the safety of its people have never been, and will never be, negotiable,"
"Bahrain's security and the safety of its people have never been, and will never be, negotiable,"
12-foot-high, chain-link fences
banking meltdown
"Tumbling tumbleweeds"
Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam
Government forces
troops
in a surprise attack early Sunday, the head of Sri Lanka's army announced.
in 1996
an independent homeland
Mullaittivu
A watchdog group critical of pork barrel spending
include a Lobster Institute; the Rocky Flats, Colorado, Cold War Museum; and the First Tee, a program to build young people's character through golf.
Rep. Jim Clyburn,
Tom Schatz,
his mother, his children and a list of charities,
Drug Enforcement Administration
10 a.m. Tuesday,
the Staples Center,
the Islamic Jihad Union,
Fritz Gelowicz, Martin Schneider, and Adem Yilmaz
Fritz Gelowicz, Martin Schneider, and Adem Yilmaz
Anfield
Mainz
a wonderland of surprises.
privately read the list of homes that have been destroyed.
"hugger."
on the floor of the garage in front of a removal van.
the license of Chambers Funeral Home & Crematorium in Riverdale, Maryland
40 bodies
on top of each other, leaking fluid,
"Dear Lord," the letter reads. "This year you have taken away my favorite actor, Patrick Swayze, my favorite actress, Farrah Fawcett, my favorite singer, Michael Jackson, and my favorite salesman, Billy Mays. I just wanted to let you know that Chris Christie is my favorite governor."
the memo was confidential and the line was intended as a joke.
the memo was confidential and the line was intended as a joke.
al Qaeda
A Taliban leader
"finish the fight against al Qaeda and the Taliban."
Barack Obama's election
leader says Barack Obama's election will bring little change.
al Qaeda
building 12 houses in Enka Hills,
Warren Haynes'
"The political party is very keen to return power to civilians and transition to an all-inclusive democracy,"
Mamadou Tandja is said to be detained in a military camp
a collapse of talks between the government and the opposition over a recent referendum allowing the president
Desmond Tutu
more than 200
more than 200 people
The Nelson Mandela Foundation issued a statement condemning the "senseless violence"
22
2004,
Pakistani scientist
Rio de Janeiro, Brazil,
on a taxiway
on a taxiway
was empty at the time,
scheduled to land on Runway 27L (left),
about the next week or maybe a little bit longer."
19
a revolving cast of local greats,
New Orleans
New Orleans
he was assaulted by the supermodel Tuesday,
that he was assaulted by the supermodel Tuesday,
"apologize for his behavior"
Bronx.
Mary Procidano,
Sonia Sotomayor,
three Occupy Denver activists
three
tells the network he's "encouraged" by the results of last week's election.
8,000
200 sessions
Jesse Jackson
Iranian-American
Saberi,
Shirin Ebadi,
inconsistent water supply and a shortage of bathroom facilities.
abuses or the final months of the ethnic conflict
280,000 displaced Tamil civilians
more than 280,000
"The Lost Symbol,"
rare thriller writer
crackdowns on their citizens,
Iran and Belarus
crimes against humanity.
Hinckley,
Hinckley
video
drinking
mother
Van der Eem has been paid about $35,000 by the show
Miley,
the night 20 years ago when a euphoric wave of people power swept away the Berlin Wall and consigned the Cold War to history.
German Chancellor Angela Merkel
German Chancellor Angela Merkel
"It was worth fighting for,"
Benjamin Franklin's success in dealing with a British general.
pilot,
grandmother, mother and her child
"Two
Michaele Salahi's Facebook page
searching for documents related to a gas deal with Russia,
Naftogaz
7.1 percent
Google's Chrome browser continued to carve away share of worldwide browser usage from rivals
has been trying to rid the world of Internet Explorer 6,
Round Robin Bar and Scotch Bar
nearby World Bank.
The basement bar, Off the Record,
Round Robin Bar and Scotch Bar
Round Robin
purple Bar
a mint julep
It became a financial casino,"
banned the couple from having sex with each other,
the couple from having sex with each other,
John Deaves and his daughter Jenny
"I like simple hair and makeup."
"This is my favorite look of the three just because it's sexy but not overtly so,"
Glasgow Rangers
Humam Khalil Abu-Mulal al-Balawi
shortly after 9 a.m. ET
Virgin Islands and Puerto Rico
36.7
Felipe Calderon's
The PAN
PRI had 36.7 percent to 28 percent for Calderon's National Action Party
The PAN
Outpost Keating, a remote base in Nuristan province.
Facebook and NATO's International Security Assistance Force YouTube Channel.
a heavy attack.
long-hidden message has been discovered inside Abraham Lincoln's pocket watch,
wrote a short message on the metal inside the watch,
the message he carried in his pocket,"
distributing illegal prescription drugs.
aims "to assist burned children and
roadside bomb.
traditional demure image of the Japanese woman
Japanese
Manny Pacquiao
wresting the WBO welterweight title from Miguel Cotto
sixth world title at a different weight
lethal injection,
a taunting, profanity-filled letter
Several
Several
"I think you have to be passionate. You have to be sincere. You have to really believe in
is Senior Lecturer in Education and Public Policy at the Harvard Graduate
Blacks and Hispanics
food stamps
diet soda
it seemed to go away.
Emotional contagion.
stating that Mitt Romney's father was born in Mexico.
the live audience.
presidential debates
that would pay back billions of dollars
four million
Seven members
Seven members of a joint United Nations-African Union peacekeeping patrol
Seven
2007
Beverly Hills, California.
health reform can't succeed as long as there's a shortage of primary care doctors.
primary care doctors.
a shortage of primary care doctors.
can't succeed as long as there's a shortage of primary care doctors.
conducted more than 12 attacks since July.
included 45 men from al Qaeda in Iraq and 21 suspected terrorists from an umbrella group of al Qaeda
Alberto Espinoza Barron,
set off two grenades during a public celebration in September,
"it would be a mistake" to repeal the 1993 law that bars gay men and lesbians from revealing their sexual orientation, and prevents the military from asking about it.
"We find unity in our incredible diversity, drawing on the promise enshrined in our Constitution: the notion that we are all created equal, that no matter who you are or
gays and lesbians from openly serving in the armed forces.
8,000 people
A volcano in southwest Colombia
to deploy temporary clinics to south Louisiana to screen workers and relatives possibly affected by the oil.
Louisiana
Inter Milan
Didier Drogba
didn't win the people over,
bodies.
in Iraq.
propaganda, instilling fear, terrorizing."
the forsaken desert lands in Western Iraq.
"Afghan Star,"
"Tartil,"
quizzed by religious authorities and judged on how well they've memorized passages from the Quran, Islam's holy book.
alleged killings at a Nazi camp.
"Rue was a close and dear friend,"
to save the girl."
"I just wanted to save the girl."
whose right hand was amputated
ordered the Civil Rights Congress of Nigeria not to have forums on Twitter, Facebook or other sites discussing the 2000 punishment of Mallam Bello Jangebe,
the third Somali-American from the city of Minneapolis to head to Somalia and die there.
Al-Shabaab,
Bruce John Gotterup,
"You can imagine the toll it took on him and his family to have to fight three times in the course of a year, to feel that, OK, perhaps it's over
murder and racketeering
The son of the late Gambino family crime boss John Gotti
five Grammys
February 8,
vocalists.
everyday folks are taking on new
Ben Goldman,
superhero groups.
The United States
that those who have a gay friend or relative are more likely to support gay marriage.
the Northeast
Libyan leader Moammar Gadhafi and Ugandan President Yoweri Museveni
African media
Libyan leader Moammar Gadhafi and Ugandan President Yoweri Museveni
(CNN)
Porsche 911
used-luxury
of recommended used cars under $30,000.
used-luxury
"What will be done will be done. But leave me out of it, please. And to be perfectly frank with you that is the sort of answer I want to give,"
"I said to Brian Cowen, who is a friend of mine as you know, that I was sorry for them and how I was struck by the talent and vigor of the Irish team.
breast cancer, lymphoma,
a few dozen Indian college students took over the abandoned federal prison on Alcatraz Island and reclaimed it on behalf of a group they had just invented, called Indians of All Tribes.
Monita Rajpal
aviation.
Bruce Dickinson
rock legend with a passion for aviation.
Kebony
the boat-building industry,
Kebony
U.S. decking market,
next young megastars
"Hunger" co-star
Spike Lee
taking "an indefinite break"
sex scandal
Tiger Woods has changed his cell phone number and is not talking to some of
senior members of the government faked evidence for sodomy charges against him.
corruption and sodomy.
Anwar Ibrahim
for sodomy charges against him.
an investment-friendly, market economy.
Lech Walesa,
the Solidarity
Soviet
the creation of the Solidarity movement,
European
Tusk soon
Tusk
Polish Prime Minister Donald Tusk
Barcelona
Jordan Dasch, Anthony Hartford, Nicholas Hausch, Christopher Overton, Jose Pacheco and Kevin Shea
29,
was paralyzed from the neck down after a car accident
125,000 people
125,000 people
"Paying for People" report, published in February this year, said that poor countries are suffering because they
low level of healthcare
4.25 million doctors, nurses and health workers
7,800
Puerto Rico
to halt settlement construction in the Palestinian territory of the West Bank.
11-2 in favor
1984
1984
Ramenskoye
the 75th anniversary of the return of beer
75th anniversary of the return of beer
beer
breweries and associated businesses
BlackBerry, which contain built-in GPS technology,
BlackBerry
BlackBerry
to keep a smartphone
the vessel had been attacked by a ship with five armed people on board,
President Robert Mugabe,
more than 600
Rice
cholera
three
One person
three
It was not clear
bills and expenses and created a plan to help
nearly $80,000.
sold the second location of her video store, stopped using her credit cards and decided it was time
debt
embroidered patches and snow globes
cosmopolitanism, fashion scene,
leading the charge in innovative gear technology and design.
thriving cosmopolitanism, fashion scene, and underground culture.
had gone away. It hasn't.
Hundreds of flights into and out of Atlanta
Atlanta's Hartsfield-Jackson
FedExCup
Donald
Adam Scott
Hugo Chavez
a Venezuelan airfield,
Venezuela
Kaka
Real Madrid's
Democrats
criminals use assault weapons from the U.S.
Obama
Calderon in Mexico City
Great Depression
the Great Depression ... of 1873.
of survival.
today's economic crisis.
Scott Reynolds Nelson
got by because they had a
from 2002
CEO of an engineering and construction company
children of street cleaners and firefighters.
a government
creation of a "government cloud," in which public data will be stored on
a compilation of Web programs, tools and services
major disaster exists
5.1 feet from sea level height,
health care system that increases patient satisfaction and health care
can fill the access gap when patients have an acute problem
quality health care.
increasing the number of subspecialists was associated with higher costs and poorer
Kaczynski signed the
Fundamental Rights of the European Union,
the navy
7:45 p.m.,
4:50 p.m.,
"not to bother" human rights activists and journalists working at anti-government protests.
authorities
flooding
new village.
Students Helping Honduras,
Nominations are open at CNN.com/Heroes
how to set up a prostitution business.
ACORN workers
"It just made you sick."
two people
Noor Faleh Almaleki,
she had become too 'Westernized'
Faleh Hassan Almaleki,
Canyon Ferry Lake in Montana,
leading British charities
British Red Cross, Oxfam, Save the Children and 10 other charities,
Glasgow office
the foyer of the BBC building in Glasgow, Scotland
Anil Kapoor:
Bollywood superstar Anil Kapoor
Mumbai,
Anil Kapoor
quiz show host Prem Kumar
Mumbai,
Indian
"broader
"Their investigation looks backward and is punitive. Ours looks forward and is preventive,"
A key congressional committee
a motley love- and drug-soaked tale of
diagnosed with colon cancer,
thousands of Zimbabwean children
The real draw is the superb spa, with its infinity pool and open-air mud lounge.
children,
"Journey for Change" mission
six months in prison
contempt charges
American Civil Liberties Union,
leave-no-synth-effect-behind R&B
cutting
"The Palme d'Or is the best prize a filmmaker can win,"
sagging ratings for the Academy Awards broadcast.
10
American Lindsey Vonn
weather,
Iraq
the ratings
girlfriend's 4-year-old son
"The knuckles across one hand were charred,"
Wednesday at 5:22 a.m. ET.
Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad,
Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad
two points clear of second-placed Roma,
Braddock, the poorest town in Western Pennsylvania,
that there's more work ahead.
someone will ask me where the man of the house is, implying that I'm staff,"
"When I'm opening the door of my own house, someone will ask me where the man of the house is, implying that I'm staff,"
wilds of Africa
petroleum and liquefied natural
Hillary Clinton
Luanda, Angola,
pictures of their "four- and sometimes three-legged friends at home,"
Chen
a man introduces you gives good insight into the status of your relationship. If a man introduces you as a friend or
Kings of Comedy,
was charged with four counts of HIV transmission and two counts of statutory rape,
knowingly spreading the HIV virus
Ravalomanana shutting down Rajoelina's radio station
But the possibility of further
anti-government protesters
travel agent,
the travel agent,
FBI
Virginia home of Robert Kennedy's widow,
1968
he had found it among the papers left by his father,
installed strict Islamic law
the Taliban
Taliban surge
Pakistan
Yemen
a deal
fighting the wildfires raging
help with supplies and security
longest-serving doorman
Ed Trinka,
claims it was being cut out of the political process.
he organized a death squad targeting government and military officials,
bombings
89
Palermo,
long
the plane crash
Buffalo, New York.
make appointments, stop by the office, text medical questions and even send photos of their injuries
Health Care Cooperative,
"I would call him a pioneer in health care, I would call him a pioneer as a human being, and also as a doctor,"
VBS.TV
"Beats digging ditches."
in Geronimo, Oklahoma.
Lester Williams Hobbs,
parked RV
has shown that he is willing to endanger his country, potentially leaving it in the hands of someone who simply has no business being a heartbeat away from the most powerful, complicated, difficult job in human history.
the automaker no longer has any models that require premium grade
is extremely powerful, and it's that movement that's having neurological impact on the autistic child,"
his son's language skills
horse,
language skills
Sheikh Issa bin Zayed al Nahyan appears to burn with rage.
half-brother of the country's ruler.
Afghan grain dealer.
a nuclear deal with the United Arab Emirates
reduce greenhouse gas
carbon trading systems
higher prices of the bigger bras was unfair.
surcharge on its larger lingerie.
surcharge on its larger lingerie.
Hispanics
issue of immigration
making immigration reform a priority if they reach the White House,
immigration reform?
More than 9 million Hispanics
deep interest in immigration reform,
Sen. John McCain
40 percent
Hispanics,
Taliban
"The evidence that we have now developed shows the Pakistani Taliban directed this plot,"
U.S. counterterrorism efforts had degraded the ability of groups such as al Qaeda and the Taliban to launch successful attacks.
working with the
losing interrogation opportunities by giving Miranda warnings to terrorism suspects,
Lagerfeld
last few years
Somalia's capital city
nearly 34,000
an interpretation of sharia, or Islamic law.
"American Idol" finalist
continued to pursue her music. Her "8th World Wonder" was a big hit, making the Top 10
steadily
placed third
to his leg.
Mogadishu,
Thursday
Thursday
shrapnel wounds
without success,
-- Kate O'Leary
I am not sure if he can do it.
Simon Cowell's
Simon Cowell's
Simon Cowell,
Christopher Speight,
a hastily pecked keystroke with a bad result
Cristiano Ronaldo
FIFA World Player of the Year
eight
Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner
more than 54%
Saturday,
in the country's north.
Sri Lankan army launched an operation against Tamil rebels
children trapped in the escalating fighting
Janis Spindel Serious Matchmaking,
"The Millionaire Matchmaker"
Some appeared fresh; others older, he said. The new ones could have resulted from the IVs that paramedics used when they tried to revive Jackson
prescription drugs
"paper white skin. As white as a white T-shirt."
Internet
a sensitive manual outlining screening procedures for law enforcement officers, diplomats, prisoners, federal air marshals and others.
Apple shaved hundreds of dollars off
a recession-prompted price war.
a recession-prompted price war.
custody
random drug tests
in July.
Sofia Vergara
the extensive contamination left behind
Barron
celibacy sets the priest apart as a symbol of the world to come.
Married life is spiritually suspect;
an "act of aggression."
the wife of former world boxing champion Arturo Gatti
the wife of former world boxing champion Arturo Gatti
staying in the northeast seaside resort of Porto de Galihnas.
$700 billion
about $135 billion
November 14, 2008,"
hit hard by worries about capital requirements
Newberry at the Louis Rich turkey processing plant,
followed a trail of blood and human tissue nine miles to the trailer park
Louis Rich turkey processing plant,
Robinho
Manchester City
1000
jumped on top of the other train.
those who have a greater "reserve" do not
Alzheimer's
with a stable mood and better capacity to handle stressful situations without anxiety
should emphasize not Negro History, but the Negro in history.
Black History Month.
wooded area
killing his wife,
in civilian court
a village near Peshawar
at least 900 others
it's possible that legacy iDevice models could employ the technology as well.
an integrated projector for iDevices
needs $5 billion of your tax money because it, too, has been hit by the economic downturn.
Seeks Federal Bailout."
porn industry
adult entertainment industry
Texas
"Desperate Housewife"
"Desperate Housewife"
espadrille wedges.
American
its employees
weekend killings of eight civilians during
of averages,
Osama bin Laden
Given the hundreds of billions of dollars that the "war on terror"
six
Sunday's
Tyler Peterson
"Playing dead until Peterson left, Neitzel survived," Attorney General J.B. Van Hollen said.
food companies,
President Robert Mugabe's
Zimbabwe
the big hotel chains
was declared illegal and many Sunni Arabs lost their government jobs.
first English Premier League managerial casualty of the season
in June 2008,
a bill to extend coverage to the uninsured while helping those already with coverage will pass this year.
Friday
Democratic representative
Grand Junction, Colorado,
while he was in a federal prison serving time for
abducting a different woman
charges of kidnapping and rape
Conjoined
Conjoined
The boys
Bruce William Carter,
Ardipithecus ramidus,
common ancestor.
he was not aware he had been identified as participating in the project and would not be involved in any effort to examine the purported
Klein's
rubber,
harping" on personal responsibility in the wake of the latest claim of inattention by an air traffic controller
was watching a movie while on duty --
was unable to sleep.
a sworn affidavit
heavy flannel or wool
1946.
oldest documented bikinis
1,700 year old Roman mosaic
out of either heavy flannel or wool
24-year-old
Powers
in a Yale medical research building
Henry Allingham
$170.2 million,
Mission: Impossible -- Ghost Protocol
70
south of New York City.
Switzerland
forced to retire with a hamstring injury
injuries
we'll move on with our investigation,"
366 cartograms (statistical maps)
Atlas of the Real World,
some of the prosecution's witnesses didn't seem trustworthy.
"There was not one decision we made that was based only on witness testimony."
"There was not one decision we made that was based only on witness testimony."
The possible sighting of Brittanee Drexel was on a bus Wednesday morning in the Myrtle Beach area, according to police, who later showed photos of her to passengers.
passengers.
high school and college students on spring break.
Myrtle Beach, South Carolina,
Myrtle Beach, South Carolina,
the ADE651,
the device, known as the ADE651,
at checkpoints in Iraq and Afghanistan
The 53-year-old unidentified suspect,
Sharlto Copley
"District
South Africa
foreign-born
restrictive immigration legislation
42 metric
it would not allow the Buganda king to travel to an area inhabited by a renegade rival group.
13
strange kind of horror movie,
the controversial collapse of his much-hyped showdown with Manny Pacquiao.
under the Olympic-style random blood testing drug protocols
authorities
state's attorney
found the bodies of Sheri Coleman and the children, Garret, 11, and Gavin, 9,
the bedrooms of their two-floor home in the St. Louis suburb of Columbia, Illinois,
a gym
more than 1,000
Richard Serino, deputy administrator for the Federal Emergency Management Agency,
1,000 first responders
he was "disappointed" with the ruling, and that the Justice Department would file the appeal next week.
dismissal of charges against
a WFP vehicle and drove away, then pushed the corpse from
Mohamud Omar Moallim,
a body double.
put on some weight
The midfielder is a hero in his home country, not only for captaining the national team, but also for flying the flag for Korean football abroad thanks to a string of lung-busting performances for one of the world's most famous club sides.
three of the victims remained
Tuesday's
broken up one of the largest auto theft cases in the U.S.
F350 Super Duty turbo diesel truck, turned out to be a stolen "clone."
the $27,000 loan.
members of the Westboro Baptist Church
a 10-month freeze
West Bank village of Yasuf.
West Bank village of Yasuf.
Munir al-Abboushi,
Il Divo
20th year of publication,
underage girl,
$8,000
10 years in prison for sexually assaulting an underage girl,
the pro-government Basij militia
A defiant
Iranians
smacked their batons against their shin guards, making loud cracking sounds that seemed like gunshots, the witnesses said.
Merseyside
men arrested
Metropolitan Police Assistant Commissioner Bob Quick
British
Rashid Rauf,
earliest efforts to regulate alcohol.
hydrometer
Nebraska
safe-haven law
hemorrhage, pre-eclampsia,
hundreds of poor, rural and indigenous pregnant women are dying because they are being denied the same health services as other women in the country.
185 in every 100,000
as between one man and one woman.
as between one man and one woman.
outside the Libyan Embassy in central London.
over the weekend,
his homeland
Russia
Polish President Lech Kaczynski,
Richard Thompson
can help people see past their particular favorite artists or genres and tap into the whole world of recorded music.
Moon,
couples exchange stuffed bears, chocolates and kisses.
third
Henin
third
David Letterman
David Letterman
to return to Haiti at the end of the month to start rebuilding the New Victorian School,
Livingston,
Livingston,
doesn't happen in the real world.
1,500 to 1,800 submissions a year of evidence,"
1932.
the federal government
Do not take on a total loan amount that exceeds the likely first-year earnings in your field.
The key document
arrests of 10 U.S. missionaries accused of taking a group of Haitian children out of the country
awful things, such as attacking and eating humans,
third Oscar nominee makes a remarkable cameo appearance,
touring the Harlem Children's Zone
Seeiso of Lesotho,
"fantastic."
coal miners.
may smooth the way for a unity government.
a Palestinian unity government
Salam Fayyad
Salam Fayyad has submitted his letter of
the FIFA vice president and the president of the Confederation of African Football
over the BBC claims.
International Olympic Committee (IOC)
nuclear
stage 4,
The "Watchcon" alert
"Defcon,"
surveillance alert
to police,
terrorist group
him to report daily to the police station nearest his home in Cala Rajada,
positive role model
"When sports stars use slurs, it is especially damaging because their increased public profile means many more people are exposed.
"These incidents provide a real opportunity for the NBA and MLB to take a strong stance against homophobia."
lobbing a similar slur at a fan
"Single Ladies (Put a Ring on It)."
two eldest children
25-minute
Somalia or Yemen,
Al-Shabaab fighters in Somalia
al-Zawahiri
Somalia or Yemen,
al-Zawahiri
with second-degree murder in the death of
at the offices of Bridges TV, the television network
accepted money from the rebels and had connections with Mexican drug gangs.
rebels
Raul Reyes
accepted money from the rebels and had connections with Mexican drug gangs.
Correa denied those
Nisa Muhammad and Dr. Rozario Slack
Three journalists from South Africa, Senegal and Kenya
The Tinkler
two counts of first degree murder
Alberto Contador
Andy Schleck,
"My relationship with Lance Armstrong is non-existent. Even if he is a great champion, I have never had admiration for him and I never will,"
Alberto Contador
Lance Armstrong
in education.
Mona Foundation,
The founder of the Mona Foundation actually knew my dad for years, and the more I learned about it, the more I realized I really found the perfect charity. It sponsors schools and educational initiatives all over the planet.
the way to change a society, to uplift people
Japan,
Noriko Savoie,
Japanese
Morrey
Activists
large group of protesters
outside the White House
Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation
promote condom use
"a body or bodies,"
are seeking witnesses and more possible victims.
1995 and possibly beyond,
multiple child sexual abuse charges
'You sound pretty good for white cats,'
'Always play the melody, man. Look at them, see their age group, play their love songs, and you'll carry all the money
his trumpet.
Sheikh Ahmed bin Saeed Al-Maktoum,
took Tyson's crown
"There has been some talk between us,"
"Although we cannot control the weather or the circumstances, we agreed that we needed to have done
members of the flight crew began snapping at passengers.
$27,500 per passenger
"is the wrong man"
A procedural not-guilty plea
Megan McAllister
no conclusions could be made yet,
the deaths of at least 1,000 Taliban prisoners
I've asked my national security team to do is to collect the facts for me that are known, and we'll probably make a decision in terms of how to approach it once we have all of the facts gathered up,"
investigate a CIA-backed Afghan warlord over the killings of hundreds of Taliban prisoners in 2001.
Census Bureau defines an individual as poor if they make less than $11,139 a year.
success.
Taliban.
Afghanistan
Thursday's vote
"combination" technology.
less cost than conventional electricity
Alaska Ranger
The trawler had 47 people on board,
crew members
One person is still unaccounted for,
The 180-foot processing trawler
in the frigid waters off Alaska's Aleutian Islands
One
"Deal or No Deal,"
irregular heartbeat,
in Toronto,
unconfirmed
captured
in the final days of World War Two.
details could be captured for "improper uses,"
Tampa, Florida."
the Gambino crime family.
John "Junior" Gotti,
Tuesday afternoon
an application for statehood to the Security Council,
Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu
her head and hand
testing
on March 19
news editor
Zambia
attacking 29
Ravalomanana
$25 to $30.
$5 baggage
$30.
will jump from $25 to $30.
$20 if prepaid online.
$20
went on a surreal shooting rampage
be uploaded on the Web site YouTube daily,
to allow cameras in a federal courtroom to document a challenge
Turkey, Saudi Arabia and Qatar,
nuclear power
device in 1974
he called flawed legislation before the vote.
French player
the goal that gave his team a 2-1 aggregate victory Wednesday against Ireland.
"Funny People,"
"Harry Potter and the Half-Blood Prince"
were ruled out of the tournament through injury.
Fernando Torres
Medecins San Frontieres workers,
Gunmen
in southwestern Somalia,
Gunmen
Zhuo Lin,
a former consultant of the Central Military Commission General Office,
"My father and mother did not just share a family, they shared political ideals and life pursuits,"
Natalya Estemirova,
Estemirova,
"Those who took away her life have no right to be called humans, they don't deserve any mercy,
human rights abuses
not guilty
"We took things he said obviously at face value and
in connection with killings that occurred in the 1990s,
a shed and other outbuildings
Moammar Gadhafi's home
a large conference
rolling billboard for Jobing.com,
that 57 percent of the
a rolling billboard for Jobing.com,
Infiniti sport-utility vehicle,
Misha Di Bono says people used to make fun of her rolling billboard. She gets $500 a month and free gas.
survival suits
16-year-old victim
21
another teen,
teenagers
first secretary of the U.S. Interests section of the Swiss Embassy
as 100
eight counts of first-degree rape; four counts of second-degree rape; 14 counts of sexual exploitation of a child; and two counts of endangering the welfare of a child,
as 100
Irregular-shaped patches of brownish-yellow grass.
yellow-to-brown
aimed at drawing attention to the role powerful financial interests played in America's spiraling economy.
infection -- nausea, vomiting, fever, diarrhea and abdominal cramps
Nothing happens to me!"
he can attack a cantaloupe and U.S. government claims in a single motion.
"It's not in our fruit,"
Conference in Durban, exploring efforts to reduce carbon emissions in urban centers.
the
French Culture Minister Frederic Mitterrand
Mitterrand describes in detail a sexual encounter with a "boy" he said was called Bird.
"The Bad Life."
sexual tourism, which is a disgrace, and
"The people
"This is robbery. He went to rob the people. He went to steal money -- American dollars,"
won seven times
announced last year that he was returning to competitive biking
collarbone
returning to competitive biking and would use the Spanish race as a warm-up for the Tour de France,
James Dobson,
27
Pamplona, Spain,
University of Navarra
four
A car bomb
four
as a CEO of North Korea Inc.,"
Kim marks the third generation
third-generation dynasties
Kim Jong Un
rape.
kidnapping, burglary and strong-arm rape.
published in the New England Journal of Medicine.
a line worker at a Nissan plant,
capital murder
20 years
bankruptcy.
The five prisoners had been
Ashura
lawmakers
the public's overall view of the health care plan has held steady, with 46 percent supporting it and 50 percent opposed.
to repeal the health care legislation,
distance traveled non-stop
a Scottish football club in 1984.
Susan Boyle
style a classic 1980s perm, confidently
"Britain's Got Talent" singing sensation,
Cambodia,
living in shelters
"But before our departure yesterday, some Cambodian media misreported that our trip to Cambodia was to surrender because we were defeated,"
Bill Clinton and George H.W. Bush
whether he should have tried to get Saddam Hussein to leave office at the end of the first Gulf War in 1991.
witnessed a sickening trade in human life
Ciudad Juarez.
Maria
honor his memory by dedicating ourselves to continuing the work he loved so much."
an e-mail
made the world "immeasurably better,"
Tim Cook
a "celebration of Steve's extraordinary life for Apple employees
Topshop, Coast, NEXT
Russia;
close to 25 percent
One single Central Bank that governs and regulates
up to 100,000
Swiss Alps,
11:30 a.m. (5:30 a.m. ET) and about noon Sunday
avalanche buried one person
one
"The curators feel that it doesn't fit with the collections here at the National Museum of American History,"
an agreement to donate the brownish-green suit O.J. Simpson wore the day in 1995 that he
"The curators feel that it doesn't fit with the collections here at the National Museum of American History,"
war in Afghanistan
warns, the mission could fail, bringing a return of power to the Taliban.
a counterterrorism approach that focuses on combating al Qaeda through the use of unmanned drones and special forces without involving additional troops.
House Speaker Nancy Pelosi, Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid, House Minority Leader John Boehner, Senate Minority Leader Mitch McConnell and the heads of the Armed Services and Foreign Relations committees
mission
top congressional leaders from both parties
counterterrorism approach that focuses on combating al Qaeda through the use of unmanned drones and special forces without involving additional troops.
more than 3,500
any private or commercial airlines
barring any private or commercial airlines from the league's 22 member states from flying into or out of Syria.
League finance ministers
declared a state of emergency
"Today, on that third anniversary, we've got to be thinking about the future,"
Gulf War illness.
Gulf War
"complex of multiple concurrent symptoms"
a cartoon Elmo smoking a joint
cartoon Elmo smoking a joint
in high school.
younger than 18
high school.
Grace.
Hailey Dean, a psychology student
"The situation is very worrying,"
food
159
begun distributing food to tens of thousands of homeless flood victims.
waterborne
the bison
88
Ted Turner
88
Kelly Clarkson, Carrie Underwood, Ruben Studdard
Crystal Bowersox,
Janet Jackson, Alanis Morrisette, Joe Cocker and Christina
Janet Jackson, Alanis Morrisette, Joe Cocker
divorced Goldman and married a Brazilian lawyer.
would have given custody of a 9-year-old boy to the U.S. Consulate in Rio de Janeiro, where he was to be reunited with his American father.
September,
The White House invoked
The White House has
trying to protect the president's ability to receive candid advice and offered to let top aides discuss the firings only if they were not placed under oath and no transcript was taken.
testify Thursday.
Getty Images Gallery in a pop-up gallery at Westfield, London
working for an airline at Heathrow Airport
working for an airline at Heathrow Airport
Hollywood stars
Michael's estate of "keeping her in the dark."
her son's contracts
her son's contracts
his children.
2-week-old son, Aiden, and his wife, Effie
fire engulfed their Bryceville, Florida, trailer.
of his life in jail, without parole, for killing his wife with a hammer.
a hammer.
1981
number of non-footballing events,
controversial pitch at the new Wembley stadium
sweeping socio-economic
sweeping socio-economic
20-year
"I guess we can call this nonviolent chemical warfare,"
A team of surgeons in Spain
Ruben Navarrette
four years.
certain traits linked to leadership.
possibility of brain training and improving leadership skills.
an associate professor at the Carey School of Business at Arizona State University,
neuroscientific techniques to help people improve the skills
ski
Mongolia.
Branchville Correctional Facility near Tell City, Indiana,
truck, money
wine cask, a salvaged 727 airplane,
booze
a fleet of seven Airstream trailers,
Todd Benjamin
global health and care organization
why there are so few women at the top.
learn as much as you can and to make sure you've got the right experience, the right qualifications, and to enjoy each job for its own interest and job satisfaction.
113
militant fighters.
eastern Afghan region of Tora Bora,
Qaeda leader Osama bin Laden
Constance McMillen.
it was the birthplace of a foiled terrorist plot.
Newburgh,
scary.
United States,
runny nose, sore throat, nausea, vomiting
Two people
Brian Smith.
Jorge Lopez, 20,
made millions of dollars
Andrew Smulian,
warlords and militants,
was unconstitutional.
President Asif Ali Zardari,
that an amnesty that had protected politicians,
corruption and criminal charges,
offered to help the Americans with the paperwork required
Stephen Hawking
Stephen Hawking
Thursday 9 October: 1300, 1730 Saturday 11 October: 0700, 1730 Sunday 12 October: 0300, 0730, 1300
scientist Stephen Hawking
the world's greatest living scientist.
Sonic,
Sega
the 20th
polish the franchise's legacy and reverse the recent decline of Sonic's popularity, said
Sonic Team, has
Lebanese-owned
four freighters being seized over the past two
Brazil
an eventual U.S. withdrawal.
Eikenberry's
family members are not allowed.
Korean and American warships
the action in-and-around the golf course
"Follow the Sun,"
golf
drama of the action in-and-around the golf course
Vienna, Austria
The sikh guru's death
staging a "fight club" among residents,
alleged abuse at the Corpus Christi State School
offers advice about how the self-employed can best avoid being audited by the Internal Revenue Service.
offers his best advice for business people who work for themselves.
consider making a retirement plan contribution -- whether it's a traditional IRA contribution, a self-employed pension plan contribution, lots of different ways
produced a host of medical benefits including the ingestible thermometer pill.
a natural bottleneck
links the Indian Ocean to the South China Sea and Pacific Ocean
place in an unlikely spot:
rural Tennessee.
The Elephant Sanctuary.
2,700-acre
three
doing 37 mph in a 35-mph
35-mph
Petty Officer Jon Moore
four origami flowers and a letter
light-welterweight crown
Pacquiao
Manny Pacquiao
Philippines,
best pound-for-pound boxer in the world,
Crack down on the illegal pirating of movies, music and other copyrighted material.
Crack down on the illegal pirating of movies, music and other copyrighted material.
American consumers from dangerous counterfeit products.
that it planned to reopen Pianura,
army
I'm sorry I'm not a more regular woman.
pressures placed upon him by "certain people in his life"
Lakewood,
Clemmons' family and friends
Investigators
fix the bug.
allow hackers to steal financial and personal
in 1997's "She's So Lovely" and 1998's "Hurlyburly," and both are set to appear in Barry Levinson's next
it is possible that Serrano was beaten "because of the fact he is a Latino male, and a lot of these people are immigrants."
"Terminator:
canceled for inadequate ratings.
"Terminator: The Sarah Connor Chronicles."
Princess Nikky Onyeri
Nigeria's
wrong diagnosis of cancer
The Colur Tyme Tattoo Parlor
The Colur Tyme Tattoo Parlor
such gang activity is spreading across the nation,
more than two years,
U.S. soldier
U.S.
Afghanistan
the Taliban,
U.S.
of fatally shooting his twin sisters,
tip from a television viewer
tip from a television viewer
Merhige
Monroe County motel
Merhige had checked into the Edgewater Lodge motel under the name John Baca and provided an address in Homestead, Florida,
strain of the swine flu virus
authority to prevent public gatherings, shut down public venues and regulate air, sea and overland travel.
John Dillinger,
John Dillinger,
$4.7 million per vessel,
Over the past four years, the average ransom has risen from $600,000 to $4.7 million per vessel,
to keep much of that evidence out of court.
Barry Bonds,
a recording of a phone conversation with an associate in which Anderson "describes injecting the defendant, having the ability to obtain and utilize inside information about MLB's random drug testing to the defendant's benefit and the undetectable nature of
Bonds' attorneys
Steroid test results and notes and calendars
Poland
20
sex scandal
sexual misconduct
using the power of his office to extract sex from a female job seeker.
between Bermuda and the U.S. East Coast over the weekend.
East
3
dad
designer logos and promise craftsmanship from materials such as sapphire and stainless steel,
$6,000
Luxury phones
"Slumdog Millionaire"
Best Film award.
Iraq
India, Myanmar, Thailand, Indonesia
two hours later.
in a "game of politics."
Roxana Saberi.
arrest
journalist Roxana Saberi.
Saberi,
Tom DeLay
by 18 months last
Brittany Zimmerman's screams and struggle for her life
a stranger.
U.S. Army Brig. Gen. Joseph Anderson,
fired indiscriminately, killing as many as 20
Deputy Defense Secretary Gordon England
its employees responded properly to an insurgent attack on a convoy.
post-election violence
11
Robert Wiles,
Orlando, Lakeland or Melbourne.
in Florida, either in Orlando, Lakeland or Melbourne.
50,000
in Winnenden, a small town about 20 kilometers (12 miles) northeast of Stuttgart, and spread to neighboring Wendlingen.
the African meningitis belt from east- to west-sub-Saharan Africa.
unpacks a little
unpacks a little
crisscrossing the country promoting her platform of community service.
88 consecutive
UCLA
contagious disease
I am not planning to get married any time soon,"
actress,
killed at least 22 people and left more than 3,500 residents homeless,
33
shook southern Iceland on Thursday, reportedly causing injuries and damaging
"put an immediate stop to the witch-hunting campaign."
1,000
felony charges of burglary with assault,
promised a smaller government budget but raises for public workers.
Ricardo Martinelli,
"An attitude of change starts today."
combat drug trafficking in the region,
January 1, 2006,
Gazprom
it had cut supplies to Ukraine Thursday.
Gazprom
Helen Suzman,
Suzman's
apartheid."
They ranged from 3 feet to 10 feet in diameter,
Federal Flight Deck Officers
capping the number of armed pilots.
Donald Trump and Joan Rivers attend "The Celebrity Apprentice" season finale Sunday in New York.
Joan Rivers'
Donald Trump and Joan Rivers
Dennis Rodman, Tom Green
The Hemi Jet
Chevrolet
Central Authority,
She never returned, instead remarrying there
military relationship,
Russia and Georgia
"share common security interests,"
to put down their weapons and "never aim" firearms at the Egyptian people.
Cairo's Tahrir Square
weapons
the overhaul to ensure that health insurance is available to the 46 million Americans currently without coverage while preventing costs to both the government and individuals from continuing to climb.
46 million Americans
make more progress'
seeks the overhaul to ensure that health insurance is available to the 46 million Americans currently without
U.S. Border Patrol Agent Robert Rosas
The men were wanted by American authorities,
as brothers Jose Eugenio Quintero Ruiz, 49, and Jose Evodio Quintero Ruiz, 43.
incumbent on us as an agency to attempt to re-interview them and establish whether this is in fact a hoax or actual event,"
began to group themselves on the wings to stay out of the frigid water.
crawling over the seats."
crawling over the seats."
Hudson River.
brace for a landing,
Andrea Pirlo
Vivienne Tam
mother
early '80s
are very powerful about the Holocaust,
"I would be very disappointed in the intelligence level of Hollywood if it gave the best picture award to 'The Reader,'
colon cancer
Philippines,
10-day
10-day mourning period
Teterboro Airport
FAA to establish a special flight rules area,
York City; require vertical separation between helicopters and airplanes in these SFRAs; require pilots to complete specific training on the SFRA requirements before flight within the area; and conduct a review of other airspace configurations where specific pilot training and familiarization would improve safety.
NTSB Chairman Deborah Hersman
small plane and a sightseeing helicopter,
eastern part of Bermuda
Bermuda,
lifetime achievement as a musician,
lifetime achievement as a musician,
"Tinkers" was awarded in
Hank Williams
the driver
Patrick Tracy Burris,
suspect in five slayings
North Carolina
five
Carolina died in a shootout with police in neighboring North Carolina on Monday,
"We believe a killer is off the streets,"
actor
thrillers,
the option of having baptisms for their children
the option of having baptisms for their children at the same time.
lost my title,
boat-people were "whipped" by Thai guards
on a tourist beach
checkups measuring weight, body fat and flexibility.
ranks workers
"Please believe me, no amount of money will ever compensate us for Gordon's loss,"
bilingual officers
Charles Barkley
Barkley, 45, pleaded guilty last month to misdemeanor drunken-driving charges stemming from a New Year's Eve arrest after
hardest to get things right.
tried his hardest to get things right. Accuracy mattered enormously.
conservative
desire to continue slavery
a policy of engagement,
"China is a different matter."
"gotten the balance right"
President Bush's battle against Islamic terrorism and the war in Iraq
social liberal and a Democratic activist,
lit up Broadway and filled the big screen, it also inspired others to action.
Casa de Campo International Airport in the Dominican Republic
the single-engine Cessna 206 went down,
Crosby Stills & Nash, Crue Fest 2, Def Leppard with Poison and Cheap Trick, Jason Mraz, Kid Rock & Lynyrd Skynyrd, Incubus, New Kids on the Block, Nine Inch Nails and Jane's Addiction, Phish, the Dead, Rascall Flats with Darius Rucker, the Allman Brothers Band, the Fray and the Killers.
lawn seats at amphitheaters,
"will give us greater flexibility in how we promote, market and sell tickets to events,"
Aerosmith, Blink-182, Coldplay, No Doubt, Nickelback, Depeche Mode, Toby Keith, Brad Paisley
extra service fees
1959
stranger
Perdido Bay.
2.7 million people in the United States have epilepsy, and that it costs some $15.5 billion in medical care and lost or reduced earnings or productivity each year.
1.65 percent
normal activity of the brain
One in six (16.1 percent) adults with active epilepsy
adults with active epilepsy with
a condition in which the normal activity of the brain malfunctions, causing recurrent seizures
Justice Sandra Day O'Connor
chemotherapy
cancer
water,
remain in shelters
Tens of thousands of people
population subject to natural disasters
those that you yourself received.
re-gifting is tacky!
about $200,
won't be breaking any etiquette rules by splitting
high-dollar gift with a fellow guest.
who am I going to leave my kids with?"
West African nation,
Nigeria's
declared war against the government
western Niger Delta region
"Watchmen"
1986 and 1987
is complete and set for release Friday,
to build 500 play parks in
Valentine's Day fundraiser
to build 500 play parks in her native Russia.
return to profitability and repay the money provided them.
detailed disclosures and strategic planning
automakers
The charter mandated the English king to cede certain basic rights to his citizens, ensuring that no man is above the law.
bringing Mellencamp, 58, into the race.
Facebook group
a likeable rock star
the draft campaign.
"never expressed overt interest in running for anything,"
John Mellencamp
something that you hope is unique, then patience and stamina, thick skin and a kind of stupidity, a mule-like stupidity, is
"Heath just died. Can you help me?"
intelligence sharing.
Huntington,
"We're monitoring Hanna, but it seems to be a heavy rain event,"
at least 137
4 to 6 inches
60
the search warrant
someone who was "unresponsive and not breathing,"
a painter
first-degree murder.
The Denver Broncos
Minnesota Vikings
an internationally recognized super brand capable of attracting the world's best players and broadcast around the planet.
fan's
not only survived but within a few years had reinvented itself, in the elite "Premier League" division of the country's top clubs at least, as an internationally recognized super brand capable of attracting the world's best players and broadcast around the planet.
would have a transformative effect on
a curfew from 8 p.m. to 6:30 a.m.
Capt. Moussa Dadis Camara
Big hotel chains such as InterContinental, Swiss-Belhotel International and Accor have recently announced plans to build
more than 350 economy and express
Asia, Latin America and the Middle East
U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon
MOGADISHU, Somalia
civilians
having the House pass the bill that was already approved in the Senate and then dealing with a package of additional reforms through reconciliation.
Democrats
$20 million
More than $20 million
his family and himself
Stephanie Parente's father
The redevelopment of Battersea Power Station
"spectacularly, riotously, extravagantly nuts,"
$8 billion redevelopment including shops, homes, a hotel, offices and a striking 300 meter eco-tower.
Keith Garner,
redevelopment of Battersea Power Station
task force formed to combat drug violence
hit by shrapnel,
Ampatuan,
Akmad Ampatuan, the vice governor of Maguindanao; Anwar Ampatuan, the mayor of Sherif Auguak,
firearms and vehicles
onto the college campus.
Technological Institute of Higher Learning of Monterrey,
Some of the criminals had fled onto the college campus.
customers
$25 each way.
to check a second bag will be $25 each way.
begin charging domestic passengers
one checked bag.
a cord connected to the treadmill,
hidden dangers in the home.
withdraw
tax records
lost puppy
Maruca Kovac
Debora Maruca Kovac,
umpire
Weber
major-league pitcher.
The Republik of Mancunia
a growing chorus of conservative
fourth seed
You Want to Cultivate Peace, Protect Creation,"
it is imperative that mankind renew and strengthen that covenant between human beings and the environment,
Pope Benedict XVI
all the codes,
codes,
Trusted Friends.
Unseeded
and Georgia each blamed the other for starting the conflict, and accused each other of a variety of offenses leading up to and during the fighting, including ethnic cleansing.
five
about 850 people
850
calls for official apologies
June 12
the disputed June 12 presidential vote,
failed to alert others to
Seven
Democratic Republic of
December 8
Harry Connick Jr. and Renee Zellweger
just a nice day at work,"
the off-camera friendship with his co-star made the on-camera experience an enjoyable one.
"New In Town"
necessary therapy.
President Obama's "renewed commitment to Afghanistan."
U.S.
pull them out by 2011.
State Department
John Coleman
Macau that he does not care about politics or succeeding his father.
The rules governing transfer of power in the secretive communist nation
leadership
we believe that leadership is an indispensable ingredient.
heroin in his shoe,
remain wary of their surroundings
Al Qaeda
attacks in the country.
Manchester United's
"Gospel Dream."
"Gospel Dream."
2003.
100
New York Times Square ball
about a million
the Gulf of Aden,
Mark Webber
caffeine within 8-10 hours of bedtime.
more than a third
more than a third
chronic medical conditions such as diabetes or hypertension,
Chrysler/Dodge/Jeep
"crash avoidance"
Rear Cross Path
the best thing for FAMU.
FAMU's board of trustees,
university President James Ammons
"the new Hotmail."
short-lived because soon after,
the brand's image,
Hotmail
Gmail
Marius
merger of BHP and Billiton,
"doing the writeup now - Tony Blair and his cockroaches are getting owned tonight. - War IS Terror."
pork producers and those who use swine
"If we are sick and we come in here, we can easily transfer [diseases], especially flu, to these pigs,"
overalls and boots
H1N1 flu virus,
H1N1 flu virus,
third,
the best deals out there
Sunday.
lost his life
"Oprah: A Biography,"
unauthorized
the Bush family political dynasty, the British royal family, Frank Sinatra, Elizabeth Taylor, Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis and Nancy Reagan.
arrested Thursday in a sting operation, the
Undercover agents
September 11
September 11
inmate's claims of prior ineffective assistance of counsel, and related claims of innocence of the murder.
stay of execution
Almost half of the electricity produced in the United States comes from coal, which is cheap, plentiful and secure.
creating such solutions will not be cheap.
$35 per ton,
They named it Tsuyoshi,
Tsuyoshi to its resident bear,
moderate, modern Pakistanis
Sunday
did not
Kurdistan Gas City
Dana Gas and Crescent Petroleum,
on September 21.
industrial, residential and commercial buildings
industrial, residential and commercial buildings
epic environmental damage, havoc to lives and livelihoods, political tumult, huge economic losses and an incessant media drumbeat.
Myrtle Beach, South Carolina,
Brittanee Marie Drexel's mom
recession
$3,000 per day.
Special Advisor to the Foreign Minister,
Los Zetas drug cartel
Its name is Los Zetas.
Mexico
illegal immigrants
vans
your kids.
Dmitry Medvedev
the greatest tenor of his time,
community centers
Colorado Springs,
economic downturn.
taxpayers'
wind,
26.
and left more than two dozen people dead.
a "lack of restraint on all sides."
would be no different.
New Orleans
Dave Eggers,
United States
50,000
Jose Mourinho
were working there in between tours of duty
a lightweight Kevlar protective vest
rapes of young women and men are a widespread, common practice in the Islamic Republic.
Twitter group
Gordon Brown
Britain's NHS.
Dixie Carter, best known for her role as Julia Sugarbaker on the TV show "Designing
her role as Julia Sugarbaker
Mozart's father,
by Mozart's father,
concerto in G
more than 600
Mozart's father, Leopold,
in the files at the International Mozarteum Foundation
Prince Andrew
"occasions when people in the U.K. would wish that those in responsible positions in the U.S. might listen and learn from our experiences."
the United States might have been better off had its leaders learned from the British experience with colonialism before invading Iraq.
those comments controversial
13
at least 13 people
Jennifer Hawke-Petit.
the tragic events
the tragic events at his Cheshire, Connecticut, home on July 23, 2007,
wife and two daughters.
Curt Knox and Edda Mellas
the Kercher family
Amanda Knox
nothing like the person they've seen depicted
Knox's
Monday at 10 a.m.,
beginning Monday at 10 a.m.,
Detroit
Detroit, Michigan,
Caylee Anthony,
the child's death will be listed as homicide by undetermined means,
"the same answers as everyone who has been assigned to investigate and prosecute this case"
last year.
"for violations that directly contributed to the deaths of six miners last year,"
Insufficient pillar support and activity in areas that should not have been mined
Utah
Screen Actors Guild
telephone repair workers
James O'Keefe and three co-defendants
entering federal property under false pretenses for a January incident
fined $1,500, placed on probation and ordered to do community service,
$1,000
federal charges related to the sale of the phony Picasso,
Pablo Picasso's 1902 pastel, "The Woman in the Blue Hat."
charges related to the sale of the phony Picasso,
in the Libyan cities of Ajdabiya and Misrata Sunday,
Tripoli
Libyan cities of Ajdabiya and Misrata
Libyan
159,000
Hong Kong,
jetliners nearly collided over
near-collision
It's the oldest trick in the political playbook: Call together a "summit" of fancy
welcome immigrants who are job generators.
Austin, Minnesota,
The cause of the accident was not immediately known,
in Northwood, Iowa.
new president of Pakistan
the new president of Pakistan
Netherlands.
Chile
Aung San Suu Kyi
Suu Kyi's two helpers
violating immigration laws and trespassing.
Microsoft's "Halo" series.
the final say about whether a storyline for new games, books and other media fits with "the Halo canon,"
"Halo"
of the Xbox 360's processor,
suicide bombers.
rehabilitate the boys
to be suicide bombers.
its charter
in Glasgow, Scotland
last July
no traces of the toxic
least 50 officers and civilians
assure frightened women and children it was safe to come out.
hit by a string of arsons
arson
arson incidents,
volunteer firefighters
in Coatesville,
Heavy Load
disabled people
"anarcho-garage-punk"
disabled gig-goers
fight for the rights of disabled
"anarcho-garage-punk"
two
"A total of seven died on our property,"
Fourteen
International Polo Club Palm Beach in Florida.
has not been determined,
extreme weather,
major carriers cancelled thousands of flights that stranded tens of thousands of passengers.
emergency disaster declaration for all the state's 77 counties,
flights
the first lady and Jay Leno
get her hooked on Twitter.
join the European Union and adopt the euro as its
Yoshiro Mori,
the first head of state to be hosted by the new administration.
Japanese Prime Minister Taro
President Barack Obama
Japanese Prime Minister Taro Aso
both sides "to exercise maximum restraint."
Israeli military and a Lebanese army official.
western Galilee region of northern Israel,
open spaces in the western Galilee region of northern
CNN Hero of the Year
chemical odor from an overheated battery system,
just over an hour after it began,
Music festivals
several cities across Australia
off the coast of the southern state of Chiapas.
he was arrested four times
he has refused
"Good Morning America."
Ramsey,
in the basement of her home in Boulder, Colorado,
John and Patsy Ramsey
Twelve
Center for Labor Market Studies at Northeastern University in Boston, Massachusetts,
"In the current global economy, having at least a high school diploma is a critical step for avoiding poverty, and a college degree is a prerequisite for a well-paying job,"
Latino or black,
U.S. Census Bureau American Community Surveys,
compatible with Apple's wireless features.
Pioneer Electronics,
Apple
Rahman
its detail
more than a quarter of the
provide infrastructure and quality education,
April 6.
"a country that in many ways represents the heart of the Arab world,"
President Obama
run the gamut from scientists to accountants to auto mechanics. In addition, the bureau said it wants to hire 850
$35,000 per year.
In 42 years
HMS Victory
HMS Victory
they have solved "one of the greatest mysteries in naval history"
world's first International
and the water level is raised or lowered in order to raise or lower the vessel to adjust to elevation changes.
Roland S. Martin
Roland Martin
Roland Martin
Roland S. Martin
in his pool
Nicolas Sarkozy,
Americans
Ciudad Juarez
to be even more compelling to me, if that was possible. Instead, I found the new characters too one-dimensional. I didn't emotionally bond with any of them
HBO,
Robert A. Harding,
nomination with Harding by her
Monday
bilking millions of dollars
in prison
105
the party.
Sarah Palin
take your names out of the running.
2,500 troops until 2011 so long as NATO contributes more troops to Kandahar.
contributes more troops
France
send a battalion of troops to eastern Afghanistan,
mission in Afghanistan
HIV infections,
site in Zheijiang Province were found to be carrying the highest levels
From its debut on November 10, 1969,
education, in all its forms.
massive reductions of federal spending before any consideration of new taxes is brought to the table.
Nkrumah-Acheampong,
it's important to not allow our fears to stand in the way of our opportunities.
his resignation.
speaker of Britain's House of Commons,
was sentenced to some property forfeiture,
international watchdog Transparency International.
the 2009 survey
they are fragile, unstable and scarred by war or long-standing conflicts.
late April
late April exhibition of 250 works by Picasso,
should
at least three legal
Proposition 8,
California Supreme Court.
"There could still be people locked into compartments ... where they can't physically move because of the twisting of the metal,"
you can celebrate the storming of the hated prison, symbol of repression and aristocratic excess.
Paris
Paris
Bastille Day,
There were no immediate reports of damage or injuries.
in a heavily wooded area in Norman, outside Oklahoma City,
murder
Fidel Castro
head of the Communist Party,
prisoners
President Yoweri Museveni
At least 21 people
the government said it would not allow the king to travel to an area inhabited by a renegade rival group.
The show
David Manaway,
Dlamini-Manaway, her sister and a cousin met
participated in "death flights"
Poch and Sisul Hess
not enough sound evidence
to support routine screening of children for autism,
after Sheila lost her government job.
Sheila Wash
"My life, my world is crumbling like a pack of cards right before me,"
allow the execution of a pregnant woman.
the death penalty,
Laos
iTunes
changed the business of music,
Pixar's
crashed his car into an oncoming vehicle.
At least ten
Shortly after midnight on January 24,
10
Los Angeles suburb of Covina,
his former wife, Sylvia Ortega Pardo, and her family
The curtain
M240 machine gun
of Gdynia
machine gun
stroke of the pen,
tireless worker spending late hours in her chambers or on projects like the college course: A tough decision-maker who would pick apart any lawyer foolish enough to come to court unprepared; a thoughtful jurist whose years as an aggressive prosecutor endeared her to law enforcement even as she developed a reputation as a social liberal; and a child of the Bronx who maintained a heart for people from all walks of life as she ascended to the legal world's loftiest positions.
Judge
six-month jail term and a fine of 22,500 euros ($32,410)
Aurelien Hamelle
down to 2.5 children per woman, and it continues to fall.
mid-October,
between 30 percent and 50 percent
admissions,
September.
Frank Vigh-Larsen
persuade people to listen to warnings about climate change
Moscow
basic conservative philosophy was changing. "It
churches should stay out of politics,
TED2010 conference
into a state of suspended animation for up to 24 hours
suspended animation
no
of the season.
Ukraine
cellar
24 years
energy for 15,000 homes.
Portuguese
2.25 megawatts of
Of the 56 animals released Tuesday night, only a grizzly bear, two monkeys and three leopards were taken alive,
one of the big cats
is the most energetic, busy little almost-2-year-old,"
"We are so excited,"
Duggar,
her nails
Seattle's Central Library
bold architectural plans,
the iconic CCTV headquarters in Beijing
Atlanta area
bass guitar player Jeff Ament and a band employee were
"suffered some lacerations" on the back of his head
some lacerations" on the back of his head
violent separatist
The April 10
Russia
an automated warning system sounded the alarm several times before the Tupolev-154 crashed in western Russia.
the National HIV/AIDS
Southeast
You see them link hands and run in a circle while singing a
precious and beautiful
to beer festivals
affects one in six
Sunday night
Neugebauer
that the bill would not change existing limits on federal funding for abortion.
once the nation's largest Muslim charity
they were found guilty of aiding a militant Palestinian organization.
Holy Land Foundation for Relief and Development
coordinated explosions
just days after the final U.S. troops withdrew.
10th July
2010,
diagnosed with skin cancer.
comeback concerts in London
in perspective, draw a box from Houston to Chicago to New York City down to Jacksonville, Florida.
off Somalia's east coast
waters off Somalia's
blast at the Upper Big Branch Mine
Monsoon rain
Monsoon flooding
Sunday's
on Tuesday
rectified immediately.
defeated.
Maya Angelou
Buffalo,
That would have aggravated the situation rather than improving it,
monitoring tweets and other messages from people in Haiti and reports from those who
major earthquake
Palace
CNN
how the nation is recovering from the global economic recession.
first lady offering her tips
the loyalty of the Mehdi Army,
Muqtada al-Sadr
About 131,000 American
About 131,000
the Mehdi Army,
Wide Field and Planetary Camera
seven hours and 20 minutes,
Monday afternoon
Science Instrument Command and Data Handling Unit, a computer
two-day summit
U.S. Doctors for Africa
Billy Zane and Sharon Stone,
from African nations
his ex-wife.
the prize,
Lise Meitner,
was not warranted because she was not aware of the risk her pet posed.
$50 million in damages
a victory
161-6
complete three triple-centuries.
nurses to Haiti free of charge to help with relief efforts
nurses to Haiti free of charge to help with relief efforts
users also circulated a
U.S. government officials
August 2008
by civilians,
"There must be no doubt: as America's first Pacific president, I promise you that this Pacific nation will strengthen and sustain our leadership in this vitally important part of the world,"
U.S. President Barack Obama,
happens in Asia "has a direct effect on our lives at home."
attend the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation Forum.
Venus Williams
Serena in the final."
Tokyo Open
of match-fixing offenses.
increase the amount they save.
adopt a new generation of savings policies that are both innovative
government and employers
"I'm very versatile, but somehow I didn't earn the tag of being called a versatile actor,"
Urkel],"
in a trash bin behind Firehouse 27,
President Obama, Vice President Joe Biden, House Speaker Nancy Pelosi, Senate Majority Leader Harry Reid, Secretary of State Hillary Clinton and Attorney General Eric Holder
dedicated her life to civil rights
a massive first-innings
massive first-innings lead of 347 runs
one-off Test against tourists Bangladesh in Hamilton.
the future of John Hinckley Jr.,
hearing
McCain
243
American Airlines Flight
American Airlines
one of the Air Force's older aircraft,
A-10 Thunderbolt II,
A-10 Thunderbolt IIs,
20-year-old
September 2008.
Arsenal,
Vela, Eduardo, Sanchez Watt, Alex Song, Nicklas Bendtner, Denilson, Robin van Persie, Theo Walcott, Lukasz Fabianski, Aaron Ramsey and Jack Wilshere
Arsenal,
a plea deal that would have allowed him to avoid jail time.
allowed him to avoid jail time.
killed himself
Ace Young and Diana DeGarmo
Arsenal
Cesc Fabregas
Former Indonesian President
President Abdurrahman Wahid
in October 1999,
139
At least 139 people
6:13 p.m. Wednesday evening
in the tropical Cerrejon region of northern Colombia
the biggest snake ever to have lived on Earth.
"I took off today, Monday, and tomorrow to practice my routine
three women
killing three women and wounding 10 others in a suburban Pittsburgh gym,
fifth of vodka and a small bottle of Jack Daniels."
Jack Daniels."
Iranian opposition leader Mir Hossein Moussavi,
South Korea.
day of burgers and basketball on the pier in San Diego,"
USS Rentz
late Sunday or early Monday,
Claudette
Gulf of Mexico
Chris Brown
sources close to the couple told CNN the alleged victim was his girlfriend, singer Rihanna,
Dexter King
filed a counter
patients
"There are serious side effects
New York Mayor Michael Bloomberg,
10,000
Lt. Col. Jeffrey Chessani, the battalion commander, and 1st Lt. Andrew Grayson
up to two dozen
Dr. Conrad Murray,
The plot was uncovered in a yearlong investigation involving an FBI informant. It ended with federal agents and New York
of plotting to detonate explosives near two synagogues in the Riverdale section of the Bronx and seeking to fire missiles at planes at an Air National Guard base.
provided the men with a surface-to-air guided missile and C-4 plastic explosives,
Michael Bloomberg praised the work of his city's Police Department and federal authorities in uncovering the alleged plot.
Michael Bloomberg
The four are
United States,
"No one was at risk,"
1,000
develop the ability to identify the onset of a seizure,
epilepsy, a brain disorder
goalie of the Washington Capitals hockey team
I didn't know who Johnson was before this NFL season began. I haven't closely followed football since Joe Namath led my home team, the New York Jets, to victory in Super Bowl III, 42 Super Bowls ago.
at least 17
Sabina Sehgal Saikia,
Dr. Jorge Mario Gonzalez
Noel Galvan Cerna,
Almost half of the world's most threatened sea turtle species can be found in the northern waters of the Indian Ocean
in the northern waters of the Indian Ocean and on nesting beaches lying within Exclusive Economic Zones in countries such as India, Sri Lanka and Bangladesh,
northern waters of the Indian Ocean
celebration of Mexico's independence day Monday night,
meteorologist at KARK,
Swordfish, Spitfire, Sea Hawk and Sea Fury.
1,500
this year's event in Hampshire
"We're worried about the entire marine food chain."
shrimp and bluefin tuna
BP oil spill.
son Ripley
"There's a whole group of family members who we
Not really,
2008
Her embryo
costs
BRCA-1 gene,
"always there for me."
taught him normal father-son things like "how to swim" and
the sightseeing highlight of your peninsula
European travel
writes European travel guidebooks and hosts travel shows on public television and public radio.
public television
public television
Lake Apopka, near Orlando,
Kelsey Grammer and
two
China, Myanmar, North Korea, Iran, Sudan, Eritrea, Saudi Arabia
"repression of religious freedom
The Chinese government increased its harassment of religious minorities before the
open to the possibility of the case being transferred to a U.S. court
C-130 Hercules
Almost 400 lost Magellanic penguins
rampage that killed hundreds in the Democratic Republic of Congo went largely unreported
$500,000 in income
not
"Our kids get only one chance at an education and we need to get it right,"
Rhode Island,
the genesis of "Sesame Street"
the genesis of "Sesame Street"
a disabled freighter
Coast Guard and Air Force
high winds
The Antalina was "basically adrift, at the mercy of the wind and sea currents,"
Aircraft from the Coast Guard and Air Force
Coast Guard
"Jack and Jill,"
Tablet users
how people use tablets
last Saturday.
late afternoon and into the evening
the song "Heal the World."
be "a sad person." "In
chimpanzees,
"Heal the World."
"In some ways, he was like a child, and a very sweet and gentle child,
killing scores of innocent Muslims in recent attacks in Lahore.
Mehsud
Qari Turkestan Bhitaini,
Baitullah Mehsud
U.N. High Commissioner
advocacy groups for the disabled,
"iWant"
residential East Palo Alto, California, neighborhood,
December
Wednesday morning,
Felipe
pledged emergency tents for more than 5,500 people
rescue 185
Chinese hackers have targeted
Mexico
898
a brain disorder
identify the onset of a seizure,
1,700 to 2,000
U.S. President Barack Obama is expected to announce a new strategy for Afghanistan on Friday
Davis County prosecutor Troy Rawlings
in a canyon near Salt Lake City, Utah.
Monday
19
obsolete,
I am
His legs
His legs were blown off
Shada
took a road trip to Gallaudet University, and on this trip I was singing all of these songs
New York.
Sign Language-enhanced music videos.
at least 10
Mississippi
characteristics
two deaths and 50 injuries had been reported in
flood-related incidents.
Red River,
Secretary Ken Salazar
revealed that federal inspectors overseeing oil drilling in the Gulf of Mexico accepted meals and tickets to sporting events from companies
Interior Department's inspector general,
that Birnbaum had resigned "on her own terms and own volition."
about eight acts,
"version 3.0."
David Kelly
800-273-TALK
information regarding mental health and other medical services available to them provided at their local VA hospitals. But
Suicide Prevention
Cigna
Wendell Potter
2008
on CNN Student News.
Friday.
to take a vacation
White House press secretary.
One powerful vaccination against slavery is to make sure freed slaves build lives of economic stability.
education, skill training, micro-finance, and citizenship
end.
marks the first papal visit
Palestinian refugee camp.
New Zealand.
a grueling series of hands-on-tests on communications, common skill tasks, emergency medical treatment, evacuation of the sick and wounded, litter obstacle course, day/night land navigation courses, comprehensive written test, 12-mile foot march, CPR, physical fitness test, and weapons qualification,"
Ashura.
operating the 47 airplanes last year without conducting mandatory checks for fuselage cracking.
conducting mandatory checks for fuselage cracking.
Gary Kelly
Southwest Airlines
NATO forces
British-owned
biological
to use a biological weapon than a nuclear one --
Terrorists
Al Green and Ann Peebles,
producer whose percussive, string-and-horn-tinged R&B
their shared Cavalier King Charles spaniel.
is receiving an honor from the queen.
queen.
Prince Charles was planning
seven
Five
near Jacksonville, Florida,
early detection and helping other women cope with the disease.
early detection
early detection
CNN's Max Foster,
three executive orders
three executive orders
New York City,
December 5
Palestinian Islamic Army,
seven children
held his daughter as a sex slave for 24 years
call
A separate swim and dive
train safety divers at the aquarium to assist swimmers with disabilities.
helps train safety divers at the aquarium to assist swimmers with disabilities.
"We tortured (Mohammed al-) Qahtani,"
determining which Guantanamo detainees should be tried
"We tortured (Mohammed al-) Qahtani,"
Sandra Boss,
26½ hours over five days.
Karthikeyan
A law professor at New York Law School and a history professor at Rutgers University,
the most well-known slave plantation in the world,
single-engine plane
Oklahoma City, Oklahoma.
cosmologist, astronomer,
Orbiting Carbon Observatory,
monitored greenhouse gases to study how they affect the Earth's climate,
Corey Baumann,
New York City Mayor Michael Bloomberg:
"Michelle and I are saddened to learn of the passing of Steve Jobs. Steve was among the greatest of American innovators
Steve Jobs
a special prosecutor
the labels
an emergency landing
tough competitor and a good sport,"
an errant elbow
Barack Obama,
as if we're watching two or three different
MV Thor Star,
in the waters off Somalia,
the officer engaged in sexual acts,
CIA's former Algeria station chief
them at his home,
station chief's
John McCain
President Bush's
ICC."
Ivory Coast
"the first former head of state taken into custody by the ICC."
200,000
passed a law criminalizing rape,
space shuttle Discovery
the International Space Station
crime drama
Sunday night.
"Wire"
Friday
1-0
a pair of goals
Borussia Moenchengladbach
after a pair of goals
with rape and sodomy
the Virginia Commonwealth's Attorney and the state's criminal justice system,
Fish and chips
digital publishing has diminished the state's influence
students have fewer opportunities than
program is deeply important because it changes the negative impression
university;
lectures
dreamer,
that words were not enough.
Taliban
Afghan
is in no position to negotiate with the Taliban,
Taliban
Saturday
Houda Ezra Nonoo
Rue des Saules in Clos Montmartre,
"I would have gone, and you know I don't like to travel,"
a vigorous supporter
on its Web site in which she suggested the Obama administration missed an opportunity by not inviting her
free movies online
HBO Latin America and Turner International Argentina
15 million unique monthly users,
HBO Latin America and Turner International Argentina
a teenager wasn't his son.
spent a year in jail for nonpayment of child support
proved was not fathered by Hatley.
John Webber
Persian
half-human creature
the body of Bigfoot
their claim that they stumbled upon the body of Bigfoot
first-degree murder charge and two counts of aggravated assault.
film
about the attack gleaned from our sources.
The Food and Drug Administration
Cervarix,
mandatory evacuation for residents of 45 towns and cities within a radius of 6 kilometers (3.7 miles) around Mayon,
inside their home in the capital of Villahermosa
legislative candidate was killed, along with his wife and two children,
North Carolina,
three top Khmer Rouge
The cities of Niteroi and Sao Goncalo are among the hardest hit, with more than 80 dead and dozens missing,
5,000.
more than 1,000 people were killed in riots in 2001.
Juan Manuel Marquez,
Juan Manuel Marquez,
Manny Pacquiao
18 percent
100 percent bioethanol
100 percent bioethanol
around the heart,
Some aid groups, including MSF, have criticized the
Haiti
French
U.S. president
Barack Obama
Michael Owen
Wayne Rooney
the "don't ask/ don't tell" law
Obama administration
Four
the crew were fired upon by suspected Taliban militia.
"Fire Burning."
reggae and hip-hop
September 22.
In 1984,
has been charged with human trafficking and other offenses.
he is resting and keeping in touch with his advisers.
French President Nicolas Sarkozy
We need urgent action.
Even if greenhouse gas emissions stopped increasing today, the climate would continue to change for generations because of the gases that are already in the atmosphere.
setting emissions standards
said Obama called him to tell him about the plan
from the country by August 2010.
Iraqi leaders
crashed into the low metal railing around a column
is in the hospital, badly injured,
to "act out" to get the United States' attention and be rewarded for its "misbehavior."
fired several ballistic missiles over Japan,
North Korea,
"small children and unruly teenagers and people who are demanding attention."
been killed by a great white shark.
his body to arrive
"report that since December, there have been four times as many anti-Semitic attacks as attacks on Muslims, even though there are seven or eight times the number of British Muslims as there are Jews,"
Michael Bookatz,
[aka 50 Cent],
701st on Forbes' yearly report on billionaires.
took manual control.
Capt. Chesley "Sully" Sullenberger
Tadeusz Wrona
"do his utmost" to make it a reality.
"the White House is going to get egged if this keeps up."
"I'm going to wait until everybody's voted off the island,"
women's
Parisa
greater freedoms for women.
Cindy McCain, wife of Republican Sen. John McCain, and 44-year-old Michelle Obama,
Cindy McCain, wife of Republican Sen. John McCain, and 44-year-old Michelle Obama,
Keystone Ski Resort in Keystone, Colorado,
the debate
Ralph Fiennes
This is Shakespearean acting of the highest caliber, and a powerful, bloody vision of "honor" gone mad.
is an ambitious undertaking, a modern-day interpretation of one of Shakespeare's meatiest but less frequently performed plays.
banish the myth that young women are not at risk for breast cancer.
Early detection saves lives.
vulnerable and scared
vulnerable and scared
1,000 speed skating
Florida Department of Law Enforcement
31
for Boys
"The Yellow Jacket."
know more than they're saying
Sinaloa and other cartels
Vicente Zambada Niebla,
the opportunity to get "advice, good counsel and fellowship" from the group.
Muslim revolutionary named Malcolm X
Eid-ul-Adha
to be a Marine, then a cop.
work permit.
"Whip It!"
a woman
Federal Aviation Administration.
August 11
other criticism.
a day of prayer
Rev. Canon Julian Dobbs, leader of the Convocation of Anglicans in North America's Church and Islam Project,
"But I will say something it took me my whole adult life to come to: America is not perfect, but I want to tell the truth: It is one of the best places in the world to live."
strong north-westerly winds
Argentina
Pep Guardiola
300 to 400
to see some significant changes in their benefits and in their conditions of employment.
five vaccine manufacturers,
members of a U.S. cavalry unit.
overwhelming enemy force
Armored Cavalry Regiment.
"I always start with color when I'm designing things. Always. If the color is right, I feel better,"
claustrophobic.
an 11-seat Challenger, courtesy of Steve Wynn,
Garth Brooks
Garth Brooks
Somalia
Russia to intervene against pirates
220 square miles of ice has collapsed in Antarctica and an ice shelf about seven times
battle dress uniforms.
They grew up fast
Ko Htike
trying to stop the violence.
accused the military of continuing to bomb civilians.
Sri Lankan
after Sri Lankan officials rejected a proposed cease-fire from the Tamil rebels,
an end to combat operations
powerful anesthetic and sedative.
death of cardiac arrest
Venezuelan,
positive thing that today's players are campaigning together,
ATP World Tour
sale of alcohol
White's fans campaigned successfully via Facebook for her to host NBC's "Saturday Night Live."
"We will continue to press forward on missile defense; we'll be transparent. We have explained that our system cannot and will not threaten Russia, does not affect our strategic balance with Russia,"
Russia
a new talk
"Cable
not
Haiti
300
1964
a shocking 45-year-old civil rights crime can be prosecuted decades later.
an appeal involving James Ford Seale, convicted in the 1964 kidnapping of two teenagers
a shocking 45-year-old civil rights crime can be prosecuted decades later.
cut hundreds of billions out of the the growth of Medicare
an American health insurance plan: $13,000 a year, on average, for a family of four.
They knew perfectly well that Medicare is provided by the government. They also knew that their government is proposing to change Medicare in ways they do not
The president wants to reduce spending on Medicare Advantage, the privately run
"The Red Curtain" cinema.
"The Red Curtain"
The bus was operating illegally, according to the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.
a selection of businesses and public service structures,
more than 25
see the entire layout of a mapped building, switch between floor plans if the structure has multiple levels, and locate indoor points of interest like retail stores, bathrooms and ATMs.
he is "relieved" to have his daughter back in Puerto Rico,
Kim Han-sol
North Korea's energy needs
its long-range missile, the Taepodong-2,
test-fire its long-range missile,
the slayings of seven Christians
seven
50
"Heart Disease
Hip-hop
of criminal possession of a weapon,
1-0 win
to end the "genocide" against their people in Sri Lanka.
and often cheaper -- to get away in the spring than in the summer
Learn to scuba dive or snowboard, explore
all around the country.
Use the
Vermont,
Pakistani Taliban spokesman Ehsanullah Ehsan denied reports that the militant group had declared a cease-fire while holding peace talks with the government.
militants
The public endorsement
sexual harassment
she has a bomb,"
Norwich, Connecticut,
"Amazing. 2 days ago FB deactivated my page saying they didn't believe I was me. I had to send a photo of my passport page," he wrote. "Then they said yes, I was me, but insisted I use the name Ahmed which appears before
throughout the Muslim world.
real-name-only policy
H1N1,
Canada
17 countries have
787
Paul Sciullo III and Stephen Mayhle
an image of the burning World Trade Center
an image of the burning World Trade Center
using billboards with an image of the burning World Trade Center
The local Republican Party
Fernandez
North Dakota
Thanatron machine,
early June
that Ocampo was a "serious, vicious killer."
of fatally stabbing four homeless men in Southern California.
the nation's education system
Wolf Blitzer.
craft a wide-ranging stimulus package,
at a graduation
Prince Charles earned his wings more than 35 years ago at the same air force base, graduating as a Flight Lieutenant.
four-month attachment with the Royal Air Force
Newark Liberty International Airport
at the Isleworth golf club near his home outside Orlando, Florida.
Paraguay
address of the Web page being visited and the Internet address of the visitor as soon as the page is loaded
the address of the Web page being visited and the Internet address of the visitor
a recording of the pilot calmly telling an air traffic controller the plane would ditch.
a civilian court in lower Manhattan,
regroup.
sequin and gem-encrusted Converse sneakers
is singing "Linger" while playing a gleaming white guitar
major trauma to the right side of the head.
severe head injury
major trauma to the right side of the head.
British High Commission,
rapper
busy parking lot of the upscale Beverly Center mall in Los Angeles, California,
One out of every 17 children under 3 years old in America has a
about 12 million in America,
people with food allergies.
peanuts.
children under 3 years old
Michelle Obama
have scared all their neighbors, aroused anti-Russian nationalism, driven the Poles, the Ukrainians and so many other countries closer to the West and away from Moscow.
Russia
Assist Georgia in rebuilding and securing itself. Assure countries like Poland that may be insecure. But
its recognition of the two provinces is a joke.
Russia
collect the oil and send
help siphon off oil leaking
give his birth date and say
readers to donate their old denim instead of throwing it away.
More than 33,000
Pakistan's tribal
the execution.
The surveillance-camera
Robert Mugabe,
encourage change."
positions in villages near Amadi in Iraq's Duhuk Province,
a terrorist organization,
Turkey
airstrikes
central Iraqi government
estimated 3,000 students descended onto the school's Bascom Hill Wednesday afternoon for a snowball fight,
resigned
former Maoist rebels
unable to persuade the former Maoist rebels to demobilize
A second 18-year-old
Loyalists blame Ratsiraka's family members for inciting the recent trouble.
crowd cheering amid intermittent gunshots and noises that may have been tear gas canisters.
Antananarivo,
Ratsiraka
died mysteriously
raping two of his daughters and fathering nine children
fathering nine children
the platform at the Gallery Place-Chinatown stop.
lip of the granite platform
Houston Metro Officer Eliot Swainson,
his wife Grace,
she would let her daughter Chelsea know
she would let her daughter Chelsea know about a Kenyan man's unique marriage offer.
Jackson's family
singer's burial arrangements,
Michael Jackson's memorial service
one of Kraft's Super Bowl rings.
(NFL)
small jewelry repair business
who walked off with one of Kraft's Super Bowl
inherited a small jewelry repair business from his father.
went on to become president and CEO
Daniel Gilbert,
Geoffrey Fieger
boyhood experience in a World War II internment camp
at midnight
The strike
never thought
Lisa Locascio is trying to buy her first home with help from the federal Neighborhood Stabilization Program.
crawling loudly through the quaint
festival
FOLKSTON, Georgia
175,000
jubilation
Tripoli
staff including chefs
meetups for people on Twitter,
Twitter
president of Lockergnome.com, a blogging network.
10
haven't worn in two years
stop you from living in the present,"
dank sub-basement chamber
invaded her
counting heads, making bottles or keeping a child from hurting another,
"You can't regret children, but [my] choices were childish, immature and selfish. I wasn't thinking at that time."
August 2009.
Torres
rape.
school officials
whether a campus setting gives school administrators greater discretion to control students suspected of illegal activity than police are allowed in cases involving adults in general public spaces.
to barrier islands off Alabama and Mississippi
Whether your tastes ran from Al Jarreau to "Weird Al" Yankovic, you could be assured that those purchased disks were yours -- for keeps.
You see, you don't really buy music for keeps anymore. I mean, how can you when this is the sort of thing that can happen?
PRLDEF
Nicolas Cage,
Roughly $1.5 million
President Richard M. Nixon and his Brazilian counterpart, Emilio Medici,
in Chile,
Yudhoyono
about $335,685,
about $335,685,
Native American lands
CNN's senior correspondent in Europe
CNN's Richard Blystone
Venezuelan President Chavez
Colombian man,
lied to the sport's governing bodies
six
1997
30
Christianity.
in Columbus, Ohio,
African-American students.
comments area below.
a prominent news story or theme
the newborn by herself
A power-sharing deal
power-sharing
Mugabe
Pakistan
180,
the arrested individuals' identities or whether they are Americans.
suspected killer of a 20-year-old pregnant Camp Lejeune Marine
late Friday
Marine Cpl. Cesar Laurean,
driver
Richard Thomas and his wife, Sandra,
Richard Thomas and his wife, Sandra,
Oklahoma.
white 1992 Toyota Paseo
a white 1992 Toyota Paseo with Oklahoma tag No. 577-BPW,
Lester William Hobbs,
the Weather Underground,
Weather Underground
used to try to save Russert.
a defibrillator.
spooky lights
an experimental rocket.
for sexually abusing children at the notorious commune known as Colonia Dignidad
Schaefer,
20-year
requested that the government "fully fund" global
Members of Health Global Access Project
entered the busy rotunda and chained themselves together with plastic chains,
Shuttle Endeavour
looking for places, such as museums, to house the
Wednesday,
the Cemetery of Defenders
At least 20
1940s
"Real Steel" won't win any prizes for innovation, but it works
Testicular cancer
2009 World Swimming Championship in Rome.
of Olympia
the longest domestic torch relay in the games'
Anniversary celebrations of the Statue of Liberty
the Statue of Liberty, which
Isabel Belarsky said she clutched her mother,
Rocky Ford brand cantaloupes
cantaloupes contaminated with the Listeria monocytogenes bacteria
most Iranians said they support an American-Iranian rapprochement for bringing a new era of peace to the Middle East.
support an American-Iranian rapprochement for bringing a new era of peace to the Middle East.
Smoking in youth-rated movies has not declined despite a pledge two
collaboration
CNN
"I am pretty sure he will play, but I do not like players who are not at 100%,"
fifth and final repair visit to the Hubble Space Telescope.
Atlantis
slayings of actress Sharon Tate and four others.
sex
death
the world a unique voice: free, unfiltered and very different from
for fear of their calls being traced.
veterans on social networking sites
Zimbabwe
Zimbabwe
fireworks
was ruined after a UFO hit one of its 20 meter-long
Sun newspaper
damaged turbine,
Sen. John Whitmire,
Baytown, Texas,"
Texas inmate in a wheelchair,
currently the CEO at Corus, an Anglo-Dutch steelmaker.
senior leadership position
€343 million, or $456 million,
5-0,
Hungary
bronze
the unknown videographer
raged for nine days,
to forcibly remove a legitimate Somali government from power."
30 years in prison
the document was designed to help two people but could have a much broader impact.
more than 1,600
the German Cup final
Bayern will now travel to Madrid for next weekend's Champions League final against Inter Milan in confident mood,
Bayern Munich
allows 10 boys and 10 girls between the age of eight and 11 to create their own mini-societies, organizing everything from
the program was made with the parents' full consent.
several months starting April 23.
London's Shakespeare Birthplace Trust.
oil
executed Nigerian writer Ken Saro-Wiwa
Nigeria's Ogoni
a deadly fundamentalist insurgency in its tribal areas and an economy that's on the verge of collapse.
the country's main opposition leader and his supporters
self-immolation
called for religious freedom in Tibet and for the return of the Dalai Lama
the safety review,"
tickets
14
protest over rules governing their flying hours which
remembered the heart, competitiveness and growing maturity of the two-time Indianapolis 500 winner,
heart, competitiveness and growing maturity of the two-time Indianapolis 500 winner,
in a horrific multi-car wreck at a Las Vegas
8 lbs and 21 inches long
director
cancel unspent funding authorized by the economic stimulus bill,
they showed that Republicans pledged allegiance to hedge fund managers on Wall Street, insurance companies, the "wealthiest of the wealthy," oil companies and big corporations that outsource jobs,
The culture of football back in the 80s was very different, something I found very hard to relate to and subsequently I found myself a little bit isolated and ostracized from certain people.
homophobia and racism
outdoor spas,
lesser-known coastal inns
Jan Brewer
immigration law.
25
Saint Louis, Missouri,
some of the approximately 150 worshippers attending the church in southern Illinois.
Terry J. Sedlacek,
Stanley McChrystal,
the Innocent Images Unit
Hundreds
Vera Zvonareva.
Jordanian and U.S. intelligence agencies
a gift from God
wasn't part of the initial plan.
skilled hacker
Stockholm.
STOCKHOLM, Sweden
al Qaeda
restive region
11 people
imports of some Chinese tires
surge in exports
some Chinese tires
to 30
just awful. There is no bright side and no silver lining. For most of us in the military community the luster of sacrificing for our country wore off a
Tiller's death
Wichita, Kansas
support programs and initiatives that empower youth,
President Obama
"I think it's just that President Chavez is better at positioning the cameras."
Red Bull team
eighth consecutive time.
"In this tragic and indignant hour, the people of Venezuela manifest their unconditional solidarity with the heroic Palestinian people, share in the sadness that overcomes thousands of families through the loss of their loved ones, and extends to them a hand by affirming that the government of Venezuela will not rest until it sees those responsible for these criminal atrocities severely punished,"
twice
communicate only through his counsel.
$1 million in cash, that he also post a bond for $5 million, that he surrender his travel documents and that he submit to home detention.
Strauss-Kahn post $1 million in cash, that he also post a bond for $5 million, that he surrender his travel documents and that he submit to home detention.
International Monetary Fund chief
join CNN's Fit Nation!
CNN's Fit Nation!
took a no-holds barred approach,
getting fired from his gig on "Two
shooting death of his father's pregnant girlfriend,
on Friday.
the official motto of the United States. That should truly help the almost 14 million
city councils
up to $300,
FIFA
Algeria's national football team
Algeria's national football
riots.
of whites.
whites
history;
Attorney General Eric Holder
wanted the show to end
she's out of there because she wants to spend more time with her newly adopted daughter, and that becoming a mother has "changed [her] desire to work full-time."
hundreds of
Ali Soufan's
playing "mental poker" with terrorism suspects
Anna Nicole Smith,
federal corruption allegations, including trying to trade or sell the Senate seat that became vacant after Barack Obama was elected president.
federal corruption allegations, including trying to trade or sell the Senate seat that became vacant after Barack Obama was elected president.
Gov. Rod Blagojevich
"unconstitutional"
Gov. Rod Blagojevich
he was never entirely convinced of
George Stobbs
American and a Briton,
helicopter crashed
Dubai,
A Pakistani official Tuesday bristled at the accusation,
"the largest center for breeding and exporting terrorism."
severe trauma
Iraq war veteran
struck by a tear gas canister
took over a campus building
southern states
the directors of "Shrek 2" and "Shark Tale"
insurgents have targeted
Shiite pilgrims,
"The Proposal"
the charming, traditional romantic comedy
save it from isolation,
the Syrian
the performance levels utilized,
consumers would receive heavily discounted PCs, then pay fees for usage.
defensive fortifications"
re-establish trade relations
Richard Timney,
£10 ($14)
Jacqui Smith
Legislation
interpret narrowly the protections that Miranda affords criminal defendants.
pledged to work closely with the country as it prepares for elections.
540 people
exploded outside Baghdad's governorate building, the other outside the Justice Ministry.
work closely
U.S. President Barack Obama called the attacks an attempt to derail progress in Iraq, and pledged to work closely with the country as it prepares for elections.
Three teens
hanging in the stairway leading to her family's second-floor apartment
said she was assaulted by Shawne Merriman,
Jensen Farms in Granada, Colorado,
Jensen Farms in Granada, Colorado,
chief of staff to the president and director of the Office of Management and Budget.
terrorism, proliferation of weapons of mass destruction and a host of regional issues in the Middle East, Africa and Asia.
terrorism, proliferation of weapons of mass destruction and a host of regional issues in the Middle East, Africa and Asia.
need to earn the trust, confidence and respect of career intelligence officials.
all the players and the management.
rugby
nature of the allegation,
400 people tasked to work on the virus,
Sebastian
will not lift sanctions or normalize relations with the North until it takes irreversible steps toward dismantling its nuclear program.
December 28.
David C. Novak
CEO,
a tour bus crashed
more than 1,000
should reopen April 1,
"Just wanted to take this opportunity to report some good news,"
spacesuits and tools
by the vicious brutality which accompanied the murders of his father and brother."
it was unjustifiable
20% tax credit
"I remember eating lunch at school all by myself and the mean kids would parade around me and mock my noises. My teacher made me get up in front of the class and apologize to everybody for the noises I was making,"
three out of every 1,000 school-age children are believed to have Tourette syndrome.
Fifty
"I like strategy. I like building something. It's built... the foundation of the [social secretary's] office is good and solid."
get out of your sleeping bags and onto the ballot!
U.S. forces
municipal
He is a true legend of the game whose impact and legacy will forever be part of the NFL."
minister of defense and head of Iran's Revolutionary Guards
Islamic Revolutionary Council,
status as a prisoner of war meant he should be returned to Panama,
have any contact with the alleged victim
shot and killed him."
Sarah Dawn McKinley,
the first "president of Europe"
Tony Blair
Herman Van Rompuy
personal story
when daughter Sasha exhibited signs of potentially deadly meningitis
health care
reform."
how health care can affect families.
Mexico
the torture of detainees
the torture of detainees
April 21
rushed to fill their cars and trucks.
more than an hour
going to be no gas in Nashville.
He said he has no idea about the origin of a rumor that there was going to be no gas in Nashville.
Nashville,
a BioArts auction for a chance to clone their family dog,
clone of "the most human of any dog
Vancouver, British Columbia,
Surrey, a city just south of Vancouver
"Would you rather be a novel or a poem?"
application process
to see how well prospective students can think,
Debris from Air France 447, which crashed en route from Brazil to France
Atlantic Ocean
"The U.S. subcontracted out an assassination program against al Qaeda ... in early 2006."
Iranian-backed militias.
Tiger Woods
fellow Swede Elin
Parnevik, 44, and his wife
Denver, Colorado.
between Denver and Winter Park.
riders love the trip route, which winds through the Rockies and climbs to 9,000 feet.
young children
the parents
traffickers
Attorney Kelly Clark,
the Scouts
Miss California
USA Carrie Prejean
found it "too racy" to post on his site.
at least four rebel leaders and 10 other rebels
Sri Lankan military
1998 best-seller "The Orchid Thief"
Haiti and the Bahamas,
about 15 miles
online social media
Latinos and African Americans
Worthersee Stadion
Slaven Bilic's side
long history of overlooked genius female directors
Michael Schumacher
about the Iran's ongoing persecution of Baha'is and other religious minority communities,"
Iran's government prevents Baha'is from gathering in homes to worship and bans Baha'is from public schools, universities, the social pension system and government leadership posts unless they conceal their faith.
Why, then, do so many Americans not accept the theory of evolution?
Peggy Sue Gerron.
Peggy Sue.
worried about disease,
Food that has been under water or moist
for heavy
prime minister
Friday
prime minister
The election upset
children
acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
to provide HIV/AIDS treatment to its people
intervention by the international community to avert the crisis.
Sunday night,
Marilyn
actor
$70,000
have gotten thrifty.
a prepaid cell phone
pharmacy's mistake with medication
is urging would-be reformers to take it slow.
sits across the Rio Grande from El Paso, Texas.
to quell a wave of drug-related violence
Baha'i
President
his representative confirmed
Zack Rosenburg,
$100 million
The federal government has "a confidence gap when it comes to the American people,"
his Cabinet, including Defense Secretary Robert Gates,
"We've got to earn their trust. They've got to feel confident that their dollars are being spent wisely."
Sarajevo
the Serb cause
100,000 residents
Galveston Bay,
Residents
Gloria Arroyo
ruled 8-5 in favor of a temporary restraining order on the travel ban,
will flee if allowed to leave the country.
allegations of corruption and electoral fraud,
NYPD officers on counter-terrorism patrol
inside those gates are being linked to computers and controlled via networks and cyberspace.
computer miscreants
roll stability control.
anti-lock brake system.
"I think it's a privilege to call yourself a Scientologist, and it's something you have to earn,"
arrested
"Hispanoamerican Queen 2008"
the title Nuestra Belleza Sinaloa.
26 suspects
Najera
A 23-year-old Mexican beauty queen and seven men were taken into custody
the title "Hispanoamerican Queen 2008"
Tendulkar surpassed the
includes Air France and KLM, Delta Air Lines, Northwest Airlines News, and Continental Airlines.
out of London Heathrow.
between the U.S. and Europe.
March 30
reported missing a week ago,
Fifteen crew members of a South African Airways
an article from Senator McCain that
"a very hard and painful decision"
The facility will become a fine arts teaching center with an exhibition gallery and studio space,
rose 3%
-- up 8% from 2000, and 5% from 2007.
45,
grandparents.
their grandparents.
Authorities
Taloga, Oklahoma,
residents, about 400, left the Dewey County town, but have been
a raging fire
to be buried in Taos,
offshore drilling
Tennis Championships
Ben Stiller
Ben Stiller and Amy Adams
March 10.
Isaiah Angel,
beach in Ocean City, Maryland,
Lifeguards
A.I. DuPont Hospital
a tunnel
kung fu is alive and flourishing in
a small area of tissue inflammation that most often occurs in the lungs
Caster Semenya
women's 800 meters
Bahrain's
multiple prescription medications
the San Francisco Bay Bridge
was under the influence of multiple prescription medications that impaired his judgment,
"Definitely
so older people
children should get the H1N1 vaccination,
older
final World Cup
Eight people
Eight people
captain
a hamstring
karaoke bar and discotheque in Medan, in Indonesia's North Sumatra province,
North Sumatra
a karaoke bar and discotheque
56,
Pushpa Kamal Dahal, the Maoist chairman,
May 4
to buy business-class airfare on domestic and international flights, flying on a state-owned aircraft to political gatherings or events "which involved no official business," and spending campaign funds
Gov. Mark Sanford
tax money to buy business-class airfare on domestic and international flights,
South Carolina
Jamaica
9.85 seconds,
Caesarean section.
Mendiola-Martinez, a Mexican citizen,
Rafael Nadal
Andy Roddick's
6-3 6-3 win
The Egyptian government required all pigs in the country be killed,
threw rocks at police officers
leaders
racist images,
the New York Post
that the only solution to Afghanistan's conflict is through dialogue, not fighting.
the country's bloody conflict
he became "addicted" to the intrusion and "didn't know how to stop."
Scarlett Johansson, Christina Aguilera, Mila Kunis, Simone Harouche and Renee Olstead,
"hackerazzi"
a fairy-tale New York businessman
in the desert,
Chester A. Stiles,
Jacob Zuma,
Jacob Zuma,
a deceased organ donor,
new kidney
dozens of people offering to be tested to see if they can match,
La Piedad Mayor Ricardo Guzman Romero
TOKYO, Japan
raping and murdering the San Diego-area teens
assault with intent
$85 billion
U.S. Treasury Department
number two
the quarterfinals
The Islamist Justice and Development Party, or PJD,
Abdelilah Benkirane,
South Korean President Lee Myung-bak
he will send American envoy Stephen Bosworth to North Korea on December 8 for bilateral talks on dismantling Pyongyang's nuclear program.
Nuclear negotiations involving North Korea
not prove enough to save Ten Cate,
Fiona
one-in-30 million rarity.
Barack Obama.
the 2007 killings of four Iraqi men by three decorated Army sergeants
now they've got it! Everyone's mad,"
everybody,"
Indian Ocean,
a fracture to his right fibula,"
Croatia
fans
"We want to keep it a little more intimate,"
lawmakers to pay for new programs, dollar-for-dollar, with budget cuts elsewhere.
Obama's proposal is responsible and necessary.
Obama's proposal
between 10 and 20 hours
diplomat in Iran was arrested and accused of participating in Iranian protests during
North African
as a Jewish state.
we have to wait until Wednesday morning,"
Roger Federer
$2 million
murder
have
"long and painful chapter for the people of Libya"
"This is more a prescription about how we ought to deal going forward.
mission" in the North African nation.
killing five
at a stress clinic at Camp Liberty, near Baghdad International Airport,
to build the Lynx, a two-seater rocketship that will carry passengers up into the atmosphere
space tourism industry
announced plans for its Astrium space division to develop a line of suborbital jets
Horry County
the Myrtle Beach
Carolina Gov. Mark Sanford
Amanda Knox
they are going to accuse you with kids trafficking,"
33
Taliban leader Baitullah
met reporters
United States and NATO forces
"It seems to me at least to be a nice gesture, but a disappointment,"
let the gay community down.
science professor
physics professor
the slaying of Dean Harold Meyers.
a religious person and it
dressed as a priest
a religious person
dressed as a priest caught at Amsterdam's airport with three kilos of cocaine under
a priest
recently due to the global slump in property prices.
worked with Sotomayor
to get search efforts to continue "until all the survivors are accounted for."
$100 million in emergency aid
$100 million
10 years
Lovely is very polite. It's the girl you marry, and Covet is the girl you date, you know?
scents
Cuban
killing Ron."
Fiorentina
torches
Tulsa, Oklahoma,
Ban Ki-moon
war crimes.
allaged war crimes in Darfur.
The opinions expressed in this commentary are solely those of
a quarter-mile pier crumbling into the sea along with two of his trucks.
If it's flowy and loose,
Identify shapes that flatter
Find a great tailor
Chaiken cashmere dress
USA Today
hacked
alcohol-based hand sanitizers
bodies of the flight captain and a steward from the Air France
$49,246
airports
Canada
by sea,
their long-term futures
a 56-year-old man whose scrawled
note invoking "Gilligan's Island"
Friday
Johnson told authorities that he had flown only about four times in his life and that the Maui-bound flight was his first over water; that he had occupied himself first by reading in-flight magazines and then by filling out comment cards provided by the airline. He said he had lifted the phrase for the card "I thought I was going to die" from comedian Mike Myers,
"We're going to do everything we can to help you, but there are a lot of people like you."
11 counts of genocide, war crimes and crimes against humanity
some facility will be provided to him to allow him to
the 1915 killings of ethnic Armenians in Ottoman Turkey as genocide
the 1915 killings of ethnic Armenians in Ottoman Turkey as genocide
that authorities now believe there was "foul play"
Kentucky Derby
served 15
The roughly $555 billion bill
former front man of Soundgarden and Audioslave
Timbaland.
Timbaland.
1999
a "genetic predisposition" to
"genetic predisposition"
likely presidential candidate.
Sgt. Barbara Jones
to help kids who are "stuck in the middle"
combines religious teaching with a focus on students with special learning needs.
Iran
allowing protesters to storm its embassy
At least seven
a 22-year-old woman
"This is not the first time we have seen smugglers attempt to use religious figures and articles of faith to further their criminal enterprise,"
woman
around the grave of Neda Agh-Soltan
Stanford International
federal agents
Russia's
applauded the move.
The Province
not to worry, things are going to improve.
a raft of reforms aimed at restoring credibility to
$10,000
@TheOtherDrew,
drawing on the strength of black leaders who opened doors for him.
"We had to be twice as good to be average,"
allegedly showed up several times at Berry's Hollywood Hills home.
forgery and flying without a valid license,
never renewed
Pan Pacific Open in Tokyo
Maria Sharapova
could put Democrats at a disadvantage
a compelling
Spc. Waide T. James, 20, of Cocoa, Florida, and Spc. Diego A. Valbuena, 23, of Port St. Lucie, Florida.
in an apartment at Meadowbrook Apartments in LeRay, New York,
20,
three
children of Martin
About 100
LBC,
Germany
Adolf Hitler
Music, TV and film
Marilyn Manson,
"When it comes down to who's to blame for the high school murders in Littleton, Colorado, throw a rock and you'll hit someone who's guilty,"
Rodrigo Rosenberg's
against corruption
Anabella De León's
"will remain in their home and familiar surroundings and be under the care of their longtime nanny,"
substance abuse
he'd threatened to kill her,
a long-term in-patient treatment center
$947 billion,
54 medical teams from hospitals in and around Manila
Ayutthaya, Lop Buri, Chai Nat and Nakhon
"A Separation"
the latest "Harry Potter" film.
gasoline
poor families
rebuild the nation's highways, bridges and other public-use facilities.
travel,
Brenda T. Buck
southwest Mississippi
nearly one in five are unemployed,
Samuel David Crowe's death sentence was changed to life in prison by Georgia authorities,
1988
life without the possibility of parole.
blew himself up.
outside wire transfer businesses,
outside wire transfer businesses,
It was his first tournament of the
as some of the greatest heavyweight boxers of all time
allows personal consumption of
Thaer al-Nashef.
kidnapping of his pregnant 25-year-old wife,
"This was not an easy decision.
Rep. Gabrielle Giffords
Otton Solis of the Citizen's Action Party
the pioneering women
Searchlight,
recent criticism of a post on her Facebook page
all areas of fine and decorative arts, jewelry, photographs, collectibles, wine, cars and more.
wanted over November's terrorist attacks in Mumbai, but his connections with the Pakistani army have not been established,
with the Pakistani army have not been established,
November's terrorist attacks in Mumbai,
ships filled with supplies and headed to Gaza to break a blockade imposed by Israel in 2007.
same-sex marriages
50% reduction in the value of Greek government bonds, steps recapitalize European banks and plans to attract capital
"Let's be clear; it was a mistake,"
China
300
to decide if they would
a temporary spending measure that would have required spending cuts to offset additional money for federal disaster relief efforts.
in Sotomayor's appellate career.
Shandong province
Tsingtao Brewery,
2008 Olympics
Poland to the United States
Warsaw Ghetto Uprising
World War II.
During the early 1980s
Polish President Lech Kaczynski and Prime Minister Donald Tusk
independent oil and gas exploration and production company
Jane Collins,
failing to take appropriate measures to stop Frechen's
More than 15,000
violence, food shortages and widespread drought
New smuggling routes across the Red Sea
Lawmakers
13,000
will be tasked with drafting a new constitution
Violent crime in the United States continues to drop significantly
dropped about 13% among U.S. residents ages 12 or older.
extensive telephone survey,
Approximately 20,000
teen vampire saga
Actor
had struggled throughout the tournament at Torrey Pines with a fractured left leg but was still in contention heading into the final round.
Glover conquers Mickelson and Duval 2009
2008
Tiger Woods wins by record margin 2000
Gunther von Hagens'
200 human bodies at various
"Body Works"
U.S.
set limits on many potentially harmful chemical residues,
U.S.
medical student
Phillip Markoff and his fiancee, Megan McAllister, has been
hijacking of the microphone from Taylor Swift
OK Cupid, and failing to finish my
dressed like Zeus,
it takes up to 16 weeks to see maximum eyelash growth. If you discontinue Latisse, your lashes will go back to their original state in a few months.
Illinois,
The U.S. Treasury Department
invaded Iraq
the conflict in Iraq drags on
Karl-Theodor zu Guttenberg.
reach the final of the World Cup
Didier Drogba
the company's biggest advance in the handheld gaming space since it introduced the Sony PSP in 2006.
the "elephant in the room"
traditions, such as mass
clergy and laity
France
cutting costs.
Top Drawer Consignments.
Bahman Ghobadi
hardships facing young rock musicians
award-winning Iranian film-maker Bahman Ghobadi
dozens of passengers
injured, including four
Miami, Florida,
A growing family
shortly before she left to be a contestant on
shortly before she left to be a contestant on "The Bachelor"
"Stonewalling is
including manufacturing and possessing juvenile pornography, distribution of juvenile pornography and lewd molestation,
"March 8 alliance"
About 50,000
a same-sex marriage
Iran
due to an airspace violation.
business jet
airspace violation.
five
incident happened a week
U.S.
its debut as a great power.
420 million
Ottoman sultans
state ministers, artists and media glitterati.
police in a raid
did not say
the best and worst of the sisters' fashions over the years.
the wardrobe choices of Venus and her younger sister Serena
Adrian Fenty
"This action suggests that the court believes there are important issues that require closer examination,"
in the home
Greg Wise, the boys head basketball coach at Jack Yates High School in Houston, Texas.
at airports
in-cabin lighting system
CIA Director Leon Panetta and national security adviser James Jones
Kerstin Fritzl,
$3.6 billion.
the man arrested is a foreign operative linked to al Qaeda.
Sunday,
a larger share of the country's natural gas revenues.
Wiseman
70,000
East Texas town of Bryan
files
flight data recorder from an Ethiopian Airlines plane
distinctive voice
New York,
1978
three Super Bowl
Tennessee Titans
Via Tornabuoni,
leather goods, designer wear and food.
ovarian cysts associated with chlamydia,
sexually assaulted the man's wife,
2:45 a.m.
first-degree rape, two counts of first-degree sexual offense and one count of attempted first-degree sexual offense,
have his wife raped
national park in the Amazon rainforest
0298595519
"Thus far, the plastic complaints appear to be confined to a very short period of production,"
drugs and prostitution,
drugs
his mother, his children and a list of charities,
drugs may have been involved in the pop icon's passing.
the Staples Center, the 20,000-seat coliseum in downtown Los Angeles
single most polluted place on Earth,
Natalia Vodianova
Natalia Vodianova
they have received a mega-offer from Manchester City owner Sheikh Mansour bin Zayed Al Nahyan to buy them out.
one
Mary Phagan
the obituaries
Wenzel's affiliation with the agency
There are now 90 stars prominently
"Overall, the new iPhone 4S scores higher in the ratings
depleted signal strength
White House's change in tone will translate to a change
United States should deal with Beijing "with respect" and not be "too abrasive."
the number traveling by air is expected to decline,
2.3 million,
Democratic
Boston, Massachusetts, at the Mission Church.
Services
Kaka, Thierry Henry, Luis Figo and Zinedine Zidane
Barcelona's official Web site.
assistance and services for homeless veterans and their entire family,"
at "CNN Heroes: An All-Star Tribute" as a
in honor of slain teammate Yeardley Love,
nine
30 police officers,
46
blocked traffic and refused to disperse.
Bret Michaels.
Rihanna
new album
The light from the cell phone screens
the Policlinico Juan D. Peron, the main hospital in Villa Mercedes, a small city in San Luis province.
Policlinico
Camara has declared himself president of the National Council for Democracy,
with Prime Minister Ahmed Tidiane Souare and about 30 other
Roberto Micheletti provisional president
to punish those who opposed the ouster of President Manuel Zelaya in June.
a rebellion of mutinous soldiers against the Syrian government known as the "Free Syrian Army."
"My eldest son sometimes opens up the computer, puts up
the self-styled leader of a rebellion of mutinous soldiers against the Syrian government known as the "Free Syrian Army."
$8 billion fraudulent investment program.
submit complaints
signs of physical pain in others,
New findings show that the streams of information provided by social networking sites are too fast for the brain's "moral compass"
General Electric CF6-45/50 series jet
cognitive impairment
cognitive impairment which could help determine
minimal signs of atrophy
one year after initial testing.
a UFO hit one of its 20 meter-long
that a wind turbine was ruined after a UFO hit one of its 20 meter-long blades
fireworks
the 80th birthday party of dad Peter Bell.
tens of thousands of dollars.
A rare and original manuscript of one of America's most patriotic songs
in a flea market
drew a .38 special handgun and began firing.
local college students
a unified command
gold
gold
he was found guilty of 27 counts of extortion and one count of conspiracy
Xenothemis and Hegestratos devised a plan in which they would receive a cash advance to ship a load of corn from Syracuse to Athens. Due to the dangers associated with shipping, the buyer would take on full risk if the shipment didn't make it to Athens, so if the boat sank Xenothemis and Hegestratos could keep their cash.
a heavy north Sudanese military presence in an oil-rich border region.
an island in Florida's Dry Tortugas, 70 miles past Key West,
Susanne Klatten.
to release pictures
$35.4 million.
capital
Somali capital
motorists waited in long lines to purchase fuel.
in India,
India's
the explosion of a train seconds after it leaves the Liverpool Street Station heading for Aldgate East.
chaos and horrified reactions after the July 7, 2005, London
transit bombings were shown to jurors
prayer
pastor Daniel Henderson
Ludwig van Beethoven
"867-5309/Jenny"
"In another five to seven years, our efforts will be a moot point because they will be gone or too infirm to participate in a mission like this,"
more than 30,000
"Witnessing their emotions is
the pop star's final three months,
9 p.m. ET Sunday
after weeks of protests
Bondi issued a statement, dismissing the documentary as "propaganda" and saying it "offends the truth and all of the
prime minister's handling of the L'Aquila earthquake,
Mercedes, who'd never had a single related symptom, had a severe gallstone attack
In October 1991, I came to America with my wife, my 6-year-old son and my mother-in-law.
London and Europe
and transport.
$59 billion
Muhammad Ali
Ireland,
"Smile: You're Under Arrest."
makes jailed inmates wear pink underwear
working for the 1%.
biochemist
downtown Manhattan.
19 percent and 4.3 million
are declining and are lowest among black and Hispanic patients,
1995,
the charges
a decision to bury the late president and his wife in a crypt previously reserved for monarchs and saints.
developing and, in many cases, the poorest nations,
the Vatican
Across the street from Harmony Road Music School in north Oakland, California,
"This is probably the worst thing that's ever happened to me in my life. I love my son greatly,"
paralyzed for life
than one in five state residents
"They have agreed to begin first on working to achieve a framework agreement for permanent status. That work is now well under way,"
condemnation of violence and working toward security,
'that the only possible decision to take is that of absolving Amanda Knox,"
'that the only possible decision to take is that of absolving Amanda Knox,"
of Alabama in Huntsville
"there were never any suspects. Never anyone charged, never anyone arrested."
Southwest
huge boost in some of those tourism attractions featured in our promotion."
"Sherlock Homes"
weapons shipments
small arms and rocket-propelled grenades.
the Taliban
lost control of the vehicle
a high-speed chase
A large cheese pizza.
New Year's Eve
final stages of terminal leukemia
Button
to sleep after its health deteriorated,
Heidi had to be put to sleep
Naira,
wild animal sanctuary in North Carolina
five young men
would never plot a terror attack.
five young men
Omar al-Bashir
Yanina Wickmayer
Justine Henin
end of the galaxy to another,
1,200 photos,
an edge-on view of the plane of our galaxy, complete with points of interests such as the 12-billion-year-old, star-packed globular cluster Omega Centauri and the beautiful, reddish Rosette Nebula.
"link the sky we can all see with the deep, 'hidden' cosmos that astronomers study on a daily basis,"
"He gave away everything. He did not even have a home to live in."
"commercialize and thereby demean
Gandhi's personal items
"Sex and the City"
relationships
an assistant professor of human and community development,
denial, contemplation, preparation, action and maintenance.
leaving
that physically leaving a relationship entails more than a woman's decision to embrace change and prioritizing her own safety. The abuser can affect her decisions, as can children, who can motivate her to return to the relationship,
Find an activity that calms my mind without giving my weary body a chance to nod off.
tai chi
Japanese photographer and activist Shuuichi
the government has complied with all the agreements reached last year and the doctors have no reason to strike,
still very proud of Obama
LZ Granderson is a senior
Black
"Cradlesong,"
how no one knew who we were. We had sold 8 million records. I don't know if we were being naive at the time, but we thought we'd won because our songs were more famous than we were.
an elite eight-man showpiece
More than 250,000
Facebook users should be skeptical of this concept:
their part in a tainted milk scandal
tainted
at least 181
at least 181 fatalities.
Kita Aoyama Salon
the beaten track.
(CNN)
drawer
camel
"Rare: Portraits of America's Endangered Species,"
worked for the National Geographic Society
Dr. Conrad Murray
says he is
two Pentagon police officers
screening area outside the Pentagon
coffee
his offices in the upscale resort community
Dennis Ray Gerwing
the land
spread the dirt
over a stage the size of a basketball court
Joe Pantoliano
a drug distribution network in Chicago.
The sailors
reached the North Pole
bronze medal in the women's figure skating final,
She wasn't the best "coach," and she was kind of picky, but she had such a good eye,
sometimes she was a pain in the ass,"
Harold Pinter
over a 24-year period.
kept her and their children in captivity and burned the body of the dead infant in an oven in the house.
cellar
Haiti's
operating under a visual flight rules plan
drugs when they haven't seen him take the drug or anyone who administered it."
'I just want to get some sleep. You don't understand. I just want to be able to be knocked out and go to sleep.'
stuffed inside a garbage bag in a public storage facility in Vienna Township,
Tiger
sponsors
overhaul health care, education and energy policy.
prescriptions for five controlled substances
"poster child" for the problem of addicts
ongoing knee problem.
£1.175 million
Hofstra University
part of the incident
Terry Gilliam, Darren Aronofsky, Paul Greengrass
more than two
Dave Gibbons,
Zack Snyder.
killer who is searching for the last Hostess Twinkie
Jesse Eisenberg and Woody Harrelson
appearance, but this story will avoid spoiling the
Brazil
Ambani, the Walt Disney Co. and loans made by a syndicate of banks.
Dave Dineen
mankind into unknown territory with dangerous ramifications
worry the ability to reprogram our biochemistry could lead mankind into unknown territory
create personalized medicine, detect illnesses
Biotechnology advances
little-known music genre.
Ricky Gervais
NBA's Most Valuable Player
media panel,
the NBA's Most Valuable Player for the second year
writing of the melodies in the songs,
"And Winter Came,"
or 30
Two business travelers
"Baby Justice" or "Baby Angel."
"Baby Angel."
Turkish President Abdullah Gul,
Kurdistan Freedom Falcons, known as TAK,
Kurdish militant group
Beijing, China
the plane's electronics had failed and that he was forced to glide it to the ground.
agreed to limit its recommendation to the low end of the guidelines
man affiliated with the Anonymous hacking group
Saskatchewan
Player of the Year
Cristiano Ronaldo
of keeping his daughter in a cellar for decades and fathering
he raped his daughter, kept her and their children in captivity and burned the body of the dead infant in an oven in the house.
LaRose
Colorado woman indicted on terror charges
massive oil spill growing
about 100
administration
second-floor lobby of Kerr Hall
Half of the trending
Barack Obama won the Nobel Peace Prize
stopped at the U.S. border for about eight minutes,
one firefighter had a criminal record, raising questions about whether he could enter the United States.
has defended its practice of using organs donated by
Corporal Matthew Millington,
is deeply disturbed by reports that Liu Xiaobo has been formally arrested and charged with serious crimes,"
an accident in his home
win the prestigious Ballon d'Or award
named the best player in Europe,
an estimated 70 people
more than 120
Marguerite Bay, Antarctica,
Marguerite Bay, Antarctica,
about 900 miles
attacks
associated with Clinton,
"high-end Hollywood dinner-party gossip" that former President Clinton "has been seen visiting" her in California.
"Todd Purdum's
daughter.
playing games
"Pinball HD"
that samples of certain Chinese drywall gave off a sulfurous odor from "volatile sulfur compounds" when exposed to extreme heat and moisture. It also found that vapors "in the residential atmosphere created a corrosive environment in the presence of moisture."
copper wiring,
'you can't stay there anymore, because you're sick every minute,'"
55 mph (90 kph),
Pennsylvania man attempted to resuscitate "a road-killed opossum,"
Donald J. Wolfe,
food thermometer
E. coli
12-0
kidnapped, raped and murdered
the death penalty
women's rights
Goldman's then-wife, Bruna Bianchi Carneiro Ribeiro,
Bruna Bianchi Carneiro Ribeiro,
not have jurisdiction over who should have custody
an autobiography.
We laughed our way through five years of great joy, great entertainment, and we got some wonderful awards during the years and the beauty of it all was that when we came in this season, we knew we were going to do 13 shows and be out. So the writing reflected the fact that we knew we were ending and it wrapped the whole show up.
with the National Transportation Safety Board announced Sunday that the World War II-era plane was equipped with data and video recording devices that they hope to use to help determine
No
Haiti farmers
Montevideo, Uruguay
Harry Truman
Vibration
"Didn't It Feel Kinder"
folk-oriented touchstones.
Sotomayor would add broader life experiences to the
makes decisions together.
Monday.
a series of mental and physical
majority of our
Christians
Puritans, Roman Catholics and Dutch Reformed to Quakers, Baptists, Presbyterians, Swedish Lutherans, Anglicans, Huguenots,
was published on the entertainment
an expensive, artery-clogging brunch,
healthful goodies.
models, such as the 1969 GTO, helped usher in the era of the muscle cars,
nearly the opposite
unusually warm tropical Atlantic surface temperatures
coming summer and fall could be an "active to extremely active" hurricane season in the
14 and 23 storms
$31 million
little over $11,000
for a problem in which the cars' gas pedals could get stuck
software glitch
Without issuing a
a software glitch
University of Maryland-College Park chemistry
extend its commitment of about 2,500 troops until 2011
commitment of about 2,500 troops
Soccer
early Wednesday
November 2007,
some populations' genetic makeup may
in Durham, North Carolina,
AR Rahman picked up two
Chennai,
landed a company plane in the ocean
wave of openness makes things worse, we tell ourselves that the answer is even more publicity,
mid-1970s,
between 1950 and 1980.
The presidential handshake between Barack Obama and Hugo Chavez
some important groundwork.
crude oil production
called for a meat boycott,
construction of a mosque
protective
protective clothing,
"I hit hard,"
to name the team's new mascot
Three people
kidnapped and brutally murdered a 7-year-old Georgia girl
"I would like to apologize for everything I have done,"
whether the bad economic times are fueling the unusual spike.
Bank robberies in New York
"major retreat" from protections against self-incrimination guaranteed by the original Miranda ruling.
FlashBauer38: I am glad to see Starbucks finally realized you only need one store per city block. I personally do not like or go to Starbucks. I normally get my coffee from Dunkin Donuts on the way to work or buy grounds from them to make at home ... for a reasonable price. I already have to spend $4 a gallon on gas, why would I spend $4 for 12 oz of coffee?
sixth
Katherine Heigl and Gerard Butler
Uma Singh,
asked the government to investigate the case and prosecute death threats against other journalists.
North
Tim Hetherington
Alicia Keys
1995
man accused of killing 77 people in a terrorist rampage
Madrid area
died after being gored in the neck during the annual running of the bulls
NAACP Vice Chair Roslyn Brock
Frank Martinez Garcia
The X-ray machine,
The X-ray machine
Loma Prieta earthquake.
Dwayne Carter,
12 parking lots across Santa Barbara
a wrecked Prius
animal cruelty, allowing an animal to roam freely and rendering animal waste without a license.
He'd cuss and scream.
14 grand slam men's singles titles
14
a few hours
Egypt.
the military's
the Thai government.
worst flooding to hit the country in half a century,
was a Ku Klux Klan initiation rite
wreckage.
torrent of rain poured down
France, Spain and Australia, as well as the far-flung suburbs of Los Angeles,
Penn Badgley,
ruled out for two weeks with a hamstring injury
Wednesday,
NFL players
high blood pressure or borderline hypertension
storm known as Rina
Continued weakening
30 miles an
forced nudity
aggressive interrogation techniques
Alice Horton
her decades-long portrayal of Alice Horton on
28,
held for security reasons and not because of their faith.
six
President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad's government
women and children.
Brian Bordainick
Katrina battered Carver High School in New Orleans, Louisiana,
the toughest stage of this year's Paris-Nice cycling classic
that carry women only
MEXICO CITY,
four major lines in the city,
made their opposition
Kaka bid,
third place
R.E.M.
bypassed big marketing,
Illinois State police
IHOP
railway safety and its fast development of rail systems.
Mofaz
Benfica
Marrowbone, Kentucky,
empowering
highlight the conditions in which women were being forced
Oman.
Cabinet-level American official to go to Libya since the ouster of longtime strongman Moammar Gadhafi.
they helped the bombers
1.6 billion
existing natural canals
"The loss of a talented 24-year-old young man like Greg, amid such tragic circumstances,
"The loss of a talented 24-year-old young man like Greg, amid such tragic circumstances, is painful for all of us throughout the game,"
Pinki Sonkar.
India-based
45 minutes,
45 minutes, five days a week.
in Britain
October
Dozens of major celebrities
inaugural
the carriage
Banana
John Madden is retiring,
an ebullient football commentator.
football commentator.
world No. 1.
Serbian
eat three to four servings a day of low-fat
Hank Williams
Ayortor,
Oklahoma State Rep. Sally Kern
directs you through a simple registration process and asks you to write a short description of your clip.
Serb-born football agent, the international football federation,
11
11 people, including two Spanish professional
20 percent.
12.2 percent
East Lansing campus
setting fire to an agriculture research building on the Michigan State University campus
Alfred Nobel,
"The $58,000 brooch... The $27,100 suitcase...
Sharon Tate
in 1977
Wednesday
Syria's membership was "a responsible and well-timed step that put forth the gravity of the situation."
clashes with personnel loyal to al-Assad in several areas.
Brandon Routh
Roy Bennett,
Bennett,
northwestern city of Skhirat,
the union of a man and a woman.
federal law that defines marriage as the union of a man and a woman.
"a legal union between one man and one woman as husband and wife"
for carrying on King's ideals and values and confronting issues including bullying and social and economic justice for all Americans.
(D)
Utah: District 03
Jared Polis
James Carville
Thursday,
victims of Myanmar's cyclone
Mumbai
31-year-old Ecuadorean man
Jose Sucuzhanay was hit in the head with a bottle and beaten with an aluminum baseball bat on December 7.
wanted to help everyone and hired a diverse team,
the West Side of Chicago
provided about 500 people a year with food, rent, utilities and other necessities.
at
Iran
Abdolfattah Soltani,
11 pounds
Circus performers
$89,770
Physics
$81,880
Xe,
autism spectrum disorders
Air India
a 24-year-old flight attendant
bluntly stated that he knew of no new weapons systems going to Hezbollah."
Tuesday
Omid
U.S.
the smallest player on the pitch,
Werder Bremen
1950s hit television shows.
Rafael Nadal
Rafael Nadal
4 pancreatic
Gabriel Thomas from
only of the submissive variety
for Achievement in African Leadership
proven hit makers such as R. Kelly, Alicia Keys, Akon and Johnta Austin.
"God takes care of his children."
destroying his McCain sign."
U.S. military personnel
of hundreds of the fallen were burned and dumped in the landfill.
flowers, cuddly toys
jungle
17 counts of identity theft, bank fraud, credit card fraud
17 counts of identity theft, bank fraud, credit card fraud and
All my life I have used Oil of Olay as my
Oil of Olay
Georgia
1,250
700-plus
Steven Gerrard
swift economic gains and the government's push for the construction of telephone and broadband lines in the country's vast rural areas,
never actually been to a women's basketball game.
the Huskies
Moscow
model train
not extend their lines of credit,
closure of two of his 11 London eateries.
ten
80,000
1985,
Arsenal
Palestinian youth are to youth all over the world.
more than 1,000 members of the 100th Battalion, 442nd RCT,
141st
Three
near Corpus Christi, Texas,
Berenson
Losers are some kind of CIA black ops squad,
David Wilhelm,
death penalty
"He and I held hands constantly for 13 years,"
famous paintings
heist
Paul Cezanne, Edgar Degas, Claude Monet
YouTube video
ridiculous way she reacted in opposing ways last week to two political heavyweights who used the word "retard."
near the village of Wanat,
Britney Spears,
Christian pop."
an industry that is now accused of "sexualizing" young girls.
the Maoists -- which won the largest number of seats but fell short of a majority
Kiran Mazumdar-Shaw,
Biotech
I can't wait for these parents to be reunited with their baby,"
on the fifth day, January 16, witnesses saw a cleanup crew rescue Jenny from the rubble.
Jenny
earthquake
Scott Olsen,"
at least 22 people,
Don't Run" and "Hawaii Five-O"
But the band, which played almost solely instrumentals, was perhaps more influential for its albums. Thirty-eight of the band's long-players hit Billboard's Top 200 chart, including albums that covered country songs, dance tunes and Christmas melodies. One of the band's albums was titled "Play Guitar with the Ventures," and countless
"Walk
Andrey Arshavin
India
U.S. to join with China against greenhouse gases.
United States and China
magnitude 7.2 (earthquake) that occurred on April 4" near Mexicali,
She died in
David Goldman
more than two dozen satellite phones and a pledge of U.S. commitment
more than two dozen satellite phones and a pledge of U.S. commitment
his third successive world player of the year title.
Maria Davis
Ted Stanke
readers
July.
far apart,
hammers, chisels and bare hands
"30 Rock"
Japanese Finance Minister Naoto Kan
Japanese Finance Minister Naoto Kan
worldwide fan base
Barnes & Noble's
It can read a user's PDFs, as well as the 1 million-plus books,
and severe mistreatment at the notorious Abu Ghraib prison
Wu-Tang
an independent state for minority Tamils in Sri Lanka
rebels
"The first thing you start with was the e-mail address. In this case, it's an e-mail address from Live.com, which is Microsoft,"
Spain's
he will not apologize
to Congress
"would never
trying to take off,
remains of another victim,
a count by Regional Disaster Risk Reduction and Management Council.
repairs to seats aboard planes
near West Hollywood Station
questioning whether Romel will ever be able
using planes with landing-gear doors that had not been repaired
crashed
only one person
bag with flotation and communication devices,
"The oceans are an unforgiving environment,"
she never saw so many cute firemen and paramedics in her life,"
Mandy Moore and rocker Ryan Adams
girlfriend.
downtown Tokyo,
fishing
"Thriller,"
"Off the Wall,"
the most sophisticated devices capable of identifying explosives, guns, knives and other such items anywhere
Rynek Starego Miasta,
Billingsley
shopping mall
inquiry
press
Japanese whaling fleets and conservation agencies
Japanese ship "Shonan Maru 2"
"Enter the Void,"
"Enter the Void,"
"Last Night"
a panel of musicians, producers, writers and record label bosses,
a relay across the English Channel.
a president has resigned,
Germany
powers of the reigning head of state
the 41-year-old actress posing with rock-hard abs and a big bottle of the pricey
A British soldier
President George W. Bush
Secretary Michael Chertoff
seized a cargo aircraft carrying tons of weapons from North
Kazakhstan
Donington Park
Johnny Depp
"delighted for our customers.
Thursday
December 2008,
"Star Wars"
four extra
10th floor of the hotel on Central Park South.
the drilling is dangerous and a threat to the environment.
"Prepare as much of the food ahead of time so you can enjoy the party,"
"Prepare as much of the food
"Prepare as much of the food ahead of time so you can enjoy the party,"
about a dozen
British troops in Iraq are being pulled out because the agreement
organized with the consent of
the event,
major winter storm
0.08.
cricket stadium
Sri Lankan
Secretary LaHood
Federal Aviation Administrator Randy Babbitt
13 members of the UEFA executive committee.
move to dissolve parliament and dismiss the prime minister.
Pakistan's ruling coalition
Prince Alwaleed Bin Talal Alsaud
Arab world.
two
CIA contractor
undocumented student from Mexico
Adam Yahiye Gadahn, also known as Azzam the American,
Adam Yahiye Gadahn,
a new imaging camera
Catwoman
"Batman: Arkham City"
Fariha Waseem
people
Lionel Messi
Chelsea,
old village tribunals
1994
156 people
156 people
Several hundred people
built-in LED,
nonprofit organization whose motto is "Ideas worth spreading."
President Bill Clinton,
the government's new import rules
Multiple tropical systems have moved over the area
Satsuma, Florida, home.
Crystal Sheffield,
then-Sen. Obama
"It was reported to the FBI,"
one night, after one of
Kids' mental
February 27.
constitutional right of privacy indirectly referenced in the 14th Amendment
old nude photos of Nancy Benoit,
Gulf of Mexico
shop at the Salvation Army
between maintaining a friendship and breaking the bank.
stimulus money is being misdirected at Hanford.
This remotely controlled robot, called BEAR,
rape, sexual exploitation of a child, endangering child welfare and assault.
she has terminal lung cancer,
Rep. Julia Carson,
There was no containment on the blaze,
Haitians living in America
seals equipped with electronic tags and robotic mini submarines
ended last month,
Authorities in Iran
Smith, Junnier and Tesler pleaded guilty to federal charges of conspiracy to violate civil rights resulting in death. Smith and Junnier also pleaded guilty to state charges of voluntary manslaughter and making false statements,
increase the rubber supply
Brazil.
the weapons program at Livermore,
"Twenty-two percent of federal waters in the Gulf remain closed because we have not yet determined it's safe" to eat seafood from there,
"Our first goal is to do no harm,"
Barcelona's
Dmitry
Vladimir Putin's
Moscow
the United States
uranium
is believed to be dead,
national elections
Bernie Madoff,
compulsive gambling
He was taken to the hospital
Sectarian rioting
Northern Ireland
forbidden to use any drugs or alcohol
not allowed to leave his home other than to visit his attorney,
65th
should be able to preserve the original hem,"
13-year-old Serhat Tokay
turbulent flight
A 47-year-old woman
deep compassion and regret
Colin Powell:
The government
new, different and better regulations
200
further assess and evaluate the damage that resulted from their collision at sea,"
Massachusetts Institute of Technology
November 27.
a strange object in the night sky: a bright, gaseous mass with a gaping hole in its middle.
a "cosmic ghost"
Netflix announced this week that it's splitting itself in two and rebranding its movies-by-mail service as "Qwikster."
price
this latest effort didn't make things much better.
Wednesday,
Barcelona
Nyon, Switzerland
that ended a grinding war between the Sudanese government and southern rebels in the Sudan People's Liberation Movement.
Kim Jong Il,
a plane
people don't fit into the neat categories outlined by the U.S. Census.
Pennsylvania
"Plasma Pat"
December 1989.
"For the past two weeks or so, the seismic activity at Redoubt volcano has significantly decreased,"
small World War II-era plane
pay, benefits and staffing levels.
that if anything ever happened, he wanted to be able to "do something about it."
the gunman,
Tuesday,
Bell Pottinger,
50,000
United States and the Netherlands
F-15
coalition forces,"
no increase
Atlanta,
her home
sexual intercourse,
"The Simpsons Movie"
Sen. Charles Schumer, D-New York,
$10 to $20 per gram,
$10 to $20 per gram,
was the
determining their overall structure
must be held accountable for the $160 million in bonus payments.
you're already paying your mobile operator for data transfer.
estimated $22 billion
released. The film offers plenty of opportunities to remember the renegade journalist,
violence
Potential wiring hazards in wheel wells that could cause fires or problems
200
a wannabe mobster
Shahar Peer
Fakka oil field
rating
estimates 200,000 women and girls have been
post-traumatic stress disorder and depression,
they were discriminated against after a promotion test was thrown out, because critics said it discriminated against minority firefighters.
Ernesto Bertarelli
in Granada, Madrid, Malaga, Oviedo, Salamanca, Valencia and counting.
Spain
iCloud service
claimed one victory
inactivity of bank cards, credit cards and cellphones since they vanished
Parallel Cinema.
the 1959 graduates
policies
text messages and e-mails
launched an online reporting system that lets users upload cell phone images of alleged police abuses.
fatal shooting of an unarmed man in Oakland, California,
Pervez Musharraf's
parents
"negrito."
a racial slur.
Woods' wife, Elin Nordegren.
she is romantically involved with the golf superstar
Tiger Woods' mistress
"not a word of it is true."
Fungal disease
a corn-gluten mix
Symptoms: Brown turf
you. If it's a humid day, it's a very difficult task to get through the number that I do. The wind, if there's any air current in there and you're expecting to catch a ring and it blows an inch, you miss it."
Pennsylvania
Beverly Center,
cousin
that would crack down on convicts caught with phones and allow prison systems to monitor and detect cell signals.
grabbed him
She first injects a sample of "wild virus"-- in this case, H1N1 virus she got from the CDC,
Barcelona
Jose Mourinho
moved to within a point of third-placed Valencia,
shock,
June 23.
"It saddens me because I believed in him and a number of people believed in him,"
lawmakers
the reality he has seen is "terrifying."
Grozny, Chechnya,
companion with him
Cleveland
Senate
Obama
steer people away from "dirty" sex toward eco-sex.
"People should eat oysters as an aphrodisiac instead,"
North Korean government
Christmas Eve.
as many as 55 people
data could wrongly lead some people to believe flying is unsafe.
Zoya Phan,
the sale of counterfeit goods through the eBay accounts.
the Americans' revolutionary wing sail
in Dubai at the Month World
students' right to freedom of religion.
Saturday.
money laundering
depositing drug money in French banks and using drug money
murder and human rights abuse
Central and South America,
At least 441
Republicans had proposed during the failed Clinton-era push to overhaul health care.
pope is not coming to get mixed up in the local political process,"
At least 236 people
the first player from the United States to be signed by the Serie A giants and is a rising talent in world football.
captured by pirates
U.S.-flagged cargo
world's tiniest sailboat
in poverty-stricken communities in India
Journalists saw shell fire coming from AMISOM -- the African Union Mission in Somalia
least 30
Clarke County,
Peruvian Lodge
with strangulation marks.
five
100,000 British pounds
of flights that it plans to operate during the walkout.
Jean-Francois Cope,
in New York
Andy Rooney
the November massacre at Fort Hood, Texas.
animation.
Jeremy Chardy
to control clashes between the clubs' supporters.
contractors were involved in the September 2007 shooting in Baghdad's Nisoor Square that left 17 civilians dead.
recycled plane parts
are a rich source of spare parts for MotoArt to create their functional furniture.
more than 110.
Duke Ellington,
Mount Redoubt, a volcano in southern Alaska,
is another sleek, finely-tuned and beautifully-designed driving machine, offering sporty performance and Euro-style luxury.
two customs officials at JFK International Airport
no
5 p.m. Wednesday,
Saturday
minister, Bjorgvin Sigurdsson,
Eric Bana and Rachel McAdams
Bana and McAdams
Liguria
Tuesday,
save millions of lives
a fully artificial heart
expect a president who bypasses the traditional media's filters while reaching out to citizens for input,
he was trying to sneak into the isolated communist state to bring a message of "Christ's love and forgiveness" to North Korean leader Kim Jong Il.
Juan Almeida,
Continental Flight 128
Brian David Mitchell,
"The Da Vinci Code"
Dan Brown's mega-selling novels
He was 95.
Twenty-year-old Jose Espinosa and 32-year-old Otis Blunt,
audiotaped
Port-au-Prince,
Belgium coach
Dick Advocaat
Lung cancer
Russia
showing her dancing against a stripper's pole.
Beirut's fashionable seaside Corniche district,
all-wheel drive capability
wealth and anonymity.
"While I was led to believe that Gates was lawfully in the residence, I was quite surprised and confused with the behavior he exhibited toward me,"
Sen. Kay Bailey Hutchison.
his wife Amy and three kids
reflex sympathetic dystrophy.
tense relations between Washington and Tel Aviv,
once-in-50-years snowstorm
effectiveness of the New Deal.
battling Stage 4 breast cancer
Apple
Thursday.
Building another airfield
"Boston Legal," "Dexter," "House" and "Lost."
formerly known as Ron Artest will officially become
cinematic single-player
at Swansea
assassination
the same rights
Brian O'Dwyer,
five women whose bodies have been
first-degree murder
Sunday
on March 6,
Training
"How to Never Look Fat Again."
to teach others through my life is that it's important to see past appearances.
prisoners being held by the government and a pullout of government security forces from the tribal areas.
Mark Webber
Eduardo da Silva
FBI
works almost every muscle in the body.
Nikkei index fell 124 points,
raise the gear and [reset] flaps
more than 80
to commit more U.S. troops to the ongoing war in Afghanistan,
co-wrote
Some of the suspects
Atlanta,
"The Walking Dead" showrunner/executive
iconic doll,
10 stamps which feature iconic album covers.
racial equality
moved to within a point of German Bundesliga leaders Bayer Leverkusen
Putin
first African-American first lady.
turned the failing calculus program at Garfield High School in east Los Angeles into one of the top in the nation.
Hernandez scored the only goal of the game
Kashmir
1996 runners-up Czech Republic and Slaven Bilic's Croatia.
Glasgow.
$106 million in company money
Rehman
Libya, Bahrain
a 7-year-old girl.
fills out tax returns and keeps the books balanced
rebellious,
Rio de Janeiro:
Candy Spelling:
a South Korean cargo ship
change the very startling and distressing issues facing most African-American children and adults in America.
in predominantly Muslim Mindanao,
London's Tate Modern gallery
Cyclone Nargis,
GDP
but they got their speed that makes up for the lack of smarts,"
the ability to search for hotel and car rental reservations,
effortlessly chic style and exotic good looks.
Lars Vilks
Ed McMahon has been hospitalized for more than three weeks with pneumonia and other
of drowning, is
Benjamin LeBaron,
"There are more important things than the people that have done this to us or
Sadek.
how to come together and how to unify this party and move forward
Syrian National Council,
sexually explicit
Jerry
captain, Jake Branam; his wife, Kelly;
Supreme Court to have Blagojevich declared unfit to serve if he does not resign.
NASA's inspector general
"save or create"
Lee Hui-ho
sleep better,
filed for dissolution of domestic partnership,
"I've flown in a lot of planes and that was a phenomenal landing,"
Kenya
District of Columbia public
the workplace good and leads to gains instead of losses.
